WV Code 6B-2-5(b) Use of public office for private gain., provides in part that ... A public official or public employee may not knowingly and intentionally use his or her office or the prestige of his or her office for his or her own private gain or that of another person.

In Advisory Opinion 95-40, the Ethics Commission ruled that an association of public servants is bound by the same ethical standards that apply to its constituent members.  The Commission also ruled that an association of public servants may not perform an act which its members are prohibited from performing.  Further, public servants may not use surrogates to perform activities which they are personally precluded from doing.  In this instance, both organizations and their individual members are subject to the requirements of the Ethics Act.

The Ethics Act contains a prohibition against the use of office for private financial gain.  It says that public servants may not use the prestige or influence of their public positions for their own private financial gain or that of their friends, relatives, business associates or political allies.

However, public servants may use the influence of their public positions for charitable purposes or those which provide significant public benefit.  For example, sales solicitations by or on behalf of law enforcement officers are an entirely appropriate and commendable way for those officers to make a contribution to the charitable needs of their communities.

Generally, lending the influence of their positions to sales which benefit the poor and disadvantaged is the kind of conduct the public has come to associate with law enforcement officers.  However, the use of the officers? prestige in sales solicitations is a use of office and it would be improper for money raised in such a way to be used by the officers for their own private gain.

Funds raised by the Association or Fund through activities which rely heavily on the prestige of its members may only be used for charitable purposes or those which result in significant public benefit.

In the context of this particular inquiry, the Commission finds that sales of shirts and caps bearing the Association logo necessarily involves use of the prestige or influence of their public law enforcement positions. Solicitation of such sales, whether in or out of uniform, on or off duty, may result in use of office for private gain, unless the sales proceeds are used exclusively for charitable purposes.

The purposes for which donations from private individuals may be used depend on the amount of the donation and its source.  Donations of $25 or less may be used by the Fund for any lawful purpose, assuming the donor has not directed such gifts to be used for charitable purposes.

The requester should note that the Association and Fund  must segregate the proceeds of any fund- raising activities, if  they come from different types of fund-raisers - based on whether use of office was involved.  Funds generated by the use of office must be spent only for charitable purposes or those with significant public benefit.  Funds generated without the use of office may be spent on any lawful purpose.

First, due to the nature of their authority and the duties they perform, law enforcement officials must be particularly careful in avoiding any appearance of offering special treatment in exchange for purchases or donations.  Second, the State agency which employs these officers is free to adopt rules and policies that are more restrictive than the limitations in the Ethics Act.  Nothing in this Advisory Opinion should be construed as directing the agency to permit its officers to conduct charitable solicitations or sales for charitable purposes while on duty and in uniform.

The corporation uses public education campaigns and political lobbying to protect the right to choose in accordance with Roe v. Wade, ensure and increase accessibility to birth control and pre-natal care, and improve education on reproductive choices.

The first step in deciding whether a public servant may accept the offer of a gift is to determine whether it comes from an interested person.  The Ethics Act places no restrictions on accepting gifts, unless the gift comes from an interested person.  A gift which does not come, directly or indirectly, from an interested person may be accepted.  However, a gift from an interested person may not be accepted by a public servant, unless the gift fits into one of several specific exemptions provided for by the Legislature.

The Employee has been invited to join a group traveling to China under the auspices of a private sector, nonpolitical organization dedicated to fostering international understanding.  The trip will take ten days and will focus on electronic commerce.  Delegation members are required to pay their own travel expenses.

WV Code 6B-2-5(c) Gifts. -- (1) A public official or public employee may not solicit any gift unless the solicitation is for a charitable purpose with no resulting direct pecuniary benefit conferred upon the official or employee or his or her immediate family ...

The Ethics Act prohibits public servants from soliciting a gift, unless it is for a charitable purpose.  The China trip is not a charitable purpose and the Employee may not solicit financial support for the project from public or private sources.

It would not be a violation of the Ethics Act for the Agency to secure, or its members to accept, discounts on health related services and products which are a part of a workplace preventive health care program.

The Agency asks whether it may solicit financial support for the project from vendors or other interested persons, or may apply for grants from established grant programs underwritten by interested persons.

The first consideration must be whether the trip will significantly enhance the traveler's occupational skill or knowledge or provide important information needed by the agency to meet its official mandate.  Public employees and officials who have been offered trips should consult with their supervisor or agency head for guidance in making this judgment.

If the trip was conceived and scheduled by the agency prior to and independent of the offer of payment from a third party, then it is likely that the trip is necessary to the agency's official activities.

The skill, knowledge or information to be gained from the trip should meet a clear immediate need of the agency.  The information should be of immediate value to current or planned activities of the agency rather than theoretically valuable to activities that are neither current nor planned for the foreseeable future.

A trip is appropriate for the traveler who needs and will use the information or job skill enhancement or who is the agency employee most suitable to acquire and transfer the information or skill to other appropriate agency personnel.

Central to this inquiry is a consideration of whether the trip is a reasonable means of meeting the agency's needs.  For example, it would not be reasonable for the agency to send its personnel to an out of state resort to obtain information that is readily available locally.

This consideration also applies to part-time officials and employees who might travel outside official work hours.  If they accept inappropriate free trips offered because of their public positions they may violate the Ethics Act's prohibition against using the prestige of office for private gain.

If the incidental personal benefit to the traveler outweighs the benefit to the agency, then the trip is in reality a gift to the traveler and not the agency.  In such a case the trip should not be accepted because it is a gift to the individual of more than nominal value.

A safe rule would be to limit acceptance to only expenses that the agency itself would accept for reimbursement, i.e. reasonable food, travel, lodging, and attendance fees.  First class airfares, deluxe accommodations, and other perks not associated with the basic travel, meals, and lodging required by the trip would increase the incidental benefit to the traveler.

The Commission reached the same result in Advisory Opinion 2001-04, an opinion decided today, which told a County Commissioner that the County Commission and its subordinate agencies could not use public funds to pay the cost of commemorative parties, including cocktails and formal dinners.

It is clear from the Legislative mandate that service on an Institutional Board of Advisers will require considerable personal sacrifice.  In spite of this demanding commitment, the Legislature specifically provided that Board Member were to serve without compensation, allowing them only reimbursement for reasonable expenses incurred in carrying out their Board duties.

The State Agency has received funding from the Legislature which will cover two-thirds of the cost of renovating a state museum.  The museum was established to collect, document, present, preserve, and promote the State of West Virginia in every aspect of its archaeology, art, culture, geology, history, paleontology, and socio-economic background representing the industries, land and people.

The museum exhibits will be available to all without charge.  The State Agency proposes to employ an individual whose duties will include working with the Museum Foundation, a private non-profit corporation, to raise funds to complete a major renovation of the museum.

Association is planning a conference to celebrate its 25th anniversary.  The Association has previously held annual conferences at which vendors set up displays to provide information to Association members concerning available products and services.

The Commission has previously determined that associations primarily comprised of public servants must adhere to the same standards in the Ethics Act as the public servants themselves.  The Ethics Act prohibits public servants from soliciting gifts, unless the solicitation is made for a charitable purpose from which neither the solicitor nor his or her immediate family members benefit directly.

The Agency is responsible for advancing the use of technology in the operation of government and in the delivery of government services to the public.   It is authorized to convene conferences which will encourage utilization of technology and it plans a two day conference which revolves around an exposition or trade show affording access to the products of over one hundred vendors.

A similar conference held last year attracted an audience in excess of 800 drawn from government agencies, the education system, private business community and the public. That conference was paid for with vendor registration fees, registration fees from those attending and Agency operational funds.  Budget constraints have reduced funds available from the Agency and it wants to increase private financial support from the vendors involved in the expo.

The Agency proposes that vendor registration fees be established at several increasingly more costly levels commensurate with increasing levels of service and presence at the conference.   The basic registration fee would provide a display area for products and promotional materials and minimal advertising space in conference literature and materials.  Each successively higher level would provide more space, additional benefits and increased advertising prominence.

However, the Commission recognizes that a sales solicitation which offers value is not a solicitation of a gift.  The Commission dealt with that issue in AO 95-18 when another State agency asked whether its personnel could (1) solicit private entities to co-sponsor social events or donate gifts for a regional conference of governmental agencies or (2) solicit advertising space or exhibit space at the conference.

The Commission finds that participation in what is essentially a trade show affords private sector vendors a genuine opportunity to market their products.  The sale of graduated registrations is not the solicitation of a gift, but a straight forward sale of the right to participate in sales promotion of private sector products and participating vendors receive value for their fees.

An Association seeks to have a river system in their area reclassified to a less restrictive water quality level in the belief that this will enhance economic development.  The Association submitted a complete and appropriately documented application for a review and reclassification of the river system and made an oral presentation before the Regulatory Board.

An agency of State government has been established to initiate and help present year 2000 activities, events and gatherings which will promote and create a positive image of the State, its people and its business prospects.  Some activities will be exclusive to the celebration, but the majority will be associated with existing fairs, festivals, and celebrations.

While the State is providing substantial public funding for the project, it is expected that the private sector will supply significant support as well.  The private sector volunteers have been soliciting financial support as well as a private, for profit, fund raiser.

The Governor, the Senate President and the Speaker of the House are honorary co-chairs of the project and each would like to encourage private sector support of the project.  Recognizing that they, as public servants,  may not solicit financial support, they never the less ask whether they may send a letter to private companies and individuals to facilitate the solicitations being made by the private volunteers and the paid fund raiser.

The requester is employed by a State University.  He is also a voting member of the City Council in the municipality where his employer is located and has been elected by the Council to serve as Mayor.

The City Council has been asked to authorize a tax-free bond to finance an apartment building which will be built by a non-profit corporation.  The non-profit corporation plans to lease these apartments to students and faculty from the State University.  Further, any profits generated by the building will be given to the State University.  Finally, when the bonds which financed construction of the building are fully paid off, the State University may purchase the building for $1.

The State Agency promotes growth, attraction and retention of private businesses on a statewide basis.  One division within the agency is dedicated to facilitating small business development.  As part of this effort, the agency provides various specialized training courses to business people throughout the state.  The agency charges fees for these classes.

In Advisory Opinions 95-05 and 95-28, the Commission authorized a public servant or agency to enter into arrangements that provided certain benefits to private businesses.  In each case, the Commission concluded that the agreements involved an overriding public benefit sufficient to legitimize any resulting private gain.  Thus, even where some element of private gain is involved, the Commission has discretion to conclude that the public benefit outweighs any potential for improper private gain.

The Commission further finds that decisions on whether an overriding public benefit exists in situations such as this must be decided on a case-by-case basis.  Therefore, this opinion is limited to the particular facts and circumstances presented by the requester, and may not be relied upon as a precedent by other persons.

A City Council Member asks whether the presiding officer of a City Council may require him to vote when he has moved to abstain from voting on matters in which he has a good faith basis to believe that in casting a vote he may be violating the Ethics Act.  The City Council Member further inquires whether he has immunity from an administrative enforcement action under the Ethics Act if he has been directed to vote by the presiding officer.

The City has implemented rules which govern parliamentary procedure for meetings. An elected member of the City Council may move to abstain from voting on matters in which they have a personal pecuniary interest.

Pursuant to the procedural rules adopted by the City, the presiding officer rules on whether to grant or deny a motion to abstain.  The City interprets its rules to require the member to vote if the presiding officer so directs.  The City further interprets its rules as requiring the vote to be cast even if the elected City Council Member believes that in so casting the vote he or she is violating the Ethics Act.

The Ethics Act prohibits a public servant  from using his or her office for private gain.  The Act further prohibits, with limited exceptions, a public servant from having an interest in the profits or benefits of a public contract.

The requester of this opinion also inquires whether he or she has immunity from the Ethics Act when he or she has requested to be excused from voting, but proceeds to vote at the direction of the presiding officer.  In these circumstances, although the elected official has been directed to vote, it is the opinion of the Commission that he or she is not immune from an administrative enforcement action under the Ethics Act.

From a common sense standpoint, the Commission recognizes that where a member makes a good faith effort to recuse themselves from voting, and is then required to vote, these facts may constitute a defense to an Ethics complaint.  Still, there may be instances when the casting of a vote arises to a violation of the Ethics Act.  Any conflict between local rules or ordinances and the Ethics Act may be cured by the public official being permitted to excuse himself from voting when he or she has a good faith basis to believe that by casting the vote, he may be violating the Ethics Act.

The requester is a Division Director in a State Agency which regulates motor vehicles.   The requester has purchased a vehicle from a local automobile dealer.  The dealer has asked if the requester will provide a testimonial concerning the quality of the vehicle.  The testimonial would be in the form of an audio-taped message which may be used in a radio advertisement.  A  photograph of the requester may also be used for a print advertisement.  The requester would not be compensated for providing the testimonial nor would he use his title .

The requester, through his position as a division director, has significant responsibilities.  The requester does not directly regulate automobile dealers but is a high ranking official within the agency.

Director in his personal capacity amounts to the endorsement of a product by a State Agency.  While the requester does not intend to use his title, he has significant management responsibilities within a State Agency which regulates motor vehicles. The Commission finds that although his title would not be used, due to the prestige of his position, providing the testimonial would be construed as an endorsement of a product by a State Agency.

Since the proposed course of action constitutes the endorsement of a product by a State Agency of a commercial product, it is only permissible if it results in an overriding public benefit.  The Commission finds that the endorsement of a motor vehicle does not provide an overriding benefit to the public.  The only benefit is to the automobile dealer who would generate goodwill through the use of the testimonial of a respected member of the community.   If the requester was a private citizen, that would be acceptable.  However, due to the prestige and responsibilities of his position, he should not allow the use of his name or image for the proposed advertisements.

A City is upgrading its water treatment plant and distribution system. As part of the upgrade, an existing water storage tank will undergo extensive restoration.  Heavy machinery must be transported to the site for the restoration project.

The City has determined through engineering studies that the most effective route of ingress and egress to the water storage tank is over a parcel of property which is owned by an elected City Council Member.   The City Council Member owns two parcels of property.  The parcels are separated by a portion of property owned by the City. The strip of land owned by the City  is approximately one hundred fifty feet (150) in length and twenty (20) feet in width.  While the strip owned by the City is a potential route of ingress to the water storage tank, due to the steep grade and rocky terrain, it is not conducive to being used as a roadway. The construction of a road over this land would result in significant costs to the City.

Over the years, to gain access to the water storage tank, the public work crews have used a  route of travel which  passes over the property owned by the City Council Member.   The City Council Member has permitted the City to utilize this route without charge.  If the City acquires this property, then the route will be further improved to support the transportation of heavy construction equipment.  The City wants to legally acquire the property before expending public monies on the improvements.

The Ethics Act prohibits public servants from being a party to or having a financial interest in a public contract which they have the power to award or control.  However, the Ethics Commission has the power to grant a municipality an exemption from this prohibition where it appears that the prohibition would result in excessive cost to the public body or undue hardship.

The employees of a State Agency have formed an employee association.  The association has a booster account.  The proceeds from the booster account are used for employee picnics, parties, scholarships and donations to employees who have exhausted their sick leave.

Proceeds from vending machines fund the booster account.   The machines are located in an area of a public building which has been designated for employee use.  Due to security concerns, the public has limited access to both the facility and area in question.

The employee association arranges for the operation of the machines and receives any profits derived from them.   Due to the location of the machines, most of the profits from the vending  machines result  from purchases made by the employees, not members of the general public.

The vending machines are located in an area of the facility designated for employee use.  Revenues from the machine are generated largely from voluntary purchases made by the employees.  As members of the public have restricted access to the facility, likewise the amount of purchases they make are de minimis.  Based upon these facts, the Commission finds that it is not a violation of the Ethics Act for the employee association, at the discretion of management,  to operate the machines and retain the profits; provided, that the association reimburses the State Agency for any expenses incurred by the Agency through the operation of the machines.

The vending machines require electricity for their operation.  Public monies are used to pay for the electricity.  Therefore, the employee association needs to reimburse the State Agency for this expense.

The Commission notes that this opinion is limited to the specific facts and circumstances of this particular case, and the decision may not be relied upon by others without having first consulted with and received written confirmation from the Ethics Commission. The Commission further notes that W.Va. Code 18-10G-1 et. seq. governs the operation of food service in public buildings.  The State Agency must independently determine whether the operation of the vending machines complies with that code provision as the Commission is without authority to interpret this particular statute.

The County Board of Education is building a new high school.  The new high school will contain a state-of-the-art printing facility.  The facility will be used for instruction of the printing trade and will also provide printing services to schools throughout the state.  The facility is being funded in part via grant from the West Virginia Economic Development Authority.  It is believed that the teaching of the printing trade will  help bolster economic growth in West Virginia by establishing a trained labor force for this growing industry.

In evaluating which operating system to acquire, the board of education has  made the preliminary determination that technology developed by a German a company would best serve the needs of the school.  The German company holds a patent for the process which it has developed.  At present, no other company in the United States has this technology, nor is this system operating in the states.

The German Company is holding an open house in Germany.  It has offered to pay the cost of attending the open house for the School Superintendent, the President of the Board, the County Supervisor of Vocational Education, and the Director of Operations.

The open house is more comparable to a trade show.  At the event, the company will unveil new products.  During the course of the trip, the company will provide on site demonstrations of the equipment for the county school board representatives.  It will also take them to a local company that uses the system and provide training.  As there is no similar system in the United States, it is not possible to inspect the equipment without traveling.

In previous Advisory Opinions the Ethics Commission has approved the practice of government agencies permitting vendors to pay the expenses of agency personnel when they attend events designed to enhance their job related skills or knowledge.  For instance, in A.O. 98-18 the Commission found that it was permissible for a Public Service District (PSD) to be reimbursed by a potential vendor for the expense of key personnel attending a one day seminar on wastewater treatment equipment.

In certain instances, this practice does not violate the Ethics Act's prohibition against the acceptance of gifts because the employing agency and the public benefit significantly from the increase in the traveler's job related skills or knowledge.  Although the individual traveler benefits, it is not the type of benefit which violates the Ethics Act.

There is no improper use of office for private gain where there is an overriding public benefit to such travel and the true recipient is the governmental agency, not the individual agency traveler.  The incidental benefit to the individual is legitimized by the overriding public benefit.

The trip should represent a reasonable investment of the traveler's time when weighed against the information acquired or the degree of improvement in job skills.  A five day trip comprised of two travel days and three days of light class work would not be a reasonable way to acquire information or skills which could be adequately presented in a one day seminar.

The foregoing guidelines provide the requestor and other public servants a means of judging whether a specific offer of a trip is acceptable under the Ethics Act. Care should always be taken that no gift is tendered or accepted under facts or circumstances which could impair the impartiality and independent judgment of public servants in a particular governmental agency or give the appearance of impropriety or the creation of a quid pro quo.

The cost of leasing or purchasing the printing system technology will involve a significant expenditure of money.  In order to ensure that the operating systems will serve the needs of the school and the state, it is important that the potential purchase be carefully evaluated and scrutinized.

The State Agency is responsible for providing health care services to public servants, including most public school employees.  The Agency and a State University are jointly conducting a pilot study to determine whether a particular electronic game engaging participants in aerobic dance activity can serve as an effective tool in reducing childhood obesity.

The University has negotiated a 40% price reduction with the manufacturer to obtain the game systems which are being provided for use by the 85 students and two public school physical education programs participating in the test program.  Parents of students not selected for participation in the program and school staff members have asked to purchase these games through the Agency at the price obtained under the pilot program.

The Commission has further recognized that there are certain situations where discounts may be pursued by a State Agency, and exercised by eligible public employees, where the government expects to obtain a significant benefit through employee participation in the discounted activities.

This particular proposal involves a game system that is being evaluated to determine whether it is a cost-effective tool for promoting beneficial aerobic activity in overweight children.  Absent a reasoned medical determination that this system promotes wellness and reduces health costs for the State, authorizing discounted purchases by employees of the State Agency, State University or participating boards of education, would violate the prohibition against use of public office for private gain.

Superintendent is required to make a recommendation to the Board of Education concerning which applicant should be selected to fill a vacant position.  The Commission finds that it would create the appearance of using public office for private gain for a County Superintendent, or one of her subordinates, to nominate herself for a vacant position, even if she is well qualified.  If the Superintendent were to resign, her successor could nominate her for a vacant position and she could then be hired as a Principal because she would no longer have any voice, influence or control over the selection process.

The Board is responsible for the investment of certain State funds.  On occasion the Board must consider possible shareholder litigation against publicly traded corporations in which the Board has equity or debt investments.

The Board previously obtained guidance concerning whether Trustees are required to recuse themselves from voting on matters in which they hold an indirect financial interest based on their investment in one or more mutual funds.  The Board now asks for guidance on voting where a Trustee holds stock in a publicly-traded company.

WV Code 6B-2-5(b) Use of public office for private gain, provides in part that ... A public official or public employee may not knowingly and intentionally use his or her office or the prestige of his or her office for his or her own private gain or that of another person.

This decision is based on the particular circumstances presented in this request and may not be relied upon to establish whether a financial interest is de minimis in some other context.  The Commission will continue to address such questions on a case-by-case basis.

A Volunteer Fire Department (VFD) seeks to participate in a program offered by an advertising company which provides vehicles for use by government agencies that agree to operate these advertisement-bearing vehicles within their communities.

Unlike the government agencies addressed in these earlier opinions, a VFD operates as a voluntary, community-based organization without significant governmental authority.  It is unlikely that the public would perceive advertising on a VFD-operated vehicle as an official government endorsement of the products advertised, anymore than billboards on a public stadium would be viewed as an official endorsement.  The Commission is also aware that VFDs generally have no independent authority to impose mandatory fees or taxes to fund their operations.

The County Commission of a county represented by the Legislator has initiated a program to petition the Legislature to pass a law giving county residents the right to decide by local referendum whether table games will be permitted at a gaming site located within the county.

The Legislator is a full-time employee of the business which operates the gaming site, but his responsibilities are not directly related to its gaming activities and do not encompass public or governmental relations.

WV Code 6B-2-5(b) Use of public office for private gain provides in pertinent part that a public official ... may not knowingly and intentionally use his or her office or the prestige of his or her office for his or her own private gain or that of another person.  The performance of usual and customary duties associated with the office ... or the advancement of public policy goals or constituent services, without compensation, does not constitute the use of prestige of office for private gain.

The usual and customary duties of members of the Legislature include sponsoring legislation, particularly legislation which is sought by constituents.  However, in this situation the Legislator is employed full-time by a business which is among the principal beneficiaries of the legislation proposed.   The Legislator shares a common financial interest with his employer in the proposed legislation and he should not, therefore, sponsor the legislation.

The advisory opinion process is designed to provide a way for public servants to determine, in advance, whether specific conduct they plan is consistent with the provisions of the Ethics Act.  The process provides guidance and protection to public servants - its purpose is to immunize those who act in good faith reliance upon an advisory opinion.

Amendment One to the WV Constitution, passed by the voters in November 2003, authorized the use of tax increment financing secured by property taxes as a new economic development mechanism.  The 2002 Legislature created a legislative framework for establishing TIF districts and approving specific TIF projects within an established district.

TIF district.  Therefore, Commissioner B should likewise not vote on a proposal to include property in which he has a financial interest in the TIF district or on any specific proposal involving that property.

A State Board asks whether its Trustees and senior executive staff are disqualified from taking official action in regard to publicly traded corporations in which they have personal financial interests.

The Board wants to establish those circumstances which will require its Trustees and senior staff to recuse themselves from consideration of official action against a publicly traded corporation, because of personal financial investments in the corporation.

The actual portfolio composition of mutual funds is a matter which most investors would be aware of only on a periodic or occasional basis and the Commission finds that it would be unreasonable to impute knowledge of all the investments of a mutual fund to its stockholders.

The Ethics Acts? prohibition against the use of office for private gain is designed to prevent public servants from misusing the influence of their public positions for their own private financial gain or that of their friends, relatives, business associates or cronies.

In the absence of any overriding public benefit, endorsement of commercial products through advertising on police and emergency county vehicles, could constitute a use of office for private gain, and the County Commission should not adopt this program.

The Agency uses two bloodhounds to assist it in wildland fire investigations.  The Agency has used the dogs for almost five years and during that time a business which sells dog food has supplied dog food to the Agency at no cost.  The business recently asked to use one of the dogs in a dog food commercial.

The Agency is willing to cooperate with the business as a way of thanking it for its past financial support and because it feels it will promote public awareness of the bloodhound program and reduce the likelihood of arson related wildfires.

The Commission has previously held that commercial endorsement of private sector products or services by governmental agencies is acceptable only when it is a part of a program which results in an overriding public benefit.  That is not the case here.  The Agency should not permit the use of its dog in the production of a dog food commercial.

The County Commission established a wellness program for county personnel which gives them free use of the health facilities of the local YMCA.  The Commission does not buy membership for those who participate, but pays the YMCA a pro-rated fee for each day an employee uses the facility.  The Commission explains that it conceived the program to further mental and physical health for those who chose to participate.

The County Commission asks whether it would be a violation of the Ethics Act for its members to approve the final settlement of estates reflecting payments of estate funds to personally compensate the Sheriff or his deputies for performing their public duties in the administration of estates which the Sheriff was appointed, in his official capacity, to administer.

In accordance with the administrative rules of the State Division of Personnel, the Employee was given time off from work, without loss of pay or charge to annual leave, to respond to a summons for jury duty.  The Employee has served as a juror and he will be paid by the court for his mileage and a per diem reimbursement for his required attendance at sessions of the court.

WV Code 6B-2-5(k) Certain expenses prohibited. --  No public official or public employee shall knowingly request or accept from any governmental entity compensation or reimbursement for any expenses actually paid by a lobbyist and required by the provisions of this chapter to be reported, or actually paid by any other person.

The Ethics Act prohibits public servants from being paid by any governmental entity for work which has actually been paid for by any other person.  The prohibition is aimed at what is generally referred to as double dipping, being paid twice for the same work.

State Personnel rules give State employees time off from their governmental job to perform jury service, without reducing their pay or charging their annual leave account.  The rules do not require employees to relinquish their jury service pay.

The county is preparing to implement new mapping requirements mandated by recently enacted law.  The County Surveyor agreed to go to orientation meetings for county officials with the expectation of helping to implement the new program.

The County Commission has reimbursed the County Surveyor for his food, travel and registration expenses incurred in attending meetings, conferences and workshops associated with the mapping program.  The Commission and Surveyor ask if the Commission may pay him for the time he spends attending such meetings on behalf of the County.

No provision of the Ethics Act disqualifies the County Surveyor from consideration for employment by the County to work on county projects.  So long as the County Surveyor is qualified to perform the activities he is paid to perform, it would not be a violation of the Ethics Act for the County Commissioners to pay him or for him to accept payment.

This opinion deals with a grant made to a public entity, a public school or school system.  The opinion does not deal with those situations where individuals seek and obtain grants in their own name - grants to further their own work or perform a specific task.

The Act does contain a general prohibition against public servants using the influence of their public positions for their own private financial gain.  WV Code 6B-2-5(b)  It would be a violation of this provision for the teacher to misuse the influence of her teaching position to secure employment in a project financed by the proceeds of a grant which she had helped obtain.

For example, it would be a violation for the teacher to accept responsibility for hiring the summer teacher and then pervert the process by arbitrarily hiring herself.  This could also be a violation of WV Code 61-10-15, a criminal misdemeanor statute which prohibits public servants from having a personal financial interest in a public contract over which their public position gives them control.

With the authority to hire comes a duty to act responsibly and use a selection process which is fair and evenhanded, a process which is reasonable and objective.  If the teacher is to be considered for a position, she must be excluded from the selection process - a candidate may not be part of the selection process.

While in office, the former Mayor arranged for Town personnel to use rough cut boards from his lumber mill to brace the roof of an existing building the Town bought to serve as a new Town Hall.  Thereafter, the Mayor ordered $1,100 worth of finished lumber from a local lumber yard to replace the lumber from his mill.  He asks the Town to pay for the replacement lumber ordered.

The Ethics Act prohibits public servants from having a personal financial interest in a public contract, purchase or sale which their public positions give them the authority to award or control.  WV Code 6B-2-5 (d)  This prohibition means that neither the Mayor nor Council members may sell goods or services to the Town.  Except for an emergency situation, it would be a violation of this prohibition for the Mayor to sell lumber to the Town for use in rehabilitating Town property.

This Opinion is confined to the facts and circumstances of this particular request and may not be relied upon by others.  The Commission cautions others to avoid, except where compelling circumstances require it, borrowing goods or services from those who control the return or replacement of those goods or services.  The risk of appearing to try to skirt the law, the difficulty in distinguishing loans from sales and the potential for the appearance of impropriety are so great that other arrangements should be made.

The Board of Education is interested in membership in the local Chamber of Commerce and asks whether it may become a dues paying member.  The Board believes that membership in the Chamber will help it promote educational and employment opportunities for its students.

The Ethics Commission finds that the use of school funds to buy meal tickets for the Board or other school personnel to attend Chamber luncheons and dinners would be a prohibited use of office for their own private gain.

The Commission asks if it may require county personnel to use and distribute promotional materials prepared by an organization which supports, and seeks to advance, the position taken by the Commission.

WV Code 6B-2-5 (b) provides in part that ... a public official or public employee may not knowingly and intentionally use his or her office or the prestige of his or her office for his or her own private gain or that of another person.

The Ethics Act prohibits public servants from using their public positions, or the influence of those positions, for their own private financial gain or the private financial gain of others.  The Commissioners? action in requiring the use of the promotional materials would be at odds with the Ethics Act only if it constitutes a prohibited use of office for private financial gain.

Therefore, it would be a violation for the Commission to order, require, encourage or approve the wearing of promotional buttons by county personnel, the display or distribution of promotional materials in county offices, the use of bumper stickers on county vehicles, or the posting of yard signs on county property, which advance the position taken by the Commission.

It would not, however, be proper for the University to secure discounted prices for purchases made by faculty and staff alone.  Since the concessionaire must make a profit on its operation, reduced prices to one group of customers will result in increased prices to its other customers.

Authority.  A majority of the Board Members hold full-time employment elsewhere and the lunch hour provides the most convenient meeting time to ensure a quorum is present.  The Authorities wish to provide light meals or snacks to meeting attendees, such as pizza, potato chips and soft drinks.

Employees and staff are required to maintain current certification as emergency medical service personnel.  In addition, the Authorities seek to ensure their employees and staff maintain a high level of preparedness for emergency response by receiving training on current medical techniques and recent advances in emergency medicine and related areas.

The Authorities provide this training in-house without charge.  Only employees who are on duty at the time, a small minority of those in attendance, are paid while attending training.  Even those on duty are not required to attend the training, and must respond to routine business of the agency at all times.  The vast majority of those attending are not compensated for their time in training.  The employer wants to provide light meals and snacks, similar to the board meetings, for participating instructors, employees and staff.

Free lunches for Authority members.  The compensation to which Board members are entitled is set by the Legislature at $20 for each meeting actually attended.  Members are also entitled to reimbursement for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in carrying out their duties.

While noon meetings are clearly convenient, the Commission finds that free lunch is not necessary for Authority meetings and exceeds limits established for expense reimbursement.  Free lunches are, therefore, not among the benefits included in the Board members? lawful emoluments and may not be provided them.

Free lunches for Authority employees.  The compensation to which Authority employees are entitled is not set by the Legislature, but is a matter to be decided by the Authority Boards.  The Boards have the authority and responsibility to establish the lawful emoluments of Authority employees.

Authority from paying employees to attend training sessions which were reasonably necessary to maintain or advance their professional competence.  Alternatively, the Act would not prevent the Authority from offering meals and refreshments as an inducement to encourage employees to voluntarily attend such training sessions on their own time, without pay.

The Commissioner asks whether public funds may be used to pay the cost of commemorative parties, including cocktails and formal dinners, held by the Commission or one of its subordinate agencies for its personnel, their families, dignitaries, contractors and vendors.  This would include annual dinners or Christmas parties.

In this case the Ethics Commission rules that it would be a violation for the County Commission, or its subordinate agencies, to use public funds to pay for commemorative social events such as Christmas parties or annual dinners.  The addition of dignitaries, contractors, vendors or select members of the public to the guest list does not legitimize the expenditure.

A State Health Care Agency asks if it would be a violation to provide free meals to agency personnel who are required to work unscheduled emergency overtime, if the practice were authorized by appropriate legislation.

The Agency is considering seeking legislation which would authorize it to provide staff free meals in cases where they are required to work overtime without prior notice.  The Agency asks whether such a practice would, if approved by the Legislature, be consistent with the Ethics Act.

It would not be a violation of the Ethics Act for the Agency, in accordance with appropriate legislative authority, to provide or pay for employee meals when those employees are required to work unscheduled emergency overtime.

This request deals with another facet of the situation the Commission dealt with in A.O. 2000-27 at its last meeting.  In that opinion the Commission ruled that it would be a violation for a Member of the same City Council to vote in support of the interests of a Foundation which was a client of the law firm of which he was a member.

Here the requester is a Council Member whose spouse is a member of that same law firm.  She asks if it would be a violation for her to vote in support of the interests of the same Foundation in the same re-zoning matter.

A privately-owned public utility has made an offer to purchase a city's water system.  Such sale must be approved by a special election of the city's voters.  The utility has further made an unsolicited offer to pay the cost of the election, without regard to the outcome of the vote.  The utility is not seeking any concession or quid pro quo from the city, other than holding the election.

Member individually.  Therefore, no provision in the Ethics Act prohibits the City Council from accepting reimbursement, should a majority determine that accepting the offer to pay the costs of the special election is in the public interest.

If the Agency agrees to become a reference account, the Vendor will provide the Agency an enhanced level of support for the software, provide more direct and influential access to its development of new products and give several Agency employees advanced training in the use of the software, which would increase its value and utility to the Agency.

The Licensing Board is responsible for licensing and regulating a  professional activity and for conducting any necessary disciplinary proceedings.  The members of the Board are paid the same compensation and expense reimbursement as is paid to members of the Legislature for their interim duties for each day or portion thereof engaged in the discharge of official duties.

Similar to the reference proposed in A.O. 2000-19, the proposed indorsement presented in this request involves more than a simple reference; it includes a subjective evaluation of the product (training) in affirmative, if not laudatory, terms.

The Commission notes that, consistent with A.O. 98-22, this opinion is not intended to prohibit the employee from giving permission to list the employee and her State Agency as a previous customer of the Trainer.

One of the vocational programs operated by the County Board of Education charges a shop fee to members of the general public who bring in their vehicles for students to repair.  The money from those fees is placed in a fund upon which the vocational teacher draws to purchase parts and supplies for the shop.  No state or local tax money is included in this fund.  In the past, the teacher has purchased certain parts for the auto shop program from a local automobile dealer. An employee of the dealer was recently elected to the County Board of Education.

The situation presented in this request is analogous to these previous opinions.  The Board Member who has a financial interest in the contracts of his employer is not involved in the purchase decision, and the employee making the purchases is not spending public funds controlled by the Board.

A County Commission asks whether it may spend County funds to pay Chamber of Commerce dues and to purchase tickets for Chamber luncheons and annual dinners for Commissioners and the County Administrator?

The County Commission is interested in membership in the local Chamber of Commerce and asks whether it may become a dues paying member.  The Commission feels membership in the Chamber, which promotes community business interests, would benefit both the Commission and the Chamber.

A newly-elected Board Member has advised the Board that she has a severe hearing impairment and asked the Board to purchase certain amplification equipment which she believes is necessary to her effective participation in Board meetings.

The Board Member has offered to pay for the cost of the hearing aids, which are designed for her individual use and will become her personal property.  She will wear the hearing aids on a daily basis in addition to the time she spends attending Board  meetings.

An Assistant Commissioner of a State Agency asks if it would be a violation for agency personnel to be paid to assist in preparing for and presenting the social elements of a regional conference of an Association to which the Agency belongs.

While the conference is primarily a business event, the agenda includes social events geared to spouses and children as well as delegates.  All conference events are funded through registration and membership fees and public funds are not used to pay for either business or social events.

The Ethics Act prohibits public servants from using their public positions for their own private financial gain or the private financial gain of others.  This opinion turns on whether the use of paid State employees to perform work associated with the upcoming conference constitutes a prohibited use of office for the private gain of the delegates, their spouses or children.

In AO 95-18 the Ethics Commission recognized the public benefit from the business portion of a similar conference and ruled that the use of agency personnel to sell advertising to reduce the cost of presenting the core elements of the conference would not be a violation.

In this case the conference workshops and business meetings are calculated to enhance the skill and professional competence of Agency personnel.  They provide an overriding public benefit which is sufficient to justify the use of Agency personnel to schedule and coordinate conference events -  both business events and those social events which are an integral part of the conference.

The candidate information which appears on the Board Site comes from a candidate information guide compiled by the local League of Women Voters from information supplied in a standard format by the candidates themselves.  Among the four current  candidates, only the Member has his own web site.  The Member believes that other candidates will be afforded a direct link from the Board Site to their campaign sites, if and when they develop such sites.

The Town is located in a rural area of the state.  An elected Town Council Member owns the only hardware store in Town.  The Town has been making purchases from the hardware store for approximately thirty (30) years.  Due to ongoing maintenance projects in the Town, frequent trips to the hardware store are required.  A plumbing store has also recently opened in the Town.

The travel distance to the next closest hardware store is approximately thirteen (13) miles.   The approximate round trip travel time is one (1) hour.   If the Town is prohibited from making purchases at the locally owned hardware store, then the Town employees will have to make a twenty-six (26) mile round trip for the majority of its hardware needs.  While some purchases can be made at the plumbing store, this store carries a limited amount of basic hardware supplies.

Due in part to rising fuel costs,  the IRS has increased the allowable mileage expense reimbursement rate to forty cents (.40).  Applying this rate, the expense of making a round trip to the next closest hardware store is ten dollars and forty cents ($ 10.40).

Maintenance projects may require numerous trips to a hardware store for small ticket items such as screws and nails.  Oftentimes when planning a project or addressing daily maintenance needs, it is difficult to predict with certainty which hardware supplies will be required.  It would be unreasonable to require the Town employees to make a twenty-six (26) mile round trip for every purchase.  Not only would such daily trips be burdensome, there are also associated vehicle and labor costs.   Small towns have a limited number of employees and financial resources.  Under the facts presented, requiring the Town to make purchases from a hardware store located thirteen (13) miles away would result in excessive costs and would create an undue hardship.

The Commission notes that exemptions must be granted on a case-by-case basis.  Therefore, this opinion is limited to the facts and circumstances of this particular case, and may not be relied upon as a precedent by other persons.

A County Board of Education Member is serving without compensation as a middle school assistant coach.  The WV Board of Risk and Insurance Management has determined that volunteer coaches should be paid a nominal salary of $1.00 per year.  This policy is intended to maintain existing liability insurance coverage for the actions of these coaches.

A newly elected County Commissioner is a minority shareholder in a holding company which owns the radio station.  The radio station charges the County Commission one hundred dollars ($ 100.00) per month for this service.  The County Commission makes a lump sum payment once a year.  It paid the yearly usage fee for 2005 prior to the newly elected County Commissioner taking office. The County Commissioner does not receive any direct remuneration as a result of the agreement.

The Commission notes that this decision is limited to the facts and circumstances of this particular case, and the decision may not be relied upon by others without having first consulted with and received written confirmation from the Ethics Commission.

Provided, however, That nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit . . . a part-time appointed public official from entering into a contract which such part-time appointed public official may have direct authority to enter into or over which he or she may have control when such official has been recused from deciding or evaluating and excused from voting on such contract and has fully disclosed the extent of such interest in the contract.

In Advisory Opinion 98-26 the Commission found that the Legislature had carved out an exemption from this prohibition for members of a County Economic Development Authority.  However, no similar exemption is contained in the statutes governing PSDs.

There are no other excavating contractors in the town.  The Town Council has contacted 4 excavating contractors in the area but they are either too busy or not interested in this particular work.  The town pays $45 per hour for these excavation services.  These services are often needed on short notice when a leak or break is discovered.  Based upon over 20 years of experience, this particular contractor is extremely familiar with the location of the water lines and shut-off valves, making it more cost-efficient to employ his business.

W. Va. Code 6B-2-5(d)(1) Interests in public contracts, provides in part that . . . no elected or appointed official or employee or member of his or her immediate family or business with which he or she is associated may be a party to or have an interest in . . . a contract which such official or employee may have direct authority to enter into, or over which he or she may have control. . . .

Should it become necessary to change the rates paid for these excavating services, the Town Council would need to request another waiver, providing specific information to establish that, absent such waiver, the town would incur an undue hardship.

Therefore, it would not be a violation of the Ethics Act for an employee of a 911 system to serve on the governing board which provides recommendations on operating and staffing the system to the County Commission.

"The purpose of the statute is to protect public funds, and give official recognition to the fact that a person cannot properly represent the public in transacting business with himself.  To permit such conduct would open the door to fraud. The statute is designed to remove from public officers any and all temptation for personal advantage. . . ."

A School Board Member is employed by a company which provides nursing services for diabetic children under a contract with the Board of Education.  She is a salaried employee of the contractor without an ownership interest in the business.  Furthermore, she receives no commission under the contract.  The school system governed by this Board of Education is presently under the control of the State Department of Education.  Consequently, the Board Members presently have no authority to approve contracts or payments for services rendered under existing contracts.

The spouse and brother-in-law have owned the company for two years.  During that time period, and prior to the election of the Board Member, the company sold approximately $ 1,350.00 worth of stone to the Board of Education.  That amount represents a limited percentage of the total annual revenue of the company.

West Virginia Code Section 6B-2-5(d)(1) states in pertinent part that...no elected public official...or business with which he or she is associated may be a party to or have an interest in the profits or benefits of a contract which such official or employee may have direct authority to enter into, or over which he or she may have control...

West Virginia Code Section 6B-2-5(d)(3) states in pertinent part that...Where the provisions of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection would result in the loss of quorum in a public body or agency, in excessive cost, undue hardship, or other substantial interference with the operation of a state, county, municipality, county school board or other governmental agency, the affected governmental body or agency may make written application for an exemption...

West Virginia Code Section 61-10-15 states in pertinent part that...It shall be unlawful for any member of any county board...to be or become pecuniarily interested, directly or indirectly, in the proceeds of any contract or service or in furnishing any supplies in the contract for, or the awarding or letting of, which as such member he may have any voice, influence or control.

In this case the Commission considers the interest of the Board Member's spouse in the potential profits from the contract to be more than de minimis.   While the revenues from potential sales to the school board only represent a limited percentage of the total revenues of the company, the actual amount of monies which may be paid are, under the facts presented, more than de minimis.

A building owned by the County Prosecutor is located next to the courthouse.  There is no other building next to the courthouse or within close proximity to the courthouse which meets the space requirements of the County Commission.

Commission.  However, if the County Commission elects to expand its facilities on adjacent property, the County Prosecutor is the only real estate owner whose property and building meets their requirements.

Commission notes that this decision is limited to the facts and circumstances of this particular case, and the decision may not be relied upon by others without having first consulted with and received written confirmation from the Ethics Commission.

The Board has limited office space and a limited budget.  The Executive Director is the only full-time employee.  Due to budget restraints, she is only paid to work thirty (30) hours a week.   There are no permanent part-time employees. A temporary part-time employee was recently hired to work on a contract basis.

Director  traveled to the unit at least once a week.  While more frequent trips would have resulted in better service to the public, time restraints prevented the Director from getting there more frequently.

The cost of the storage unit is five dollars ($ 5.00) less per month than the cost of the other unit.   The greatest benefit to the Board is that the Director will incur less travel time, which in turn allows her to devote more time to her responsibilities.  While in all likelihood the Director would continue to allow the use of her space without charge, the Board believes that it is both fair and reasonable to compensate her for the space.  It therefore seeks this waiver.

The Development Authority was established to promote economic development in four counties and their participating municipalities.  The Authority is governed by a 13-member Board of Directors who may be nominated by any County Commissioner or Mayor from a participating county or municipality.  Any County Commissioner, Mayor, or current Board Member may veto any person so nominated.

The Authority operates a Revolving Loan Program financed with grant money from a federal commission.  A County Commissioner from one of the four participating counties owns a small business and has expressed an interest in applying for a loan through the program, if it is permissible.

WV Code 6B-2-5(d)(1) Interests in public contracts, provides in part that . . . no elected or appointed official or employee or member of his or her immediate family or business with which he or she is associated may be a party to or have an interest in . . .  a contract which such official or employee may have direct authority to enter into, or over which he or she may have control. . . .

WV Code 61-10-15 states in part that . . . It shall be unlawful for any member . . . of any . . . county or district board . . . to be or become pecuniarily interested, directly or indirectly, in the proceeds of any contract . . . [over] which as such . . . member . . . he may have any voice, influence or control. . . .

The vocational school considered in Advisory Opinion 96-29 was managed by a five-member administrative board.  Each participating county designated a Board Member and their County Superintendent of Schools to serve on that board.  In this matter, three counties jointly operate a vocational school through a seven-member board which includes a Board Member and School Superintendent from the County Board where the vocational school employee will be serving.

The Board of Education plans to post an extra-curricular position for an appropriately certified teacher to provide remedial instruction to selected students in Language Arts and Mathematics.  The spouse of a current Board Member is qualified to fill this position.

Board members, members elect, and those desiring to become members may make a written request for such an opinion.  Good faith reliance upon a Commission opinion that a particular position is not a bar to board membership is a defense to civil suits or criminal prosecution based on holding such position.

Effective July 1, 2003, members of county boards of education are not permitted to hold another public office, unless: (1) they do not receive compensation for serving in that office; and (2) the primary scope of the other office does not relate to the public schools.

Therefore, the requester is barred from serving on the County Board of Education unless he is not compensated for his service, and the primary scope of this office does not relate to the public schools.

District constitutes compensation which renders the requester ineligible to simultaneously serve on a County Board of Education and a Soil Conservation District Board of Supervisors.  Further, the requester may not avoid the prohibition by declining to accept such compensation.

However, it would not be a violation of the Ethics Act or 61-10-15 for the Board to contract with the Land Trust, so long as his spouse is not directly involved in or paid for providing services contracted for.  The Board member may be involved in the discussion and vote on matters between the Board and Land Trust, so long as they do not deal with those involving his spouse.

However, the Board may contract with the Land Trust, so long as his spouse is not directly involved in and compensated for providing services contracted for.  The Board member may be involved in the discussion and vote on matters between the Board and Land Trust, so long as they do not deal with those involving his spouse.

WV Code 61-10-15 is a criminal statute governing the activities of certain county personnel, including school board members, superintendents and treasurers.  Like the Ethics Act, it applies to public servants, their spouses and the businesses in which they have an ownership interest.  Unlike the Ethics Act, it applies to businesses which employ public servants and their spouses.

The Requester is a newly elected Board Member.  He is employed as a sales representative by a building products distributor and he sells to retail building supply companies in several counties, including his county of residence.  He has no ownership interest in the company by which he is employed.

The product lines handled by his employer include siding, interior finishing products, doors, windows, skylights, flooring and deck components.  He receives commissions on all sales to his designated customers, including orders called into his employer without his involvement.

The Board Member knows to whom he sells his products, but does not know to whom his customers sell the products he has supplied them.  He asks if it will be a problem if materials he has sold local retailers are (1) resold to the Board or (2) resold to a contractor for use in a Board construction project.

The Board Member represents that while he serves on the Board his employer will not engage in any special order sales to the Board or for Board projects, unless he is entirely excluded from the process - that is to say he would receive no commission on the sale and would take no official action as a Board member in regard to approving the purchase or paying for the materials.

It would be a violation of both WV Code 61-10-15 and the Ethics Act for him to sell building products directly to the Board or to special order materials for one of his customers for a Board job and receive a commission from the sale.

During its Regular 2002 Session, the Legislature amended WV Code 61-10-15 to allow agencies to deal with businesses which employ agency personnel or their spouses, if the conditions of subsection (e) are met.  Stated simply, those conditions exclude public servants from involvement in awarding or paying for agency contracts and require that neither they nor their spouses benefit directly from them.

WV Code 61-10-15 states in part that ... It shall be unlawful for any ...supervisor or superintendent, principal or teacher of public schools ... to be or become pecuniarily interested, directly or indirectly, in the proceeds of any contract ... [over] which as such ... supervisor or superintendent, principal or teacher, he may have any voice, influence or control ...

Both the Ethics Act and WV Code 61-10-15 prohibit public servants from being a party to, or having a financial interest in, a public contract, purchase or sale which their public position gives them authority to award or control.  WV Code 61-10-15 is a criminal misdemeanor statute which applies only to certain county personnel, including the members of county solid waste authority boards.

However, the Ethics Commission has recognized instances in which agencies may continue to do business under the terms of a contract in which an agency member has an otherwise prohibited personal financial interest, if the contract was OK when entered into - where, for example, the public servant had no control over the contract at the time of its execution.

The Member is a physician who maintains a private medical practice and is employed part-time by the local hospital, the only one in the county.  He asks whether certain associations between the hospital and the Board may pose a problem with his continued service on the Board.

Unlike the Ethics Act, WV Code 61-10-15 does apply to businesses by which public servants or members of their immediate families are employed, even if they have no ownership interest in the business which employs them.  In most situations, it would be a violation for a school board to contract with the employer of one of its members.

In this case it is not clear whether the Board can locate a suitable alternative source of drug testing.  The Commission notes that the tests themselves are not done by the hospital, but by an outside lab.  Nor is it clear whether blood alcohol tests could be performed by others in the community, or in reasonable proximity.

However, in this situation the Ethics Commission finds that the non-profit hospital is not a public agency and its employment contracts are not public contracts of the county subject to the provisions of WV Code 61-10-15.  Therefore, it would not be a violation for the Candidate to serve on the County Commission, while a hospital employee.

No provision of the Ethics Act would prevent the Board Member from serving, without compensation, as a volunteer judge of school speech competitions, whether or not her child participated in the competition.

The private school by which the Principal is employed receives Federally funded services and benefits from the County Board of Education.  The Principal asks whether it would be a violation of either the Ethics Act or WV Code 61-10-15 for him to serve on the Board while employed as Principal of the private school.

WV Code 61-10-15 states in part that ... It shall be unlawful for ... any member of any ... county or district board ... to be or become pecuniarily interested, directly or indirectly, in the proceeds of any contract ... [over] which as such ... member ... he may have any voice, influence or control ....

Therefore, it would not be a violation of either the Ethics Act or WV Code 61-10-15 for a private school principal to serve on a county Board of Education, simply because the school received Federally mandated benefits through the Board.

WV Code 6B-2-5(d)(1) provides in pertinent part:  In addition to the provisions of section fifteen, article ten, chapter sixty-one of this code, no elected or appointed public official or public employee or member of his or her immediate family or business with which he or she is associated may be a party to or have an interest in the profits or benefits of a contract which such official or employee may have direct authority to enter into, or over which he or she may have control. . . .

WV Code 61-10-15 states in pertinent part:  It shall be unlawful for any member . . . of any . . . county or district board . . . to be or become pecuniarily interested, directly or indirectly, in the proceeds of any contract or service, or in furnishing any supplies in the contract for, or the awarding or letting of, which as such member . . . he may have any voice, influence or control. . . .

The County Housing Authority administers several housing related programs, including one which subsidizes the rent for low income families.  Qualifying families select their place of residence and the Authority enters into a lease with the property owner and pays a rent subsidy directly to the property owner from funds provided by the federal housing program.

WV Code 6B-2-5(b) provides in part that ... a public official or public employee may not knowingly and intentionally use his or her office or the prestige of his or her office for his or her own private gain or that of another person.

WV Code 61-10-15 states in part that ... It shall be unlawful for a ... superintendent ... of public schools ... to be or become pecuniarily interested, directly or indirectly, in the proceeds of any contract ... [over] which as such ... superintendent ... he may have any voice, influence or control...

WV Code 61-10-15 is a criminal misdemeanor statute which applies to county personnel.  Both it and the Ethics Act prohibit public servants from being a party to, or having a financial interest in, a public contract, purchase or sale over which their public position gives them control.

These provisions are designed to prevent both actual misconduct in awarding public contracts and the appearance of impropriety inherent in public servants awarding public contracts to themselves or those with whom they have a financial association.  The provisions steer public servants away from situations where they might need to consider their own financial interests in awarding agency contracts.

Requester assumed her role as Interim Superintendent.  Therefore, the Commission rules that it would not be a violation of WV Code 61-10-15 or the Ethics Act for the Board to continue buying dairy products under the existing contract, so long as there is no modification of its terms.

In July 2000, prior to her employment with the Board, a business in which the Requester has a substantial ownership interest bid and received the contract to supply diesel fuel and gasoline for the Board.  The contract was for one year beginning in August 2000 and ending in August 2001.

The Requester asks if her employment as Assistant Superintendent or as Superintendent will prevent the Board from continuing to purchase fuel under the terms of the existing contract.  She understands that her association with the Board prevents the Board from contracting with her company in the future and a new contract with another vendor will be entered into.

Students with speech and language deficiencies are eligible for therapy provided by public school speech therapists.  The Pathologist is a speech therapist whose regular duties include testing students, from the schools to which he is assigned, for speech and language deficiencies and providing appropriate therapy to the students from those schools.

The Pathologist asks if he may, when his case load reaches 50, contract with the county to provide therapy on his own time for students who are entitled to therapy but cannot be handled by him as a part of his regular job.

The Commission finds that the Pathologist has neither the authority to award speech therapy contracts, nor voice, influence or control over the award of such contracts - even those for students the Pathologist may have tested and certified as eligible for therapy.  Therefore, it would not be a violation of either the Ethics Act or WV Code 61-10-15 for him to be employed by the Board to provide therapy to students after his normal work day.

WV Code 61-10-15 states in part that ... It shall be unlawful for any member of a county commission ... to be or become pecuniarily interested, directly or indirectly, in the proceeds of any contract ... [over] which as such member he may have any voice, influence or control ...

WV Code 61-10-15 prohibits certain county personnel, including county commissioners, from having a direct or indirect financial interest in a public contract over which their public position gives them control.  However, that provision contains an express exemption for legally required newspaper publications.

Like WV Code 61-10-15, the Ethics Act prohibits public servants from being a party to or having a financial interest in a public contract which they have the power to award or control.  This prohibition makes it unlawful for the County Commission to contract for services from a business in which one of its members has a substantial ownership interest.

The Board of Health will be considering whether to transfer or sell certain of its health care delivery activities.  If the Board of Health chose to do so, one of the service providers which might be interested in assuming or acquiring those activities, and their assets, is partially owned by a not for profit health care corporation on whose board the Health Board Member also serves.

The Member asks if he may take part in the discussion and vote on these issues and whether it would be a violation of the Ethics Act or WV Code 61-10-15 if the Health Department sold or transferred its public assets to the service provider partially owned by the health care corporation.

Legislative Rules 158-9-2.1 provides in part that ... A public official or public employee may not vote on or decide a matter ... when he or she has any pecuniary interest either directly or indirectly in the matter or is affected in a manner which may influence his or her vote or would clearly give the appearance of impropriety.

The Board is considering establishing a high school swim team.  The only indoor pool within 25 miles, the only pool which could reasonably be utilized by the team, is owned by a private college which employs a member of the Board.  The college would charge the Board a daily fee of from $10 to $25 depending on the number of students using the pool.

Membership of a board of education is a matter of high public trust charged with the most sacred governmental duty known to us.  The office should be filled by persons of the highest character procurable and our Legislature has undertaken to throw safeguards around that office in order that the discharge of its high responsibilities shall be jeopardized as little as possible.  Code, 61-10-15, is one of these safeguards.

It forbids a pecuniary interest by a member of the board of education in any contract with the board.  As we have already pointed out, it goes far beyond imposing a penalty upon actual corruption.  It recognizes as a matter of public policy that a pecuniary interest might, and in many instances would, subject members of boards of education to harmful suspicion of corruption and that in some instances there would be created a borderland where the distinction between honesty and corruption would not be pronounced.  Wishing to avoid discriminations that might result from considering the question of degree, our Legislature very wisely forbade members of boards of education from having a pecuniary interest directly or indirectly in any sort of contract with a board of education of which they were a member, providing that it should be a criminal offense to do so.

City Council Member is an attorney engaged in private practice.  The Member's law firm represents the Foundation generally, but does not represent the Foundation in this matter.  The Member's law firm also represents another corporation which has an interest in the issue before Council.  However, that corporation is not a party to the matter pending before City Council.

In Advisory Opinion 98-02, the Commission addressed a similar situation involving a pending vote by a lawyer serving on a City Council.  In that instance, the individual and his law firm had represented companies in which the President of a foundation with a matter pending before City Council was an officer.  Applying an earlier Advisory Opinion governing voting, A.O. 91-38, the Commission concluded that it would not be a violation of the Ethics Act for the requester to vote.

WV Code 6B-2-5(d)(1) Interests in public contracts, provides in part that  . . .  no elected or appointed official or employee ... may be a party to or have an interest in ...  a contract which such official or employee may have direct authority to enter into, or over which he or she may have control:  Provided, That nothing herein shall be construed to prevent or make unlawful the employment of any person with any governmental body.

WV Code 61-10-15 is a criminal misdemeanor statute which prohibits public servants from having a direct or indirect pecuniary interest in public contracts which their public positions give them the authority to award.  The members of the Board have the authority to award Board contracts, including those for the employment of coaches.

If the Board Member is not compensated for his work as coach, he will have no pecuniary interest in the coaching contract and the provisions of WV Code 61-10-15 do not apply.  It would not be a violation for him to coach without compensation.

These provisions steer public servants away from situations where they might need to consider their own financial interests in awarding agency contracts.  Both would prevent the Board from entering into a service contract with the Member, now that he is on the Board.

The Commission ruled that it would not be a violation of WV Code 61-10-15 for the Board to continue to purchase books during the balance of the term of the contract, since neither the superintendent nor his spouse had an interest in the contract at the time it was entered into.

West Virginia law provides for the creation of both county airport authorities and regional airport authorities.  County authorities are established by the county commission.  Regional authorities, comprised of one or more counties joined with one or more municipalities are public corporations governed by representatives appointed by the entities they represent.

The local planning districts are operated by planning committees members who are appointed by and report to the State Commission.  The authority of the local planning districts is confined to implementing the federal statutes at the local level and their financial support comes from federal grant proceeds awarded by the State Commission; they receive no county tax revenues.

The planning districts are responsible for collecting information, preparing studies and developing plans to deal with emergency situations arising in their respective geographic areas.  Five of the districts are composed of two counties; the other districts are single county entities.

Some of the districts have experienced some difficulty in finding qualified local people to do this work, and have had to contract with those from another part of the State, because many of those with the necessary qualifications are serving as members of the district committees.  The Commission asks if the local district committees are permitted to hire their own committee members to do this work.

The Ethics Act prohibits public servants from being a party to, or having a financial interest in, a public contract, purchase or sale which their public position gives them the authority to award or control.   WV Code 61-10-15, a criminal misdemeanor statute, contains a similar prohibition against certain county personnel having a direct or indirect financial interest in county contracts, purchases or sales over which their public position gives them voice, influence or control.  This prohibition applies to the members of county or district boards and county or district officers.

Commission which appoints the members of their governing committees.   The mission of a planning district is to carry out the mandate of a federal law and its activities are financed by federal funds.

The Ethics Act prohibits public servants from being a party to or having an interest in a contract they have the authority to award or control.  WV Code 6B-2-5(d).  This prohibition applies to State, county and municipal personnel.  However, the Legislature exempted part-time appointed officials from the prohibition, if they have disclosed their interest in a contract and been recused from considering and voting on the transaction.

There is another provision of the Ethics Act which bears on this question.  WV Code 6B-2-5(b) prohibits public servants from using the influence of their position for their own private financial gain or the private financial gain of another.  Special care must be exercised in proceedings which result in contracts between a planning district and one of its members, so as to prevent any suggestion of favoritism between the members of the governing body.  It would be a violation of this provision for planning committee members to give a fellow committee member preferential treatment or unwarranted consideration in awarding contracts.

While an agency may not lessen the standards of the Ethics Act, it may add rules and regulations it deems necessary to accommodate potential problems or situations unique to the agency and to preserve the appearance of propriety in the conduct of agency business.

WV Code 61-10-15 states in part that ... It shall be unlawful for any member... of any ... county or district board ... to be or become pecuniarily interested, directly or indirectly, in the proceeds of any contract ... [over] which as such member he may have any voice, influence or control ...

WV Code 6B-2-5(d)(1) provides in pertinent part that ... no elected or appointed official or public employee or member of his or her immediate family or business with which he or she is associated may be a party to or have an interest in ... a contract which such official or employee may have direct authority to enter into, or over which he or she may have control...

Even where their financial interest in Board business with their employer is negligible, their interest in the financial health of their employer is substantial and confronts Board members with the type of divided loyalty that WV Code 61-10-15 was created to avoid.  Those who are responsible for spending  public funds should not have to take into account their own financial interests, or those of their employers, when deciding where and how to spend public funds.

Therefore, the Commission finds that it would be a violation of WV Code 61-10-15 for the Board to buy books from the business by which one of its members is employed part-time.  This ruling applies to purchases approved by the Board and paid for with public funds.

However, the Commission finds that WV Code 61-10-15 does not apply to purchases made by teachers with proceeds from fund-raising activities and school vending machine sales, because the Board does not control the expenditure of those funds.  Such purchases would not be a violation.

An attorney for a newly elected member of a County Board of Education asks if the member-elect may serve as a Board Member while employed by the State Department of Education as a teacher at a State correctional facility in the county in which the member-elect lives.

The foundation board has appointed him as their representative on a City Council Committee which meets quarterly to consider requests for distribution of funds administered as part of a particular bequeathed endowment.  He receives no compensation for serving in this appointed position.

Economic Development Authority members are appointed by the County Commission to serve three year terms.  The other positions in question are filled by volunteers.   No compensation is authorized for serving in any of these positions.

The regional highway safety coalition recruits volunteers to serve as liaison with various local groups and organizations, including the public schools, to facilitate an exchange of information, concerns and initiatives related to various aspects of community safety, including highway safety.  These volunteers are not compensated and exercise no executive or legislative authority.  The Commission finds that serving on such a coalition does not comprise holding a public office.

The requester has been elected to serve on a County Board of Education.  She has been previously appointed by the Governor to serve on the West Virginia Community and Technical Education Council and the West Virginia Workforce Investment Council. Persons who serve on these Councils are not compensated beyond receiving reimbursement for travel expenses.

West Virginia Workforce Investment Council, the Commission finds these positions are public offices.  Further, the Commission finds that the primary scope of the Workforce Investment Council is not related to the public schools.

The requester was recently elected to serve on a County Board of Education.  He currently serves on the board of directors of a non-profit corporation which promotes the beneficial use of forest resources in a particular region.  The Ethics Commission previously determined that this corporation, which receives State funding, is a private organization which is not subject to the Ethics Act.

Action Organization, established as a private, non-profit corporation, finding that serving as a director of that organization does not involve holding a public office.  The same analysis applies here.  The position currently held by the requester as director of a non-profit corporation is not a public office, and the requester may continue in this position after taking office on the County Board of Education.

The requester has filed as a candidate for the Board of Education in the county where he resides.  He is employed by the WVDOE as a teacher in a state-operated detention facility.  That facility is located in a different county.  By statute, the compensation received by WVDOE teachers serving in these facilities is linked to the pay scales adopted by the County Board of Education in the county where the institution is located.

Applying these criteria to a teacher employed by a state agency, the Commission finds this position involves mere employment rather than holding a public office. Therefore, the requester, if elected, may retain his teaching position while serving on the County Board of Education.

Any person who is eligible and seeks to hold an office or political party position to be filled by election in any primary or general election . . . shall file a certificate of announcement declaring as a candidate for the nomination or election to the office.

A person being considered for appointment to a County Board of Education vacancy asks if he may continue to serve on the Board of Directors of a private non-profit organization which operates a sheltered workshop for physically and mentally challenged people.

Camp and seeks to include a County Board of Education Member in the membership. The members are appointed by the Commission to advise the West Virginia University Extension Office on the operation of the County 4-H Camp.  They receive no pay or reimbursement for their services.

Applying these criteria to a County 4-H Camp Advisory Council, the Commission finds such position, involving only advisory duties,  is not a public office.  Moreover, even if this position were deemed a public office, it does not bar the requester from remaining on the County Board of Education because the members are not compensated for their service, and the primary scope of the position is  not related to the public schools.

Committee employs cooperative extension workers in partnership with West Virginia University, coordinates financial support for these activities with the County Commission and Board of Education, and provides guidance on the operation of the county cooperative extension service program.  There is no compensation currently provided for this position.

The county extension service committee shall be composed of (a) the president of the county farm bureau, (b) the president of the county extension homemakers council, (c) the president of the county Four-H leaders' association, (d) a county commissioner designated by the president of the county commission, (e) a member of the county board of education designated by the president of the county board of education, (f) a county representative of the grange, and (g) two members who are residents of the county to be appointed by the board of advisors of West Virginia University....

The requester is currently serving as a Board of Education Member.  He has been asked to serve on the board of the County Economic Development Authority.  Authority members are ordinarily appointed by the County Commission to serve three year terms. Persons serving on the Development Authority Board are not compensated beyond being reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses.

No member of the authority shall receive any compensation, whether in formal salary, per diem allowance or otherwise, in connection with his or her services as such member. Each member shall, however, be entitled to reimbursement by the authority for any necessary expenditures in connection with the performance of his or her general duties as such member.

The Commission finds that a Director of a County Economic Development Authority holds a public office.  Further, the Commission finds that the primary scope of this office is not related to the public schools.

The requester is currently serving as a Board of Education Member.  He would like to be considered for appointment to the Emergency Ambulance Authority in his county. He explains that he previously served on the Authority Board and did not receive any salary or expenses.

Further, the Commission finds that the primary scope of Emergency Ambulance Service Authorities is not related to the public schools.  Therefore, the only remaining issue involves the compensation associated with this position.

It is not clear whether the proviso the Legislature added to 18-5-1a was intended  to permit a school board member to escape the prohibition against serving in another public office by simply declining to accept compensation for service in the office.  Had that been its intent, the proviso would have said that the prohibition does not apply to service for which the Board of Education member accepts no compensation.

However, the Ethics Commission does not believe that the Legislature intended to say, in effect, school board members may serve in any position, unrelated to public schools - so long as they decline to accept pay for their service.  Rather, the Commission believes the proviso is intended to apply only to public offices for which the law provides no compensation.

The Commission believes the proviso does not exempt service in any office for which the law prescribes or requires compensation.  Where compensation is prescribed or required, the proviso offers no relief, even if the office holder declines to accept compensation.

A pandemic is a global disease outbreak. A flu pandemic occurs when a new influenza virus emerges for which people have little or no immunity, and for which there is no vaccine. The disease spreads easily person-to-person, causes serious illness, and can sweep across the country and around the world in very short time.

The West Virginia Department of Education recognizes that schools play an integral role in protecting the health and safety of staff, students, and their families. The department is working with other state agencies in planning for potential pandemic flu outbreaks.

Fifty grants of $10,000 each will be made to schools, community groups and other non-profit organizations with innovative programs aimed at improving the nutrition and activity habits of young people. The involvement of a registered dietitian or dietetics technician, registered is a requirement for each program.

Fifty-four million kids attend nearly 123,000 schools nationwide. Six million adults work in schools as teachers, nurses, administrators and other staff. Collectively, over 20 percent of the United States population can be found in the school community. Because of the size and accessibility of this population, school health programs are one the most efficient ways of shaping our nations health, education, and social well-being.

The Healthy Schools Program is being launched by the American Heart Association and the William J. Clinton Foundation, with funding from The Robert Wood Johnson Foundation, and in collaboration with members of the Alliance for a Healthier Generation. This is a network of organizations and individuals concerned with childhood obesity and physical inactivity among Americas youth.

To provide leadership, training and support for schools and their communities designed to improve collaboration and ensure the health and educational achievement of children in a safe, nurturing and disciplined environment.

Coordinators provide a wealth of information, offer asset presentations, facilitate community-building asset initiatives and coordinate with schools to assist with Search surveys. Please contact Adolescent Health Coordinators or Director within your RESA.

The EHCP training will be provided to county school nurses who were unable to attend the 2006 School Nurse institute. This is a voluntary training, if you are comfortable in utiizing the ECHP then do not feel obligated to attend this offering.

The ECHP was develop to provide a standard EHCP while ensuring quality and acountability for students.  The EHCP is not comprehensive of all specialized procedures in the school setting but will allow for EHCP to be created for students with insulin by injection, insulin by pump, metered dose inhalers, vagal nerve stimulator, rectal valium (Diastat), sterile catheterization, sterile suctioning, mechanical ventilator, emergencey care of a tracheostomy and emergency replacement of a tracheostomy. These ten specialized procedures will allow your county to receive part of the one million dollar appropriation from SB 53. WVDE will upload the  EHCP on January 1, 2006 and June 1, 2007 to distribute the funds according to the specialized procedures identified above and health service hours.

All "Prescribed OTCs" fall under the management and delegation of the county certified school nurses. Please speak with the certified school nurse to ensure your county has a "Nonprescribed OTC" policy.

After registration, the designee's employment will have to be verified by WVDE-Office of Healthy Schools. Once verified as county school personnel, a list will be sent to the "Technology Administrator" for generation of an email to the "designee" for access to the training. The training can be accessed at http://wvlearns.k12.wv.us/index.asp with a user ID and password.

West Virginia University is offering an online initial substitute school nurse training and renewal program. This is a noncredit course with a certificate upon completion. Please make sure your county board of education will accept this 18 hour training for initial substitute permit approval or the 12 hour course for renewal of the substitute permit.

A training for health educators, school nurses and community health specialist was held at Fairmont State University on March 14, 2005. The incorporation of activities and teaching tools enhanced the learning experience and capacity of all participants.

SHEC Conference proved to be a true success. This year several tracks were available, such as family health, school health, school nursing and community health. A BIG thank you to all SHEC Conference Planning Committee Members for an excellent conference.

Assessment Brief has been created for a quick review of the state distribution of certified school nurses,student screenings and students with medical/health conditions. The complete School Nurse Needs Assessment is posted on the Office of Healthy Schools home page and above.

Guidance and counseling program content standards and student competencies.)  The nine National Standards for School Counseling are organized in three categories of student development: academic, career and personal/social.  These standards provide guidance and direction for states, school systems and individual schools to develop quality and effective school counseling programs.  Each of the nine standards includes a list of student competencies that enumerate the desired student learning outcomes.  The student competencies define the specific knowledge, attitudes and skills that students should obtain or demonstrate as a result of participating in a school counseling program.

Program Guide.  This program guide describes West Virginia's comprehensive developmental guidance and counseling program model and outlines a process for tailoring the model to meet the needs of individual West Virginia districts and schools.

Good health and safety are essential to student learning.  The administration of medication to students during the school day should be discouraged unless absolutely necessary for the student&#8217;s health.  Administration of medication during the school day is essential to allow some students to attend school.  This policy establishes the standards that must be followed when any medication is required to be administered during attendance at school or school related events and to provide for emergency medication administration, when necessary.

County Boards of Education shall develop or amend medication administration policies to meet or exceed the standards set forth in W.Va. Code '18-5-22a as well as the components set forth in this policy.

The West Virginia Department of Education (WVDE) may issue and periodically update advisories to provide guidance on the administration of medication to students in the West Virginia public school system .

Coordinate development of procedures for the administration of medication during school-related events with classroom teachers, school nurses, parents/guardians, designated qualified personnel and administrator&#8217;s designees.

For students needing long-term and emergency prescription medication to attend school, the school nurse shall assess the student, review the licensed prescriber&#8217;s orders, assure implementation of needed health and safety procedures, and develop a health care plan.

Complete and sign a parent/guardian authorization form (to be designed by each county), which indicates student name; date; allergies; medication name; dosage, time, and route; intended effect of medication; other medication(s) taken by student; and parent/guardian signature .

When a student&#8217;s medical condition requires a change in the medication dosage or schedule, the parent must provide a new written authorization form from a licensed prescriber and container.  This must be given to designated personnel within an appropriate time frame.

Submit a written report to the administrator and county superintendent at the time of the incident.  The report should include the name of the student, the parent/guardian name and phone number, a specific statement of the medication incident, who was notified, and what remedial actions were taken.

A written statement is received from a licensed prescriber which contains the student name, purpose, appropriate usage, dosage, time or times at which, or the special circumstances under which the medication is to be administered.

The student has demonstrated the ability and understanding to self-administer asthma medication by passing an assessment by the school nurse evaluating the student&#8217;s technique of self-administration and level of understanding of the appropriate use of the asthma medication.

The parent/guardian has acknowledged in writing that they have read and understand a notice provided by the county board of education stating that the school, county school board and its employees and agents are exempt from any liability, except for willful and wanton conduct, as a result of any injury arising from the self-administration of asthma medication.

The permission to self-administer asthma medication shall be effective for the school year for which it is granted and all documents related to the self-administration of asthma medication shall become part of the student health record.

The permission to self-administer asthma medication may be revoked if the school administrator finds that the student&#8217;s technique and understanding of the use of asthma medication is not appropriate or is willfully disregarded.

When a parent/guardian authorizes a non-prescribed medication to be given in addition to a known prescribed medication, the administrator or school nurse shall validate the safety of multiple medications.  At times, this validation process may require a licensed provider order.

Access to medications shall be under the authority of the administrator of the school in conjunction with the school nurse assigned to that school.  If there is a full-time school nurse assigned to the building, the school nurse shall have authority over the access to prescribed medications.

School personnel shall dispose of unused or outdated medicine unclaimed by the parent/guardian no later than 30 days after the parent/guardian medication authorization expires or on the last day of school.

Medication disposal shall be done in a manner in which no other individual has access to any unused portion.  Two individuals will witness the disposal of the medication and the procedure must be documented on the appropriate form related to the specific student.

B.  ensure that parents or guardians are informed of educational and related opportunities available to their children, and are provided with meaningful opportunities to participate in the education of their children.

E.  immediately assist in obtaining immunizations or record of immunizations or other medical records for those students who do not have them, and assure that students are enrolled in school while the records are being obtained.

H.  ensure that homeless families, children, and youths receive educational services for which such families, children, and youths are eligible, including Head Start and Even Start programs and preschool programs administered by the local educational agency, and referrals to health care services, dental services, mental health services, and other appropriate services.

Virginia Division of Motor Vehicles shall deny a license or instruction permit for the operation of a motor vehicle to any person under the age of eighteen who does not at the time of application present a diploma or other certificate of graduation issued to the person from a secondary high school of this state or any other state, or documentation that the person: (1) is enrolled and making satisfactory progress in a course leading to a general educational development certificate (GED) from a state approved institution or organization, or has obtained such certificate; (2) is enrolled in a secondary school of this state; (3) is a West Virginia resident enrolled in an out-of-state school; (4) is excused from such requirement due to circumstances beyond his or her control; or (5) is enrolled in an institution of higher education as a full-time student in this state or any other state.

Suspension or expulsion from school or imprisonment in a jail or a West Virginia correctional facility is not a circumstance beyond the control of the person.  If suspended, the West Virginia Division of Motor Vehicles may not reinstate a license before the end of the semester following that in which the withdrawal occurred.

The Legislature also finds that the State of West Virginia must take an informed, sensitive approach to communicate and educate the citizens of the state about health issues related to obesity and inappropriate weight gain. The Legislature further finds that the state must take action to assist West Virginia citizens in engaging in healthful eating and regular physical activity. The Legislature further finds that the state must invest in research that improves understanding of inappropriate weight gain and obesity. These efforts are needed to coordinate the state's interest in improving the health of its citizens and in reducing the cost of health care. Therefore, it is the purpose of this article to create, as an integral part of the Department of Health and Human Resources, an entity to coordinate the efforts of all agencies to prevent and remedy obesity and related weight problems and to ensure that all citizens are being educated on this serious health risk that is affecting the state.

There is hereby created the Office of Healthy Lifestyles within the Department of Health and Human Resources. The management of this office shall be provided in the manner determined by the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Resources to be in the best interest of the state and its citizens.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a separate special revenue account, which shall be an interest bearing account, to be known as the "Healthy Lifestyles Fund". The special revenue account shall consist of all appropriations made by the Legislature, income from the investment of moneys held in the special revenue account and all other sums available for deposit to the special revenue account from any source, public or private. No expenditures for purposes of this section are authorized from collections except in accordance with the provisions of article three, chapter twelve of this code and upon fulfillment of the provisions set forth in article two, chapter eleven-b of this code. Any balance remaining in the special revenue account at the end of any state fiscal year does not revert to the general revenue fund but remains in the special revenue account and shall be used solely in a manner consistent with this article. No expenses incurred under this section shall be a charge against the general funds of the state.

Provided, That nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the use of programs designed under the auspices of the President's Council on Physical Fitness and Sports. The program shall include modified tests for exceptional students. Each school in the state shall participate in National Physical Fitness and Sports Month in May of each year and shall make every effort to involve the community it serves in the related events.

An opportunity shall be afforded to the parent or guardian of a child subject to instruction in the prevention, transmission and spread of acquired immune deficiency syndrome and other sexually transmitted diseases to examine the course curriculum requirements and materials to be used in the instruction. The parent or guardian may exempt the child from participation in the instruction by giving notice to that effect in writing to the school principal.

In the 2002-2003 school year, the Office of Student Services and Health Promotion at the West Virginia Department of Education planned and implemented its first ever statewide assessment of health education. A team of health educators from across WV planned and implemented this assessment. Assessment items were taken from the State Collaborative on Assessment and Student Standards Health Education Assessment Project (SCASS-HEAP). Health education content areas and items were selected based on the extent to which they aligned with the WV Health Education Content Standards and Objectives ( CSOs ). All grades included items on the health education content areas of nutrition, physical activity, growth and development, alcohol and other drugs and tobacco. Grades 6 included items on injury prevention and the 8 th grade and high school versions included questions on mental health.

Injury prevention emerged as an area of strength for 6 th graders. Conversely, sixth graders had their lowest scores in growth and development. Eighth graders almost met the standard on physical activity; their lowest scores were on the alcohol and other drugs questions. High school students almost met the standard on the nutrition questions and they scored the lowest on the mental health questions.

Comparisons of HEAP scores based on gender showed significant differences. Mean HEAP scores (overall and subscores ) for female students were higher than scores for male students. The gender differences on HEAP Scores were maintained when the analysis was conducted at the three grade levels.

It is great that West Virginia has mandated the FITNESSGRAM program! I have been receiving multiple calls from West Virginia about the PACER CD for Fitnessgram as well other basic questions regarding the program. I was informed that you have my contact information listed on your website. I think that it would be very helpful to also provide the link to www.fitnessgram.net where your teachers can find the pricing of the Fitnessgram software and the other components of the program, as well as other valuable information. I have attached the Fitnessgram Brochure to this email, if you perhaps like to post it on your website as a reference so that individuals might gather the information they need for placing their orders.

I am more than happy to work with your teachers on getting them set up with the Fitnessgram software, but I think it would be beneficial to all parties involved if you could provide further information on your website.

Incidental travel costs such as mileage, parking fees, ground transportation, and non-event meals will be reimbursed to the attendee upon submission of an invoice form and required receipts to the  CONSORTIUM after attendance at the event. More detailed information concerning travel arrangements will be supplied upon successful registration.

West Virginia's public schools.  They also outline the requirements for educators who wish to qualify for an advanced salary classification.  Important terminology is defined, governing principles are identified, and the criteria for issuance of each license and salary classification are established.

Licensure requirements established in this policy provide a means of ensuring that persons employed in West Virginia public schools have the necessary knowledge and skills to meet the responsibilities of their professional assignments in instruction, student support, administration, and any other areas of responsibility for which licensure is required.

WVBE by the first day of May, annually, a report that includes: 1) the available teacher positions in the county; 2) any shortages in subject matter areas in the county; and 3) the name of all teachers reduced in force provided the teacher has permitted the county board of education to submit his/her name.

G.  Validity of Test Scores. -   The validity period for in-state and out-of-state tests and passing scores is ten years from the date on which the candidate passed the examination.  In those circumstances where the WVBE has not altered either the required test or the passing score, the test and score shall remain valid beyond the ten-year period.  A candidate whose test scores exceed the ten-year validity period at the time of application for licensure is required to satisfy current tests and passing scores.

H.  Failure to Apply for Licensure. - A candidate who fails to apply for licensure within three months from the date of eligibility for licensure is required to satisfy any additional test and program components in effect at the time of application and to comply with conditions outlined for the validity period.

Supervisor of Instruction and shall indicate the specialization(s) and grade levels in which the holder may be assigned within the public schools.  Experience gained on the Temporary Administrative Certificate may be used for conversion purposes.  The Temporary Administrative Certificate is issued to an administrator who graduates from an out-of-state institution of higher learning, or who is transferring his/her credential from another state or country so that s/he may complete the requirements for testing if applicable and the Evaluation Leadership Institute.

B.  Out-of-State Certification - For those candidates who hold a valid out-of-state Professional Administrative Certificate in the area for which West Virginia licensure is requested without completion of the Evaluation Leadership Institute offered through the West Virginia Center for Professional Development or equivalent training approved by the WVBE.

D.  	Recommendation of Superintendent. - If the candidate is currently employed by a county board of education, the candidate must receive the recommendation of the employing county's superintendent. If the educator does not teach in West Virginia, then s/he must secure a recommendation from his/her most recent education supervisor. If the signature of a superintendent or educational supervisor is not available, a recommendation from the current employer or a community leader is acceptable.

D.  Successful Educational Experience. - Three years of successful out-of-state experience as an educator within the seven years immediately preceding the date of application, the required tests in Basic Skills and Content, if applicable, and a valid out-of-state Career/Technical Education Certificate.  Both the out-of-state certificate and the experience must be in the specialization(s) for which West Virginia licensure is requested.

Education shall be valid for one school year and shall expire on June 30.  An educator employed on or after January 1 may be issued a First-Class/Full-Time Permit for Career/Technical Education valid until June 30 of the following school year.  This is to allow completion of the required coursework prior to making application for the initial career/technical certificate.

D.  Technical School. - Complete credit in an approved two or four year technical school.  Each ten-semester hours of approved coursework may count for one year toward the four years of required work experience.  However, maximum allowance for credit in lieu of experience is two years toward the four years of required work experience.

C.  Recommendation. - Receive the recommendation of the county superintendent verifying that the applicant is the most qualified candidate for the position, or, if the candidate for the permit is a county superintendent, receive a recommendation and verification of employment from the county board of education.

Certificate endorsed for early education, elementary education, preschool education, or preschool special needs must be completed within five years of the original issuance of the First-Class/Full-Time Permit for Community Programs.

A.  Verification of successful completion of eighteen clock hours of training provided or authorized by the employing county to include but not be limited to classroom management, state and local policies, content standards and objectives, and an overview of school law to include reporting requirements for suspected child abuse. The eighteen clock hours of training may include no more than six clock hours of classroom observation and must have been completed no more than one year prior to the date the application is received by the local education agency.

Permit may serve as a short-term substitute in any teaching area or may serve in a position for more than 30 consecutive instructional days in the endorsement area reflected on the Long-Term Substitute Permit.

When the ESL teacher delivers the content standards and objectives in the general education program, s/he must collaborate with the appropriate teachers to ensure that the LEP student receives the content standards and objectives in the general education program.

Individuals who previously were issued a Gifted Education endorsement for only those grade levels that appeared on their general education or career/technical education certificates may request the 1-12 grade level endorsement by submitting the appropriate application to the WVDE.

If it is later determined that the applicant was not eligible, the State Superintendent may authorize payment by the county board of education to the applicant for a time not exceeding three school months or the date of notification of his or her ineligibility, whichever occurs first (Refer to W.Va.

Career/Technical Education Certificate shall be based on a bachelor's degree unless the permit or certificate is issued on the basis of a master's or doctoral degree in which case the salary will be at the appropriate degree level.

Reimbursement for courses completed toward certification renewal is limited to fifteen semester hours of courses for any teacher.   An educator may be reimbursed for an unlimited number of hours when working on an additional endorsement in a verified shortage area.  The educator must have completed the appropriate college or university coursework with a minimum 3.0 GPA.

Certification Program may submit a request for reimbursement of one-half of the fee by submitting the appropriate application to the WVDE with the appropriate documentation, which includes a copy of the canceled check verifying payment of the assessment fee for which reimbursement is requested, and documentation that the candidate is enrolled in the NBPTS Certification Program.

In those circumstances where the West Virginia Board of Education has not altered either the required test or the passing score, the test and score shall remain valid beyond the ten-year period.  See section 8.5 in Policy 5100 for a more detailed explanation of testing requirements, particularly as they apply to experienced educators.

NOTE: All programs leading to a Chemistry/Physics endorsement must meet the standards listed within this section as well as those listed in the Physics section.  All individuals completing a program leading to an endorsement in Chemistry/Physics must meet all test requirements listed within this section as well as the Physics section.

Character Education in West Virginia schools is integrated in several different ways based upon each individual school or county school system. In April 2001, Character Education was mandated through HB 2208 for all schools to integrate character education into all aspects of school culture, school functions and existing curriculum. All public schools PK-12 are to develop and integrate components of character development into their existing curriculum. The school may incorporate such programs as "Life Skills", "Responsible Students", or any other program encompassing any of the following components: honesty, caring, citizenship, justice, fairness, respect, and responsibility.

The West Virginia Department of Education during the Safe Schools Conference 2001 trained approximately 200 educators in national character education models for integrating character education throughout the school curriculum and school environment. The models represented where the following: Character Counts!, Character Centered Teaching, and the Giraffe Heroes Program. In March 2002, an additional 120 educators where trained by Dr. Phil Vincent on "Developing Character in Students". During the 2002 Center for Professional Development Summer workshops approximately 960 educators attended workshops at one of the eight regional sites on the integration of character education. The presenters during these sessions were West Virginia Schools presenting Best Practice Sessions.

Schools around the State are implementing character education in a variety of ways. In order for character education to be effective and have long lasting results, character education needs to be developed by the school, parents, and community. Schools have been using the character education professional development opportunities, the prevention programs currently in place, and the instructional goals and objectives for each subject area in order to create a comprehensive, well disciplined, safe and caring school environment for all students. In addition, Caring Habits of the Month Adventure Project was presented to approximately 100 educators in March 2004. Since then the West Virginia Department of Education has developed a contract with Caring Habits to provide a statewide framework for implementing character education.

If you would like to receive information periodically concerning character education updates, professional development opportunties and resources, please send Lisa Burton an email at lgburton@access.k12.wv.us to be placed on a listserv.

This Comprehensive Guidance and Counseling Program Manual provides an important framework for a developmental, sequential program for students based on the national model. While the core of the framework lies in the student centered standards and competencies, the implementation of the national model is driven by school wide data that points to student needs.

To provide background for all stakeholders in schools for understanding the paradigm shift in school counseling from monitoring process and measuring services delivered to focusing also on and measuring the results of school counseling programs and services.

To provide practical support for the school counselor by its inclusion of program implementation and best practices sections. A categorized resource listing offers assistance to school counselors as they lead the way to address student needs in their respective schools.

Essential to the successful implementation of the programmatic model are two basic beliefs: Students are more important than the system, and the school counselor is an essential member of the educational team.

The information provided under the School Closings Website is not under the control of the WV Department of Education, and the WV Department of Education makes no representations, warranties or guarantees relating to the accuracy or timeliness of the information posted on the Closings Website. County Offices  assume any and all risk associated with relying upon the accuracy and timeliness of the information presented.

Information is provided concerning etiquette, the braille code, the white cane, anatomy of the eye, myths and misconceptions, and inspirational stories about people who are blind and visually impaired. Learn more about blindness awareness.

This section contains resources and adaptations for students with visual impairments that are intended to help them achieve proficiency in all academic subjects from language arts, math, science, and social studies to art, music and physical education. Learn more about providing students with visual impairments access to the core curriculum.

The expanded core curriculum refers to specialized skills needed by students who are blind and visually impaired to access and participate meaningfully and independently in the core curriculum through specialized instruction in assistive technology, communication skills, travel skills, daily living skills, vocational skills, and visual skills. Learn more about the expanded core curriculum.

Specific populations refer to students with visual impairments who have additional considerations, such as those who are deafblind, second language learners, pre-school age, or who have multiple disabilities. Also included are the individuals who are involved with students with visual impairments. These include parents, general educators, administrators, school psychologists, paraprofessionals, related service providers, and teachers of students with visual disabilities. Learn more about specific populations.

This Toolbox contains items related to developing self-determination skills. Visit this toolbox to gather ideas on ways to support the development of this skill for students who are deaf or hard of hearing Self Determination.

IDEA requires that IEP teams consider the communication of students who are deaf and hard of hearing. Regardless of the student's communication mode, teams need to plan for providing full communication access for the student's entire day. Here are some tools for teams to use in planning and providing communication access.

The Deaf Education Master Teacher Project has made available multiple and practical solution focused information for educating students who are deaf or hard of hearing. Information showcased was developed by teachers who are identified as Masters in the field. Examples of topics include making information visible, phonics, sign language, incorporating technology into lessons, ASL and English literacy, self-advocacy, use of interpreters, language and vocabulary development, tips for itinerant teachers, deaf culture and deaf role models, family involvement, and many more.

HE.5.3.1 distinguish between safe and risky or harmful behaviors in relationships and list strategies (e.g., anger management, peer pressure reversal, self-protective strategies) to reduce threatening situations.

HE.HS.1.2 discriminate between the positive and potentially negative effects of local and global environmental health problems (e.g., pollutionair, land, water, noise, exposure to sun, pesticides, food production).

HE.HS.1.3 analyze and interpret how public health and social policies, along with government regulations (e.g., local, state, federal, world health organizations), influence health promotion and disease prevention.

HE.HS.5.4 identify potentially harmful situations (e.g., domestic violence, dating violence) and devise strategies and develop skills to avoid such situations through refusal, negotiation and collaboration skills (e.g., peer mediation, conflict resolution, support groups, constructive I statements).

HE.HS.6.1 apply a decision-making process to set goals for various life situations (e.g., food choices, weight control, relationships, health care providers, making purchases, education and career options).

HE.HS.7.4 identify school support staff (e.g., counselors, nurses, professionals) and community health services (e.g., Big Brothers, mental health facilities, ministerial counseling) and describe the impact this service has on individual school and community health.

HE.K.3.4 identify household poisons and their symbols and drugs and medicines to avoid without supervised use, HE.K.3.5 identify  actions that might lead to accidents or dangerous situations at school or in the community.

Lisa Burton has worked for the West Virginia Department of Education for seven years. Prior to her work with the West Virginia Department of Education, she was a school counselor for five years. In addition, she is a licensed professional counselor (LPC), a nationally certified school counselor (NCC) and an approved Licensed Professional Supervisor (ALPS). She is certified K-12 in school counseling and has an educational specialist degree in school counseling.

Have students compare rules their parents and other adults reported. How many reported the same rule? Are any rules in the the Student Code of Conduct the same as reported through these interviews? Which ones?

"The bus will be here any minute," John thought. His stomach was already upset because he knew it would start again when he got on the bus. The teasing had been bad enough, but now they were punching and kicking him. Every day it got worse and no one seemed willing to help him. He had told the bus driver what was happening, but was told, "Just be a man about it."

MERIT mentor teachers (MMTs), at least one from each of the 55 county school systems and more in higher population counties. Working with mathematicians and mathematics educators from institutions of  higher education, this group serves all school systems in WV. Project MERIT will provide for the systematic delivery of instruction in the pedagogical content knowledge of mathematics to more than 950 mathematics teachers (grades 6-8) throughout the state of West Virginia.

The teacher will show the plates to the class and ask the students to identify the meal illustrated on the plate. Is it breakfast, lunch or dinner? This may be done in small groups or large group instruction.

Students will distinguish between safe and risky or harmful behaviors in relationships and list strategies (e.g. anger management, peer pressure reversal, self-protecive strategies) to reduce threatening situations.

Students will recall communication skills needed with conflict resolution and relating feelings in positive and proactive ways; and recognize aggressive, passive and assertive ways to respond to conflict.

Fourth grade students performing at the mastery level will state all forms of communication to express feelings; recognize positive personal qualities and list those needed for making and keeping friends.

Discuss with students the meaning of "I" statements. By using an "I" statement, the persons speaking is accepting responsibility for his/her own feelings, thoughts, and behavior. Sometimes when we are upset we blame other people.

The teacher will model an "I" statement. For example: "I felt angry when you didn't invite me to your party. I felt left out." These statements are not blaming. The speaker takes the responsibility for his/her feelings.

Students may work in pairs to complete the interactive quiz at the URL listed below. This site provides lots of information about the nutrients contained in foods from each level of the food pyramid and how the body uses them.

Students will list situations on the board or on poster paper in which people find themselves throughout life(e.g. attending a new school, going to a place where you do not know the other people, traveling alone). Sometimes these situations may be safe and at other times they may not be.

Have the class to hi light or check off situations that may be uncomfortable or unsafe(e.g., being at a party where drugs or alcohol are being used, riding in a car with someone who has been drinking).

"EXERCISE: Exercise is one of the most effective methods of stress management. If you do nothing else to reduce the harmful effects of stress, you should exercise. Exercise not only strengthens your body and increases your stamina so you're physically more capable to deal with stress, it also lowers your blood pressure, relaxes your muscles, reduces heart rate, etc. Many people find that exercise promotes mental stimulation and tranquility as well as invigorates and relaxes.

Chemicals (endorphins) are released by the body during physical activity, which produces a "natural high." Although the best way to exercise is to use your whole body and cardiovascular system in a workout at least three times a week, you can also do exercises as simple as stretches."

Invite the students to join you in a stretch break. Direct students to "stretch both arms up toward the ceiling with hands and fingers outstretched.stretch.then drop, relax, let's go!" Repeat the stretch.

Finally announce that those students who think this is a silly exercise and believe the group should be more serious should use their right hip and write the Pledge of Allegiance or the National Anthem (or school song).

IMAGERY:  Encourage students to design their own relaxation scene. It should be a place they like to go to relax (beach, fishing hole, etc.) or anyplace they can imagine as a restful place. Ask them to close their eyes and picture the scene. What are the shapes, the sounds, and the smells? Whenever they feel under stress they can take a "mental vacation," closes their eyes, and conjures up this scene.

"Each time you breathe, concentrate on the feelings and changes in your body that occur with each breath. Listen to your breath, hearing the sounds of breathing in and out. Allow the thoughts of the day to be forgotten. Repeat a special word rather than listening to your breathing if this works better for you. Fifteen minutes of meditation can be effective in reducing tensions, and the more you practice, the less your mind will wander as you do this."

Level: Students will compare safety guidelines for preventing unintentional and intentional injuries; list appropriate procedures to prevent pregnancy with emphasis on abstinence; review the laws and policies related to harassment in the school, community and job setting and recall school rules related to harassment; and identify the signs of various self-destructive behaviors.

Lead a discussion on the dangers of having sex at their age. Have students generate dangers and write them on the board. Divide students into groups of four or five. Challenge students to list as many ways as possible of expressing affection without having sexual intercourse. Have one student from each group write suggestions on flip chart.

Level: Students will state the different cultural beliefs and their impact on health behaviors; determine cause and effect of peer harassment and how this impacts total health; research, with assistance, historical events pertaining to individual/group differences and recognize the impact of such events on laws and social norms; and review ATOD media messages and interpret them with assistance.

Draw a rectangle on the board, the head of the company sits at the head of the table (draw a square at one end of the rectangle) and asks the others to help solve the problems, or to give advice. The board of directors (draw squares around the remaining sides of table) gives their opinions and argues among themselves about what should be done. The head of the company listens and makes the final decisions.

Suggest to students that when they make a decision, they are like the head of a company with their board of directors. Their parents, friends, and other important people sit on the board and influence what they decide. Some people, like friends and parents, have influence because one wants to please them. Parents and grandparents may influence them because they have instilled strong values in them.

Have each student answer the following questions: (1) Who influences you on a regular basis? (2) How do your friends influence your decisions? (3) Who on your board of directors helps you to make wise, healthy decisions? (4) Who, if any, on your board of directors continually influences you to make unhealthy decisions, which you later regret? And (5) What can you learn from this activity to use in future decision making?

After students have learned to read food labels and calculate the percentage of fat contained in each serving, explain the formula for calculating the amount of calories they must take in to maintain their desired body weight.

Relate the following to the class: "One of the first steps in making a good decision is knowing what you want and what is important to you. After all, if you do not care what happens, it does not matter if you make a good decision. Today you will have the opportunity to choose among some things that are important to you or that may be important to you some day."

"Imagine that you are given 5,000 Life Units. Life Units are similar to dollars in that they are both valuable and are transferable. Life units are much more valuable than money because they are imaginary units of your life an represent what you think is important for you."

"The handout you have been given (on the board), is a list of items you may want to have in life. The cost of each, in terms of Life Units, is also listed. Each item will be auctioned off shortly. Study the list and determine how you would best like to spend all of your Life Units. If you have units left at he end, you will have to return them and receive nothing in return at that point. Therefore, it is to your advantage to spend all 5,000 units."

The auctioneer should start the auction by beginning the bidding at 1,000 units for world peace. The activity should continue under the direction of the appointed auctioneer for 30 minutes or until all the items are "sold." The recorder's task is to keep a running record of both items purchased and all units spent by each bidder.

Give each group a marker and station before one of the five dimensions. Instruct them to consider what behaviors, characteristics and elements are a part of their assigned dimension. Have students rotate from dimension to dimension, brainstorming each.

Up: Have students walk around the room following the last dimension to see how each dimension turned out. Tape the charts so that they overlap each other showing how each affects the others. Follow up with large group discussion about how the individual dimensions are defined, overlapped and related with the other dimensions. Conclude by asking them to arrive at their own functional definitions of health and wellness .

Each student is responsible for calculating the approximate total calories from their recipe and the percentage of fat calories (a review on how to calculate food calories should have preceded this activity).

Begin the lesson by reviewing what students learned about depression in the video. What is depression? What are some different types of depression? What are some causes of depression? Describe different treatments available.

Next, have students work in pairs and discuss what facts in the video they found most surprising. Tell students they will choose one fact they'd like to explore further to create a "Myth and Reality" poster about that aspect of depression. Their poster should highlight one misperception and feature the truth. Encourage students to use facts from the video and their own research. They can also include quotes from a variety of sources: the video, their research, or anonymous interviews. Below are some ideas for common misperceptions about depression. You may choose to use them to spark discussion among students.

"logo." Encyclopedia Britannica defines logo as " any visible sign or device used by a business enterprise to identify its goods and distinguish them from those made or carried by others. Trademarks may be words or groups of words, letters, numerals, devices, names, the shape or other presentation of products or their packages, color combinations with signs, combinations of colors , and combinations of any of the."

Dictionary of International Trade and Business (PACIFIC-DITB) is an experimental hypertext dictionary that covers the fields of international trade, international business, international financial economics, and general macroeconomics. An easy-to-use search interface enables users to quickly locate interesting information, and hypertext links in individual dictionary entries allow users to explore further related information.

As of August 1998, the IMF/IFS Retrieval System uses a new internal database format. This should make access faster, while the user interface remains unchanged. If you notice any problems caused by this software upgrade, please contact Werner Antweiler with a description of the problem.

Access to this service is deprecated because this database has not been updated in a long while. The World Bank has changed the delivery mechanism for these data, and the data set has been renamed the "World Development Indicators".

Access to the World Tables database is restricted to current students, staff, and faculty of the University of British Columbia. Use of the database is restricted to academic non-commercial purposes only.

University of California at Berkeley, Haas School of Business, in organizational behavior and industrial relations, and an MBA from the Stanford Graduate School of Business. Her research interests include corporate strategy and interfirm relations in Japan, human resource management in the Japanese firm, organizational innovation and organizational learning in international business, and comparative institutional analysis in East Asia. Professor Ahmadjian's current research includes studies on the structure and performance of suppliers and large manufacturers in the Japanese automotive and electronics industries and keiretsu relations between publicly traded firms in japan.

She is currently working on several projects including a study of Japan's software industry and a book exploring how the state managed competition in Japan's telecommunications, computer, semiconductor, software, and consumer electronics industries. She received her undergraduate, masters, and Ph.D. degree from the University of California at Berkeley.

M.A. and B.A. degrees in East Asian Studies from the University of Oregon. He has published two books and about forty articles in the areas of technology management and policy in Japan, institutional environments for technological innovation, and technology transfer.

University of Illinois, Department of Business Administration.  Prior to his appointment with the University of Illinois, Professor Roehl has taught at the University of Michigan and the University of Washington in Seattle.

With respect to customs duties and charges of any kind imposed on or in connection with importation or exportation or imposed on the international transfer of payments for imports or exports, and with respect to the method of levying such duties and charges, and with respect to all rules and formalities in connection with importation and exportation, and with respect to all matters referred to in paragraphs 2 and 4 of Article III, any advantage, favour, privilege or immunity granted by any contracting party to any product originating in or destined for any other country shall be accorded immediately and unconditionally to the like product originating in or destined for the territories of all other contracting parties.

The provisions of paragraph 1 shall not apply to preferences between the countries formerly a part of the Ottoman Empire and detached from it on July 24, 1923, provided such preferences are approved under paragraph 5 of Article XXV, which shall be applied in this respect in the light of paragraph 1 of Article XXIX.

Such products shall also be exempt from all other duties or charges of any kind imposed on or in connection with importation in excess of those imposed on the date of this Agreement or those directly and mandatorily required to be imposed thereafter by legislation in force in the importing territory on that date.

No contracting party shall alter its method of determining dutiable value or of converting currencies so as to impair the value of any of the concessions provided for in the appropriate Schedule annexed to this Agreement.

If any contracting party establishes, maintains or authorizes, formally or in effect, a monopoly of the importation of any product described in the appropriate Schedule annexed to this Agreement, such monopoly shall not, except as provided for in that Schedule or as otherwise agreed between the parties which initially negotiated the concession, operate so as to afford protection on the average in excess of the amount of protection provided for in that Schedule. The provisions of this paragraph shall not limit the use by contracting parties of any form of assistance to domestic producers permitted by other provisions of this Agreement.

If any contracting party considers that a product is not receiving from another contracting party the treatment which the first contracting party believes to have been contemplated by a concession provided for in the appropriate Schedule annexed to this Agreement, it shall bring the matter directly to the attention of the other contracting party. If the latter agrees that the treatment contemplated was that claimed by the first contracting party, but declares that such treatment cannot be accorded because a court or other proper authority has ruled to the effect that the product involved cannot be classified under the tariff laws of such contracting party so as to permit the treatment contemplated in this Agreement, the two contracting parties, together with any other contracting parties substantially interested, shall enter promptly into further negotiations with a view to a compensatory adjustment of the matter.

Provided that the CONTRACTING PARTIES (i.e., the contracting parties acting jointly as provided for in Article XXV) concur that such adjustments will not impair the value of the concessions provided for in the appropriate Schedule or elsewhere in this Agreement, due account being taken of all factors which may influence the need for, or urgency of, such adjustments.

The contracting parties recognize that internal taxes and other internal charges, and laws, regulations and requirements affecting the internal sale, offering for sale, purchase, transportation, distribution or use of products, and internal quantitative regulations requiring the mixture, processing or use of products in specified amounts or proportions, should not be applied to imported or domestic products so as to afford protection to domestic production.

The products of the territory of any contracting party imported into the territory of any other contracting party shall not be subject, directly or indirectly, to internal taxes or other internal charges of any kind in excess of those applied, directly or indirectly, to like domestic products. Moreover, no contracting party shall otherwise apply internal taxes or other internal charges to imported or domestic products in a manner contrary to the principles set forth in paragraph 1.

With respect to any existing internal tax which is inconsistent with the provisions of paragraph 2, but which is specifically authorized under a trade agreement, in force on April 10, 1947, in which the import duty on the taxed product is bound against increase, the contracting party imposing the tax shall be free to postpone the application of the provisions of paragraph 2 to such tax until such time as it can obtain release from the obligations of such trade agreement in order to permit the increase of such duty to the extent necessary to compensate for the elimination of the protective element of the tax.

No contracting party shall establish or maintain any internal quantitative regulation relating to the mixture, processing or use of products in specified amounts or proportions which requires, directly or indirectly, that any specified amount or proportion of any product which is the subject of the regulation must be supplied from domestic sources.

The provisions of paragraph 5 shall not apply to any internal quantitative regulation in force in the territory of any contracting party on July 1, 1939, April 10, 1947, or March 24, 1948, at the option of that contracting party; Provided that any such regulation which is contrary to the provisions of paragraph 5 shall not be modified to the detriment of imports and shall be treated as a customs duty for the purpose of negotiation.

No internal quantitative regulation relating to the mixture, processing or use of products in specified amounts or proportions shall be applied in such a manner as to allocate any such amount or proportion among external sources of supply.

The contracting parties recognize that internal maximum price control measures, even though conforming to the other provisions of this Article, can have effects prejudicial to the interests of contracting parties supplying imported products. Accordingly, contracting parties applying such measures shall take account of the interests of exporting contracting parties with a view to avoiding to the fullest practicable extent such prejudicial effects.

The provisions of this Article shall not prevent any contracting party from establishing or maintaining internal quantitative regulations relating to exposed cinematograph films and meeting the requirements of Article IV.

Goods (including baggage), and also vessels and other means of transport, shall be deemed to be in transit across the territory of a contracting party when the passage across such territory, with or without trans-shipment, warehousing, breaking bulk, or change in the mode of transport, is only a portion of a complete journey beginning and terminating beyond the frontier of the contracting party across whose territory the traffic passes. Traffic of this nature is termed in this Article "traffic in transit".

There shall be freedom of transit through the territory of each contracting party, via the routes most convenient for international transit, for traffic in transit to or from the territory of other contracting parties. No distinction shall be made which is based on the flag of vessels, the place of origin, departure, entry, exit or destination, or on any circumstances relating to the ownership of goods, of vessels or of other means of transport.

Any contracting party may require that traffic in transit through its territory be entered at the proper custom house, but, except in cases of failure to comply with applicable customs laws and regulations, such traffic coming from or going to the territory of other contracting parties shall not be subject to any unnecessary delays or restrictions and shall be exempt from customs duties and from all transit duties or other charges imposed in respect of transit, except charges for transportation or those commensurate with administrative expenses entailed by transit or with the cost of services rendered.

All charges and regulations imposed by contracting parties on traffic in transit to or from the territories of other contracting parties shall be reasonable, having regard to the conditions of the traffic.

With respect to all charges, regulations and formalities in connection with transit, each contracting party shall accord to traffic in transit to or from the territory of any other contracting party treatment no less favourable than the treatment accorded to traffic in transit to or from any third country.

Each contracting party shall accord to products which have been in transit through the territory of any other contracting party treatment no less favourable than that which would have been accorded to such products had they been transported from their place of origin to their destination without going through the territory of such other contracting party. Any contracting party shall, however, be free to maintain its requirements of direct consignment existing on the date of this Agreement, in respect of any goods in regard to which such direct consignment is a requisite condition of eligibility for entry of the goods at preferential rates of duty or has relation to the contracting party's prescribed method of valuation for duty purposes.

In order to offset or prevent dumping, a contracting party may levy on any dumped product an anti-dumping duty not greater in amount than the margin of dumping in respect of such product. For the purposes of this Article, the margin of dumping is the price difference determined in accordance with the provisions of paragraph 1.

No countervailing duty shall be levied on any product of the territory of any contracting party imported into the territory of another contracting party in excess of an amount equal to the estimated bounty or subsidy determined to have been granted, directly or indirectly, on the manufacture, production or export of such product in the country of origin or exportation, including any special subsidy to the transportation of a particular product. The term "countervailing duty" shall be understood to mean a special duty levied for the purpose of offsetting any bounty or subsidy bestowed, directly or indirectly, upon the manufacture, production or export of any merchandise.

No product of the territory of any contracting party imported into the territory of any other contracting party shall be subject to anti-dumping or countervailing duty by reason of the exemption of such product from duties or taxes borne by the like product when destined for consumption in the country of origin or exportation, or by reason of the refund of such duties or taxes.

The contracting parties recognize the validity of the general principles of valuation set forth in the following paragraphs of this Article, and they undertake to give effect to such principles, in respect of all products subject to duties or other charges or restrictions on importation and exportation based upon or regulated in any manner by value. Moreover, they shall, upon a request by another contracting party review the operation of any of their laws or regulations relating to value for customs purposes in the light of these principles. The CONTRACTING PARTIES may request from contracting parties reports on steps taken by them in pursuance of the provisions of this Article.

The value for customs purposes of any imported product should not include the amount of any internal tax, applicable within the country of origin or export, from which the imported product has been exempted or has been or will be relieved by means of refund.

Monetary Fund, shall formulate rules governing the conversion by contracting parties of any foreign currency in respect of which multiple rates of exchange are maintained consistently with the Articles of Agreement of the International Monetary Fund. Any contracting party may apply such rules in respect of such foreign currencies for the purposes of paragraph 2 of this Article as an alternative to the use of par values. Until such rules are adopted by the CONTRACTING PARTIES, any contracting party may employ, in respect of any such foreign currency, rules of conversion for the purposes of paragraph 2 of this Article which are designed to reflect effectively the value of such foreign currency in commercial transactions.

The bases and methods for determining the value of products subject to duties or other charges or restrictions based upon or regulated in any manner by value should be stable and should be given sufficient publicity to enable traders to estimate, with a reasonable degree of certainty, the value for customs purposes.

No contracting party shall impose substantial penalties for minor breaches of customs regulations or procedural requirements. In particular, no penalty in respect of any omission or mistake in customs documentation which is easily rectifiable and obviously made without fraudulent intent or gross negligence shall be greater than necessary to serve merely as a warning.

Each contracting party shall accord to the products of the territories of other contracting parties treatment with regard to marking requirements no less favourable than the treatment accorded to like products of any third country.

The contracting parties recognize that, in adopting and enforcing laws and regulations relating to marks of origin, the difficulties and inconveniences which such measures may cause to the commerce and industry of exporting countries should be reduced to a minimum, due regard being had to the necessity of protecting consumers against fraudulent or misleading indications.

The laws and regulations of contracting parties relating to the marking of imported products shall be such as to permit compliance without seriously damaging the products, or materially reducing their value, or unreasonably increasing their cost.

As a general rule, no special duty or penalty should be imposed by any contracting party for failure to comply with marking requirements prior to importation unless corrective marking is unreasonably delayed or deceptive marks have been affixed or the required marking has been intentionally omitted.

The contracting parties shall co-operate with each other with a view to preventing the use of trade names in such manner as to misrepresent the true origin of a product, to the detriment of such distinctive regional or geographical names of products of the territory of a contracting party as are protected by its legislation. Each contracting party shall accord full and sympathetic consideration to such requests or representations as may be made by any other contracting party regarding the application of the undertaking set forth in the preceding sentence to names of products which have been communicated to it by the other contracting party.

Laws, regulations, judicial decisions and administrative rulings of general application, made effective by any contracting party, pertaining to the classification or the valuation of products for customs purposes, or to rates of duty, taxes or other charges, or to requirements, restrictions or prohibitions on imports or exports or on the transfer of payments therefor, or affecting their sale, distribution, transportation, insurance, warehousing, inspection, exhibition, processing, mixing or other use, shall be published promptly in such a manner as to enable governments and traders to become acquainted with them. Agreements affecting international trade policy which are in force between the government or a governmental agency of any contracting party and the government or governmental agency of any other contracting party shall also be published. The provisions of this paragraph shall not require any contracting party to disclose confidential information which would impede law enforcement or otherwise be contrary to the public interest or would prejudice the legitimate commercial interests of particular enterprises, public or private.

No measure of general application taken by any contracting party effecting an advance in a rate of duty or other charge on imports under an established and uniform practice, or imposing a new or more burdensome requirement, restriction or prohibition on imports, or on the transfer of payments therefor, shall be enforced before such measure has been officially published.

No prohibitions or restrictions other than duties, taxes or other charges, whether made effective through quotas, import or export licences or other measures, shall be instituted or maintained by any contracting party on the importation of any product of the territory of any other contracting party or on the exportation or sale for export of any product destined for the territory of any other contracting party.

Any contracting party applying restrictions on the importation of any product pursuant to sub-paragraph (c) of this paragraph shall give public notice of the total quantity or value of the product permitted to be imported during a specified future period and of any change in such quantity or value. Moreover, any restrictions applied under (i) above shall not be such as will reduce the total of imports relative to the total of domestic production, as compared with the proportion which might reasonably be expected to rule between the two in the absence of restrictions. In determining this proportion, the contracting party shall pay due regard to the proportion prevailing during a previous representative period and to any special factors which may have affected or may be affecting the trade in the product concerned.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph 1 of Article XI, any contracting party, in order to safeguard its external financial position and its balance of payments, may restrict the quantity or value of merchandise permitted to be imported, subject to the provisions of the following paragraphs of this Article.

Due regard shall be paid in either case to any special factors which may be affecting the reserves of such contracting party or its need for reserves, including, where special external credits or other resources are available to it, the need to provide for the appropriate use of such credits or resources.

PARTIES determine that the restrictions are being applied in a manner involving an inconsistency of a serious nature with the provisions of this Article or with those of Article XIII (subject to the provisions of Article XIV) and that damage to the trade of any contracting party is caused or threatened thereby, they shall so inform the contracting party applying the restrictions and shall make appropriate recommendations for securing conformity with such provisions within a specified period of time. If such contracting party does not comply with these recommendations within the specified period, the CONTRACTING PARTIES may release any contracting party the trade of which is adversely affected by the restrictions from such obligations under this Agreement towards the contracting party applying the restrictions as they determine to be appropriate in the circumstances.

No prohibition or restriction shall be applied by any contracting party on the importation of any product of the territory of any other contracting party or on the exportation of any product destined for the territory of any other contracting party, unless the importation of the like product of all third countries or the exportation of the like product to all third countries is similarly prohibited or restricted.

With regard to restrictions applied in accordance with paragraph 2 (d) of this Article or under paragraph 2 (c) of Article XI, the selection of a representative period for any product and the appraisal of any special factors affecting the trade in the product shall be made initially by the contracting party applying the restriction; Provided that such contracting party shall, upon the request of any other contracting party having a substantial interest in supplying that product or upon the request of the CONTRACTING PARTIES, consult promptly with the other contracting party or the CONTRACTING PARTIES regarding the need for an adjustment of the proportion determined or of the base period selected, or for the reappraisal of the special factors involved, or for the elimination of conditions, formalities or any other provisions established unilaterally relating to the allocation of an adequate quota or its unrestricted utilization.

The provisions of this Article shall apply to any tariff quota instituted or maintained by any contracting party, and, in so far as applicable, the principles of this Article shall also extend to export restrictions.

A contracting party which applies restrictions under Article XII or under Section B of Article XVIII may, in the application of such restrictions, deviate from the provisions of Article XIII in a manner having equivalent effect to restrictions on payments and transfers for current international transactions which that contracting party may at that time apply under Article VIII or XIV of the Articles of Agreement of the International Monetary Fund, or under analogous provisions of a special exchange agreement entered into pursuant to paragraph 6 of Article XV.

The provisions of Article XIII shall not preclude a group of territories having a common quota in the International Monetary Fund from applying against imports from other countries, but not among themselves, restrictions in accordance with the provisions of Article XII or of Section B of Article XVIII on condition that such restrictions are in all other respects consistent with the provisions of Article XIII.

PARTIES shall accept all findings of statistical and other facts presented by the Fund relating to foreign exchange, monetary reserves and balances of payments, and shall accept the determination of the Fund as to whether action by a contracting party in exchange matters is in accordance with the Articles of Agreement of the International Monetary Fund, or with the terms of a special exchange agreement between that contracting party and the CONTRACTING PARTIES. The CONTRACTING PARTIES, in reaching their final decision in cases involving the criteria set forth in paragraph 2 (a) of Article XII or in paragraph 9 of Article XVIII, shall accept the determination of the Fund as to what constitutes a serious decline in the contracting party's monetary reserves, a very low level of its monetary reserves or a reasonable rate of increase in its monetary reserves, and as to the financial aspects of other matters covered in consultation in such cases.

Contracting parties shall not, by exchange action, frustrate the intent of the provisions of this Agreement, nor, by trade action, the intent of the provisions of the Articles of Agreement of the International Monetary Fund.

If the CONTRACTING PARTIES consider, at any time, that exchange restrictions on payments and transfers in connexion with imports are being applied by a contracting party in a manner inconsistent with the exceptions provided for in this Agreement for quantitative restrictions, they shall report thereon to the Fund.

PARTIES in writing of the extent and nature of the subsidization, of the estimated effect of the subsidization on the quantity of the affected product or products imported into or exported from its territory and of the circumstances making the subsidization necessary. In any case in which it is determined that serious prejudice to the interests of any other contracting party is caused or threatened by any such subsidization, the contracting party granting the subsidy shall, upon request, discuss with the other contracting party or parties concerned, or with the CONTRACTING PARTIES, the possibility of limiting the subsidization.

The contracting parties recognize that the granting by a contracting party of a subsidy on the export of any product may have harmful effects for other contracting parties, both importing and exporting, may cause undue disturbance to their normal commercial interests, and may hinder the achievement of the objectives of this Agreement.

Accordingly, contracting parties should seek to avoid the use of subsidies on the export of primary products. If, however, a contracting party grants directly or indirectly any form of subsidy which operates to increase the export of any primary product from its territory, such subsidy shall not be applied in a manner which results in that contracting party having more than an equitable share of world export trade in that product, account being taken of the shares of the contracting parties in such trade in the product during a previous representative period, and any special factors which may have affected or may be affecting such trade in the product.

Further, as from 1 January 1958 or the earliest practicable date thereafter, contracting parties shall cease to grant either directly or indirectly any form of subsidy on the export of any product other than a primary product which subsidy results in the sale of such product for export at a price lower than the comparable price charged for the like product to buyers in the domestic market. Until 31 December 1957 no contracting party shall extend the scope of any such subsidization beyond that existing on 1 January 1955 by the introduction of new, or the extension of existing, subsidies.

The CONTRACTING PARTIES shall review the operation of the provisions of this Article from time to time with a view to examining its effectiveness, in the light of actual experience, in promoting the objectives of this Agreement and avoiding subsidization seriously prejudicial to the trade or interests of contracting parties.

The provisions of paragraph 1 of this Article shall not apply to imports of products for immediate or ultimate consumption in governmental use and not otherwise for resale or use in the production of goods for sale. With respect to such imports, each contracting party shall accord to the trade of the other contracting parties fair and equitable treatment.

The contracting parties recognize that enterprises of the kind described in paragraph 1 (a) of this Article might be operated so as to create serious obstacles to trade; thus negotiations on a reciprocal and mutually advantageous basis designed to limit or reduce such obstacles are of importance to the expansion of international trade.

The contracting parties recognize that the attainment of the objectives of this Agreement will be facilitated by the progressive development of their economies, particularly of those contracting parties the economies of which can only support low standards of living and are in the early stages of development.

The contracting parties recognize further that it may be necessary for those contracting parties, in order to implement programmes and policies of economic development designed to raise the general standard of living of their people, to take protective or other measures affecting imports, and that such measures are justified in so far as they facilitate the attainment of the objectives of this Agreement. They agree, therefore, that those contracting parties should enjoy additional facilities to enable them (a) to maintain sufficient flexibility in their tariff structure to be able to grant the tariff protection required for the establishment of a particular industry and (b) to apply quantitative restrictions for balance of payments purposes in a manner which takes full account of the continued high level of demand for imports likely to be generated by their programmes of economic development.

The contracting parties recognize finally that, with those additional facilities which are provided for in Sections A and B of this Article, the provisions of this Agreement would normally be sufficient to enable contracting parties to meet the requirements of their economic development. They agree, however, that there may be circumstances where no measure consistent with those provisions is practicable to permit a contracting party in the process of economic development to grant the governmental assistance required to promote the establishment of particular industries with a view to raising the general standard of living of its people. Special procedures are laid down in Sections C and D of this Article to deal with those cases.

The contracting parties recognize that the export earnings of contracting parties, the economies of which are of the type described in paragraph 4 (a) and (b) above and which depend on exports of a small number of primary commodities, may be seriously reduced by a decline in the sale of such commodities. Accordingly, when the exports of primary commodities by such a contracting party are seriously affected by measures taken by another contracting party, it may have resort to the consultation provisions of Article XXII of this Agreement.

PARTIES do not find that the compensation offered by a contracting party proposing to modify or withdraw the concession is adequate, but find that it has made every reasonable effort to offer adequate compensation, that contracting party shall be free to proceed with such modification or withdrawal. If such action is taken, any other contracting party referred to in sub-paragraph (a) above shall be free to modify or withdraw substantially equivalent concessions initially negotiated with the contracting party which has taken the action.

The contracting parties recognize that contracting parties coming within the scope of paragraph 4 (a) of this Article tend, when they are in rapid process of development, to experience balance of payments difficulties arising mainly from efforts to expand their internal markets as well as from the instability in their terms of trade.

In applying these restrictions, the contracting party may determine their incidence on imports of different products or classes of products in such a way as to give priority to the importation of those products which are more essential in the light of its policy of economic development; Provided that the restrictions are so applied as to avoid unnecessary damage to the commercial or economic interests of any other contracting party and not to prevent unreasonably the importation of any description of goods in minimum commercial quantities the exclusion of which would impair regular channels of trade; and Provided further that the restrictions are not so applied as to prevent the importation of commercial samples or to prevent compliance with patent, trade mark, copyright or similar procedures.

In carrying out its domestic policies, the contracting party concerned shall pay due regard to the need for restoring equilibrium in its balance of payments on a sound and lasting basis and to the desirability of assuring an economic employment of productive resources.

It shall progressively relax any restrictions applied under this Section as conditions improve, maintaining them only to the extent necessary under the terms of paragraph 9 of this Article and shall eliminate them when conditions no longer justify such maintenance; Provided that no contracting party shall be required to withdraw or modify restrictions on the ground that a change in its development policy would render unnecessary the restrictions which it is applying under this Section.

If a contracting party coming within the scope of paragraph 4 (a) of this Article finds that governmental assistance is required to promote the establishment of a particular industry with a view to raising the general standard of living of its people, but that no measure consistent with the other provisions of this Agreement is practicable to achieve that objective, it may have recourse to the provisions and procedures set out in this Section.

CONTRACTING PARTIES do not request the contracting party concerned to consult with them, that contracting party shall be free to deviate from the relevant provisions of the other Articles of this Agreement to the extent necessary to apply the proposed measure.

If it is requested by the CONTRACTING PARTIES to do so, the contracting party concerned shall consult with them as to the purpose of the proposed measure, as to alternative measures which may be available under this Agreement, and as to the possible effect of the measure proposed on the commercial and economic interests of other contracting parties. If, as a result of such consultation, the CONTRACTING PARTIES agree that there is no measure consistent with the other provisions of this Agreement which is practicable in order to achieve the objective outlined in paragraph 13 of this Article, and concur in the proposed measure, the contracting party concerned shall be released from its obligations under the relevant provisions of the other Articles of this Agreement to the extent necessary to apply that measure.

The contracting party having recourse to this Section shall thereupon be released from its obligations under the relevant provisions of the other Articles of this Agreement to the extent necessary to permit it to apply the measure.

Article concerns an industry the establishment of which has in the initial period been facilitated by incidental protection afforded by restrictions imposed by the contracting party concerned for balance of payments purposes under the relevant provisions of this Agreement, that contracting party may resort to the provisions and procedures of this Section; Provided that it shall not apply the proposed measure without the concurrence of the CONTRACTING PARTIES.

Nothing in the preceding paragraphs of this Section shall authorize any deviation from the provisions of Articles I, II and XIII of this Agreement. The provisos to paragraph 10 of this Article shall also be applicable to any restriction under this Section.

At any time while a measure is being applied under paragraph 17 of this Article any contracting party substantially affected by it may suspend the application to the trade of the contracting party having recourse to this Section of such substantially equivalent concessions or other obligations under this Agreement the suspension of which the CONTRACTING PARTIES do not disapprove; Provided that sixty days' notice of such suspension is given to the CONTRACTING PARTIES not later than six months after the measure has been introduced or changed substantially to the detriment of the contracting party affected. Any such contracting party shall afford adequate opportunity for consultation in accordance with the provisions of Article XXII of this Agreement.

A contracting party coming within the scope of sub-paragraph 4 (b) of this Article desiring, in the interest of the development of its economy, to introduce a measure of the type described in paragraph 13 of this Article in respect of the establishment of a particular industry may apply to the CONTRACTING PARTIES for approval of such measure. The CONTRACTING PARTIES shall promptly consult with such contracting party and shall, in making their decision, be guided by the considerations set out in paragraph 16. If the CONTRACTING PARTIES concur in the proposed measure the contracting party concerned shall be released from its obligations under the relevant provisions of the other Articles of this Agreement to the extent necessary to permit it to apply the measure. If the proposed measure affects a product which is the subject of a concession included in the appropriate Schedule annexed to this Agreement, the provisions of paragraph 18 shall apply.

Before any contracting party shall take action pursuant to the provisions of paragraph 1 of this Article, it shall give notice in writing to the CONTRACTING PARTIES as far in advance as may be practicable and shall afford the CONTRACTING PARTIES and those contracting parties having a substantial interest as exporters of the product concerned an opportunity to consult with it in respect of the proposed action. When such notice is given in relation to a concession with respect to a preference, the notice shall name the contracting party which has requested the action. In critical circumstances, where delay would cause damage which it would be difficult to repair, action under paragraph 1 of this Article may be taken provisionally without prior consultation, on the condition that consultation shall be effected immediately after taking such action.

Each contracting party shall accord sympathetic consideration to, and shall afford adequate opportunity for consultation regarding, such representations as may be made by another contracting party with respect to any matter affecting the operation of this Agreement.

Economic and Social Council of the United Nations and with any appropriate inter-governmental organization in cases where they consider such consultation necessary. If the CONTRACTING PARTIES consider that the circumstances are serious enough to justify such action, they may authorize a contracting party or parties to suspend the application to any other contracting party or parties of such concessions or other obligations under this Agreement as they determine to be appropriate in the circumstances. If the application to any contracting party of any concession or other obligation is in fact suspended, that contracting party shall then be free, not later than sixty days after such action is taken, to give written notice to the Executive Secretary to the CONTRACTING PARTIES of its intention to withdraw from this Agreement and such withdrawal shall take effect upon the sixtieth day following the day on which such notice is received by him.

The provisions of this Agreement shalt apply to the metropolitan customs territories of the contracting parties and to any other customs territories in respect of which this Agreement has been accepted under Article XXVI or is being applied under Article XXXIII or pursuant to the Protocol of Provisional Application. Each such customs territory shall, exclusively for the purposes of the territorial application of this Agreement, be treated as though it were a contracting party; Provided that the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to create any rights or obligations as between two or more customs territories in respect of which this Agreement has been accepted under Article XXVI or is being applied under Article XXXIII or pursuant to the Protocol of Provisional Application by a single contracting party.

For the purposes of this Agreement a customs territory shall be understood to mean any territory with respect to which separate tariffs or other regulations of commerce are maintained for a substantial part of the trade of such territory with other territories.

The contracting parties recognize the desirability of increasing freedom of trade by the development, through voluntary agreements, of closer integration between the economies of the countries parties to such agreements. They also recognize that the purpose of a customs union or of a free-trade area should be to facilitate trade between the constituent territories and not to raise barriers to the trade of other contracting parties with such territories.

If, in fulfilling the requirements of sub-paragraph 5 (a), a contracting party proposes to increase any rate of duty inconsistently with the provisions of Article II, the procedure set forth in Article XXVIII shall apply. In providing for compensatory adjustment, due account shall be taken of the compensation already afforded by the reductions brought about in the corresponding duty of the other constituents of the union.

Taking into account the exceptional circumstances arising out of the establishment of India and Pakistan as independent States and recognizing the fact that they have long constituted an economic unit, the contracting parties agree that the provisions of this Agreement shall not prevent the two countries from entering into special arrangements with respect to the trade between them, pending the establishment of their mutual trade relations on a definitive basis.

Each contracting party shall take such reasonable measures as may be available to it to ensure observance of the provisions of this Agreement by the regional and local governments and authorities within its territory.

Agreement, the CONTRACTING PARTIES may waive an obligation imposed upon a contracting party by this Agreement; Provided that any such decision shall be approved by a two-thirds majority of the votes cast and that such majority shall comprise more than half of the contracting parties.

Each government accepting this Agreement shall deposit an instrument of acceptance with the Executive Secretary to the CONTRACTING PARTIES, who will inform all interested governments of the date of deposit of each instrument of acceptance and of the day on which this Agreement enters into force under paragraph 6 of this Article.

This Agreement shall enter into force, as among the governments which have accepted it, on the thirtieth day following the day on which instruments of acceptance have been deposited with the Executive Secretary to the CONTRACTING PARTIES on behalf of governments named in Annex H, the territories of which account for 85 per centum of the total external trade of the territories of such governments, computed in accordance with the applicable column of percentages set forth therein.

Any contracting party shall at any time be free to withhold or to withdraw in whole or in part any concession, provided for in the appropriate Schedule annexed to this Agreement, in respect of which such contracting party determines that it was initially negotiated with a government which has not become, or has ceased to be, a contracting party. A contracting party taking such action shall notify the CONTRACTING PARTIES and, upon request, consult with contracting parties which have a substantial interest in the product concerned.

On the first day of each three-year period, the first period beginning on 1 January 1958 (or on the first day of any other period that may be specified by the CONTRACTING PARTIES by two-thirds of the votes cast) a contracting party (hereafter in this Article referred to as the "applicant contracting party") may, by negotiation and agreement with any contracting party with which such concession was initially negotiated and with any other contracting party determined by the CONTRACTING PARTIES to have a principal supplying interest (which two preceding categories of contracting parties, together with the applicant contracting party, are in this Article hereinafter referred to as the "contracting parties primarily concerned"), and subject to consultation with any other contracting party determined by the CONTRACTING PARTIES to have a substantial interest in such concession, modify or withdraw a concession included in the appropriate Schedule annexed to this Agreement.

In such negotiations and agreement, which may include provision for compensatory adjustment with respect to other products, the contracting parties concerned shall endeavour to maintain a general level of reciprocal and mutually advantageous concessions not less favourable to trade than that provided for in this Agreement prior to such negotiations.

PARTIES to reserve the right, for the duration of the next period, to modify the appropriate Schedule in accordance with the procedures of paragraphs 1 to 3. If a contracting party so elects, other contracting parties shall have the right, during the same period, to modify or withdraw, in accordance with the same procedures, concessions initially negotiated with that contracting party.

The contracting parties recognize that customs duties often constitute serious obstacles to trade; thus negotiations on a reciprocal and mutually advantageous basis, directed to the substantial reduction of the general level of tariffs and other charges on imports and exports and in particular to the reduction of such high tariffs as discourage the importation even of minimum quantities, and conducted with due regard to the objectives of this Agreement and the varying needs of individual contracting parties, are of great importance to the expansion of international trade. The CONTRACTING PARTES may therefore sponsor such negotiations from time to time.

The contracting parties undertake to observe to the fullest extent of their executive authority the general principles of Chapters I to VI inclusive and of Chapter IX of the Havana Charter pending their acceptance of it in accordance with their constitutional procedures.

Pending such agreement, Part II of this Agreement shall again enter into force; Provided that the provisions of Part II other than Article XXIII shall be replaced, mutatis mutandis, in the form in which they then appeared in the Havana Charter; and Provided further that no contracting party shall be bound by any provisions which did not bind it at the time when the Havana Charter ceased to be in force.

If any contracting party has not accepted the Havana Charter by the date upon which it enters into force, the CONTRACTING PARTIES shall confer to agree whether, and if so in what way, this Agreement in so far as it affects relations between such contracting party and other contracting parties, shall be supplemented or amended. Pending such agreement the provisions of Part Il of this Agreement shall, notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph 2 of this Article, continue to apply as between such contracting party and other contracting parties.

Organization shall not invoke the provisions of this Agreement so as to prevent the operation of any provision of the Havana Charter. The application of the principle underlying this paragraph to any contracting party which is not a Member of the International Trade Organization shall be the subject of an agreement pursuant to paragraph 5 of this Article.

Agreement, amendments to the provisions of Part I of this Agreement or to the provisions of Article XXIX or of this Article shall become effective upon acceptance by all the contracting parties, and other amendments to this Agreement shall become effective, in respect of those contracting parties which accept them, upon acceptance by two-thirds of the contracting parties and thereafter for each other contracting party upon acceptance by it.

Article XXIII or of paragraph 2 of Article XXX, any contracting party may withdraw from this Agreement, or may separately withdraw on behalf of any of the separate customs territories for which it has international responsibility and which at the time possesses full autonomy in the conduct of its external commercial relations and of the other matters provided for in this Agreement. The withdrawal shall take effect upon the expiration of six months from the day on which written notice of withdrawal is received by the Secretary-General of the United Nations.

The contracting parties to this Agreement shall be understood to mean those governments which are applying the provisions of this Agreement under Articles XXVI or XXXIII or pursuant to the Protocol of Provisional Application.

At any time after the entry into force of this Agreement pursuant to paragraph 6 of Article XXVI, those contracting parties which have accepted this Agreement pursuant to paragraph 4 of Article XXVI may decide that any contracting party which has not so accepted it shall cease to be a contracting party.

There is need for positive efforts designed to ensure that less- developed contracting parties secure a share in the growth in international trade commensurate with the needs of their economic development.

Given the continued dependence of many less-developed contracting parties on the exportation of a limited range of primary products, there is need to provide in the largest possible measure more favourable and acceptable conditions of access to world markets for these products, and wherever appropriate to devise measures designed to stabilize and improve conditions of world markets in these products, including in particular measures designed to attain stable, equitable and remunerative prices, thus permitting an expansion of world trade and demand and a dynamic and steady growth of the real export earnings of these countries so as to provide them with expanding resources for their economic development.

The rapid expansion of the economies of the less-developed contracting parties will be facilitated by a diversification of the structure of their economies and the avoidance of an excessive dependence on the export of primary products. There is, therefore, need for increased access in the largest possible measure to markets under favourable conditions for processed and manufactured products currently or potentially of particular export interest to less-developed contracting parties.

Because of the chronic deficiency in the export proceeds and other foreign exchange earnings of less-developed contracting parties, there are important inter-relationships between trade and financial assistance to development. There is, therefore, need for close and continuing collaboration between the CONTRACTING PARTIES and the international lending agencies so that they can contribute most effectively to alleviating the burdens these less-developed contracting parties assume in the interest of their economic development.

The developed contracting parties do not expect reciprocity for commitments made by them in trade negotiations to reduce or remove tariffs and other barriers to the trade of less-developed contracting parties.

Less-developed contracting parties agree to take appropriate action in implementation of the provisions of Part IV for the benefit of the trade of other less-developed contracting parties, in so far as such action is consistent with their individual present and future development, financial and trade needs taking into account past trade developments as well as the trade interests of less-developed contracting parties as a whole.

Certain of the territories listed above have two or more preferential rates in force for certain products. Any such territory may, by agreement with the other contracting parties which are principal suppliers of such products at the most-favoured-nation rate, substitute for such preferential rates a single preferential rate which shall not on the whole be less favourable to suppliers at the most-favoured-nation rate than the preferences in force prior to such substitution.

The imposition of an equivalent margin of tariff preference to replace a margin of preference in an internal tax existing on April 10, 1947 exclusively between two or more of the territories listed in this Annex or to replace the preferential quantitative arrangements described in the following paragraph, shall not be deemed to constitute an increase in a margin of tariff preference.

XIV are those existing in the United Kingdom on April 10, 1947, under contractual agreements with the Governments of Canada, Australia and New Zealand, in respect of chilled and frozen beef and veal, frozen mutton and lamb, chilled and frozen pork, and bacon. It is the intention, without prejudice to any action taken under sub-paragraph (h) of Article XX, that these arrangements shall be eliminated or replaced by tariff preferences, and that negotiations to this end shall take place as soon as practicable among the countries substantially concerned or involved.

Agreement, the present Agreement has been accepted by contracting parties the external trade of which under column I accounts for the percentage of such trade specified in paragraph 6 of Article XXVI, column I shall be applicable for the purposes of that paragraph. If the present Agreement has not been so accepted prior to the accession of the Government of Japan, column II shall be applicable for the purposes of that paragraph.

Except where otherwise specifically agreed between the contracting parties which initially negotiated the concession, the provisions of this paragraph will be applied in the light of the provisions of Article 31 of the Havana Charter.

Any internal tax or other internal charge, or any law, regulation or requirement of the kind referred to in paragraph 1 which applies to an imported product and to the like domestic product and is collected or enforced in the case of the imported product at the time or point of importation, is nevertheless to be regarded as an internal tax or other internal charge, or a law, regulation or requirement of the kind referred to in paragraph 1, and is accordingly subject to the provisions of Article III.

The application of paragraph 1 to internal taxes imposed by local governments and authorities within the territory of a contracting party is subject to the provisions of the final paragraph of Article XXIV. The term " reasonable measures " in the last-mentioned paragraph would not require, for example, the repeal of existing national legislation authorizing local governments to impose internal taxes which, although technically inconsistent with the letter of Article III, are not in fact inconsistent with its spirit, if such repeal would result in a serious financial hardship for the local governments or authorities concerned.

With regard to taxation by local governments or authorities which is inconsistent with both the letter and spirit of Article III, the term " reasonable measures " would permit a contracting party to eliminate the inconsistent taxation gradually over a transition period, if abrupt action would create serious administrative and financial difficulties.

A tax conforming to the requirements of the first sentence of paragraph 2 would be considered to be inconsistent with the provisions of the second sentence only in cases where competition was involved between, on the one hand, the taxed product and, on the other hand, a directly competitive or substitutable product which was not similarly taxed.

Regulations consistent with the provisions of the first sentence of paragraph 5 shall not be considered to be contrary to the provisions of the second sentence in any case in which all of the products subject to the regulations are produced domestically in substantial quantities. A regulation cannot be justified as being consistent with the provisions of the second sentence on the ground that the proportion or amount allocated to each of the products which are the subject of the regulation constitutes an equitable relationship between imported and domestic products.

Hidden dumping by associated houses (that is, the sale by an importer at a price below that corresponding to the price invoiced by an exporter with whom the importer is associated, and also below the price in the exporting country) constitutes a form of price dumping with respect to which the margin of dumping may be calculated on the basis of the price at which the goods are resold by the importer.

It is recognized that, in the case of imports from a country which has a complete or substantially complete monopoly of its trade and where all domestic prices are fixed by the State, special difficulties may exist in determining price comparability for the purposes of paragraph 1, and in such cases importing contracting parties may find it necessary to take into account the possibility that a strict comparison with domestic prices in such a country may not always be appropriate.

As in many other cases in customs administration, a contracting party may require reasonable security (bond or cash deposit) for the payment of anti-dumping or countervailing duty pending final determination of the facts in any case of suspected dumping or subsidization.

Multiple currency practices can in certain circumstances constitute a subsidy to exports which may be met by countervailing duties under paragraph 3 or can constitute a form of dumping by means of a partial depreciation of a country's currency which may be met by action under paragraph 2. By " multiple currency practices " is meant practices by governments or sanctioned by governments.

It would be in conformity with Article VII to presume that "actual value" may be represented by the invoice price, plus any non-included charges for legitimate costs which are proper elements of "actual value" and plus any abnormal discount or other reduction from the ordinary competitive price.

It would be in conformity with Article VII, paragraph 2 (b), for a contracting party to construe the phrase "in the ordinary course of trade . . . under fully competitive conditions", as excluding any transaction wherein the buyer and seller are not independent of each other and price is not the sole consideration.

The wording of sub-paragraphs (a) and (b) permits a contracting party to determine the value for customs purposes uniformly either (1) on the basis of a particular exporter's prices of the imported merchandise, or (2) on the basis of the general price level of like merchandise.

While Article VIII does not cover the use of multiple rates of exchange as such, paragraphs 1 and 4 condemn the use of exchange taxes or fees as a device for implementing multiple currency practices; if, however, a contracting party is using multiple currency exchange fees for balance of payments reasons with the approval of the International Monetary Fund, the provisions of paragraph 9 (a) of Article XV fully safeguard its position.

It would be consistent with paragraph 1 if, on the importation of products from the territory of a contracting party into the territory of another contracting party, the production of certificates of origin should only be required to the extent that is strictly indispensable.

The term "in any form" in this paragraph covers the same products when in an early stage of processing and still perishable, which compete directly with the fresh product and if freely imported would tend to make the restriction on the fresh product ineffective.

The term "special factors" includes changes in relative productive efficiency as between domestic and foreign producers, or as between different foreign producers but not changes artificially brought about by means not permitted under the Agreement.

It is agreed that the date shall be within ninety days after the entry into force of the amendments of this Article effected by the Protocol Amending the Preamble and Parts II and III of this Agreement. However, should the CONTRACTING PARTIES find that conditions were not suitable for the application of the provisions of this sub-paragraph at the time envisaged, they may determine a later date; Provided that such date is not more than thirty days after such time as the obligations of Article VIII, Sections 2, 3 and 4, of the Articles of Agreement of the International Monetary Fund become applicable to contracting parties, members of the Fund, the combined foreign trade of which constitutes at least fifty per centum of the aggregate foreign trade of all contracting parties.

It is agreed that paragraph 4 (e) does not add any new criteria for the imposition or maintenance of quantitative restrictions for balance of payments reasons. It is solely intended to ensure that all external factors such as changes in the terms of trade, quantitative restrictions, excessive tariffs and subsidies, which may be contributing to the balance of payments difficulties of the contracting party applying restrictions, will be fully taken into account.

No mention was made of "commercial considerations" as a rule for the allocation of quotas because it was considered that its application by governmental authorities might not always be practicable. Moreover, in cases where it is practicable, a contracting party could apply these considerations in the process of seeking agreement, consistently with the general rule laid down in the opening sentence of paragraph 2.

One of the situations contemplated in paragraph 2 is that of a contracting party holding balances acquired as a result of current transactions which it finds itself unable to use without a measure of discrimination.

The word "frustrate" is intended to indicate, for example, that infringements of the letter of any Article of this Agreement by exchange action shall not be regarded as a violation of that Article if, in practice, there is no appreciable departure from the intent of the Article. Thus, a contracting party which, as part of its exchange control operated in accordance with the Articles of Agreement of the International Monetary Fund, requires payment to be received for its exports in its own currency or in the currency of one or more members of the International Monetary Fund will not thereby be deemed to contravene Article XI or Article XIII. Another example would be that of a contracting party which specifies on an import licence the country from which the goods may be imported, for the purpose not of introducing any additional element of discrimination in its import licensing system but of enforcing permissible exchange controls.

The exemption of an exported product from duties or taxes borne by the like product when destined for domestic consumption, or the remission of such duties or taxes in amounts not in excess of those which have accrued, shall not be deemed to be a subsidy.

For the purposes of Section B, a "primary product" is understood to be any product of farm, forest or fishery, or any mineral, in its natural form or which has undergone such processing as is customarily required to prepare it for marketing in substantial volume in international trade.

The fact that a contracting party has not exported the product in question during the previous representative period would not in itself preclude that contracting party from establishing its right to obtain a share of the trade in the product concerned.

Notwithstanding such determination by the CONTRACTING PARTIES, operations under such a system shall be subject to the provisions of paragraph 3 where they are wholly or partly financed out of government funds in addition to the funds collected from producers in respect of the product concerned.

The intention of paragraph 4 is that the contracting parties should seek before the end of 1957 to reach agreement to abolish all remaining subsidies as from l January 1958; or, failing this, to reach agreement to extend the application of the standstill until the earliest date thereafter by which they can expect to reach such agreement.

The activities of Marketing Boards which are established by contracting parties and which do not purchase or sell but lay down regulations covering private trade are governed by the relevant Articles of this Agreement.

The charging by a state enterprise of different prices for its sales of a product in different markets is not precluded by the provisions of this Article, provided that such different prices are charged for commercial reasons, to meet conditions of supply and demand in export markets.

Governmental measures imposed to ensure standards of quality and efficiency in the operation of external trade, or privileges granted for the exploitation of national natural resources but which do not empower the government to exercise control over the trading activities of the enterprise in question, do not constitute "exclusive or special privileges".

The term "import mark-up" in this paragraph shall represent the margin by which the price charged by the import monopoly for the imported product (exclusive of internal taxes within the purview of Article III, transportation, distribution, and other expenses incident to the purchase, sale or further processing, and a reasonable margin of profit) exceeds the landed cost.

When they consider whether the economy of a contracting party "can only support low standards of living", the CONTRACTING PARTIES shall take into consideration the normal position of that economy and shall not base their determination on exceptional circumstances such as those which may result from the temporary existence of exceptionally favourable conditions for the staple export product or products of such contracting party.

The phrase "in the early stages of development" is not meant to apply only to contracting parties which have just started their economic development, but also to contracting parties the economies of which are undergoing a process of industrialization to correct an excessive dependence on primary production.

The reference to the establishment of particular industries shall apply not only to the establishment of a new industry, but also to the establishment of a new branch of production in an existing industry and to the substantial transformation of an existing industry, and to the substantial expansion of an existing industry supplying a relatively small proportion of the domestic demand. It shall also cover the reconstruction of an industry destroyed or substantially damaged as a result of hostilities or natural disasters.

A modification or withdrawal, pursuant to paragraph 7 (b), by a contracting party, other than the applicant contracting party, referred to in paragraph 7 (a), shall be made within six months of the day on which the action is taken by the applicant contracting party, and shall become effective on the thirtieth day following the day on which such modification or withdrawal has been notified to the CONTRACTING PARTIES.

The second sentence in paragraph 11 shall not be interpreted to mean that a contracting party is required to relax or remove restrictions if such relaxation or removal would thereupon produce conditions justifying the intensification or institution, respectively, of restrictions under paragraph 9 of Article XVIII.

It is understood that the CONTRACTING PARTIES shall invite a contracting party proposing to apply a measure under Section C to consult with them pursuant to paragraph 16 if they are requested to do so by a contracting party the trade of which would be appreciably affected by the measure in question.

The phrase "that the interests of other contracting parties are adequately safeguarded" is meant to provide latitude sufficient to permit consideration in each case of the most appropriate method of safeguarding those interests. The appropriate method may, for instance, take the form of an additional concession to be applied by the contracting party having recourse to Section C or D during such time as the deviation from the other Articles of the Agreement would remain in force or of the temporary suspension by any other contracting party referred to in paragraph 18 of a concession substantially equivalent to the impairment due to the introduction of the measure in question. Such contracting party would have the right to safeguard its interests through such a temporary suspension of a concession; Provided that this right will not be exercised when, in the case of a measure imposed by a contracting party coming within the scope of paragraph 4 (a), the CONTRACTING PARTIES have determined that the extent of the compensatory concession proposed was adequate.

The provisions of paragraph 19 are intended to cover the cases where an industry has been in existence beyond the "reasonable period of time" referred to in the note to paragraphs 13 and 14, and should not be so construed as to deprive a contracting party coming within the scope of paragraph 4(a) of Article XVIII, of its right to resort to the other provisions of Section C, including paragraph 17, with regard to a newly established industry even though it has benefited from incidental protection afforded by balance of payments import restrictions.

It is understood that the provisions of Article I would require that, when a product which has been imported into the territory of a member of a customs union or free-trade area at a preferential rate of duty is re-exported to the territory of another member of such union or area, the latter member should collect a duty equal to the difference between the duty already paid and any higher duty that would be payable if the product were being imported directly into its territory.

Measures adopted by India and Pakistan in order to carry out definitive trade arrangements between them, once they have been agreed upon, might depart from particular provisions of this Agreement, but these measures would in general be consistent with the objectives of the Agreement.

The provision that on 1 January 1958, and on other days determined pursuant to paragraph 1, a contracting party "may . . . modify or withdraw a concession" means that on such day, and on the first day after the end of each period, the legal obligation of such contracting party under Article II is altered; it does not mean that the changes in its customs tariff should necessarily be made effective on that day. If a tariff change resulting from negotiations undertaken pursuant to this Article is delayed, the entry into force of any compensatory concessions may be similarly delayed.

January 1958, or to the termination date of any subsequent period, a contracting party wishing to modify or withdraw any concession embodied in the appropriate Schedule, should notify the CONTRACTING PARTIES to this effect. The CONTRACTING PARTIES shall then determine the contracting party or contracting parties with which the negotiations or consultations referred to in paragraph 1 shall take place. Any contracting party so determined shall participate in such negotiations or consultations with the applicant contracting party with the aim of reaching agreement before the end of the period. Any extension of the assured life of the Schedules shall relate to the Schedules as modified after such negotiations, in accordance with paragraphs 1, 2 and 3 of Article XXVIII. If the CONTRACTING PARTIES are arranging for multilateral tariff negotiations to take place within the period of six months before 1 January 1958, or before any other day determined pursuant to paragraph 1, they shall include in the arrangements for such negotiations suitable procedures for carrying out the negotiations referred to in this paragraph.

The object of providing for the participation in the negotiations of any contracting party with a principal supplying interest, in addition to any contracting party with which the concession was initially negotiated, is to ensure that a contracting party with a larger share in the trade affected by the concession than a contracting party with which the concession was initially negotiated shall have an effective opportunity to protect the contractual right which it enjoys under this Agreement. On the other hand, it is not intended that the scope of the negotiations should be such as to make negotiations and agreement under Article XXVIII unduly difficult nor to create complications in the application of this Article in the future to concessions which result from negotiations thereunder. Accordingly, the CONTRACTING PARTIES should only determine that a contracting party has a principal supplying interest if that contracting party has had, over a reasonable period of time prior to the negotiations, a larger share in the market of the applicant contracting party than a contracting party with which the concession was initially negotiated or would, in the judgment of the CONTRACTING PARTIES, have had such a share in the absence of discriminatory quantitative restrictions maintained by the applicant contracting party. It would therefore not be appropriate for the CONTRACTING PARTIES to determine that more than one contracting party, or in those exceptional cases where there is near equality more than two contracting parties, had a principal supplying interest.

Notwithstanding the definition of a principal supplying interest in note 4 to paragraph 1, the CONTRACTING PARTIES may exceptionally determine that a Contracting party has a principal supplying interest if the concession in question affects trade which constitutes a major part of the total exports of such contracting party.

It is not intended that provision for participation in the negotiations of any contracting party with a principal supplying interest, and for consultation with any contracting party having a substantial interest in the concession which the applicant contracting party is seeking to modify or withdraw, should have the effect that it should have to pay compensation or suffer retaliation greater than the withdrawal or modification sought, judged in the light of the conditions of trade at the time of the proposed withdrawal or modification, making allowance for any discriminatory quantitative restrictions maintained by the applicant contracting party.

PARTIES. It is, however, intended to be construed to cover only those contracting parties which have, or in the absence of discriminatory quantitative restrictions affecting their exports could reasonably be expected to have, a significant share in the market of the contracting party seeking to modify or withdraw the concession.

Any request for authorization to enter into negotiations shall be accompanied by all relevant statistical and other data. A decision on such request shall be made within thirty days of its submission.

It is recognized that to permit certain contracting parties, depending in large measure on a relatively small number of primary commodities and relying on the tariff as an important aid for furthering diversification of their economies or as an important source of revenue, normally to negotiate for the modification or withdrawal of concessions only under paragraph 1 of Article XXVIII, might cause them at such a time to make modifications or withdrawals which in the long run would prove unnecessary. To avoid such a situation the CONTRACTING PARTIES shall authorize any such contracting party, under paragraph 4, to enter into negotiations unless they consider this would result in, or contribute substantially towards, such an increase in tariff levels as to threaten the stability of the Schedules to this Agreement or lead to undue disturbance of international trade.

It is expected that negotiations authorized under paragraph 4 for modification or withdrawal of a single item, or a very small group of items, could normally be brought to a conclusion in sixty days. It is recognized, however, that such a period will be inadequate for cases involving negotiations for the modification or withdrawal of a larger number of items and in such cases, therefore, it would be appropriate for the CONTRACTING PARTIES to prescribe a longer period.

In determining under paragraph 4 (d) whether an applicant contracting party has unreasonably failed to offer adequate compensation, it is understood that the CONTRACTING PARTIES will take due account of the special position of a contracting party which has bound a high proportion of its tariffs at very low rates of duty and to this extent has less scope than other contracting parties to make compensatory adjustment.

It is understood that the reference to fiscal needs would include the revenus aspect of duties and particularly duties imposed primarily for revenue purpose, or duties imposed on products which can be substituted for products subject to revenue duties to prevent the avoidance of such duties.

The words "developed contracting parties" and the words "less-developed contracting parties" as used in Part IV are to be understood to refer to developed and less-developed countries which are parties to the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade.

A diversification programme would generally include the intensification of activities for the processing of primary products and the development of manufacturing industries, taking into account the situation of the particular contracting party and the world outlook for production and consumption of different commodities.

It is understood that the phrase "do not expect reciprocity" means, in accordance with the objectives set forth in this Article, that the less-developed contracting parties should not be expected, in the course of trade negotiations, to make contributions which are inconsistent with their individual development, financial and trade needs, taking into consideration past trade developments.

The other measures referred to in this paragraph might include steps to promote domestic structural changes, to encourage the consumption of particular products, or to introduce measures of trade promotion.

This Protocol shall remain open for signature at the Headquarters of the United Nations (a) until 15 November 1947, on behalf of any government named in paragraph 1 of this Protocol which has not signed it on this day, and (b) until 30 June 1948, on behalf of any other Government signatory to the Final Act adopted at the conclusion of the Second Session of the Preparatory Committee of the United Nations Conference on Trade and Employment which has not signed it on this day.

Any government applying this Protocol shall be free to withdraw such application, and such withdrawal shall take effect upon the expiration of sixty days from the day on which written notice of such withdrawal is received by the Secretary-General of the United Nations.

A C program that converts the phrase list files and tagged-format source files into a database file and an index file. This program also marks up the textual sources to hypertext, scanning the information for words that are defined elsewhere in the dictionary.

A search is performed on the contents of the dictionary index, not on the contents of dictionary entries. A search returns all matches, ranked by a matching score. A match is achieved when the search string is part of the indexed name.

No warranties, express or implied, are given as to the accuracy or reliability of the data, nor are any warranties given that the retrieval procedures satisfy any standard of merchantibility. Neither the author nor his employer are liable for damage, direct or consequential, resulting from the use of this dataset.

This server could not verify that you are authorized to access the document requested.  Either you supplied the wrong credentials (e.g., bad password), or your browser doesn't understand how to supply the credentials required.

This  data  collection  contains  economic   and   social indicators  for 189 countries. Included are economic variables such as gross national product, gross domestic product, value  added  in agriculture,   industry,  manufacturing,  and  services,  value  of imports and exports, private consumption,  government  consumption, gross  national savings, gross domestic savings, government deficit or surplus, net direct foreign investment, repayments of  long-term loans,  public  long-term  debt,  international  reserves excluding gold, and gold holdings at London market price. Many variables  are expressed  both in terms of current prices and in terms of constant 1980 prices. Demographic and social variables  include  population, total  fertility  rate, crude birth rate, life expectancy at birth, food production per capita, percent of labor force in  agriculture, percent  of  labor  force that is female, and primary and secondary school enrollment rates.

We're sorry, but access to this section of the PACIFIC web server  requires authorization. Parts of this server are accessible only to UBC faculty and students, affiliated universities, or by subscription.

If you have been granted access to a particular service by PACIFIC but are unable to access these pages, perhaps we haven't correctly identified your hostname or network domain in our access configuration file.

Many international business problems involve issues related to technology. This course will be concerned with the management of technology in international settings and its implications for firms and the domestic economy. Possible topics discussed include industry standard settings, ptotection of intellectual property rights and diffusion of technology, management of technology transfer in foreign direct investment and the impact of technology outflow on the domestic firms and economy. The course consists of lectures and student presentations.  Class discussions will be based on some of the readings listed below.

Spiders on Drugs And Other Miscellanous Cool Stuff...First and foremost, kill spam with spamarrest (93% of our incoming e-mail is dreaded spam, spamarrest makes sure we don't see a drop of it).  How about being able to watch TV on your PC, or sending and receiving faxes via the Web and E-mail, or using the Internet to make phone calls, or getting the coolest ringtones for your phone, or downloading music from the Web, or getting a degree online, or getting satellite TV for your crib (or DirecTV), or filing your taxes online, or losing weight, or entering a poetry contest, or watching spiders on drugs?

There are a million cool and hilarious videos available on the Web.  With the penetration of broadband throughout the world, the amount of video will only increase.  Sometimes we find stuff that splits our gut; Spider on Drugs is one of them.  If you've seen something especially great recently, please let us know about it and we'll post a link on our Cool Videos page.  Thanks.

Why this blog?  Because there's so much more to picking cool sites than simply putting up a link and asking you to rate the featured 'Cool Site of the Day'. Here's a place where we can discuss some of our favorite picks....and for you to turn us on to cool sites you stumbled upon.

Also featured on Cool Site of the Day are lots of great deals, plus contests, free stuff and more just to show how much we appreciate your patronage. The bottom line? Cool Site of the Day is a valuable resource site where people come to start their surfing day.

C Notes Interactive, Inc. has created this privacy statement in order to demonstrate our firm commitment to  privacy. The following discloses our information gathering and dissemination practices for Cool Site of the Day.

Certain forms or polls used on Cool Site of the Day may from time to time require users to give us contact information (like their name and email address)  and demographic information (like their zip code, age, or income level). We use customer contact information from these forms to send the user information about our company and promotional material from some of our partners. The customer's contact information is also used to contact the visitor when necessary. Users may opt-out of receiving future mailings; see the choice/opt-out section below.

Our site uses a secure merchant account order form for visitors to submit their sites to Cool Site of the Day. We collect visitor's contact information (like their email address) and financial information (like their account or credit card numbers). Contact information from the order form is used to send visitors information about our company, and promotional material from some of our partners to our customers. The customer's contact information is also used to get in touch with the visitor when necessary. Users may opt-out of receiving future mailings; see the choice/opt-out section below. Financial information that is collected is used to bill the user for services relating to the review of their submissions.

Our online surveys may from time to time ask visitors for demographic information (like their zip code, age, or income level). Demographic and profile data is also collected at our site. We use this data to tailor our visitor's experience at our site, and improve on the information that we include based on our visitors responses.

We run contests on our site in which we ask visitors for contact information  (like their email address) and demographic information (like their zip code, age, or income level). We use contact data from our contests to send users information about our company and promotional material from some of our partners. The customer's contact information is also used to contact the visitor when necessary and shared with other companies who may want to contact our visitors. Users may opt-out of receiving future mailings; see the choice/opt-out section below.

This site makes chat rooms, forums, message boards, and/or news groups available to its users. Please remember that any information that is disclosed in these areas becomes public information and you should exercise caution when deciding to disclose your personal information.

Our site provides users the opportunity to opt-out of receiving communications from us and our partners at the point where we request information about the visitor. This site gives users the following options for removing their information from our database to not receive future communications or to no longer receive our newsletter.

If we should ever give information to prospective advertisers, it is in the form of grouped statistics compiled through all our participating members' answers to survey questions. Your personal info is NOT included.

Webposition GoldWhat Web marketing tool do we whole-heartedly recommend to our readers?  There's no question it's WebPosition Gold. Unlike other products out there, this amazing tool really does help you achieve top rankings on the search engines. If your business has a Web site, be sure to check them out.

Website Marketing SecretsProven methods for getting rich on the web! Learn how ANY web site can get to #1 position in the search engines for ANY keyword. The web site promotion secret that brings in 10 times more traffic than any search engine and more.

For the past few years I have been talking up Ken Evoy's Site Build It!.  If you're not familiar with SBI! it's a software program that combines site building/hosting/traffic building into one incredible package that makes it easy for you to build a professional, popular, and profitable business.. I have grown to love SBI more and more each year. If you're struggling to create a successful, tightly focused, themed web site featuring a topic (or product) that you are PASSIONATE about, SBI is a must have.  To prove how much I believe in this package, I am willing to spend a half-hour on the phone with you, one-on-one, to introduce you to SBI's wonderful tools. So, if you'd like to schedule a short brainstorming session, send me an e-mail and let me know what kind of site you're either working on or planning.  If you want to just jump right in, then you can try SBI risk-free; you truly owe it to yourself to make SBI a part of your web existence (the 'keyword brainstorming' tool is enough to make you a believer!). Click here.

Please note that no adult ads will be accepted. All ads are subject to our approval. If your ad is not run, your payment will be refunded in full. Fill out the form below only if you are paying using a credit card. PayPal users click here.

War and tragedy are all around us, but rather than feel helpless about the things we see throughout the world, we are doing what we can to support non-profit organizations that we think will have a positive impact on our future, but we need your help. Cool Site of the Day donates $5 to the non-profit organizations below for every person who submits and is approved for a FREE American Express Blue Card (0% Introductory APR, NO annual fee).

Safer World Safer World is working to keep nuclear, biological and chemical weapons and materials out of terrorist hands. They need your help to make locking down and destroying these weapons and materials at the source - before terrorists can get them - a top priority.

Applying for the card is free and there is no annual fee. Even though it will never cost you a penny, for every approved application we will make a sizeable donation to a very deserving organization simply because you APPLIED for the card.

This effort will only be successful if you pass this message along to as many people as possible. Please forward this URL your friends and family, your business associates and anyone else you can think of. If you run a web site or send out a newsletter, please share this opportunity with your visitors and readers as well.

P.S.  Not sure if you need the American Express card? Maybe you don't, but that's not what's important. What's important is that in 5 minutes you will generate funds for an organization whose work is so desperately needed in our society and the world.  All I'm asking for is 5 minutes of your time. Let's make something great happen. Complete the short application now.

SIGACT is an international organization that fosters and promotes the discovery and dissemination of high quality research in theoretical computer science (TCS), the formal analysis of efficient computation and computational processes. SIGACT, through its awards program, recognizes individuals who have made significant contributions to the field in research and service.  TCS covers a wide variety of topics including algorithms, data structures, computational complexity, parallel and distributed computation, probabilistic computation, quantum computation, automata theory, information theory, cryptography, program semantics and verification, machine learning, computational biology, computational economics, computational geometry, and computational number theory and algebra. Work in this field is often distinguished by its emphasis on mathematical technique and rigor.

Nominations may be made by any member of the scientific community. A nomination should contain a brief summary of the technical content of each nominated paper and a brief explanation of its significance. A copy of the research paper or papers should accompany the nomination. The nomination must state the bibliographic data of the first (preliminary) conference publication of the main results or state that no conference publication has occurred.

Any research paper or series of research papers by a single author or by a team of authors is deemed eligible if the paper was published in a recognized refereed journal before nomination but the main results were not published (in either preliminary or final form) in a journal or conference proceedings 14 or more years before the year of the award. This extended period is in recognition of the fact that the value of fundamental work cannot always be immediately assessed. A conference publication starts the clock because it often is the most effective means of bringing the results to the attention of the community.

The research work nominated for the award should be in the area of theoretical computer science. The term "theoretical computer science" is meant in a broad sense, and encompasses, but is not restricted to, those areas covered by ICALP and STOC. The Award Committee shall have the ultimate authority to decide whether a particular paper is eligible for the Prize.

Although the Award Committee is encouraged to consult with the theoretical computer science community at large, the Award Committee is solely responsible for the selection of the winner of the award. The prize may be shared by more than one paper or series of papers, and the Award Committee reserves the right to declare no winner at all. All matters relating to the selection process that are not specified here are left to the discretion of the Award Committee.

Frank had a beautiful spirit! He had a great j'oie de vivre which overflowed naturally and spontaneously. He had a sweet heart and gentle disposition. He had a deep and abiding love for his mathematics.

An author of numerous books and articles, his book "Graph Theory", published in 1969, is a modern classic that helped define, develop, direct and shape the field of modern graph theory. It is one of the most cited and influential scholarly works in modern scientific literature.

Dr. Harary taught what were the first graph theory and combinatorial theory courses ever in 1955 at University of Michigan. He was also the founder of the Journals of Combinatorial Theory and of Graph Theory and served on the editorial boards of many more. During his long and productive career, Dr. Harary authored/coauthored more than 700 scholarly papers in areas as diverse as Anthropology, Biology, Chemistry, Computer Science, Geography, Linguistics, Music, Physics, Political Science, Psychology, Social Science and of course Mathematics which brought forth the usefulness of Graph Theory in scientific thought.

SIGACT has written some software for handling electronic conference submissions and provides the software and a centralized server (sigact.acm.org) that has a well-tested installation of this software.  The server and software are both available to any conference with significant participation by the SIGACT community.

When you get your account/password, log in as soon as possible and change your password to something more secure.  If you know how to use it, we recommend that you use "ssh" for logging into the sigact machine, since it encrypts all sensitive data such as passwords.  You can even set it up so that sigact does a cryptographic authentication of your identity before allowing you to log in.

When logged in to your conference account, type esub_setup at the shell prompt.  This will prompt you for all sorts of information regarding your conference, including submission deadlines and contact names and e-mail addresses.  You can see a sample setup run to see what sorts of things will be asked.  After successfully completing esub_setup, the software and submission instruction web page should be all set up automatically.  Make a note of the URL of the submission instructions so that you can include it in your call for papers or other publicity.

Carefully read through all the submission instructions yourself, and try out each command.  This serves two purposes: first, it makes sure that the software is installed and working correctly.  Second, it makes you familiar with the process so that you can help people who are submitting to your conference.

The point is not that each of is incapable of making up a reasonable answer, but that it is important for us all to give pretty much the same answer.  The more we appear to speak with one voice, the more credible our comments will appear to people outside of theory.

This extended period is in recognition of the fact that the value of fundamental work cannot always be immediately assessed. The research work nominated for the award should be in the area of theoretical computer science. The term "theoretical computer science" is meant in a broad sense, and encompasses, but is not restricted to, those areas covered by ICALP and STOC. The Award Committee shall have the ultimate authority to decide whether a particular paper is eligible for the Prize.

In August 2002 one of the most ancient computational problems was finally solved. Agrawal, Kayal, and Saxena presented an unconditional deterministic polynomial time algorithm that determines whether an input number is prime or composite. Due to the Internet, the preprint of their paper circulated within hours in the scientific community and found an immediate enthusiastic response.  All previously known polynomial time primality tests were based on probabilistic methods or they relied on an unproven assumption, known as the generalized Riemann Hypothesis.

A remarkable aspect of the article is that the final exposition itself turns out to be rather simple.  The text as published in Annals of Mathematics is a masterpiece in mathematical reasoning.  It has a high density of tricks and techniques, but the arguments come in a brilliantly simple manner; they remain completely elementary. The contents of the paper are therefore accessible to a broad audience.

The performance of the algorithm depends on some number-theoretic assumptions, but an exact unconditional polynomial bound is given in the paper. However, if the number-theoretic assumptions hold, then the algorithm runs in nearly cubic time, which is amazing.  The award-winning paper makes use of a new probabilistic algorithm by Agrawal and Somenath Biswas, presented at FOCS 1999, which Agrawal, Kayal, and Saxena were able to derandomize.  Thus "PRIMES is in P" is a perfect example for a new trend in derandomization.

We cannot yet foresee the full impact of the paper, but since its appearance many researchers have been inspired by the algebraic techniques in the paper and have continued to work on them.  For example, follow-up papers have established new connections between graph-isomorphism, integer-factorization, and ring-isomorphism.  Primality testing and integer-factorization remain in the focus of current research: The intractability of finding the prime factors of very large numbers has been a cornerstone of cryptography and data security.

This concise work laid the foundations of the analysis of data streams using limited memory.  It demonstrated the design of small randomized linear projections, subsequently referred to as "sketches," that summarize large amounts of data and allow quantities of interest to be approximated to user-specified precision.

Due to the simplicity, elegance, and wide applicability of its techniques, the paper set the pattern for a rapidly growing body of work, both theoretical and applied, and created the now burgeoning fields of streaming and sketching algorithms.

The areas of practical application include query planning and processing in databases and the design of small synopses to monitor vast quantities of data generated in networks.  The ideas have since enabled effective, one-pass algorithms for numerous data-streaming problems, including relational join queries, top-k frequency estimation, histogram and wavelet construction, and correlating XML data streams.

The paper demonstrates that the theory of computing continues to be a powerful source of mathematical ideas with immediate and profound impact on the practice in other communities such as databases and networking.

These papers demonstrate that one can avoid the inherent difficulty of analyzing a dynamic model, transforming it into a static one by associating computational tasks with simplicial complexes and translating the question of existence of a wait-free protocol into (distinct but related) topological questions about the complexes.

The discovery of the topological nature of distributed computing provides a new perspective on the area and represents one of the most striking examples, possibly in all of applied mathematics, of the use of topological structures to quantify natural computational phenomena.

This paper introduced AdaBoost, an adaptive algorithm to improve the accuracy of hypotheses in machine learning. The algorithm demonstrated novel possibilities in analysing data and is a permanent contribution to science even beyond computer science.

Because of a combination of features, including its elegance, the simplicity of its implementation, its wide applicability, and its striking success in reducing errors in benchmark applications even while its theoretical assumptions are not known to hold, the algorithm set off an explosion of research in the fields of statistics, artificial intelligence, experimental machine learning, and data mining. The algorithm is now widely used in practice.

The paper highlights the fact that theoretical computer science continues to be a fount of powerful and entirely novel ideas with significant and direct impact even in areas, such as data analysis, that have been studied extensively by other communities.

Science 251 (2001), pp.1-166. The author gives a complete solution to the decidability of the equivalence problem for deterministic pushdown automata: Given two languages L_1 and L_2 accepted by deterministic pushdown automata decide whether L_1 = L_2. The problem was posed by S. Ginsburg and S. Greibach in 1966 and various subcases were shown to be decidable over the years. However, the full question remained elusive until it was finally settled by the awardee. He showed the problem to be decidable. The paper not only settles the equivalence problem for deterministic context-free languages, but also develops an entire machinery of new techniques which are likely to be useful in other contexts. They have already found useful in semantics of programming languages.

The prize winners established the surprising fact that certain problems in NP remain hard even when only an approximative solution is required. With their deep insights and powerful results, they have opened new perspectives for many problems in computer science, for example in optimization and cryptography.

The implication for quantum computers, hypothetical devices first studied by Benioff and Feynmann, is that, if they could really be built and used, their impact on real-world computation would be revolutionary.  The assumption that there are no polynomial-time factoring or discrete-log algorithms for classical computers is needed to prove the security of all of today's widely deployed public-key cryptosystems.  These two problems have been extensively studied, and indeed the fastest known algorithms that solve them on classical computers require much more than polynomial time.  If quantum computers could be built and used, cryptanalysts could use Shor's algorithms to break all of the public-key cryptosystems in wide use today and all of the electronic-commerce applications that depend on them.

In the remarkable paper "PP is as hard as the polynomial- time hierarchy" Seinosuke Toda showed that two fundamental and much studied computational concepts had a deep and unexpected relationship. The first is that of alternation of quantifiers - if one alternates existential and universal quantifiers for polynomial time recognizable functions one obtains the polynomial time hierarchy. The second concept is that of counting the exact number of solutions to a problem where a candidate solution is polynomial time recognizable.

Toda's astonishing result is that the latter notion subsumes the former - for any problem in the polynomial hierarchy there is a deterministic polynomial time reduction to counting. This discovery is one of the most striking and tantalizing results in complexity theory. It continues to serve as an inspiration to those seeking to understand more fully the relationships among the fundamental concepts in computer science.

The Halpern-Moses paper provided a new and effective way of reasoning about distributed systems, providing rigorous and powerful new techniques based on epistemic logic.  When reasoning informally about distributed protocols, researchers naturally think (and speak) in terms of agents "knowing" certain facts about the global system state.

The key insight of Halpern and Moses was that this informal notion of knowledge could be given a rigorous mathematical formulation.  Using this, they delineated various forms of group knowledge, including common knowledge, which can be viewed as a limiting form of group knowledge.

They illustrated these using clever examples, and showed for instance that the distributed task of coordinated attack cannot be performed without common knowledge, and that common knowledge is impossible when communication is not guaranteed.

It not only has had a profound impact on the study of distributed computing, but also on areas as diverse as security, where knowledge is a key concern of cryptographic protocols, and artificial intelligence, where the paper's concrete computational interpretation of knowledge has reinvigorated whole lines of research into knowledge and goals.

The first paper demonstrates a two-way connection between the mixing rate of a Markov chain and a graph-theoretic quantity called conductance, and provided the canonical paths tool for establishing high conductance.   The second paper then brilliantly applies this method to prove the rapidly mixing property of a certain random walk on the set of all perfect matchings of a dense graph, thereby providing a polynomial time algorithm for approximating the permanent.

Together, these two papers have helped trigger a Markov Chain "renaissance" in the 1990's, and one can conservatively count seventy major papers employing Markov chains in the style and methodology they initiated, covering areas as diverse as matching algorithms, geometric algorithms, mathematical programming, statistics, physics-inspired applications, and dynamical systems.

These two papers, using a subtle yet elementary method, independently proved that nondeterministic space complexity classes are closed under complementation.  This surprising result settled a fundamental question in complexity theory that had remained open for more than three decades.

These papers introduced the concept of interactive proof systems, which provides a rich new framework for addressing the question of what constitutes a mathematical proof. The invention of this framework has already led to some of the most exciting developments in complexity theory in recent years, including the discovery of close connections between interactive proof systems and classical complexity classes, and the resolution of several major open problems about the difficulty of finding near-optimal solutions to combinatorial optimization problems.

Instead of trying to reconstruct the past using only incidents that I think I remember, I will quote extensively from actual documents that were written at the time things happened.  The remarks below are extracted from a one-hour keynote speech I gave to the Stanford Computer Forum on 20 March 2002; many further details, including images of the original documents, can be seen in a video recording of that lecture, which has been permanently archived on the Internet by Stanfords Center for Professional Development [scpd.stanford.edu]. As in that lecture, I wont attempt to give a traditional biography, with balanced accounts of Bobs childhood, education, family life, career, and outside interests; I believe that the intriguing task of preparing such an account will be undertaken before long by professional historians who are much more qualified than I. My aim here is rather to present a personal perspective.

My own work on programming was merely a sideline by which I could pay for my college education and prepare to start a family. During the summer of 1962 I wrote a FORTRAN compiler for a small UNIVAC computer;  this work had almost no connection with what I viewed as my future career as a teacher of mathematics, except that I did spend one fascinating day studying the efficiency of linear probing (the simple hash table algorithm by which my compiler maintained its dictionary of symbols).  I had never heard of computer science.  My whole attitude changed, however, when I met Bob for the first time in person at the ACM conference in Syracuse at the end of that summer.

We became fast friends, perhaps because we had both learned programming in the late 1950s by sitting at the consoles of IBM 650 computers.  Bob showed me some work he had been doing about mathematical techniques for verifying that a program is correct--a completely unheard-of idea in those days as far as I knew.  The accepted methodology for program construction was quite the opposite: People would write code and make test runs, then find bugs and make patches, then find more bugs and make more patches,  and so on until not being able to discover any further errors, yet always living in dread for fear that a new case would turn up on the next day and lead to a new type of failure.  We never realized that there might be a way to construct a rigorous proof of validity; at least, Im sure that such thoughts never crossed my own mind when I was writing programs, even though I was doing nothing but proofs when I was in a classroom.

I considered programming to be an entirely different category of human activity. The early treatises of Goldstine and von Neumann, which provided a glimpse of mathematical program development, had long been forgotten. I was also unaware of John McCarthys paper, Towards a mathematical science of computation, presented at the IFIP Congress in Munich that summer, nor did I associate McCarthy-style recursive functions with real programming at that time. But Bob taught me how to wear my programmers cap and my mathematicians cloak at the same time.

Proceedings of Symposia in Applied Mathematics 19 (1967), 19-32], he gave credit to unpublished ideas of Alan Perlis and Saul Gorn, but Im sure that he had developed everything independently. His paper presented a formal grammar for flowcharts together with rigorous methods for verifying the effects of basic actions like assignments and tests; thus it was a direct precursor of the preconditions and postconditions subsequently developed by Tony Hoare.

Whenever I had mail from Bob, Id learn that he had gotten ahead in our friendly competition; then it was my turn to put TAOCP on hold for another day, trying to trump his latest discovery. Our informal game of pure-research-at-a-distance gave us a taste of the thrills that mathematicians of old must have felt in similar circumstances, as when Leibniz corresponded with the Bernoullis or when Euler and Goldbach exchanged letters.

I found in my files a letter that Id written to Myrtle Kellington in June, 1967, urging her to have the illustrations in this paper typeset by the printer instead of using the much cheaper alternative of Leroy lettering.  I argued that Floyds article, perhaps more than any other article I have ever seen, is based almost entirely on illustrations coordinated with text.  ...  Saying he should prepare his own diagrams is, in this case, like telling our authors never to use any mathematical formulas unless they submit hand-lettered copy. ... Professor Floyd has been one of our best and most faithful referees in the ACM publications for many years, and he has volunteered much of his valuable time to this often thankless job. Now he is an associate editor of JACM. We certainly owe him a decent treatment of his article. Im happy to report that she agreed, even though she had received my letter more than two weeks after the publication deadline.

Meanwhile my publishers and I had asked Bob for a detailed critique of TAOCP Volume 1, which was being prepared for the press in 1967.   Needless to say,  his comments proved to be invaluable to me, although I didnt agree with every single one of his remarks.  Here are some excerpts from what he wrote:  Chapter I: Overall opinion.   I like the chapter,  but I think it could be improved by chopping most of the humor and anecdotes, retaining the historical material.

The authors personal notes of advice, etc., are often valuable; at times, though, the non-technical material gets a little thick.  The technical content meets very high standards of scholarship, and is a credit to the author.  Then he gave hundreds of detailed suggestions for improvements to the text.

Our correspondence was not entirely technical.  On 22 February 1967 I wrote, Bob, I have the feeling that this is going to be a somewhat extraordinary letter.  During the last year or so I have been getting lots of offers of employment from other colleges.  I think I told you that I plan (and have planned for a long time) to decide on a permanent home where I will want to live the rest of my life, and to move there after the year I spend in Princeton working for the government.

I replied that I dont know anyone I could recommend more highly. He is the most gifted man in his age bracket that I have ever met.  Several of his published papers have been significant mile- posts in the development of computer science, notably his introduction of precedence grammars, tree-sort algorithms, and methods of assigning meanings to programs. I have also had the pleasure of carrying on frequent correspondence with him for five years, so I am quite familiar with his unpublished work too; this correspondence covers a wide variety of topics, for example, graph theory, word problems in semigroups, mathematical notations, algorithms for syntactic analysis, theorems about languages, algorithms for manipulating data structures, optimal sorting schemes, etc., etc.

He also was dedicated to teaching our introductory programming course, CS106; we often talked about examples that might help to introduce basic concepts.  He was promoted to Full Professor at Stanford in 1970, one of extremely few people to achieve this rank after having served only five years as Associate Professor (three of which were at Carnegie).

This picture of Bob Floyd was taken by a Stanford student and posted on our departments photo board about 1972.  To simulate gray scale with binary pixels, Ive rendered it here using the Floyd-Steinberg error diffusion algorithm, implementing that algorithm exactly as suggested in the famous article that Bob published with Louis Steinberg in 1976 (diffusing errors from bottom to top and right to left); the resolution is 600 dots per inch.  Caution:  Software for printing might have mangled the bits that you are now seeing.

Floyd and Steinbergs paper matches the technology of inkjet printers better than that of laserjet printers, so you may not be seeing this image at its best.  Error diffusion does, however, give beautiful results when it has been tuned to work with a typical inkjet device.

He was destined to be disappointed that his dream of a new, near-ideal programming language called Chiron was never to be realized--possibly because he was reluctant to make the sorts of compromises that he saw me making with respect to TEX. Chiron was an attempt to provide a programming environment in which, to the largest extent possible, one designs a program by designing the process which the program carries out. His plans for the Chiron compiler included novel methods of compile-time error recovery and type matching that have never been published.

I know that when he retired in 1994, the publication of his book The Language of Machines with Richard Beigel brought him enormous satisfaction, especially when he received a copy of the fine translation of that book into German.

Id like to close with a few anecdotes.  First, people often assume that my books are in error or incomplete when I refer to Bob as Robert W Floyd, since the indexes to my books give a full middle name for almost everybody else. The truth is that he was indeed born with another middle name, but he had it legally changed to W--just as President Trumans middle name was simply S. Bob liked to point out that W. is a valid abbreviation for W.

Third, he had a strong social conscience. For example, he spent a significant amount of time and energy to help free Fernando Flores from prison in Chile.  Flores, a former vice-rector of the Catholic University of Chile who had developed a computer-based information system for the entire Chilean economy and become a cabinet minister in the government of Salvador Allende, came to Stanford as a research associate in 1976 largely because of Bobs efforts, after having been held without charges for three years by the military junta headed by Augusto Pinochet.

Fourth, he was a connoisseur of fine food.  Some of the most delicious meals Ive ever experienced were eaten in his presence, either as a guest in his house or in a restaurant of his choice.  I particularly remember an unforgettable duckling with flaming cherry sauce, consumed during an ACM conference in Denver.

SIGACT News serves as a forum for issues of interest to the theoretical computer science community.  Readers can keep abreast of professional events and announcements, and benefit from regular technical columns written by respected professionals in key areas of theoretical computer science.

In addition, the non-technical columns, letters to the Editor, and minutes of professional meetings help keep the reader up-to-date on issues of importance to professional theoretical computer scientists.  The Education Forum provides insight into the latest teaching methods and material, and provides previews of recent or upcoming textbooks.  Regular columns and features include the following.  The columns are run by a staff of dedicated volunteers.  Questions about and submissions for their columns should be addressed directly to the respective columnist.

This script will prompt you for all the information required to set up the electronic submissions software for your conference.  When default values are allowed for submissions, they will be shown in square brackets immediately before the input position.  The default value can be selected by simply hitting return.

Papers presenting original research on theoretical aspects of computer science are sought.  Typical, but not exclusive, topics of interest include algorithmic graph theory, algorithms and data structures, applications of logic, biological computing, computational biology, complexity theory, cryptography, computational algebra, computational geometry, machine learning, parallel and distributed computation, and probabilistic computation.

According to SIGACT policy, abstract material which has been previously published in another conference proceedings or journal (or which is scheduled for publication prior to STOC) will not be considered for acceptance at STOC.  In addition, SIGACT policy does not allow simultaneous submissions of the same (or essentially the same) abstract material to another conference with a published proceedings.

Applicants should be STOC authors or co-authors, or be contributing to the conference in some other way. To apply send the information outline above(Student Travel Award) under items 1 throught 4 (item 5 is not required) to secretary.sigact@sigact.acm.org by March 26, 2005. If you are applying for a Developing Country Travel Award please explicitly mention in your application that you are applying for this award and not the regular award. This award is on a trial basis and may be discontinued.

A bug in the search engine prevented searches from finding names containing accents.  This bug was fixed so that searchers can simply leave out the accent from the name and still get a correct string match.

An abstract should start with the title of the paper, each author's name, affiliation, and e-mail address, followed by a one-paragraph summary of the results to be presented.  This should then be followed by a technical exposition of the main ideas and techniques used to achieve these results, including motivation and a clear comparison with related work.  The abstract should not exceed 10 single-spaced pages on letter-size paper, using reasonable margins and at least 11-point font.  If the authors believe that more details are essential to substantiate the main claims of the paper, they may include a clearly marked appendix that will be read at the discretion of the program committee.  Abstracts deviating significantly from these guidelines risk rejection without consideration of their merits.

Prof. Knuth is best known for his ongoing multivolume series, The Art of Computer Programming, which played a critical role in establishing and defining Computer Science as a rigorous, intellectual discipline. Prof. Knuth has also made fundamental contributions to the subfields of analysis of algorithms, compilers, string matching, term rewriting systems, literate programming, and typography. His TeX and MF systems are widely accepted as standards for electronic typesetting. Prof. Knuth's work is distinguished by its integration of theoretical analyses and practical real-world concerns. In his work, theory and practice are not separate components of Computer Science, but rather he shows them to be inexorably linked branches of the same whole.

In selecting the Knuth Prize winner, the Committee will pay particular attention to a sustained record of high-impact, seminal contributions to the foundations of computer science. The selection may also be partly based on educational accomplishments and contributions such as fundamental textbooks and high-quality students. The award is not based on service work for the community, although service might be included in the citation for a winner if it is appropriate.

The prize can be awarded to an individual for a single contribution or for a series of contributions over a career.  All living individuals are eligible with the exception of the sitting SIGACT Chair, an individual who nominated a majority of selection committee members, or a member of the selection committee.

Nominations can be made by any member of Theory of Computing community and should contain a statement of no more than 500 words explaining why the candidate deserves the award.  The nomination can also include an additional separate listing of service activities. The nomination must include the address, phone number, and the email address of the nominator.

Each author on each of the selected papers will receive a certificate or plaque with the name of the award, the name of the paper, and the names of the authors of the paper, to be awarded at the Business Meeting that year.

The main criterion for selection is the same as for being a top-rated paper in the conference: introduction of a strong new technique, solution of a long-standing open problem, introduction and solution of an interesting and important new problem, etc. These are the characteristics associated with giving a paper the highest score.

If a paper qualifies for the Machtey/Lewin Best Student Paper Award, it should not be disqualified from being considered for the Best Paper Award, and vice versa; a paper meriting both Awards should be given both Awards.

If last-minute help with the submissions process  is needed  or in the unlikely event of difficuties with the submissions server please contact the local chair, Lawrence Larmore (larmore @ cs.unlv.edu).

Las Vegas offers top quality entertainment, attractions, shopping and world-renowned resorts. Las Vegas nightlife will keep you up until dawn and art displays, music and museums take you on a journey from the classic to the contemporary. Downtown Las Vegas offers an energetic display of color with a bit of nostalgia and a glimpse of the future.

This person is a volunteer, so please only contact him/her for problems not handled by the submissions server or this document.  Do not contact the conference chair or program committee chair, as they do not have any control over the electronic submission process (other than to set guidelines).

Please do not ask the contact person to help you with system-specific problems, such as those with LaTeX, PostScript(tm), or your mailer.  Such questions are best addressed to your system administrator or support staff.

This is a working document describing the electronic submission procedure for ALENEX '07.  The procedures and policies described herein may change slightly as we encounter problems or develop new solutions.

When you send in a submission, the server now generates an md5 "receipt" for the submission.  In case of serious server error, this lets you "prove" to us that the submission arrived.  We strongly recommend that you keep your original PostScript(tm) or PDF file until after the deadline so that it can be used in conjunction with the receipt for verification.

Notes on all changes to a paper (submissions, requests for information, etc.) are sent to the contact for the paper.  (If a change is done inappropriately, it is the contact's responsibility to notify Gerth S. Brodal).

Experience shows that the most common errors in using the system are neglecting to register before submitting or failing to include the system-supplied file name when submitting the paper.  Both of these mistakes may make life more difficult for the program committee, and should be avoided.

Electronic Publishing Board to investigate and develop guidelines and mechanisms for electronic submission and dissemination of STOC and FOCS proceedings and other SIGACT and theoretical publications.

Unprintable and late submissions will be rejected. Submissions formatted for paper size other than 8.5 x 11 inch paper (US Letter), or with pages in nonascending order, also risk rejection without consideration of their merits.  The committee accepts no responsibility for errors due to problems with the system, although we will do our best to make sure that no such problems occur.

You may revise or withdraw your paper after submitting it.  However, revisions must be received by the deadline.  Withdrawals before the deadline can be done using the electronic submissions system.  Withdrawals after the deadline will need to be arranged through the program committee.

Because of copyright restrictions, we request that authors only use standard LaserWriter fonts (e.g., Times, Helvetica, Symbol) or public domain fonts (e.g., the Computer Modern Fonts) in their preliminary submissions.  For final submissions, it should be possible to use copyrighted fonts.

To submit via electronic mail, send electronic mail to alenex07@sigact.cs.unlv.edu with one of the following subjects.  The submission server will send you a reply indicating the disposition of your request.

Please add an abstract to your registration to simplify the job of the program committee to assign submissions to committee members. The abstract will not be used later in the review process. So don't worry if the abstract of your final submission deviates from the abstract you submitted when you registered. In an emergency, you can still withdraw your paper and reregister it.

Submit (or revise) a paper. The Postcript(tm) or PDF file of the submission can be either stored in the body of the message or attached to the message. The server will acknowledge the submission.  The acknowledgement will include an MD5-generated receipt for the submission, as well as basic information on the file so that you can verify that it arrived "safely".  The basic information includes sizes (in bytes), checksum, first and last ten lines of the file.

We do not plan to include a mechanism for encryption/decryption of submissions to ALENEX '07.  The primary reason for this decision is that the SIGACT community is honorable.  Additionally, it is unlikely that we can provide sufficiently general cross-platform software that will not hinder the refereeing process.

This server could not verify that you are authorized to access the document requested.  Either you supplied the wrong credentials (e.g., bad password), or your browser doesn't understand how to supply the credentials required.

It mostly contains quotes on subjects of interest to theoretical computer scientists, including comments on mathematics, science, technology, research, and academics in general. Suggestions for quotes for future inclusion should be sent to the editor at editor@sigact.acm.org.

When a person has discovered the truth about something and has established it with great effort, then, on viewing his discoveries more carefully, he often realizes that what he has taken great pains to find might have been perceived with the greatest of ease.

For a research worker, the unforgotten moments of his life are those rare ones, which come after years of plodding work, when the veil over nature's secret seems suddenly to lift and when what was dark and chaotic suddenly appears in a clear and beautiful light and pattern.

The major difference between a thing that might go wrong and a thing that cannot possibly go wrong is that when a thing that cannot possibly go wrong goes wrong it usually turns out to be impossible to get at or repair.

Even if your reader does not herself know precisely what rules you are breaking, she will certainly notice whether your thoughts are easy to understand.  If you write muddy, indecipherable prose, riddled with mistakes, your reader is bound to wonder how carefully you designed your study, collected your data, applied statistical techniques, or otherwise behaved like a respectable scientist.

On the other hand, as my husband was leaving graduate school for his first job, his thesis advisor told him, "You may wonder how a professor gets any research done when one has to teach, advise students, serve on committees, referee papers, write letters of recommendation, interview prospective faculty. Well, I take long showers."

The first was never to accept anything as true if I had not evident knowledge of its being so; that is, carefully to avoid precipitancy and prejudice, and to embrace in my judgment only what presented itself to my mind so clearly and distinctly that I had no occasion to doubt it.

The third, to direct my thoughts in an orderly way; beginning with the simplest objects, those most apt to be known, and ascending little by little, in steps as it were, to the knowledge of the most complex; and establishing an order in thought even when the objects had no natural priority one to another. And the last, to make throughout such complete enumerations and such general surveys that I might be sure of leaving nothing out.

Poets do not go mad; but chess-players do. Mathematicians go mad, and cashiers; but creative artists very seldom. I am not, as will be seen, in any sense attacking logic: I only say that this danger does lie in logic, not in imagination.

There are very few things which we know, which are not capable of being reduc'd to a Mathematical Reasoning; and when they cannot it's a sign our knowledge of them is very small and confus'd; and when a Mathematical Reasoning can be had it's as great a folly to make use of any other, as to grope for a thing in the dark, when you have a Candle standing by you.

If you keep proving stuff that others have done, getting confidence, increasing the complexities of your solutions - for the fun of it - then one day you'll turn around and discover that nobody actually did that one!  And that's the way to become a computer scientist.

In presenting a mathematical argument the great thing is to give the educated reader the chance to catch on at once to the momentary point and take details for granted: his successive mouthfuls should be such as can be swallowed at sight; in case of accidents, or in case he wishes for once to check in detail, he should have only a clearly circumscribed little problem to solve (e.g. to check an identity: two trivialities omitted can add up to an impasse).

The unpractised writer, even after the dawn of a conscience, gives him no such chance; before he can spot the point he has to tease his way through a maze of symbols of which not the tiniest suffix can be skipped.

Some people say that a monkey would bang out the complete works of Shakespeare on a typewriter given an unlimited amount of time. In the meantime, what they would probably produce is a valid sendmail configuration file.

Should we be surprised that one does not know how to reason when the language of the sciences is nothing but a jargon of much too many words, some of which so vulgar as to not have any definite meaning, while others are foreign or barbarian words one does not understand well.

An entry for a person without a doctoral degree (which is included when he or she has served as a thesis adviser on doctoral degrees) has the string "---" (three hyphens) in the adviser, university, and year fields.

The university file maps acronyms to universities.  Each entry consists of an acronym, followed by the character "=", followed by the name, city or town, state or province (if applicable), and country of a university (separated by commas).

The SIGACT Theoretical Computer Science Genealogy, which lists information on earned doctoral degrees of theoretical computer scientists, is currently in the process of being published on the World-Wide Web.

Columbia University for his astonishing breadth of contributions to theoretical computer science. Mihalis has made major contributions to computational complexity theory, database theory, computer-aided verification and testing, and algorithmic graph theory.

His fundamental contributions to computational complexity theory include two key papers in the PCP theory of hardness of approximation --- the definition of the class max-SNP and the proofs of hardness of approximation of graph coloring and set cover. In database theory his far-reaching contributions include the initiation of the study of acyclic databases and of non-two-phase locking. In verification he is arguably the researcher most responsible for laying the rigorous algorithmic and complexity-theoretic foundations of the field.

Jeffrey D. Ullman, for his sustained research contributions to Theoretical Computer Science, especially as it relates to applied areas of Computer Science such as compilers, parallelism, and databases; and for his contributions to Theoretical Computer Science education through textbooks and the mentoring of graduate students.

The recipient of the second Knuth Prize is Prof. Leslie G. Valiant of Harvard University for his far-reaching contributions to the study of computational complexity, parallel computation, and learning theory.

He has also helped to shape the structure of computer science at a conceptual level, making numerous contributions to the theory of parallel computation and bringing about a renaissance in the computational theory of learning.

Many of these strands in his work are brought together in his recent book, Circuits of the Mind, which is one of the few efforts to relate the cognitive functions of the brain to concrete computational models.

The recipient of the first Knuth Prize is Prof. Andrew C.-C. Yao of Princeton University, who is being honored for his fundamental research in computational complexity.  For 25 years Andy Yao has been producing research papers in almost every aspect of computational complexity and many aspects of algorithmic design. These results and proof methods have typically caused a leap in the community's understanding of some central issue, enabling rejuvenated research by others. We list several examples as illustrations.

Andy's classic paper on Communication Complexity, perhaps the most quoted paper in Complexity Theory, introduced a fundamental model for communication and techniques for analyzing it. Communication Complexity has since developed into a major area, finding diverse and unexpected applications, with two books on the subject coming out soon.

In the paper "Should Tables Be Sorted," Andy revolutionized our view of efficient information storage, leading to the optimal probabilistic perfect hashing schemes and dictionary implementations. The same paper introduced the fundamental "Cell Probe" model for analyzing data structure algorithms, which is again a major object of study.

The article "Theory and Applications of Trap-door Functions" contains an array of fundamental results. The most important is proving that the Blum-Micali generator is pseudo-random, leading to an important "hardness vs randomness" tradeoff: if one-way permutations exist, then BPP has subexponential deterministic simulations.  It also defines and studies computational entropy, introduces the XOR lemma to amplify computational difficulty, and uses it to generate hard-core bits for every function.

Complexity. After the breakthrough superpolynomial lower bounds for constant depth circuits were proved, many subsequent attempts to construct exponential-depth lower bounds failed. Andy's tour-de-force "Separating the Polynomial-Time Hierarchy by Oracles" was a major accomplishment.

His tenure in charge of the Education Forum at SIGACT News has exceeded all expectations in length and breadth and has out-lasted at least three Editors. Rocky has been known by all who have worked with him for his alacrity and tireless reliability.

Conference on Computational Complexity. Alan was involved in the drafting of several policy reports for NSF that helped present the case for funding theory to less enlightened administrators. He has also served the community well as an editor and on numerous program committees.

For over 25 years Rao Kosaraju has actively and continuously served the theory community. His distinguished service record includes numerous editorships of refereed journals, program and conference committee memberships, service on the SIGACT Executive Committee including a term as SIGACT Chair, service on many prize and review committees for top-ranked Computer Science Departments, the National Science Foundation, and the ACM Fellows Selection Committee.

Fred is widely noted for his service and dedication to the DIMACS cause, for his open-mindedness, and for his ability to overcome difficult challenges.  Through his efforts with DIMACS, he has truly had a significant positive impact on our community.

Architectures, Algorithms, and Networks (I-SPAN) is a forum for scientists, engineers, and practitioners throughout the world to exchange ideas and research results related to the design, use, analysis, and application of parallel architectures, algorithms, networks, and internet technology.

Communication protocols for in ad hoc and sensor networks Data compression, association, aggregation Interplay between information processing, communication, and routing Analytical, mobility, and validation models for ad hoc and sensor networks Hybrid networks and wireless Internet Quality of service in medium access control and routing Data management issues, query processing etc.

By logging into NACEWeb, you can take advantage of all of the online benefits of your membership. Please note: your login and password belong to you and cannot be shared with anyone. If you would like additional logins and passwords for other members of your staff, take advantage of the individual and electronic memberships that are available for college and employer members.

Prepare your faculty for the 2006-2007 recruiting season. Use the Faculty Referral Workshop to show faculty, administrators, and your career center staff how to refer and offer references. Order online today.

Students majoring in the arts face intense competition and a lack of consistent job opportunities. The authors offer suggestions for modifying traditional career advising methods, services, and resources to engage the artistic personality.

Student Characteristics and Career Planning: A Case Study of an HRD Program To determine the effectiveness of a human resource development program at a Midwest university, a study analyzed student profiles and their answers to a questionnaire on career planning.

NACE's Salary Survey report. Know the going rate for entry-level accountants, engineers, programmers, and other new hires, and set competitive starting salaries to new college graduates with confidence.

Available only to Salary Survey subscribers and NACE members, these reports can give you the salary information you need, the way you need it. For more information, see www.naceweb.org/salarysurvey/salsur_custom.htm.

In February 1924, the first placement organization in the United States was established in Chicago. Its original name was the National Association of Appointments Secretaries, after the British position title, "appointments secretary," also known as "placement director" in this country. Of the 12 representatives who founded the pioneer organization, 11 were women.

Career services and employment professionals are involved in an important process-helping students choose and attain personally rewarding careers, and helping employers develop effective college relations programs which contribute to effective candidate selections for their organizations.

Whether you want to connect with students and new college graduates or career services and college recruiting professionals, the National Association of Colleges and Employers provides you with a variety of print and online publications and web sites to reach your goals.

This study compares salaries over a 15-year period and looks at how supply and demand, the tech bubble, recession, and other forces affected starting salary offers to students in the business, engineering, computer-related, sciences, and nursing fields. The study features an analysis to help you understand why salaries are what they are, and where they may be going.

Standards for College and University Career Services, the workbook complements the 13 categores of standards and helps you identify areas of your career services program that need improvement and those that fully meet professional standards. The workbook also offers tools for calculating composite and mean scores for each category to enhance or overhaul your program.

Based on responses from employers nationwide, the Job Outlook 2007 report is an annual, national forecast of the hiring intentions of employers and examines other issues related to the employment of new college graduates.

The report includes hiring projections for the college Class of 2007, including projections by sector and region of the country; information about employers' intentions for Spring 2007 on-campus recruiting, preferred/most effective recruiting methods; qualities of the ideal candidate; and more.

Collect, analyze, and report information relative to the needs of practitioners in the field and the reactions of users of NACE materials and service. Conduct field contacts (personal, telephone and group) and complete contact reports for all contacts; prepare reports to Director of Sales and other appropriate staff members regarding trends, needs, and assessments.

"Companies that include new college graduate hires as part of their work force planning strategy not only reap the immediate benefits associated with hiring new college graduates, but also sow the seeds for the future success of their organizations."

"The increased interest means employers face more competition for their new college hires," says Mackes. "In fact, employers told us that competition is the number one challenge they face in hiring Class of 2007 graduates."About the Job Outlook 2007 Survey: The Job Outlook survey is a forecast of hiring intentions of employers as they relate to new college graduates.

"Other studies we've conducted show that organizations target new college graduates for job openings because it gives organizations the opportunity to mold their future leaders," notes Mackes. "This study bears out the importance of leadership skills."

Less than 5 percent of respondents reported that work experience isn't typically a factor in their decision to hire a new college graduate. About the Job Outlook 2007 Survey: The Job Outlook survey is a forecast of hiring intentions of employers as they relate to new college graduates.

Students with disabilities are a growing population on college campuses; however they find employment in significantly lower percentages than other students. Why? Statistics show these students, without question, are the largest underserved population of college students. Yet, their career development needs are acute.

If you want to strengthen your knowledge and skills of career development and the job search for students with disabilities, you'll want to hear Dan Ryan, a career services practitioner with 16 years of experience working with this population. Ryan offers practical advice and timely information that will increase your competence and comfort level for guiding and teaching students with disabilities.

Career services professionals who want to expand and strengthen their knowledge of the job search for students with disabilities will want to hear Dan Ryan, a career services practitioner with 16 years of experience working with this population. This is a basic level seminar.

If you register for the live audio/web conference, we will send you confirmation via e-mail. The confirmation will include telephone instructions and instructions for accessing the PowerPoint presentation.

Through an extensive collaborative partnership between Freshman Studies and The Career Center at Seton Hall University, more than 90 percent of first-year students complete an online career assessment and more than 80 percent participate in a career-related program or advising activity.

Hall University program which focuses on program management, career counseling, and outreach to first-year students. They will offer ideas on program development, evaluation, and relationship cultivation as it relates to retention initiatives.

Andrew Brereton's graduate degrees are in theology. He was originally brought in to Seton Hall's Career Center as part of an initiative that encourages students to discern their true vocation and consider how they might be of service to the common good. He is responsible for programming and counseling efforts that seek to engage students early in the career development process.

Register now The NACElink Network, the result of an alliance among the National Association of Colleges and Employers, DirectEmployers Association, and Symplicity Corporation, features three levels designed to meet the needs of schools of all sizes. Each level features a variety of tools and capabilities, and the levels are designed to provide options for budgets of all sizes.

Often, students adopt and adapt to new technologies more rapidly than we (career services practitioners) do. Based on research on technology and usage trends in career services units, this workshop's presenters will investigate course management systems and emerging web-based social software applications that hold promise for transforming how we offer services, deliver instruction, and share knowledge.

Presenters will analyze a range of emerging technologies and assess their potential to improve service delivery, instructional effectiveness and organizational management; and help partictipants formulate strategy, based on a SWOT analysis, for use of these tools appropriate to their own campus situations.

Participants will be grouped into small teams, each with a laptop (you are encouraged to bring your laptop), to move through presentations and activities where you will get hands-on practice in many of the discussed applications. For example, you and your colleagues will share knowledge on weblogs, wikis, and RSS (Really Simple Syndication) and then practice posting to a weblog, editing a wiki page, and subscribing to a weblog using an RSS reader.

Can you define spark that makes someone a leader? How does a person effectively capture a group's attention and lead individuals to volunteer thoughts and ideas? Do you have what it takes to be a leader?

By the end of The Common Sense Approach to Leadership workshop, you will be thinking about your own leadership style and the direction you want to take your organization in, and planning how to make a difference in your office and among your staff.

Understand how to take advantage of engaging and empowering other members of your organization to become leaders; and Develop insight into your organizational leadership and how you might engage others, from the most junior employee to senior management.

Call it emotional intelligence or just good old-fashioned people skills, but how you manage yourself and interact with others profoundly influences your credibility and overall effectiveness. Career services and employment recruiting are intensely relationship-oriented businesses. Professionals who work well with a variety of individuals and situations will be more successful.

Examine contemporary relationship concepts that work best in fast-paced, results-driven, electronically-oriented work environments. Assess your own style and identify your strengths and learn to leverage them to enhance your image. Pinpoint your weaknesses and pick up ideas for how to manage around them.

Examine the complexities of trust systemically; discover behaviors that build, break, rebuild, and sustain trust; participate in experiential learning to identify these interrelations; and learn the connections between trust and change management. Explore a research-based, practical approach to trust building that is nonthreatening and practical.

Through group discussion, experiential learning, and self-reflection, you'll gain strategies, best practices, and tools to deal with critical trust-related issues that affect performance in your office. Learn metrics that will measure trust building behaviors in your workplace, and discover how to apply a research-based, proven approach for rebuilding and sustaining trust, improving performance, particularly during change.

Are you an idea person? Do you work with creative people? Too often, innovation is thought of as something "those people" do as opposed to an essential opportunity (and responsibility) of everyone in an organization.

Groups that routinely produce breakthrough ideas and incremental improvements do so because they work in a culture of innovation that encourages and engages individuals with different perspectives to contribute to a shared vision and common goals.

In this interactive session, you will explore what it takes to produce great ideas on a regular basis, examine best practices from recognized innovators like IDEO and Wikipedia, and review the different categories of innovation worth pursuing. Gain a better understanding of the individual and organizational actions that are required to make innovation a manageable everyday activity.

Network of Graduate Recruitment and Development Associations (INGRADA), comprised of associations from countries worldwide, serving professionals engaged in the career development, recruitment, and hiring of college and university graduates.

INGRADA's purpose is to gather, disseminate, and network across national borders relevant and timely information and best practice relating to graduate preparation, recruitment, and career development.

NACE tracks IP addresses to measure traffic on our sites. We do not use IP addresses to determine any user's identity. Members who use our web sites are required to accept cookies. A cookie is a piece of data that our server stores when you visit our web sites.

These cookies save your password so that you don't have to re-enter during your session. In addition, some cookies coordinate banner advertising seen on the NACE web sites. Cookies also track the pages that you have visited. The only personal information that a cookie contains is information you supply. A cookie cannot read other data from your computer's hard disk.

The NACE web sites, JobWeb and NACEWeb, contain links to other sites. NACE is not responsible for the privacy practices of such web sites. Inclusion of links to an outside web site, whether in an advertisement or content area of a NACE web sites, is not an endorsement of the outside web site or a guarantee that the information it contains is accurate.

NACE has no way of knowing whether those advertisers use cookies with their banner advertising and cannot guarantee that if you click on a banner, you will not be required to accept a cookie from the advertiser. You should contact the advertiser to determine its polices regarding use of cookies.

You may be asked to use an online form to request information, products, and services. These forms typically ask for contact information (such as your phone number or e-mail address), unique identifiers (such as your NACE membership number or account number), financial information (such as a credit card number), and demographic information (for example, your age, location, type of organization, size of organization). Contact information from these forms is used to send the products, promotional materials or membership information that you request, or to register you for roundtables, conferences, or workshops. Forms on our site that request financial information do so in order to bill for products or services ordered. Unique identifiers (specifically, your password or member number) are collected from members to verify the user's identity and for use in our record system. Information from these forms is also used by NACE to send you information about products, services, conferences, and other information that may be if interest to you. If you do not want to receive mailings (regular or electronic) from NACE, please see the "opt-out" section below.

NACE makes membership mailing labels available to other reputable organizations whose products or services we think you might find interesting. The mailing labels contain your name, organization, and postal address. They do not include your e-mail address, fax, or phone number. If you do not want to receive any mail (regular from any organization to which NACE sells its membership mailing labels, please see the "opt-out" section below.

NACE does not provide any of the e-mail addresses, phone numbers, or other personally identifiable information that it collects on its web sites to any individual or organization for any purpose, including commercial. NACE uses the information collected to improve the content of our web sites; to enhance existing products, services, and member benefits; and to plan for new products, services, and member benefits. NACE may also collect aggregate information about which pages visitors access as they use the NACE web sites.

NACE makes networking and chat opportunities available to our members through the NACEWeb communities. Any information that is disclosed in these areas becomes public information, and you should exercise caution when deciding to disclose your personal information. NACE cannot control the acts of its members who use the communities feature.

In our communities section, NACE collects all contact names, e-mail addresses, and dialogue. Dialogue in the communities may be archived for later retrieval by a NACE member. Messages go to the archives as they are posted. NACE does not edit discussions provided through the communities section.

NACE may deem it necessary or appropriate from time to time to modify this privacy policy to reflect changes in the way NACE collects or uses information or changes in privacy-related laws, regulations, or industry standards. Accordingly, NACE reserves the right to change this privacy statement at any time by posting the revised policy on this Site. Information will be handled according to the privacy statement in effect at the time the information is used.

The National Association of Colleges and Employers provides members with the opportunity to take their names and organizations off the NACE mailing list or not to be included in membership mailing labels that NACE sells to other organizations. Members can choose to "opt out" of participating in this function.

The National Association of Colleges and Employers (NACE) provides information and services on the Internet as a benefit and service in furtherance of NACE's not-for-profit and tax-exempt status. NACE makes no representations about the suitability of this information and these services for any purpose.

The appearance of advertisements and product and service information on JobWeb, NACEWeb, or NACElink does not constitute an endorsement or favoring by NACE of the product or service. Neither has NACE investigated the claims made by any advertiser or vendor. Product and service information is based solely on material received from the advertiser or vendor. NACE assumes no responsibility and disclaims any liability for the consequences resulting from the use of such products, services, advertiser, or vendor.

The employer information on JobWeb, including banners, company descriptions, or featured employers, does not imply endorsement of the organizations purchasing these services, nor any association with their owners or operators. JobWeb takes no responsibility whatsoever for the recruiting, hiring, or employment practices of these organizations.

Any links from JobWeb.com to a third-party web site that is offering products or services to the job seeker for a fee shall not be deemed to be an endoresement, representative, or warranty of that third party.

At certain places on JobWeb, NACEWeb, or NACElink, links to other Internet addresses can be accessed. Such external Internet addresses contain information created, published, maintained, or otherwise posted by institutions or organizations independent of NACE. NACE does not endorse, approve, certify, or control those external Internet addresses and does not guarantee the accuracy, completeness, suitability, or timeliness of information located at such addresses. Reference on the external Internet site to any specific commercial product, process, or service does not constitute or imply endorsement, recommendation, or favoring by NACE. NACE assumes no responsibility and disclaims any liability for the consequences resulting from the use of information obtained from these linked addresses.

Copying and/or downloading, including framing or mirroring, of any of this information for the purpose of distributing it to others is prohibited without the specific written permission of NACE. All other rights are reserved by NACE. Any individual making unauthorized copies or downloading any NACE material will be subject to the penalties as set forth in the federal and state copyright laws.

Linking to the information contained on JobWeb, with written permission, is considered a permissible use of the information. Links to the public areas of NACEWeb are permitted with permission. Links to materials in the password-protected areas of NACEWeb are not allowed.

Linking to NACElink is limited to employers, students, and schools only. Third-party recruiters and temporary agenices may not link to NACElink. NACE reserves the right to revoke permission to link to any or all web sites. For more information, contact Claudia Allen, permissions editor, at callen@naceweb.org.

When using JobWeb, NACEWeb, or NACElink links to go to external internet sites, you must comply with the copyright notice and policy provided at those web sites. Any copying and/or downloading of copyright material found at those sites must be with express written permission of the person or organization that owns the copyright.

The National Association of Colleges and Employers expects all staff members and web page authors to be aware of how intellectual property laws and policies apply to the electronic environment and to respect the intellectual property of others. Also, NACE has advised all of its users and subscribers that copyrighted or trademarked information cannot be placed on the JobWeb, NACEWeb, or NACElink. Neither staff members, subscribers, nor users of the JobWeb, NACEWeb, or NACElink are permitted to post, publish, or in any manner place copyrighted or trademarked information of others on JobWeb, NACEWeb, or NACElink without the express, written permission of the copyright holder.

The Digital Millennium Copyright Act establishes a limitation of liability for infringement of the copyright laws for Internet service providers, such as NACE. In compliance with that law, NACE has designated an agent to receive statutory notices from copyright owners about infringement.

A statement, in writing and signed by the owner of the copyrighted work or his or her agent, stating that he or she is the copyright owner of the information. This must be sent by regular mail (not fax or e-mail) to NACE's agent.

All Jobwire ads must be prepaid. You may pay online with a credit card through our secure payment site (https://store.naceweb.org/jobwire/default.aspx) or you may fax or phone in your credit card payment information.

Assistant Director will oversee: employer relations, on-campus recruiting, and experiential learning. This position is responsible for establishing and maintaining employer partnerships to develop recruitment strategies and programs on campus, presents information to various groups on career-related topics and hiring trends, and provides individual consultation to students exploring career options and experiential learning opportunities.

Master of Science in Finance Program. This person will be responsible for promoting the MSF program and its graduates to companies, developing contacts to facilitate employment opportunities and placements for finance graduate students, and preparing students for employment.

The position prefers a Masters Degree in Counseling, Student Personnel, or a related field and at least two years experience with career planning, internships, human resources or related program administration. The position also requires strong written and oral communication, organizational, interpersonal and computer skills and the ability to build positive rapport with students, faculty, administration, staff, alumni and employers.

Reporting to the Director, the Assistant Director will be responsible for advising undergraduate students from all majors within the School of the Arts (except Writing Literature and Publishing) on career development issues and contribute to the direction of Career Services and development of the team. Specific duties include: 1) Advise undergraduate students on career development issues, provide walk-in advising for students and alumni as scheduled; 2) collaborate with team members, faculty, and student organizations to plan, publicize, and implement career and industry related programs, panels, speakers, workshops, site visits, and events to help educate constituents about career options and industry issues/trends, and connect them with industry professionals and organizations; 3) Collaborate with team members to develop, implement, and/or assist with major Career Services initiatives; 4) Present standing workshops on various career related topics and contribute to the development of, and present workshops on, new topics, as needed; 5) Cultivate and maintain relationships with alumni, faculty, student organizations, Emerson College staff, and other constituents to support advising and programming efforts; 6) Maintain relevant listservs and career resources for career library and web site; 7) Participate in division-wide and all campus events; 8) Stay abreast of career services and relevant industry news and information and update colleagues and constituents as appropriate; 9 Assist in preparation of Career Services reports; and 10) perform other duties as assigned.

The Massachusetts Institute of Technology is committed to the principle of equal opportunity in education and employment. The Institute does not discriminate against individuals on the basis of race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, disability, age, veteran status, ancestry, or national or ethnic origin in the administration of its educational policies, admissions policies, employment policies, scholarship and loan programs, and other Institute administered programs and activities, but may favor US citizens or residents in admissions and financial aid.

MBA students. Duties include the creation and delivery of career seminars for both large and small groups, advising students on a one-to-one basis, and acting as a cohort manager for 1.5 cohorts of first year students (approximately ninety students). Will also be responsible for the creation, distribution, collection, and analysis of evaluations of career education programming and advising; developing and delivering a comprehensive, timely, and relevant career education program; supporting two to three job function/industry student clubs to create and deliver focused workshops; advising students regarding resumes and cover letters, interview preparation, and job negotiations; addressing the emotional needs and stresses of highly motivated business professionals experiencing career transitions.

Experience in the creation, distribution, and analysis of surveys needed. Computer and web literacy necessary, including experience with database creation and maintenance, spreadsheet analysis, word processing, presentation preparation, and survey software. Must be able to work flexible hours and occasionally travel.

Minimum Qualifications: Master's degree in an appropriate area of specialization and four years of appropriate experience; or a bachelor's degree in an appropriate area of specialization and six years of appropriate experience.

Doctorate is preferred. Must be able to set priorities and meet deadlines. Experience in the creation, distribution, and analysis of surveys needed. Prefer National Certified Counselor. Experience in providing career counseling and coaching in a higher education setting a plus. The search will remain open until the position is filled.

Master's Degree required. Knowledge of effective techniques and resources for advising students and alumni in making career-related decisions. Knowledge of performance management for direct reports, including providing appropriate feedback, and maintaining the policies and procedures of the office. Ability to collaborate and develop rapport with students, alumni, academic units, staff and faculty. Ability to effectively communicate to a variety of audiences using excellent writing, marketing and presentation skills. Computer literacy, including knowledge of Microsoft Word, Excel, Powerpoint, Lotus Notes and Interfase career software. Prior leadership and management experience a plus.

Associate Director, Career Dev. Office, Pomona College, Claremont, CaliforniaPomona College, one of the top 10 liberal arts colleges in the nation, seeks qualified candidates for the position of Associate Director in the Career Development Office. The college is located 30 miles east of Downtown Los Angeles, in the city of Claremont. Pomona College offers a strong benefits package, a beautiful campus, and ample resources.

The incumbent will design and deliver customized career-related workshops and programs. Coordinate and staff career-related events with students, alumni, and employers. Provide career counseling regarding career options, goal setting, career research, and the job search process. Manage and direct the Career Fellows Program (a peer-career-advising program). Assist in training and supervising Graduate Interns. Write and produce office publications. Contact prospective recruiters and internship sponsors regarding hiring Pomona students. Supervise student staff. Develop and present career and graduate school related workshops.

Pomona College is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, creed, place of national origin, sex, age, sexual orientation or physical handicap in its employment practices and in admission of students to educational programs and activities, in accordance with the requirements of Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 and other applicable laws.

The Associate Director will work closely with the Director of Career Partnerships to expand the range of internship and full-time job opportunities for students, with a special emphasis on arts and sciences majors. The Associate Director will also work collaboratively with students and other key stakeholders such as alumni, parents, and faculty.

The Associate Director will develop and implement a four-year approach to interactive educational programming that utilizes alumni, parent, and faculty partners and that respects the year-by-year change in student perspective and priorities.

Minimum qualifications include a Master's degree in the Humanities or a related discipline; 3 - 5 years of related professional experience, preferably in non-profit or philanthropic organizations; prior supervisory experience; strong organization skills with an equally strong results orientation; outstanding interpersonal and communication skills with the ability to create buy- in among constituents for a common vision; demonstrated success in creating and managing partnerships; and excellent judgment. The Associate Director will be thoroughly familiar with trends, approaches, and tools for successfully delivering career coaching. Initiative and a willingness to go the extra step for both internal and external constituents are required. The successful candidate will bring to this position a positive approach; the ability to manage multiple tasks simultaneously; the capability to plan goals and achieve them; and the flexibility to take risks and change course based on data.

Application procedures-- Individuals who possess all required qualifications as listed above are encouraged to apply. Qualified applicants are asked to submit: (1) a cover letter which references this position, (2) one copy of their resume, (3) contact information for at least three professional references, including their current or most recent employer, and (4) salary requirements.

Service in the enhancement and establishment of an innovative career development and management model for the College of Engineering. The Associate Director contributes to the leadership and vision by establishing practices that heighten the awareness of the services and resources of the office. This position is responsible for administering three essential areas in the schools/colleges assigned: career development, experiential learning; and employer development.

The Associate Director is responsible for marketing and establishing partnerships with faculty, staff, and academic units to assist in developing relationships to enhance programs and services within his/her assigned liaison roles. The Associate Director will manage daily student program operations, meet with students in individual and group settings, develop program policy/procedure, conduct program assessment and evaluation, and participate in strategic planning. Collaboratively set career goals with the dean, assistant/associate deans, faculty, and school/college-based staff.

Desired Qualifications: The ideal candidate must have at least a Master's degree in business, engineering, liberal arts, or education; a minimum of four years experience in a college or university Career Services office or equivalent; ability to conduct employer development, understanding of career development; and ability to work with a diverse population. Expansive work experience in developing career programs and activities; working in a team environment; use of internet, word processing, spreadsheet, database, and presentation software.

In addition to career counseling, responsibilities include teaching career development and student success classes, administering and interpreting career assessments, conducting campus outreach, supporting ACCS programs as appropriate, and managing the non-credit internship program.

Looking for an opportunity to play a key role in shaping the future direction and growth of a public company in one of the fastest growing industries? Have a passion for helping people change their lives through education?

Ensures the Career Services System operates efficiently and meets the current needs of key stakeholders, including students, employers and alumni as well as support operations, regulatory and corporate requirements.

We offer a competitive salary, employee relocation assistance, 401(k), group medical (including the new Health Savings Account option), dental and vision coverage, flexible spending accounts, a tuition discount program for your family members, employee tuition reimbursement, and a fitness center, just to name a few.

At least 3-5 years of extensive, related university-level career office and/or corporate college/university relations experience. Demonstrated experience working effectively with business sector employers. Outstanding interpersonal, analytical and problem-solving skills. Demonstrated ability to work independently and creatively.

Supporting our new College Relations Initiative under the direction of the Director, Workforce Planning, this position will research, design, implement and manage the Blue Cross Blue Shield of Massachusetts College Relations Program. The college relations program is a key component of the workforce planning process and is critical to the company's diversity strategy and succession planning. This position will have one direct report and will be responsible for a budget of approximately $100,000 annually.

Establish criteria for appropriate school partnerships and develop relationship models. Leverage existing relationships by building internal networks that connect business leaders, HR and formal programs together.

Manage the execution of all campus recruiting activities for professional staff including, but not limited to university relations, communication materials, resume screening, on-campus events, interviewing, and the offer process.

Business. Provide individual/group career coaching and programming including workshops, industry panels, and presentations on career education topics targeted toward assigned students from College of Business.

The University of Tennessee, Knoxville, in its efforts to ensure a welcoming environment for all persons, does not discriminate on the basis of sexual orientation in its campus-based programs, services, and activities. Inquiries and complaints should be directed to the Office of Equity and Diversity.

I / College of Engineering Consultant to provide direction and coaching for engineering students. This position will work primarily with UT students and faculty in the College of Engineering. The position will also be required to build long term relationships with employers interested in hiring students from the College of Engineering. The position reports to the Director of Career Services.

Fifty-three majors are offered by 25 departments and 11 programs. Consistently ranked among the top liberal arts colleges in the country, Colby follows a 4-1-4 academic calendar, with the month of January devoted to intensive study.

Review of applications will begin on February 19, 2007 and will continue until the position is filled. A resume with an accompanying cover letter may be submitted via the SJG website at www.spelmanandjohnson.com under the link Open Positions.

Colby is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer, committed to excellence through diversity, and strongly encourages applications and nominations of persons of color, women, and members of other under-represented groups.

Ensure that appropriate supervision is provided by the direct supervisors of paraprofessional and other student staff members. Seek to have all staff consistently give high-quality efforts, in a cohesive manner.

Office. Collaborate with that staff, alumni Bear Career Network volunteers and members of the colleges Advisory Boards. A focus of this effort is to further assist with activities which can result in professional career networking relationships developing between alumni/board members and current students.

The Director is a full-time, 12-month position. The standard work schedule will be 8 am  5 pm, M-F. Depending upon the needs of the office, division and/or institution, the director will be expected to work occasional evenings and/or weekends. As a professional staff member of the division, the director serves as a member of the Student Affairs Response Team. Thus, the director is on-call some week-ends, in case an emergency transpires on campus.

The Director of Career Services Center reports to the Dean of Students and works collaboratively with division of Student Development staff, academic departments and faculty, and external employers. CSC is one of five departments in UAA's new student development division, which in turn is part of UAA's larger student affairs family. CSC coordinates UAA's student internship program, on-campus employer recruitment efforts, a career resource library, and provides career advising for students.

The director must posses skills in management and leadership and have the professional credentials and experience to supervise professional and support staff. The director must provide a leadership role in the development of the career services mission statement and program goals. The director should participate in institutional decisions about career services' objectives and policies. The director must be able to prepare and maintain annual budgets in alignment with the mission goals. The director must posses skills necessary to establish effective procedures for implementing policies and programs, and conduct outreach efforts. The director must have competence in strategic and operational management, staffing, staff development, supervision, budget management, program marketing, and revenue generation. The director should have experience in and be able to manage and integrate multiple programs, such as career advising, graduate placement, student internships, student employment, and graduate school advising.

Ability to effectively work, communicate, collaborate, and influence UAA's diverse population of students, faculty, staff, community members, and external constituencies, multiple departments, and community campuses. Ability to communicate effectively within and accross University divisions; demonstrated commitment to collaborative teamwork across Academic Affairs, Administrative Services, and Student Affairs divisions, and University Advancement; and demonstrated commitment to the engagement and development of a diverse collegiate environment.

A master's degree in college student personnel, higher education administration, counseling, business administration/management, or other closely related discipline is required from a postsecondary institution whose accreditation is recognized by the U.S. Department of Education and/or the Council on Higher Education Accreditation.

Significant, progressively responsible experience in student affairs or career-related positions in a post-secondary environment directing, managing, supervising, and coordinating career services activities and operations at the university level.

Develop funding streams through grants or initiatives. Provide community leadership and outreach. Serve on community, university, and national boards and committees which enhance career opportunities for UAA students and alumni. Serve as a liaison with regional, national, and international employers.

Provide career advising, exploration, development assistance for prosepective students, community groups, student organizations, students, and alumni. Serve as guest lecturer for various groups of graduating students.

Responsibilities include: supervise the CSC staff; develop, cultivate and promote positive relationships across campus, with current and potential employers, and with professional associations and community groups; establish a comprehensive recruiting services program; collaborate and determine needs with alumni relations to identify and develop programs which engage alumni in career services; oversee development and maintenance of CSC website; collaborate with the development office to identify and secure funding; oversee and manage budget; represent CSC and participate in university outreach activities; collaborate and network with the Williams College of Business and other university offices; oversee academic course offerings of the career-related courses; oversee and maintain program evaluation activities and report outcomes and performance measures.

Review of applications will begin on February 26, 2007 and will continue until the position is filled. A resume with an accompanying cover letter may be submitted via the SJG website at www.spelmanandjohnson.com under the link Open Positions.

The director provides leadership for a campus-wide career services program serving undergraduate and graduate students and alumni. S/he will play a key role in making career preparation an integral, dynamic part of the MIT education and in ensuring the continued expansion of the Careers Office role in supporting MIT students' career development.

Reporting to the Dean for Undergraduate Education, the director partners with academic and administrative departments across the Institute to create an integrated approach to career development for students and graduates. The director serves as a member of the Dean's senior management team. The office delivers career services and professional advising for approximately 4,000 undergraduates and 6,000 graduate students. The director will supervise eighteen permanent staff, two temporary part-time employees, and five career interns. The director will be knowledgeable about national and international trends affecting career choice for MIT students and oversee the continued growth of MIT's study abroad and prestigious fellowship programs.

The Director of the MIT Careers Office must have at least ten years of relevant experience in a highly competitive professional career services environment as well as knowledgeable about science and technology careers. The successful candidate will have demonstrated experience in developing and implementing career programs and in providing career or academic counseling.

Experience with global experiential learning, study abroad, and foreign internship programs as part of career preparation is highly desirable. S/he will demonstrate exceptional skills in interpersonal relations, leadership, and management, including communication, problem-solving, decision-making and planning. S/he will be able to work collaboratively, building and maintaining a strong office team, and thrive in an entrepreneurial environment. Candidates should have a master's degree or Ph.D. in higher education, career counseling, or a related field.

Counseling and Career Development 60% - Provide career counseling to graduate students to help them explore the full range of employment opportunities and career paths. Help students develop effective job-search strategies, both within and outside of the academy. - Develop, organize, and lead workshops for graduate students looking for careers outside of academic teaching and research. These workshops will include self-assessment, resume preparation, interviewing and networking skills, and other career-related issues. - Develop and lead career workshops and programs for students seeking academic employment. These workshops may be delivered collaboratively with the office of the McGraw Center for Teaching and Learning, or as independent programs and will include content pertaining to resumes/curriculum vitas, interviewing, networking, and other career-related issues. - Hold individual counseling appointments, walk-ins, and group counseling sessions for graduate students and graduate alumni. - As needed, hold individual counseling appointments and walk-ins for undergraduate students and undergraduate alumni. - Participate in the use and interpretation of career-related assessments and inventories. - Review and evaluate career-related programs and software. - Develop, promote, and deliver workshops for undergraduate students as part of office initiatives, i.e., Career Week.

Administrative 30% - Plan and develop career-related panel discussions, speaker events, and other programming in consultation with student groups, faculty, departments, and other campus organizations or departments. - Plan and participate in the implementation of on-site or virtual career fairs and other events involving the participation of graduate student and graduate alumni associations. - Develop and maintain electronic resources for graduate students, including library material, website information, handouts, and databases. - Administer the annual graduate exit career plans survey, including collection, analysis, and reporting of data. - Develop and implement on-going communications directly with students through email announcements, list-servs, and email distribution lists. - Develop monthly and annual reporting and statistical analysis on counseling and programs.

External Relations and Job Development 10% - Consult and collaborate with faculty, academic advisors, student development professionals, university staff and administrators who work with graduate students, alumni, and employers. - Assist in the development of marketing and publication material for print and web media. -Initiate discussion with employer representatives to encourage their participation in the on-campus recruiting program, resolve any service issues. Additionally, evaluate employers' literature and advise them in establishing effective recruiting procedures as part of job development. - Interact with individuals at peer institutions, and participate in Graduate Career Consortium meetings and initiatives. - Represent Princeton University and the Office of Career Services at professional and corporate conferences.

Graduate degree and at least 2-5 years of professionally responsible career development experience. Additional qualifications include: A working knowledge of career development theory and familiarity with a variety of career assessment/ inventories is required. An understanding of graduate study in the arts and sciences and engineering at the masters and doctoral level is required. Must possess the capacity for effective collaboration and communication with students, faculty, administrators and employers. Demonstrated ability to work both independently and as a contributing team member is required. Experience with information technology and the use of the Internet as a counseling tool, team building, project management, working to deadlines, and handling multiple priorities is needed. A high degree of familiarity with a variety of software packages for word-processing (Word, WordPerfect), spreadsheets (Excel), databases (Access) and web creation (e.g., HTML, Dreamweaver) is needed. Must also possess the ability to write clearly and concisely, as there is involvement in preparing material for instructional and public relations uses.

The Teach For America Office of Career and Civic Opportunities ("OCCO") supports this objective by creating resources, tools and support systems that enable corps members and alumni (1) to know that they are uniquely positioned through their career and civic choices to take an active part in closing the achievement gap (2) to learn how to assess their skills, interests, and values to make appropriate and inspirational career and civic choices (3) to have access to information about various careers and career paths so they can make informed decisions about their careers and (4) to be connected to career and civic opportunities that are related to their goals and support the movement to end educational inequity.

Since the number of Teach For America corps members and alumni is expanding rapidly, it is imperative that OCCO move aggressively toward "wholesale" delivery - creating an OCCO that efficiently serves the needs of thousands of alumni at a time, rather than "retail" thinking - working with either individuals or very small groups of alums. The managing director has to be very comfortable and invested in creating a wholesale approach to career services.

The managing director reports directly to the vice president of the Office of Career and Civic Opportunities, but must work with many members of the Alumni Affairs team effectively to reach her/his goals.

Education and Experience o Experience in and knowledge of career development critical o Bachelor's degree required; masters degree in career counseling or related field preferred o Minimum of 3 to 5 years of experience preferred Knowledge, Skills, and Experience o Demonstrated record of accomplishment and a self-starter with an entrepreneurial spirit o Exceptional communication and project management skills to reach ambitious goals o Past experience developing and executing strategic plans o Strong client-service orientation and relationship-building skills. High comfort level working with various types of people in different contexts o Ability to travel up to 25 percent of work days across the country o Keen ability to discern priorities and invest others in our work so to reach our goals Compensation Salary for this position is competitive and depends on prior experience. In addition, a comprehensive benefits package is included.

At the same time, corps members gain the insight and conviction necessary to be lifelong leaders in the pursuit of fundamental change. More than 12,000 Teach For America alumni are providing critical leadership within education and social reform, and they are also marshalling support for change from positions in business, law, medicine, and other sectors.

In October 2005, we launched an ambitious five-year plan to grow to scale, maximize the impact of our corps members and alumni as a force for change, and build an enduring American institution. By 2010, we aim to field a corps of 8,000 members who have a significant impact on the academic achievement of 700,000 of our nation's most disadvantaged students. At that point, we will be among the nation's top employers of top recent college graduates, building an unprecedented pipeline of civic and educational leadership to foster the fundamental reforms needed to realize our vision of educational opportunity for all.

As a member of the Career Management Center team, this individual will lead the Main Campus and the Stuart School of Business in providing students and alumni with training, self-assessment, counseling, alternatives, networking, and placement management in the pursuit of a position with an organization.

Manager will be responsible for management and development of lifecycle recruitment for the campus recruiting program. The Campus Recruiting Manager manages the relationship with internal business units to continue to build the campus program while implementing campus programs that attract top candidates and build a talent pipeline for key business units.

Marketing talent to the organization, as well as participate in national diversity outreach efforts. This position is responsible for managing Nestle's MBA Marketing full-time and internship efforts as well as serving as the primary lead for Nestle's participation at the following national diversity conferences: Consortium for Graduate Studies in Management (CGSM), National Black MBA Association (NBMBAA), and the National Society of Hispanic MBAs (NSHMBA). Duties will also include implementing college recruitment strategy, planning and executing year round recruitment activities and events, participation in diversity outreach events which encompass sourcing for candidates, interviewing, and consulting on final candidates and extending offers.

Academic Council and supervises the deans of the undergraduate school and graduate schools, and has oversight of the library, the Washington, D.C. Campus, enrollment and academic services, and the registrar.

A passion for the mission and vision of the university, including a strong commitment of faith and acquaintance with renewal theology  A keen understanding of a broad range of academic disciplines  Excellent communication and people-management skills  Knowledge and support of non-traditional curriculum development and delivery systems  Successful leadership in budget development and management  One or more terminal degrees and record of scholarly research and publication As a racially and ethnically diverse institution accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools, Regent University welcomes nominations and applications without regard to race, color, age, national origin, or disability.

If you're responsible for your organization's college relations and recruiting program, you should know that, since 1956, the National Association of Colleges and Employers (NACE) has been keeping human resources professionals abreast of the changing standards and trends affecting their work. NACE membership offers publications, services, and professional development options that target employer-related priorities, issues, and concerns.

Eligibility Criteria: Available to an employing organization engaged in human resources, professional staffing, or the recruiting/hiring of college graduates solely for its own work force (or for a subdivision) and maintaining college relations for its own organization. An organization that provides a service or product to college relations/recruiting or career services functions is eligible for affiliate membership.

Distributed annually to more than 1 million job seekers (students, graduates, and alumni). Members receive up to 300 volumes free, and may order additional volumes at a nominal cost. Issued in August.

Available to an individual employed in career services at a school that holds institutional membership at any location worldwide. (Each institutional membership includes two free electronic memberships.) You can look up your institutional membership in the Membership Gallery.

Institutional Membership at the same location.Criteria requires student to be enrolled in at least six (6) credit hours per term, not be employed full time, and be sponsored by a full-time career services staff member.

We encourage you to become active in a regional association as well to provide you with important networking opportunities and assist you with local concerns or needs. More information can be found at http://www.naceweb.org/about/regions.htm.

When you join NACE, you join a community of professionals that will expand your knowledge, improve your on-the-job performance, and increase your value to your organization. To see a list of NACE members, click on the links below.

This form should be used for expressing interest in joining a NACE committee or action team. The form must be completed in a single session. The form will not save your answers until you click the SUBMIT button at the end of the form. Please complete the form by January 31, 2007.

The Information Center is your library, containing practical resources and information on topics specific to your role as a professional. You'll find survey data on subjects including internships/co-ops, MBA hiring, and hiring projections, samples of important forms, and access to a wide range of articles on topics such as technology, career fairs, student expectations, marketing, and recruiting trends. While most of the information here is from NACE's research department, there are links to outside sources of information like government-generated education and employment data.

By keeping up to date with issues, changes in the job market, legal issues, and new workplace technologies, service-type organizations can identify product and service needs for this audience and connect with these professionals at NACE events.

The Online Directory enables you to search for contacts by name, school, or location and to obtain information about their activities, schedules, requirements, and career and job fairs. The Online Directory enables you to update your information so that prospective clients know exactly where to reach you.

Your organization's membership in the National Association of Colleges and Employers (NACE) does not entitle you to use the association's name to endorse your product or service in any of your marketing pieces, customer letters, customer e-mails, or on your web site, or in any other medium, nor should endorsement be implied in any manner.

You've spent a good deal of your lifetime on the job. Over the years, you've enjoyed working with numerous professionals in your region and across the country. There's no need to lose contact just because you've retired! Take advantage of NACE's new retiree categories of membership.

You get just-in-time tools, tips, and tactics in this bi-weekly e-mail newsletter that targets career services as well as staffing/HR interests and needs, zeroes in on issues, trends, facts, and stats, and offers professionals in the field practical, ready-to-use information.

Retired professional membership may be granted to any individual who has retired and is no longer working in the career services or human resources, professional staffing, or recruiting/hiring field and who would not otherwise quality for another membership category.

Established in 1940, the NACE Journal is the nation's only professional magazine that speaks to both sides of the college career services and HR/staffing field. The Journal is filled with current, in-depth information-articles, reports, and features-on what's really happening in the field. A subscription to the Journal is part of the NACE membership benefits package, but independent subscriptions independent are available. All subscriptions automatically include receiving a year's worth of the e-mail newsletter Spotlight Online, which is published biweekly for a total of 24 issues annually. Spotlight Online covers the profession's current hot topics, including current trends, the job market, legal issues, and technology-related products for the field, coming events, and job openings within the profession. The Journal is published four times a year: October, December, March, May. NACE members receive one free subscription covering both publications. Other subscriptions: $72 a year. Foreign subscriptions (except Canada and Mexico): Add $25 for airmail postage, $10 for surface.

These customized reports offer you the opportunity to target the curricula and a group of schools for which you need data. The report combines the latest starting salary offers to students of the colleges and universities you choose, thus providing an average figure for each of your selected specific degree/curricula disciplines. There is no limit to the number of schools you may select; but to preserve the confidentiality of Salary Survey information, you must select a minimum of six schools. Your report will provide the combined averages of the starting salary data from the schools you've selected.

The "remember" option saves you from having to log in to NACEWeb each time you visit the site. As long as you use the same computer each time to access NACEWeb, your Login and password will be automatically entered for you.

Adherence to the guidelines will support the collaborative effort of career planning, placement, and recruitment professionals while reducing the potential for abuses. The guidelines also apply to new technology or third-party recruiting relationships which may be substituted for the traditional personal interaction among career services professionals, employer professionals, and students.

These principles are not all-inclusive; they are intended to serve as a framework within which the career planning, placement, and recruitment processes should function, and as a foundation upon which professionalism can be promoted.

Principles for Professional Conduct Committee was established. The committee, made up of practitioners, will provide advisory opinions to members on the application of the Principles, act as an informational clearinghouse for various ethical issues, periodically review and recommend changes to this document, and resolve problems which may arise.

It is important to keep in mind one final point. The Principles do not address certain professional obligations to support state and regional associations, professional development programs, salary surveys, and other demographic trend surveys. Obligations such as these are recognized as vital to the continuing growth of our profession, but since they do not relate directly to the recruitment process, they are not addressed specifically in this document. However, the National Association of Colleges and Employers Board of Governors strongly encourages career services and employment professionals to support and participate in these activities.

Principles for Career Service Professionals 1. Career services professionals, without imposing personal values or biases, will assist individuals in developing a career plan or making a career decision.

Principles for Employment Professionals 1. Employment professionals will refrain from any practice that improperly influences and affects job acceptances. Such practices may include undue time pressure for acceptance of employment offers and encouragement of revocation of another employment offer. Employment professionals will strive to communicate decisions to candidates within the agreed-upon time frame.

Preface: The NACE Principles provides definitions and guidelines for third parties and contractual/staffing services. It is our hope that career services will use this information to make appropriate decisions about the use of third-party, contractual, and staffing services in their operations, including career fairs. These standards are also designed to provide guidance to third-party recruiters who recruit college graduates through the college recruitment process. These standards are not to be construed as requiring or encouraging, or prohibiting or discouraging, use of third-party recruiters by college or employer professionals.

A NACE member/regional association may request an advisory opinion regarding an interpretation of the Principles document at any time. The advisory opinion will apply to the situation as explained and will not be considered precedent for a subsequent complaint brought to NACE.

The member/association will prepare a written statement detailing the conduct in question. Statements will include the section, or sections, of the Principles to be interpreted relative to the conduct in question.

Membership in NACE today is almost 4,000 organizations, evenly divided between colleges and employers. The resulting interface provides invaluable services and opportunities to members through NACE's publications, web resources, services, professional development workshops, and annual National Meeting.

With NACE custom training, you will gain valuable insights via up-to-date research on motivators for Generation Y; learn high-impact, low-cost recruiting strategies; and discover best practices employed by organizations with successful programs.

Designed for leaders who are committed to continuously building their leadership abilities, this intensive two-day program provides the skills and strategies you need to move beyond your current leadership capabilities.

Tom Peters Company in leadership development. She has more than 20 years of experience in the field of training and development, teaching a variety of topics from technical instrumentation to sales and leadership development. Mikkelsen, a frequent speaker at national conferences, was responsible for the redesign of the Management Leadership Institute.

Eric Schlesinger and Susan MusichSams Teach Yourself e-Job Hunting Today is designed to give you the steps you need to know to begin and complete your job search using the wealth of resources available online. Learn how to use the Internet to identify key questions you should answer before searching for a job, make a decision about your best career option, manage change and transition, evaluate and counter a job offer, and more.2000.6 x 9. 356. $17.99.

I knew I could only attend one conference and wanted the "best of the best." Most valuable to me was having the opportunity as a two-year college career services professional was the networking and learning from individuals from four-year universities.

This program is designed especially for new directors or mid-career professionals with two to seven years of experience in career services. The content is tailored to practitioners without extensive management training. Participants must be committed to learning and are required to complete some assignments prior to the Institute.

NACE Employer Roundtables enable NACE employer members and prospective members involved in college relations/recruiting and staffing to discuss the latest issues and challenges, trade problems and solutions, and build their professional networks.

Working adults, traditional-age students, part-time and full-time students, dorm residents, and commuters: all expect help from the career services office-personalized help that can be accessed at the student's convenience.

The National Association of Colleges and Employers is seeking nominations for the NACE Academy of Fellows. Established in June of 1994, the Academy recognizes individuals who have contributed to the career services and human resources/staffing profession through the advancement of knowledge, leadership, or excellence in professional practice. Induction in the NACE Academy of Fellows is one of the highest honors that can be achieved by a professional in the field. Deadline for nominations for the 2007 award is January 31, 2007.

The Chevron Corporation and the National Association of Colleges and Employers invite college career services practitioners to participate in this annual competition honoring innovative programming in career services.

The Selection Committee will screen all entries and identify those entries it wishes to consider further. If your entry is selected for further consideration, you will will be asked to provide additional information about your program.

Be innovative by demonstrating a significant change or new methodology in programming/service delivery and/or by generating new information that can assist in the improvement or implementation of other institutions services or programs.

The need for such a review was identified from two recent member surveys, one indicating that member recognition was the least important role for the association; the other indicating that the Awards Program was the least valued member benefit.

The individual(s) receiving these awards must be a member(s) of NACE and must have made notable contributions with distinguished achievement to the association or the profession during the previous year.

The Excellence Award of the Vision and Future of NACE was established to recognize NACE members for their foresight and unlimited efforts in the establishment, development, and growth of the National Association of Colleges and Employers.

Any individual may nominate a colleague or support a nomination. Board members are encouraged to recognize committee and task force members who made a significant contribution to the work of their group. Please use the online form.

This award recognizes the programs and innovations that go above and beyond the profession's standards in aiding a student in his or her career development or developing an effective college relations program.

Information Resources for Students recognizes the best information/resources on career development or employment topics. The information/resource must be targeted to and distributed to college students free of charge.

Educational Programming recognizes the best educational programs related to career development or employment and targeted to students or career center/college recruiting staff. The program can be delivered via workshop or self-study (print, video, CD-ROM, or web). Examples of the type of educational programs to submit include new-hire orientation programs, recruiter training programs, career development or job-search workshops, peer career counseling programs, credit and non-credit career classes, internship programs, ambassador programs.

Council, Inc. (CPC) Board of Governors, acknowledges the accomplishments and contributions of Warren E. Kauffman, who served the association for more than 30 years. The recipient of the award is recognized for making a tangible contribution to NACE that significantly improved the association.

To nominate a colleague, write a letter citing the contributions your nominee has made. Please be as detailed as possible. Include the name and contact information for your nominee, as well as your own name and contact information.

Valuing individual diversity means reaching beyond stereotypical views of individuals and using the strengths and different perspectives that each person offers as a result of his or her culture, religion, ethnicity, gender, race, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, and age.

NACE's Board, committees, and task forces will reflect the individual diversity of the profession. Even more important, they will embrace and derive value from the diverse views that each individual brings to a task at hand.

The stated objective of this new association was to promote professional improvement for its members through an interchange of information on common placement problems. The association planned to accomplish this objective through conventions, general meetings, and presentations by speakers who had undertaken specific studies in the field. Thus, the foundations were laid for the current Regional Associations and the National Association of Colleges and Employers.

During the Great Depression of the nineteen-thirties, there was a growing demand (from students and faculty) for vocational guidance. At this time, the original ECPO group was expanded to admit employer recruiters. Elsewhere in the country in the 1930s and throughout most of the 1940s, there was no common ground for employers and placement people who wanted to meet and discuss their mutual problems.

Following World War II, frantic recruiting activity gave tremendous momentum to organized recruitment and placement groups. In December 1947, the Rocky Mountain College Placement Association was formed by 10 educators. The following year, 1948, three major events took place that had a profound impact on the college placement field.

GE invited recruiters from major firms and selected placement officers from various universities to meet at Schenectady, New York, for a discussion of mutual issues pertaining to placement. From those conversations, a code of recruitment ethics was developed. There also was a strong push to encourage the formation of other regional placement associations to connect recruiters and placement directors.

The regional placement associations commonly agreed that each group would remain autonomous and that any proposed national meetings of the total membership would be specifically prohibited. However, as the eight regional placement associations of North America grew in size and complexity, their activities, conference dates, and projects often overlapped, resulting in a duplication of efforts. It became obvious that coordination and communication on a national scale woud require a vehicle not yet in existence.

While the development of the regional placement associations was taking place, an interesting parallel unfolded in the publishing field that would serve as a catalyst in the formation of the College Placement Council, now the National Association of Colleges and Employers.

In 1940, Dr. Clarence E. Clewell, the director of placement at the University of Pennsylvania, helped to establish the Pennsylvania Association of School and College Placement. He also was the editor of the first edition of School and College Placement, the first formal attempt to establish a national communications vehicle among all interested recruiters and placement officials.

Gordon A. Hardwick, a Philadelphia insurance executive, was named president of the Association of School and College Placement in 1941, and for a decade held the association together with his interest, financial support, and office space. When he retired from active management in 1950, the demise of School and College Placement, which many placement people valued, appeared imminent.

Mitchell, placement director at Duke University, and E. Craig Sweeten, director of placement at the University of Pennsylvania. Ms. Mitchell also was named president of the parent, the Association of School and College Placement. During her term of office, the title of the association's publication was changed from School and College Placement to the Journal of College Placement.

The October 1955 issue of the Journal included a report on a meeting of the presidents of the eight regional associations held in Philadelphia in June. The article summarized the discussions which centered upon the advisability of forming a national advisory council. The council would pursue several objectives, including the dissemination of information through the Journal of College Placement. That fall, the proposal was brought before the eight regional associations for action so that a formal structure might be organized to provide the coordination of activities.

During the same year, the regional associations agreed that the safeguards written into the constitution of the proposed council could permit them to endorse and support a national or international coordinating agency.

The executive committee and the administrative boards of the eight regional associations met at Lehigh University in June 1956 to form the College Placement Publications Council with Everett A. Teal, the placement director at Lehigh University, as president, and Mr. Herrick as executive director.

Shortly thereafter, CPC began publishing a national directory of practitioners in the field, and in 1959 began collecting and reporting entry-level salary offers made to college graduates in the CPC Salary Survey. The publishing function of the College Placement Council was thus established at the very outset.

Meeting in 1975. In the 1980s, CPC introduced professional standards for its members, more training and development opportunities, three National Meetings, legal columns in publications, and an awards program to recognize member accomplishments. During this decade, CPC also published a number of benchmark research studies.

In the 1990s, NACE continued to expand its services including roundtables for employers, a one-week management training program for career services, more research studies, and the introduction of JobWeb, the association's Internet web site.

NACE continues today as a national publisher for the profession, but its role and horizons have expanded considerably. Back in 1956, when publishing the Journal was its sole function, the association was staffed by an editor and a secretary. It had an annual budget of $20,000 and a net worth of minus two dollars. Today, a staff of 37 full-time and two part-time employees administers a budget of $6.2 million. While most of the staff is in Bethlehem, there are also employees in Maryland, Illinois, Texas, and Washington.

NACE is one of the charter members of the International Network of Graduate Recruitment and Development Associations (INGRADA), associations from countries world wide, serving professionals engaged in the career development, recruitment, and hiring of college and university graduates.

Additionally, requests to reprint any association materials, in whole or in part, should be submitted in writing to Claudia Allen, editor/web content and production manager, or by using the online form.

Depending on how the materials will be used, NACE typcially grants permission for a limited amount of photocopying and/or reprinting of NACE's copyrighted materials by its members. In some cases, NACE will allow nonmembers to make photocopies of copyrighted materials for a fee. A fee may be charged when materials are reprinted in a book or magazine. However, NACE reserves the right to refuse reprint requests.

All requests must be made in writing using our online form, by e-mail, or by fax to 610/868-0208. Please include your e-mail address so that we can reply to your inquiry. Please allow at least five business days for your request to be processed.

Permission grants are for one-time use only. You must re-request permission to reprint for any additional reprinting/photocopying beyond your original request. This includes making additional photocopies or reprinting an article even if you plan to reprint the same article in the same manner first specified.

In general, NACE grants limited permission for electronic reproduction of its materials to NACE members only, including republishing print or electronic articles online in an internal newsletter or attaching a PDF of an article to an e-mail for dissemination within the NACE member organization.

NACE reserves the right to refuse any requests to reprint NACE materials for any reason. We do not grant reprint permission for reprints used as part of sales, marketing, or promotional brochures or packages. In addition, there may be a charge for use of NACE material. There are restrictions and limits on photocopying and reprinting. Allow at least five business days for your request to be processed.

Directors in January, 2006. This plan outlining the vision for NACE in the future is based on information and perspectives gathered from members in the past year, a careful scan of the environment and the knowledge and insight of the NACE leadership.

This magazine focuses on minority students. Readers include INROADS interns and students from historically black colleges and universities, Hispanic-serving institutions, and tribal schools. This edition is an ideal way for your organization to demonstrate its objectives for a diverse work force.

Highlight your potential career paths for new graduates in accounting, administration, government, hospitality, insurance, public relations, and other nontechnical fields. With the largest circulation in the Job Choices series, this edition is the perfect medium to showcase your organization to a vast audience of college job seekers.

Build your brand among new college graduates with Job Choices No other publication in the field comes close to Job Choices in reach, credibility, and readership. Rated as the #1 best-read recruitment publication among graduating college students,* Job Choices offers you a receptive audience primed for information about your job and career opportunities.

By clicking on your logo or by doing a company name search, students connect with your company profile. Profile content includes your location, industry, benefits, contact information, jobs available and qualifications needed, and a full description of your company.

Your company logo in this spot on the home page draws attention to your company as an employer of choice. Clicking on your logo takes job seekers to an interesting, comprehensive article about working for your company.

NACE mailing lists are an efficient, effective way to target your message to a select audience. And, because you can choose from a variety of options, you can tailor your direct mail efforts to reach just those buyers you want.

Your banner ad on the NACEWeb home page or on one of the NACEWeb select pages puts your products and services in front of your customers daily as they come to the web site to use NACEWeb's professional resources.

Gain added exposure for your organization with a link on one or more NACEWeb selected pages. With just one click, potential customers will find information about your products and services quickly and easily.

Two additional Booth Personnel Registrations with access to the exhibit hall only. Booth personnel receive tickets for the welcome reception, breaks, and lunches served in the exhibit hall. There will be a charge of $200 for each person over the limit of two.

Four additional Booth Personnel Registrations with access to the exhibit hall only. Booth personnel receive tickets for the welcome reception, breaks, and lunches served in the exhibit hall. There will be a charge of $200 for each person over the limit of four.

When Dan Nagy was at Gulf Oil in the early 1980s, the oil industry was in its heyday. Big budgets and aggressive hiring characterized HR functions for these companies, and there were many opportunities for geologists and petroleum engineers.

During the boom, this particular recruit walked into the office where one of Nagy's colleagues was scheduled to interview him. Without introduction, the recruit said, "Let's not waste any time here," as he began spreading sheets of paper with offers from other oil companies on the desk.

"That's not the way we work," Nagy's colleague replied. "From the offers you received from other companies, I can tell you're a good candidate. But I'd like to get to know you before making an offer."

The recruit who 18 months earlier had his choice of offers walked up to their table with a much humbler demeanor. Nagy and his colleague recognized the recruit; however, the recruit didn't recognize them.

Camille Luckenbaugh is NACE's research director and provides NACE members with relevant benchmarking data. She conducts surveys of NACE members and analyzes and reports on experiential education (internships and cooperative education), career development, and recruiting and hiring trends. Luckenbaugh also reports on student opinions through an annual survey of new graduates and alumni.

Andrea Koncz is NACE's employment information manager. She analyzes and reports on employment and job market trends for new college graduates. She also researches starting salary information for NACE's Salary Survey report, and responds to inquiries regarding the national and regional job market for new college graduates, including starting salary information for more than 70 disciplines. She also reports on employers' hiring projections through NACE's annual Job Outlook report, and is available to discuss the recruiting methods employers favor, the skills they seek in college candidates, and the challenges they face in assimilating new hires into the workplace.

NACE is not able to give advice about specific legal issues regarding situations particular to your organizations, nor answer questions from students or alumni. For specific legal advice, please contact your organization's legal counsel.

Parts of NACEWeb are open to NACE members only, providing exclusive access to NACE resources pertaining to the career services and recruitment process. Because of the special nature of this privilege, before proceeding further, you are asked to agree to the following regarding your use of NACEWeb. Once you click the "I Agree" button, you will be agreeing to all of the terms and conditions in this user agreement.

Directory, Salary Survey data, articles, and benchmarking data, unless specifically noted otherwise, are copyrighted materials owned by NACE. NACE has the exclusive rights and privileges in and to the copyright in this material. Use of the information contained on NACEWeb is solely intended for individual and private use. NACE grants you a license to use the material contained on NACEWeb solely for your own, private noncommercial purposes. You agree not to copy, download, frame, rent, lease, distribute, re-distribute, transmit, sell, transfer to magnetic media, or otherwise transfer any or all portions of the material contained on NACEWeb, or otherwise take any action, which would be in violation of NACE's copyright, without the specific written permission of NACE. All other rights are reserved by NACE. Any individual making unauthorized copies or downloading any NACE material will be subject to the penalties as set forth in the federal and state copyright laws. Copyright and trademark infringement is a violation of federal and state law subject to criminal and civil penalties.

NACE Directory to conduct any commercial or noncommercial solicitation for sales of products, merchandise, or services. Your use is for personal professional use only. You agree that searches that you perform cannot be copied, downloaded, framed, rented, leased, distributed, redistributed, transmitted, sold, or transferred to magnetic media.

You also agree not to use the information contained in the Directory data base to conduct any commercial or noncommercial solicitation or sales of products, merchandise, or services. You agree that you will not share your login and password with any other person. You understand that material contained in the Directory data base has been copyrighted. Individuals making unauthorized copies or downloading will be subject to the penalties set forth in the federal and state copyright laws. Copyright infringement is a violation of federal and state law subject to criminal and civil penalties.

Use of the information is voluntary and reliance on it should be taken after an independent review of its accuracy, completeness, timeliness, and applicability to your particular situation. NACE assumes no responsibility for and expressly disclaims all liability for the consequences resulting from the use of or reliance on information contained on NACEWeb.

NACE assumes no responsibility and disclaims any liability for the consequences resulting from the use of such products, services, advertisers, or vendors. The employer information on NACEWeb, including banners or company descriptions does not imply endorsement of the organizations purchasing these services, nor any association with their owners or operators. NACEWeb takes no responsibility whatsoever for the recruiting, hiring, or employment practices of these organizations.

Any links from NACEWeb.org to a third-party web site that is offering products or services to the job seeker for a fee shall not be deemed to be an endoresement, representative, or warranty of that third party.

RetireTalk, NACE2Year) section and any other live chat, forums, bulletin boards, or discussion groups (hereafter referred to as the Communities section) provided on NACEWeb allows you and other NACE members to post information, provide feedback to NACE, and interact in real time. You agree that NACE does not control the information available on the Communities section and that opinions expressed by contributors are not those of NACE. Since fellow professionals drive the Communities section, NACE makes no warranty that the Communities section will meet your requirements, or that it will be uninterrupted, timely, secure, or error free. Nor does NACE make any warranty as to the accuracy or reliability of any information obtained through the Communities section.

NACE may store information you provide as part of the registration process and use of the information to provide aggregate statistical information about members to advertisers, potential advertisers, and content licensors. NACE also may use such information to inform you about other publications, products, and services of NACE, unless you notify NACE that you do not wish to receive this information.

NACE also may deliver additional messages about the service to you by e-mail. As a general policy, NACE does not disclose to third parties any specific personal identifying information about you, such as your name, address, telephone number, or e-mail address.

Otherwise, NACE will not disclose any of your personal identifying information to a third party without first notifying you and giving you an opportunity to elect not to have your personal identifying information disclosed. NACE will fully comply with its Privacy Policy found on NACEWeb's home page. Consult the Privacy Policy if you elect not to have your information disclosed by NACE to a third party.

NACE asked college career services practitioners to share information on successful programs/processes they have that serve their campus communities or the employers who recruit at their schools. NACE members can read the full text of these best practices articles on NACEWeb.

In an effort to increase awareness of career services and to help today's millennial student better understand career options, Belmont University developed a program that assists students in their career exploration.

Career services staff at the Nashville school researched the trends, values, attitudes, and behaviors of the millennial generation. They observed the changes in new students and how this generation is different from previous generations.

"Students today are multi-taskers," she says. "If you look at their computer screens, there are 12 different windows open, they're instant messaging a friend, sending an e-mail, and doing their homework.

At the University of Virginia, Elly Tucker, assistant director of career resources in university career services (UCS), is working to transfer alumni data bases, directories, job posting subscriptions, and various handouts from paper to digital formats. Conversion of files presents career librarians with challenges.

The workshop, held during summer orientation, is designed to help parents explore ways to start career conversations with their sons or daughters, and simultaneously recognize the importance of targeted conversations.

This theme has been effective in that the conversation starters are organized around key career-planning concepts and not by progressions through the class years, an innovation that has elicited positive feedback from parents.

Smith Career Center at Bradley University held a mini job-seeking conference in September 2006 that provided freshman through graduate students with critical career exploration and job-search information. It also served as a primer one week before the largest career fair on campus.

The conference was in response to having less than satisfactory student attendance at workshops the previous year. After meeting to address this issue, the staff decided to package workshops into one main event they called "The Big Event."

"The Big Event" was marketed to appeal to the student who might not have time to devote four hours to the program. Career center staff encouraged students to "come for the keynote and stay for the entire event, or come and go as your schedule allows."

Thanks to the combined efforts of career services, communications, and computer services staff members at Ball State University, students can now embark on an online "Quest" to help match majors, classes, and careers to students' interests.

The Quest program guides students through a series of questions about their interests, and using programming that is based on BSU's academic offerings and the Occupational Outlook Handbook, offers students a list of activities and related careers to help them identify a potential academic course at BSU along with a future career path.

"Generally, our goal is for our students to be thinking intentionally about their gifts, talents, skills, and abilities and how to connect them with academic, vocational, and experiential opportunities," explains Robert Rostoni, director of career development.

Titled "A Faculty Roundtable: Exploring Majors in Math and Science," the event attracted more than 65 students looking to find out what to do with their math or science degrees. The success of this event, and requests from other academic departments, will lead to future roundtables in the Fall semester.

Career services and the student leadership and activities department at Ferris State University in Big Rapids, Michigan merged two separate conferences into one event in order to pool human and financial resources, result in greater efficiency, reduce costs, increase attendance, and offer a more comprehensive program. The new conference includes as many as four motivational keynote speakers and 15 breakout sessions on leadership and career success topics. By all accounts, the conference has been successful.

After employer surveys told Old Dominion University's career management center staff that students don't attend career fairs properly attired, the school created a campaign called "Don't Be a Job Fair Dummy."

The program, which ran a month before the March 2006 career fair, had the support from local merchants, who provided well dressed mannequins, and employers, such as an image coach sponsored by Target Company.

The results? The majority of students came to the career fair properly dressed, hundreds came to the student registration booth to compare themselves to the dummies, and employers were well pleased with the students and the campaign's success.

While Rutgers University was swept up in alumnus Randal Pinkett's quest to be "hired" on NBC's "The Apprentice," the school's career services department launched a reality-based web series that followed five Rutgers' juniors as they searched for summer internships.

"The Intern" chronicled the students' experiences on the career services web site through every phase of their internship search. The goal was for other students to emulate the strategies showcased on "The Intern" and land their own internships.

During the summer of 2005, the career services department at the University of Massachusetts in Lowell met with the dean of students and the residence life staff to discuss having each resident adviser (RA) and student assistant residence director (ARD) attend an individual meeting with a career counselor during the fall semester.

The career services office at Davidson College in North Carolina is working to assess student-learning outcomes and apply the results to the programming and services it offers. To accomplish this, a 26-question survey was developed that is based on Taylor and Betz's Career Decision-Making Self-Efficacy Scale.

The goal was to determine whether using career services over time was positively related to self-efficacy. Data has shown that overall service utilization is not related to self-efficacy, but that internships, individual appointments, and workshops are.

Knowing where WMU students gain employment is important, but the Career and Student Employment Services department (CSES) wanted to be held accountable for facilitating learning and personal development, not "placing" students.

To begin the process of developing the framework that became its new strategic assessment plan, CSES identified what it would be held accountable for based on what it wanted the students to learn, be able to do, and experience within the framework of the career development model.

The center uses low tech methods such as a sign in sheet whose information is entered into an Access data base to show faculty, administrators, potential students and parents how they are helping students.

The center also gauges satisfaction and solicits recommendations for future actions from participating students. The career center also maintains a first destination data base of graduates. An early start and repeated follow up surveys, e-mail and phone calls result in a 97 to 99 percent response rate to the center post-graduate survey.

Each student is assigned an ID and a university e-mail account. The system allows career services staff to login a student contact by either ID or e-mail. Once logged in, staff can track individual appointments, student attendance at presentations, workshops, and events, and use of any other service. Staff can also track general e-mail inquiries and even track on-campus media interviews and articles in student papers.

Offering services which are organized around academic departments, and cataloging job openinings and new students in the same fashion, center has been able to produce monthly reports showing statistics related to each academic department.

"The idea was good, but despite a strong marketing effort, we didn't attract as many students as we had hoped," says Toi Tyson, an assistant director of career services. "The students who attended loved it, but something was missing, and we realized what we needed: high-profile employers."

The series included eight, two-hour events, each focused on a specific career field. After a brief presentation on networking, a panel of professionals offered their perspectives on effective networking. Students then put what they learned into practice by networking with the panelists during a hors d'oeuvre and ''mocktail'' reception.

At a luncheon which included alumni, guests, student clubs, and individual students, the career center staff arranged seating to match alumni with student clubs where possible. Alumni spoke about their careers and how networking has helped them. All participants recived a handout with networking tips and a complementary business card case.

To help counselors at North Carolina State's career center meet and connect with on-campus recruiters, the career center built in a 15-minute morning break into its interview schedules. Recruiters are invited for refreshments and to meet the center's counselors.

Keuka College in Keuka, New York, has embraced experiential learning by adding to the school's curriculum. Requiring that tudents complete a minimum 140 yours of field experience, Keuka ensures that its students have what it takes to go from the classroom to real life.

The school's Center for Experiential Learning (CEL) houses six separate programs which promote experiential learning, and provides one-stop shopping for employers, alumni, community members, and students.

"We hope more families will read the information, become more educated in talking with their student on career-related matters, and advise their students to use our services," says career counselor Jodi Schneiderman.

Getting First- and Second-Year Students Involved in Career Services Reaching first- and second-year students is a challenge for most career centers. How do you get these students involved in the job-search process?

The Career Services office recruits volunteers through the campus newspaper, the center web site, and through word-of-mouth. Staff members interview students interesting in participating on the task force to find out their interest in participating. Of particular interest are marketing and communications majors, who benefit from participating by adding career related activities to their resumes.

The task force of 15 student volunteers works with career services staff on a variety of projects, randing from distributing flyers and working promotional tables to planning a marketing blitz for a new mock interview service and conducting a campus-wide marketing survey.

Stanford University's career center offers food, games, prizes, and a raffle to students attending their "Frosh Open House" in an evening event developed in 2003 to attract students early in their academic career. Students are also introduced to career information along with the other services offered by the career development center.

When the office of career services at the University at Buffalo (UB) began its strategic planning process in 2000, one of the goals was to increase the number of students using the career services office.

The success and populary of the program has prompted Millikin to continue the practice into the Fall semester, when the new kit will also include leather business card holders with the Millikin University logo.

Through this program, students establish a community leadership mentoring relationship, cultivate community leadership skills, build career-networking opportunities, and learn more about 'service above self.' It also serves as an extension of the career services mission to connect students with the real world of work.

The P.L.A.N.(Promoting, Learning, and Networking) program combines mentoring, job shadoing, and alumni networking to create a unique experience that benefits the 500 student and professional representatives that participate each year.

A student-run initiative, the P.L.A.N. committee reviews student applications and uses career center and alumni contacts to identify potential hosts or mentors. Following several development workshops, students meet with mentors for a dinner, then schedule a "job shadow day" with their mentor.

Of the more than one million students who enter four-year colleges and universities each year, fewer than 40 percent will earn their degree in four years, and slightly fewer than 60 percent will do so in six years, according to a 2002 report issued by the National Center for Education Statistics.

"I see us as the final phase of the initial handshake we make with students and parents," Gaw says. "We make a deal with them, although it's not explicit, that when a student gets an education from an institution, we're there to help them get into graduate school, professional school, or a work position.

If your college career center is relying on employers only to do the same old resume writing, dress for success, or interviewing workshops, your students are missing out, says Marcia Robinson, associate director of corporate relations in the Center for Student Professional Development (CSPD) at Temple University's Fox School of Business and Management.

"Many career center staff members have a lot of experience working in career centers and do a great job keeping up with what is happening in their own professions, but not necessarily what is happening in the industries they are advising their students about," Robinson explains.

"'Efficient' and 'effective,' or more clearly stated, becoming more efficient and effective in design, development, and delivery of services," according to Jeff Nardo, career services coordinator at Coastal Carolina Community College.

Volunteers and alumni are enlisted to help this small career center give a big impression across campus. With help, two full time staff members are able to offer up to 50 career-related programs a year.

Enlisting student workers, staff at Viterboro held a beanbag toss to market upcoming events. Passing students all had a chance to "toss it in" and a drawing was held from the students who got the beanbag in one of the holes.

Working closely with faculty has helped this two-person career center find a place on campus. Career counselors help out by holding career-related presentations when a class would otherwise be canceled.

To teach students professional behavior in social settings, the career center at Tennessee Technological University (TTU) has gone mobile. The center's "Etiquette on Wheels" program is an innovative student workshop designed to bring basic etiquette training into the classroom.

TTU career services uses 'on-wheels' in the title because dishes, drinks and ice, and chips and dip, are brought into the classroom in a rolling cooler. The program provides student interaction with demonstrations such as double-dipping and cold, wet handshakes.

Students at the University of St. Thomas in St. Paul, Minnesota, are required to attend an orientation session before they can apply for on-campus interviews. One issue with this requirement is that many students' schedules don't permit them to attend a session because of academic, job, or other commitments.

To overcome the dilemma, the Career Development Center reworked the information it offers during its standard orientation session into a quiz that can be taken online. The offering has been effective. Of all students fulfilling the orientation requirement, 40 percent do so online and get interviews at almost the same rate as those who attend live sessions.

Employer feedback to Lakeshore Technical College's student employment office told them that students technical skills were exception, but their "soft skills" needed some work. To address this, the "Job Seekers' Boot Camp" was developed.

Staff encouraged students to use their 30-45 second commercial to describe their interests, values, personalities, and skills. Employers were asked to speak about thw works of work in addition to their industry and job function.

The career center doesn't only require that students be involved in at least one professional association, they'll pay the bill as well. The networking opportunities, opportunities to develop professional speaking, and potential to build long-term relationships and contacts are only a few reason why student participation is required.

Aspinwall says. "Students actively involved can learn about trends in the industry, relate this to their current classwork, and/or apply it in their internship or future job. This is very attractive to employers."

Professional Development Institute (PDI) in an effort to address three core needs: consistency in program development, a way to help student develop skills necessary to provide leadership for their own career planning, and ways to collect important data for assessment of student learning.

Participation is open to all University of Arkansas students, although it requires a true commitment to training, development, and individual career coaching. The program includes assistance with resumes, cover letters, interviews and etiquette, core training seminars, personal branding, co-curricular "credits" earned through an experiential education program, the assignment of an individual carer coach, and other programs to help U of A students develop the professional edge that they will need in the competitive job market.

East Carolina University's career center enlisted the local Kiwanis Club to help expand their mock interview offerings. The H.I.R.E.D. (Helping Individuals Reach Employment Destinations) program was developed, using the help of retired professionals to conduct mock interviews with students.

Setting up mock interviews with real companies and job titles has helped make the process more meaningful. The experience of interviewing with seasoned professionals, have helped students prepare for their real interviews.

Sixty-five students received a short review of interview tips and were then matched with volunteer employers who held 10-minute interviews followed by feedback from the employer and the student's peers.

To receive the transcript notation, students must complete a learning agreement plan, work a minimum of 240 hours within their field of study, be evaluated, evaluate their experience, be visited at their work site, and make a "presentation" about their experience.

Presentations which used to be made to faculty members are now made to new students enrolled in Juniata's (required) orientation course. Interns get to sharpen their presentation skills, and new students have the opportunity to get a fresh perspective of their fields from fellow students.

They researched web sites for tutorials, but didn't find any that addressed creating resumes for entry-level professional applicants. The department worked with LSU Computing Services for more than a year to develop the online, step-by-step tutorial and resume builder. While some student balked at a "cookie-cutter approach" to resume writing, the career services staff showed users how to be creative with the resume template and how it's beneficial for them to use it.

NACE asked college career services practitioners at schools that participate in the Salary Survey to identify employers who they felt best performed certain aspects of the recruiting process. The following companies were named. NACE members can read the full text of these best practices articles on NACEWeb. If you're not a member, but would like to read these and other important articles on NACEWeb, click here.

Blogging, the latest Internet phenomenon, can be an effective recruitment tool for employers. There are over 3,500 employee blogs online at Microsoft, and according to Gretchen Ledgard, marketing manager of staffing, these blogs assist recruiting efforts by putting a human face on the company, conveying a passion for Microsoft, and empowering employees.

Developing these presentations is labor-intensive, as NVR tries to tie in all aspects of the presentation to the company's corporate employment brand. Providing anecdotal stories reinforces the corporate brand and provides professional development to students.

For Plasticpak Packaging of Garland, Texas, branding of its manufacturing facility to college students is as important as the branding done for the products the the plastics manufacturer produces bottles for: Dr. Pepper, Pepsi, and Gatorade.

United Technologies Corporation (UTC) hired its first INROADS intern in 1984. This initial focus on diversity representation and the relationship with INROADS brought a new focus on promoting education within the company which led to the creation of employee scholar program, providing tuition and textbood costs, time off during the week to study, and stock awards to employees graduating through the program.

Through their employees, UTC came to recognize the value of being involved with professional organizations as a development tool for their current employees, as an aid in recruitment of new employees, and to assist in the retention of their new recruits. Close relationships with professional organizations such as INROADS, the National Society of Black Engineers, the Society of Hispanic Professional Engineers, the Society of Women Engineers, the National Society of Hispanic M.B.A.s, and the Natonal Black M.B.A.

Programs such as STARS and the Logan Associates Program provide a means for the company to hire qualified diverse entry-level employees, and allows interns and new hires to work in all business units across Time Warner, which includes Time, Inc.

She then explains that L-3 wants to bring the co-op back either full-time after graduation or to take another assignment, and asks the employees to keep in touch with the student throughout the academic year.

Sales and management internships at Mattress Firm allow students to gain real-world sales and management experience while working in a professional business environment. Interns develop skills in direct consumer sales, internal and external marketing strategies, advertising strategies, vendor relations, merchandising, customer service, basic accounting, and business management.

Interns are rewarded in a few different ways. They are paid a base salary bi-monthly and then have the opportunity to earn commission based on their performance on the sales floor. Housing is provided for out-of-state interns.

The company has found that "Intern of the Year" students serve as an incredible resource in its recruiting efforts in the year following their award, and have been responsible for recruiting and referring new students for both intern and full-time positions.

At the conclusion of the internships, Weyerhaeuser interns give a short presentation about the key things they learned to an audience of the company's IT senior leaders, IT managers, team members, mentors, supervisors, and former interns. Visitors from colleges and universities often attend the intern presentations, as well.

Presentations don't just focus on the interns' work assignments, but on the value they got out of the internship and what they learned through their experiences. The interns often have some very inspirational things to share, and visitors from the colleges and universities give very positive feedback about seeing what a tremendous experience the interns have at Weyerhaeuser.

A great deal of effort is spent in the universities on training and getting to know engineers before hiring for full-time work. In addition, recruiter training is a foundation for achieving and maintaining a high retention rate for CRMD.

Becton Dickinson, a manufacturer of medical and diagnostic healthcare products and instruments, invests a lot of time and resources in its internship program, with a goal toward converting its interns to full-time hires.

In the past the program wasn't as efficient because hiring managers didn't formally indicate intern-hiring needs. Now, if hiring managers request interns, they must have the head count budgeted for their department.

KCI, a San Antonio-based corporation that develops and markets therapeutic systems, has developed a ten week summer internship program with a unique 4+1 format that blends hands-on experience with professional development.

Spending four days of the work week in their assigned department and one day in professional development sessions allows KCI's interns to experience the real work environment while enhancing and developing their communication and problem-solving skills in a structured format.

Lyondell Chemical, a manufacturer of chemicals and polymers, has a seventy-five percent retention rate for new hires after five years of service. And the chances are excellent that those new hires actually started through a co-op or internship program. Last year, Lyondell met all of the company's full time entry-level hiring needs through their experiential ed programs.

General Growth Properties (GGP), a Chicago-based real estate investment trust that is the country's second-largest shopping center owner, provides internships in the shopping center management industry.

City, markets its internship program to 17 colleges and universities and hires between 100 and 150 interns each year. Tom Moore, regional recruiting manager, notes that the acceptance rate of full-time offers by interns in the midwest region last year was 100 percent. How did the region achieve a perfect conversion rate?

Nationwide, an insurance and financial services company headquartered in Columbus, Ohio, offers internships to between 100 and 250 college students each year. Most of Nationwide's internships are offered during the summer and last from 10 to 12 weeks. It also offers some part-time internships for local students available throughout the school year.

Make the co-op a meaningful work experience It is offered each year to approximately 48 qualified students in the fields of science, engineering, professional administration, and other occupational fields.

Training sessions also provide information about the campuses the individual managers will visit, so they know where they will go on campus and the career services practitioners, faculty, and administration they will meet.

Students use Insurance 101 to gain insights into the industry and to prepare for the interview process, and career center advisers use it to gain additional knowledge of the insurance industry so that they can better advise students as they begin the career planning process.

Stockamp & Associates, a small, privately held healthcare firm with nearly 400 employees, believes the high-touch approach to college recruiting is critical to success, particularly in a competitive job market.

The company benefits from this approach in terms of consistent offer/acceptance rates ranging from 72- to 76-percent, increased branding on targeted campuses, a significant drop in first-year attrition of new hires, and improvement in campus career center relationships.

To keep abreast of candidate wants and desires Stockamp collects feedback from incoming hires annually. In addition to that feedback, recruiting team members review industry periodicals and best practices. Finally, a number of campus career centers provide invaluable feedback, especially on the nuances of their respective student populations.

A vice president of Texas-based Advanced Micro Devices (AMD) recognized the importance of having company executives actively involved in the recruitment process. The vice president developed a model which led to the formation of the Technical Education Committee (TEC).

The TEC is a collaboration of AMD's university relations staff and a group of executives from various engineering groups throughout the technology development group. The committee selects target schools and distributes monies to schools.

This unique partnership between company executives and university relations is "key to successfully administring the decided actions of the TEC," according to Kristin Paulson, university relations manager for AMD.

Because they have not streamlined their process to remove any variability that causes inefficiency and can ultimately increase operating expenses, according to Kasey Arceri, Raytheon's university programs manager.

After assessment of its current state, Raytheon decided to create an in-house data base called "Rayevents." The business units wanted a tool to assist them in managing their events and one that could grow to meet their future needs.

Strategies that evolved to meet the challenges of the program include the addition of staff recruiters who can speak at college career events about the opportunities in all of T-Mobile's business units, on-campus interviewing the day after a career fair to more quickly recruit students of interest, and methods to demonstrate the value of the college recruiting program through the data they capture.

Department goals are directly aligned to Washington Mutual's business goals. To measure the success of the department and individual recruiter performance, metrics are captured that directly support the company's business goals.

Washington Mutual uses HR systems and tools to measure every step of the recruiting process. The company tracks individual hiring statistics by school, business line, function, and recruiting strategy. Candidate information, such as degree(s), skills, and years of experience, also are tracked. This information helps create a successful candidate profile for each program.

The qualities sought by EchoStar's recruiters are energy, intelligence, and a need for achievement. The company's recruiting program succeeds by networking with career centers and faculty, and by taking a different approach at career fairs.

The focus group helps the company determine how to provide the most effective and valuable giveaways, reviews the company web site from a students perspective, and offers other suggestions to help make G&O a preferred employer by new college graduates.

NBC's early identification (EID) programs offer a variety of entry-level opportunities for college graduates who want to get their "foot-in-the-door" in the media industry. Each program allows associates to learn more about their field of interest in an environment that provides training and mentoring.

Ultimately, the EID programs create a pipeline of talent into various departments and positions within the company. Approximately 70 percent of the EID program associates are hired into staff or freelance positions.

New college hires quickly associate with one another and have a better understanding of Harris's business activity. Participants connect through e-mails and web site information. In addition these employees participate in a variety of events such as organized league sports, holiday parties, bus trips, and community involvement projects.

Kicked off at a three-day weekend event at the corporate headquarters, the program spans a new employee's entire first year. The success of the program shows in the company' now 80 percent retention rate.

Consolidated Graphics, a national commercial printing company headquartered in Houston, looked at the turnover among its entry-level hires within the first few months of employment and decided to formally address it.

Vanguard, an investment management company located in Valley Forge, Pennsylvania, has used rotational programs since 2001 to help new hires gain a broad understanding of the organization and its goals.

One is a rotational program for college graduates with less than two years experience. Rotations last three to six months and are across all departments, with 85 percent taking place in engineering/manufacturing.

In addition to being able to identify top talent, other benefits of the programs include significantly low attrition rates, comments from senior management about the success and importance of the programs, and recognition of the programs on campus.

"We find that the people who go through the First Career Program have a better overall understanding of our business and how PacifiCorp's units fit together," says Nicole D'Onofrio, a PacifiCorp HR consultant.

The purpose of the NACE Communities is to encourage discussion within specific interest areas, with the goal of keeping online discussions targeted to the needs and interests of the subscribers. There are five Community groups to choose among. NACE Communities are open to all staff members at NACE member offices. You must register for each Community you wish to join.

The online interface allows you to read messages online, search the archived messages, send a message, or change your subscription data. Choose the group you want to enter by clicking on the name of the community link under "Enter the Communities" in the upper right-hand corner of this page.

Search: To search the archives, click on "search" in the navigation bar at the top of the page. Use keyword(s) to search the archives. An advanced search is also available for narrowing your search results.

Digest (one message each day contains all the messages sent to the group that day); or Mime (individual messages as they are sent to the community in MIME format); or Index (a list of subject lines from messages sent to the community).

The advanced tab will allow you to change the password on any or all subscriptions. Type in the password you want to use. Use the drop-down arrow next to "apply changes" at the bottom of the box to choose whether you want to apply changes to your data to just one community or to all communities using the same e-mail address and password.

Communities. Plain text messages are required. If you send a message that is written in "Rich Text Format," it will be rejected. Instructions on how to change your settings just for this address will be sent with the rejected message.

Salary Survey. When you need data by specific job location or by group of schools, choose a Salary Survey customized report to deliver special cuts of salary data by specific job location and/or group of schools.

Location Report: Target among the 50 most active employment centers in the nation. The report will provide localized salary data based on job location, not on that of the graduating institution. You may select the specific degree and disciplines in which you are interested.

Key School Report: These customized reports offer you the opportunity to target the curricula and a group of schools for which you need data. The report combines the latest starting salary offers to students of the colleges and universities you choose, thus providing an average figure for each of your selected disciplines. There is no limit to the number of schools you select; but to preserve confidentiality of Salary Survey information, you must select a minimum of six schools. Your report will provide the combined averages of the starting salary data from the schools you've selected. Available to NACE members and Salary Survey subscribers only.

Increased participation means better and more complete salary information in NACE's Salary Survey: Become a participant and reap the benefits as you help strengthen national data and create additional options for special cuts of salary information, including key school cuts (aggregates data among six or more schools), cuts by region, and cuts by metropolitan location. You'll benefit yourself as well as the profession.

NACE's Salary Survey tracks discipline, job function, and employer type, so you'll have access to meaningful information and will have real measures to share with your students, faculty, and administrators. In addition, you will collect and track internal data that will greatly enhance your operations. You will be seen as the source of information about the college job market for the people you serve. You'll also be part of an exclusive group that is recognized and cited by the national media.

Participation is easy: NACE offers a variety of reporting methods, including an online form as well as data bases (yours, or one NACE provides you), or paper forms. Choose the method that suits you best.

NOTICE: Information contained in the NACE Salary Survey is copyrighted and owned by the National Association of Colleges and Employers. It is provided to NACE members for personal professional use only. Results of any searches you perform cannot be copied, downloaded, framed, rented, leased, distributed, re-distributed, transmitted, sold, or transferred to magnetic media. You may not use the information contained in the online Salary Survey to conduct any commercial solicitation for sales of products, merchandise, or services. Any individual making unauthorized copies or downloading any NACE Salary Survey material will be subject to the penalties as set forth in the federal and state copyright laws.

Employer's Guide to College Recruiting and Hiring is an 18-chapter resource featuring current research and results-oriented approaches to attracting top college candidates. The Employer's Guide gives you all the basics (how to select target schools, establish contacts on campus, make offers, and more) and gives you the insight and information you need to develop and revitalize your college relations program. Find out how to position your organization as an employer of choice; learn how to invigorate your diversity recruitment efforts; and build a solid business case for your program. The Employer's Guide, by seasoned professional Julie Cunningham, includes a CD-ROM containing 20 sample letters, forms, checklists, agendas, and more that you can adapt and use for your organization. 2003.

Get the information you need to build a top-quality internship program. Written by seasoned college recruiting professional Julie Cunningham, Building a Premier Internship Program gives you all the basics-program design, implementation, documentation, metrics, and more-and offers the practical guidance you need to build a business case for your internship program and demonstrate its use to the organization; design a recruitment-focused program that feeds your college recruiting program efficiently and effectively; and create effective orientation programs for interns as well as their supervisors and mentors. Internship programs are the most effective method of recruiting new college graduates-get the information, tools, and advice you need to ensure your program works for you! The book also features 18 sample forms, surveys, schedules, and other documents that you can adapt for your program.

The Career Decision Pyramid makes it easy for you to help students identify just where they are in their career decision-making process and provide them with "next steps."The Career Decision Pyramid is a three-dimensional, easy-to-use career development tool that you can use with students at any point in the career decision-making process: from extremely undecided to having nearly nailed down a decision.The 3-D Pyramid enables your students to quickly "see" where they are and what they need to do: Side one presents five levels of career clarity (completely undecided to nearly decided); side two identifies five major ways to acquire needed career information to help formulate a decision; and side three identifies generic programs and services offered by career centers for each level of career clarity.Along with the Pyramid, you get an Advisers Guide that details how to use the tool and guidance on developing materials that customize the Pyramids guidance to your career center, plus a CD that includes sample materials that you can adapt and use. The Career Decision Pyramid Kit includes: 3 Pyramids (approx. 10 inches high); Advisers Guide; CD of sample materials.2005.Members: $74.95. NonMembers: $99.95.

This 20-page booklet clearly defines those areas of preemployment inquiry that employers should avoid asking on job application forms, or during the pre-hire interview process. Career services can use this legal resource as a handy reference when students ask what an employer may or may not ask during the recruitment process. Included in the booklet is a sample of a suggested application for employment, a voluntary self-identification report, and a summary outline of undesirable/recommended inquiries.1997.21 pages. Members: $5.00. NonMembers: $7.50.

Organizations concerned about maintaining a diverse work force are investing more resources in recruiting and retaining diverse workers. The labor force is becoming increasingly diverse, and universities continue to produce a diverse population of graduates. Research suggests that minority employees may face unique challenges in the workplace, such as greater interpersonal conflict and harassment, less supportive co-workers or supervisors, additional performance pressures, and/or heightened perceptions of blocked career paths. These stressful and challenging work conditions may be intensified among young entrants into the work force. As their expectations of the job are not met, they become more likely to turnover.Organizations may therefore realize a loss of unique knowledge, experiences, and perspectives to pilot organizations into the future.Note: Full results of research supported by a grant from the NACE Foundation. By David G. Allen, Ashley Kilburn, and Brandon Kilburn2005.40. PDF Format. Members: $39.95. NonMembers: $69.95.

The NACE Principles for Professional Conduct document is intended to serve as a framework within which the career planning, placement, and recruitment processes should function, and as a foundation upon which professionalism can be promoted. The NACE Principles for Professional Conduct Committee reviews the document annually.

Since 1995, NACE has used its web site to offer timely information on the college employment market, connect members to important statistics and data, and help practitioners establish important professional networks. Because of this, NACEWeb is the Internet's most trusted source of professional information for the career services and human resources professions. NACEWeb was designed to meet NACE member demands. Many web site features are based on requests noted in a survey of member needs.

If you have comments or suggestions for making NACEWeb easier to use or a better tool for NACE members, or if you'd like to suggest information we should add to the web site, please use the form below.

The Journal covers the entire scope of career planning, placement, recruitment, and employment of college-educated persons. As a consequence, we seek a wide range of article topics. Some examples: Results from new techniques or innovative practices and programs developed by career services or recruitment offices; current professional issues; the significance of national or global trends that affect the field; research reports or statistical analyses of unusual significance, dwelling upon implications for the profession; examples of solutions to current problems in career services or recruiting.

Writing can be a time-consuming undertaking, so before you write a manuscript for submission to the Journal, we recommend that you first discuss your idea with one of the editors. In addition, we ask that you submit an outline or brief summary. Both steps will prevent you from spending your time on topics that we can't use and allow us to offer you direction and advice on how to approach and develop the topic to ensure it meets our audience's needs and interests.

The Journal does not reprint articles from other publications except under unusual circumstances. Nor do we normally review manuscripts that are being considered for publication elsewhere, or that are based on information that is planned for public release prior to its possible appearance in the Journal.

We prefer articles be written in an engaging, narrative style rather the in the dry, formal style of a thesis. Avoid footnotes. We encourage the referencing of data with superscript numbers in the text and a listing of these sources at the end of the article as Endnotes.

Limit any descriptions of methodology to as few paragraphs as possible; our readers are generally not so much interested in how you conducted the survey or study as they are in what you found and its possible implications.

For example, some articles relating how the author(s) solved a problem or implemented a new program could run about 1,500 words and should be in the form of 1) this was the problem, 2) these are the steps we took to solve it, and 3) this is how it all turned out. Other shorter features or commentaries could also run about 1,500 words.

Since we publish only four issues of the Journal during the academic year (in October, December, March, and May, with respective copy deadlines of August 1, October 1, December 1, and February 1), there is often a time lag of months between acceptance and publication of a manuscript.

All authors are asked to sign a release form in which they attest that the manuscript has not been published elsewhere, that the National Association of Colleges and Employers owns the copyright for the article, and that reprint privileges and assignments reside with the Journal.

Colleges and Employers, the Journal, like most educational publications, does not offer compensation to its authors. Authors are sent two complimentary copies of the issues in which their articles appear; additional copies may be purchased from NACE.

Faculty Referrals Workshop package. This workshop, contained on a CD, will help you understand some of the minefields so you can show faculty, administrators, and your career center staff how to maneuver safely through them while still providing meaningful opportunities for your students-a career network and additional resources where they can access employment opportunities.

As we move forward with this iteration, increasing participation and ensuring that data are accurate and reliable will be essential. Many of our community college member have indicated their interest in collecting and submitting data (or strengthening their current processes), but have told us that they're not sure how to proceed. As a result of these conversations, NACE has compiled information that we hope will help with the process (see Tools You Can Use).

Salary Survey for Associate Degree Candidates. You'll have access to reliable information and will have salary data to share with your students, faculty, administrators, and employers. In addition, as a participant, you will collect and track internal data that will greatly enhance your operations. You will be seen as the source of information about the college job market for the people you serve.

Outlines methods being used by two-year colleges to gather salary data from associate degree candidates, suggestions on how to start the data collection process, and requirements for Salary Survey participation.

Increasingly, college career centers are called upon to report student outcomes, so reporting job offers to your target schools is one of the best ways you can strengthen your relationship with those schools.

Some employers and school officials cite legal concerns as their reason for not releasing salary information about new hires. Please be assured that Salary Survey is published in accordance with federal and state privacy and antitrust laws. Salary Survey meets all the conditions set forth by the U.S. Department of Justice and the Federal Trade Commission that apply to compensation surveys.

Catch up on diversity initiatives, legal issues in internships, the latest Job Outlook forecast, benchmarks in experiential education, and much more. We've archived materials from the virtual education sessions.

NACE will accept returns on all products except for audio and video material and materials downloaded in PDF format. Audiocassettes, CD-ROMs, and videos sales are final unless product is defective. Prepayment is required. Returns for other resources that are postmarked within 30 days from shipping date are accepted for a full refund; returns postmarked 31 to 60 days from the shipping date will incur a 50 percent restocking fee. No refund available 61 days after invoice date.

NACE is the leading source of information about the employment of college graduates: Throughout the year, the association surveys on data relevant to the employment of new college graduates and publishes related reports, including a quarterly report on starting salary offers and periodic forecasts for the college job market. In addition, NACE publishes a wide variety of professional resources to assist its members in their roles and is the publisher of the Job Choices magazine series, the premier recruitment publication for the college market.

There is no single average salary for all college graduates. NACE can provide you with average salaries by specific discipline, e.g., electrical engineering, and can also provide you with average salaries by broad category, e.g., all engineering majors.

By sector, service employers project the biggest increase in college hiring: They expect to hire 19.8 percent more new college graduates in 2006-07. Manufacturers, as a group, are also positive about hiring, predicting an overall increase of 9.5 percent in their college hiring. Government/nonprofit employers plan to hire 9 percent more new college graduates.

Employers in the West expect to increase hiring by 23 percent, and those in the Northeast project an increase of 16.9 percent. Employers in the Midwest expect to increase college hiring by 10 percent.

NACE members serve the association by participating on committees and teams and task forces. You'll find links to their action statements, white papers, and projects on their web pages and under Committee Resources in the Publications section of NACEWeb. You can also read the charges for each committee.

Two Booth Personnel Registrations with access to the exhibit hall only. Booth personnel receive tickets for the welcome reception, three breaks, and two lunches served in the exhibit hall. There will be a charge of $200 for each person over the limit of two. A full conference upgrade may be purchased for $400.

If you're even thinking about exhibiting at the 2007 NACE National Meeting, you'll want to get your reservation in early! The 2006 Exhibition Hall, holding 68 exhibitors, sold out four months before the conference. Space will go even faster for this special conference. Reserve your place now and get a choice of location at the early-bird price.

This magazine includes information that is vital to a successful job-search, plus articles focusing on diversity in the workplace, including how to find a mentor, communicate in the culturally diverse work environment, adapt to corporate culture, and more. This magazine also contains information from employers offering career opportunities to new college graduates.

Get the information you need to ensure the success of your diversity recruiting efforts. This outstanding guide gives you practical, what-to, how-to, why-to guidance to help you achieve your goals for a diverse work force.

Gain insight into how changes in the economy, demographics, and work-related forced affect the salaries of graduating college students. This study compares salaries over a 15-year period and looks at how supply and demand, the tech bubble, recession, and other forces affected starting salary offers to students in the business, engineering, computer-related, sciences, and nursing fields. The study features an analysis to help you understand why salaries are what they are, and where they may be going.

The report features hiring projections for the college Class of 2007, including projections by sector and region of the country. The report also examines other issues related to the employment of new college graduates, including effective recruiting methods, qualities of the ideal candidate, and more.

Building a Premier Internship Program: A Practical Guide for Employers This resource examines the key components of internship programs and provides detailed information on setting up and running a top-notch program, advice, and 18 samples on CD to use and adapt.

Learn the fundamentals of the recruiting and hiring process at your own pace with this new self-study edition of The Employer's Guide to College Recruiting and Hiring, now available in a self-paced CD version! This special package contains the text from NACE's touchstone resource book, written by Julie Cunningham, president of The Cunningham Group, a university relations and recruiting consulting firm in Chicago, and includes research and results-oriented approaches to attracting top college candidates, and samples of letters, forms, checklists, and agendas to adapt and use with your own organization-plus a quick assessment at the end of each chapter to test your new knowledge.

Interviewing to Win Don't spend your time creating, developing, and refining your own workshop from scratch: Interviewing to Win is a convenient workshop package that includes a one-hour, 10-slide presentation in PowerPoint format, complete with instructor's notes; a leader's guide, which includes logistics/preparation information, timeline, and instructor's script (in Word document format, so it's also easy to adapt), and teaching tools and materials you can use with students. And, all materials are fully adaptable, so you can tailor your presentation to your audience as needed. Created by seasoned career services professional Neil Murray, University of California, San Diego, Interviewing to Win is the answer to one of Gen Y's key information needs-interviewing successfully-and provides you with a powerful tool to help students compete in today's tight job market.).

Tailored to students in the nontechnical disciplines, this magazine includes information about career development and the job search, career opportunities in business, accounting, marketing, and other fields with employers across the country.

Employer listings include candidate requirements, contact information, and more. The magazine also includes articles that focus on the job market and how to break in to various industries. Indexes: Opportunities by Employer (alphabetical); Location; Occupation; Special Opportunities; and Employer Web Sites. For information about discounts, please see Job Choices - Discounts.

Employer listings include such information as job candidate requirements, contact information, and more. The magazine also features articles about the job market for technical grads, engineering licensure, opportunities in healthcare, and alternative careers for engineering and science majors.

Gauge the effectiveness of your internship/co-op program with data from NACE's 2006 Experiential Education Survey. Get a broad national view of the market for internship and co-op students and discover which recruiting methods your colleagues say work the best.

Career Services, the workbook complements the 13 categories of standards and helps you identify areas of your career services program that need improvement and those that fully meet professional standards. The workbook also offers tools for calculating composite and mean scores fo reach category to enhance or overhaul your program.

Outlook 2007 report is an annual, national forecast of the hiring intentions of employers. The report features hiring projections for the college Class of 2007, including projections by sector and region of the country. The report also examines other issues related to the employment of new college graduates, including effective recruiting methods, qualities of the ideal candidate, and more.

Addressing the concepts, approaches, activities, and resources associated with mentoring, this guide examines best practices and how-to strategies for companies that want to develop an effective mentoring program.

Colleges and Universities. Data by size of enrollment, and include office specifics, services; graduating student activity; staffing (salaries, years of experience, degree levels, and more); budget and finance; and technology.

Learn about your colleagues' offer/acceptance ratios; how they select target schools for recruiting; and what other companies are offering in the way of base salaries, signing bonuses, benefits, and total compensation packages.

Which have lost ground, and why? Gain insight into how changes in the economy, demographics, and work-related forced affect the salaries of graduating college students. Based on historical salary data from NACE's Salary Survey report as well as economic and demographic information supplied by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, Bureau of Economic Analysis, and National Center for Education Statistics, this study compares salaries over a 15-year period and looks at how supply and demand, the tech bubble, recession, and other forces affected starting salary offers to students in the business, engineering, computer-related, sciences, and nursing fields. The study features more than 40 graphs and figures to illustrate trends at both the bachelor's and master's degree levels, and analysis to help you understand why salaries are what they are, and where they may be going.

This is NACE's touchstone resource book, including research and results-oriented approaches to attracting top college candidates, and samples of letters, forms, checklists, and agendas to adapt and use with your own organization.

NACE Customer Satisfaction Return Policy: NACE will accept returns on all products except for audio and video material and materials downloaded in PDF format. Audiocassettes, CD-ROMs, and videos sales are final unless product is defective. Prepayment is required. Returns for other resources that are postmarked within 30 days from shipping date are accepted for a full refund; returns postmarked 31 to 60 days from the shipping date will incur a 50 percent restocking fee. No refund available 61 days after invoice date.

Side 2 identifies five major ways to acquire needed career information to help formulate a decision; and Side 3 identifies generic programs and services offered by career centers for each level of career clarity.

The NACE/Chevron Award for Innovative Programs in Career Services recognizes and honors a NACE college member or a regional association college member for the development of a ground-breaking program in the field.

The NACE Academy of Fellows recognizes individuals who have contributed to the career services and human resources/staffing profession through the advancement of knowledge, leadership, or excellence in professional practice.

Chevron Award. Iowa State's College of Engineering career services office developed a set of metrics to assess student development and demonstrate the ability-based outcomes required for accreditation.

Staff also developed a sustainable system to deliver the tools to students, faculty, advisers, and experiential education supervisors, and supports the program by delivering data about student development to faculty each semester.

The Employer of the Year award recognizes individuals who have contributed to the college relations and recruiting progression through exemplary service/leadership in the professional associations, advocacy of the college relations and recruitment function, and mentorship of new professionals.

Employer Profile" submitted by the University of California-Berkeley Career Center. The career center staff, led by director Thomas Devlin, developed this web-based program to allow participating employers to market themselves to Berkeley students with a basic employer profile, complete with text, hyperlinks, and company logo. Profiles remain online for 11 months, and include such options as a weekly "Employer of the Week" and a "Tell Me More" feature which link into the employer profiles.

The video simultaneously addresses student concerns and misconceptions about these services. Incorporating commentary from upbeat students, the video depicts the career services office as inviting, accessible, and well worth a visit.

During the competition, teams of M.B.A. students compete for a hypothetical job with a sponsoring employer. The competition includes a career resource scavenger hunt, requiring hands-on use of CRC resources; company and industry research; and an interview with a representative of the employer.

This program enables students to acquire career-related, paid internship experience in an international setting. Offered in conjunction with the University of North London and the University of Technology, Sydney, the program includes an he academic component--a three-credit course entitled "International Perspectives in Career Development."

For many college students, going out into the world poses its share of challenges. To facilitate that transition, student life and alumni relations staff collaborated on a guide for prospective graduates.

The handbook offers advice on such topics as finding a place to live, managing money, and achieving a work/life balance. In addition to being distributed to seniors of traditional age, the guide also is used as a textbook for an interim course for upperclassmen entitled "Real World 101: Life After College."

The guide encourages new and recent graduates to evaluate and compare prospective employers based on total cash compensation, benefits, nature of work, professional development opportunities, work-life balance, employment stability, and organizational values.

Designed to build a one-to-one relationship between the student and the company, the site incorporates streaming video, audio clips, and interactive features, such as video clips of executives discussing their experiences working for Federated.

This eight-minute video explains how to effectively prepare for a job fair. The video targets a student audience, discussing the stages of job-fair preparation, communication, and follow-up. There are also tips on how students can present themselves to companies during a job fair. Brief remarks from students and corporate contacts attending a job fair show how to prepare for job fairs, and what employers seek from students. "Connecting with Employers" is fast-paced and presents information in a clear, organized, nonintimidating manner.

During Career Month, educators from schools, colleges, and universities provide resources and programs associated with careers. They also have students read and write about careers. Educators are also asked to visit companies and to invite alumni to speak on-campus about their jobs. In turn, employers may hold open houses, and invite students and employees? children to visit. In addition, employees are encouraged to speak at schools about their career experiences.

Career Month in Louisiana creates an awareness of career services among LSU faculty, staff, students, and employers. Career services also gains the opportunity to collaborate with more than 30 existing statewide networks, such as chambers of commerce and trade associations.

Career Week, entitled "Shoot for the Stars," the career center staff designed a publicity package. The package included a button, a poster, a four-fold brochure, and a 40-page booklet. In staying with the out-of-this-world theme, each piece in the media package is illustrated with shooting stars and other space-related graphics. In addition, the four-fold brochure encourages students to "Expand your universe."

"The Career Digger" helps freshmen and undecided majors explore their options in choosing a major and a career. The publication is divided into sections by major, with information on the job outlook and starting salaries in various fields. It also lists employers who have hired Colorado School of Mines (CSM) students and graduates.

The Career Services Center Information System (CSCIS) is an intranet offering Darden Graduate School students and staff, as well as corporate representatives, a more efficient system to access placement opportunities.

Students apply to the career services center in their junior year and participate in the program in August during the week before school starts. The program was submitted by Bob Orndorff, director of career services.

Career Placement Center is an all-in-one career planning resource for the students at State University of New York-Stony Brook. Taking top prize among college entries, this guide was submitted by Tim Luzader, director of career placement at SUNY-Stony Brook. The 35-page booklet contains a month-by-month calendar of on-campus career planning events, information on the various services offered by the career placement center, job hunting tips, a career checklist, and details on graduate school. The magazine was created to draw students to the almost-hidden career services office in the basement of the campus library.

This free guide talks to students about how to use the Internet as part of a comprehensive job-search program. The guide was submitted by Raymond H. Thrift, Jr., director of career development services at the University of West Florida.

Room Zoom: The CPA Source Disc, from the American Institute of CPAs, was recognized as the winner in the technical innovation category. This CD-ROM offers information to students on accounting and careers. The interactive CD allows users to explore educational requirements, offers tips on finding a first job, and gives details on career paths, salaries, technology, publications, and organizations for CPAs. It was submitted by Jodi Landau Ryan, manager of recruiting programs.

Carolina Connection is a web-based data base of University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill alumni who have volunteered to help UNC students and graduates with their career plans and job searches. This data base is searchable on the Internet and accessible to anyone using a UNC-domain computer or a career center-registered password. Carolina Connection was submitted by Marcia Harris, director of career services.

"Projections for M.B.A. hiring are in line with what we're seeing in the job market for new college graduates as a whole," says Marilyn Mackes, NACE executive director. "Employers reported plans to increase their college hires by more than 17 percent this year."

"We're not seeing any significant move toward using signing bonuses this year," says Marilyn Mackes, NACE executive director. "In fact, more than three-quarters of those who plan to use signing bonuses reported that they will use them selectively. They won't be offering them to all candidates."

"On average, employers reported plans to increase their starting salary offers by 4.6 percent over last year," says Mackes. "That's nearly a full percentage point higher than the increases they reported for the Class of 2006 and the Class of 2005."

About the Job Outlook 2007 Survey: The Job Outlook survey is a forecast of hiring intentions of employers as they relate to new college graduates. Each year, the National Association of Colleges and Employers (NACE) surveys its employer members about their hiring plans and other employment-related issues.

"These salary increases combined with the results of a recent poll of Salary Survey participants indicate that 2005-06 has been the best job market in the past four years," says Marilyn Mackes, NACE executive director.

"Nearly nine out of 10 respondents to that poll said that 2005-06 grads had more job opportunities available to them than 2004-05 grads," she added. "And, respondents said employers strongly participated in recruiting activities, including on-campus recruiting, career fairs, information sessions, and intern and co-op recruiting."

Salary Survey participants reported other signs of a robust market for 2005-06 grads, such as earlier, and, in some cases, multiple job offers to students. Therefore, it's not surprising that starting salary offers have increased in almost all curriculum areas.

The increase for liberal arts majors as a group was a minute 0.2 percent, with the increases and decreases of individual majors cancelling each other out. For example, political science/government majors saw a 0.3 percent increase to their average offer, raising it to $33,094, but English majors saw a decrease of 0.2 percent, lowering their offer to $31,385.

More than half of the employers who provided key reasons for their anticipated hiring increase cited the growth of their organizations. Many also reported employees nearing retirement age, high attrition rates, or business needs that would require increased hiring.

"Overall, the college Class of 2006 is doing very well in terms of starting salaries," says Camille Luckenbaugh, NACE research director. "We began reporting on their salary offers in January and we've seen salaries continue to rise since that time. Employers expected to face more competition for new college graduates this year, and that competition is translating into higher salaries."

Business administration/management graduates also fared well; their average salary offer jumped by 6.3 percent to $42,048. A large number of offers made to these graduates came from investment banking firms, who offered on average, salaries of $53,277, well in excess of the overall average.

The average salary offer to economics/finance graduates rose to $45,112, a solid 5.1 percent increase. Financial services employers and investment banking firms provided a hefty share of the offers reported for these graduates.

Graduates with degrees in the computer sciences also posted increases across the board. The average offer to computer science graduates rose just 1 percent to a healthy $51,305. Information sciences and systems graduates saw a more substantial increase, gaining 8.5 percent to bring their average offer to $48,593.

Chemical engineering majors posted a solid 4.7 percent increase to their average salary offer, raising it to $56,335. Petroleum and coal products manufacturers made the largest number of offers to these grads and were willing to pay them top dollar-an average of $58,456.

About Salary Survey: Salary Survey is a quarterly report of starting salary offers to new college graduates in 70 disciplines at the bachelor's degree level. The survey compiles data from college and university career services offices nationwide. Salary Survey is issued in Winter, Spring, Summer, and Fall, with the Fall issue serving as the year-end report.

Learn how easy it is to improve morale and productivity in your office with coaching, staff meetings, performance reviews, and "fun" activities. Discover what organizations are doing to successfully increase employee performance through "attitude makeovers," and pick up new ideas that you can use with the people around you.

Tennessee Tech University for six years and is responsible for all career placement and experiential programs for this comprehensive university of 9,400 students. She is president-elect of the Tennessee Association of Colleges Employers and served on the NACE Technology Committee. Camuti has an M.B.A. from Golden Gate University and is working on her Ph.D. in industrial psychology.

Mary Mahoney is assistant director of career services at the University of Tennessee, Knoxville. She manages the day-to-day operations of their on-campus recruiting program, and presents workshops and counseling on areas relating to the job-search process. She has 21 years of experience as a career services professional.

Both presenters supervise employees and have conducted research into motivation theory. They conducted research in February of 2006 to collect feedback from employers regarding successful techniques that have been tried and implemented in the field.

Career services practitioners at Albertus Magnus College in Connecticut knew they needed to service a wide range of students, including working adult students balancing education, employment, and family; students looking to advance or change their careers; and traditional students who would be seeking an entry-level position. Staff wanted to develop services that were personal, convenient, and comprehensive. This case study looks at the methods the career center at Albertus Magnus College used to increase service levels to all students.

Explore how this office used resume development concepts, Schlossberg's transition theory, market-driven management, and qualitative research methods to define and meet the diverse resume development needs of traditional and adult populations.

Suzanne Yurko Wall is currently the director of career services at Albertus Magnus College in New Haven, Connecticut, where she has developed a wide range of innovative career development services for current students and alumni. She was the 2002 recipient of the National Association of Student Personnel Administrators (NASPA) Outstanding New Professional Award for Connecticut and is serving as secretary of the Connecticut Career Counseling and Development Association (CCCDA). She has eight years of experience in the career services field.

What makes the roundtable unique is that you and other college recruiting and staffing professionals will set the agenda, whether you want to discuss signing bonuses or experiential education programs. Come prepared with questions and suggestions for this moderated discussion. As a participant, you'll gain valuable insights into enhancing and distinguishing your program.

Higher education institutions demand accountability. College and university administrators want to know that they are getting the most out of their resources and dollars and thus, increasingly, career services offices must provide concrete evidence about the positive impact of services to clients.

In the past, career services answered this request for evidence by providing placement numbers and counting everything (visits, programs, job postings, phone calls, etc.). Yet, placement numbers were often dependent on the economy and student motivation. At the same time, the career centers provide developmental services, and work with students beginning early in students' college careers.

Join us for a view of one high-tech approach to improving outcomes data and high-touch services. Presenters will share a strategy for defining career competency outcomes that engendered immediate staff buy-in. See how these outcomes were connected to programs and services, bringing theory to practice in a unique and exciting way. This seminar, which is an encore presentation of a popular concurrent session at the 2006 NACE National Meeting, aims to stimulate your thoughts and actions to meet the challenge of actualizing outcomes.

Discover how a learning outcomes model for career services was developed and supported by staff Explore how a technology solution provides the foundation for outcomes data collection and high touch or personalized services Find out how a learning outcomes model can drive interventions, promote accountability, and demonstrate student competency development.

Gail S. Rooney is the director of The Career Center at the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign. Prior to her current position she was the director of University Career and Employment Services at the University of Kansas. She has been a faculty member in a counselor education program and vice-president for student development at a small private college. She received her Ph.D. in counseling psychology from the University of Illinois and her M.S. from George Williams College.

M.S. in counseling and human systems from Florida State University. She is a Nationally Certified Counselor, and also holds a B.S. in computer science from Cornell University. Makela has seven years of experience working in career development in higher education, serving as a counselor, instructor, mentor, consultant, and researcher. She discovers unique ways to blend theory and practice, empowering student development practitioners to embed their expertise into novel technology and student engagement strategies. She has a passion for enhancing student affairs programs that encourage holistic student development, and is currently pursing a Ph.D. in higher education administration with a specialization in evaluation research methodologies.

Disabled workers have long been an untapped source of talent, and are expected to play an increasingly vital role in the work force in the future as older workers retire and the labor pool shrinks. And many employers want to include disabled college graduates in their diversity hiring plans.

Allen R. Vaala and M. Lynne Morley, director and assistant director of the NTID Center on Employment, will present model strategies that career services offices and employers can use to facilitate successful work relationships.

Both presenters work with deaf students at Rochester Institute of Technology (RIT) enrolled through the National Technical Institute for the Deaf (NTID) and with employers who are seeking to bring talented deaf individuals into their work environment.

Employment. She joined RIT 29 years ago, first as a faculty member in the business area and later as an employment adviser. She works with deaf students who are looking for co-op and permanent jobs and with employers.

Allen R. Vaala is the director of the NTID Center on Employment, a position he has held for five years. The NTID Center on Employment works with the 1,200 deaf and hard-of-hearing students at NTID to prepare them for obtaining both co-op and permanent jobs. This includes resume and interview preparation and job search skills. The Center on Employment also has an extensive employer outreach program including a job fair, workshops, and seminars on how to better integrate deaf and hard-of-hearing employees into the work force. It also offers recruiting support.

If you can't participate in the virtual seminar, request a copy of our audio archive of the session. Catch up on diversity initiatives, legal issues in internships, the latest Job Outlook forecast, benchmarks in experiential education, and much more. We've archived materials from the virtual education sessions.

Once registration for the live audio/web conference is complete and payment is received, NACE will send you confirmation via e-mail. The confirmation will include telephone instructions and instructions for accessing the PowerPoint presentation.

Why do drug dealers still live with their mothers? How are sumo wrestlers and school teachers alike? Where is your child safer: At the home of a friend whose family owns a gun or with a friend whose family has a swimming pool?

Steven D. Levitt, bestselling author of Freakonomics, looks for the story that no one else has found, using simple questions to reach sometimes startling conclusions. The Wall Street Journal said that if Indiana Jones were an economist, he'd be Steven Levitt, who has shown other economists just how well their tools can make sense of the real world.

A 37-year-old self-effacing midwestern father of four, Levitt has an enormous curiosity and is set on course by personal experiences and the incongruities he sees in everyday life. He is an intuitionist. He sifts through a data to find the surprising story and devises ways to measure an effect that veteran economists have declared unmeasurable.

Brooke earned her place on the Forbes list through a distinguished career of public and private service. Brooke is global vice chairman for Ernst & Young, where her job focuses on developing the firm's strategic direction and shaping its position on public policy. She is in charge of strategy, communications, and regulatory affairs, and has taken part in the public policy debate about the controversies the accounting profession has faced over the past few years. Brooke also served in the U.S. Treasury Department under the administration of President Bill Clinton and currently serves on several nonprofit boards. As a keynote speaker, she pairs laser-sharp insight with a global perspective.

His role on this television drama as a humane spiritual figure in the desperate and inhumane world of a maximum security prison provided the actor with a stimulating platform for his diverse talent, as well as tremendous exposure and popularity.

Substitute II. But moviegoers will undoubtedly remember him most from his surprising work in four popular films as three extremely different men: the outrageous wedding coordinator's assistant, Howard Weinstein, opposite Martin Short in Father of the Bride (parts I and II), the quiet, intense and ambitious Tibetan foreign minister Ngawang Jigme, opposite Brad Pitt in Seven Years in Tibet, and as the voice of the powerful and heroic Captain Li Shang in Disney's animated blockbuster, Mulan.

This alternate career has brought the actor a great sense of satisfaction; a self-described "ham," he enjoys infusing his remarks (and the subsequent answering of questions) with humor and dramatic readings.

Visit the home offices of some New York City companies. All groups will depart at 12:15 p.m. promptly on Wednesday May 30, 2007 from the lower lobby of the Marriott Marquis and will return about 4 p.m. There will also be concurrent sessions offered during this time slot. Registration is required and seats are limited.

Site visits are open to registered NACE conference attendees and are designed to provide NACE professionals with a unique look inside a diverse group of leading employers. Any conference attendee interested in learning more about an organization's culture, career opportunities, and facilities is encouraged to attend.

Our New York City (NYC) location presents an unprecedented opportunity at the annual conference for NACE conference attendees to have an opportunity to reach out beyond the conference site and explore various profit and nonprofit employers in the heart of New York City. Most jobs and organizations are different than what you can learn from web sites or other publications.

The site visits present a unique opportunity to gain a "real life" view of corporate culture, find out about career opportunities that may be available to students and alumni and benchmark with others in your field or industry.

Groups will meet in the lower lobby of the Marriott Marquis. Each site visit will be led by an experienced guide, dressed in a distinctive red NACE shirt, who will accompany participants to each of the locations.

Because the city is at the crossroads of the world, visitors can choose from nearly unlimited travel options, with three major airports handling more daily flights than any other city and countless rail, bus, ferry, and driving options.

What should you donate? Among the sought-after items at last year's auction were a laptop computer, hotel stays, and original artwork. Tickets to an event, sports memorabilia, a company product are appropriate. All donations must have a minimum value of $100. Donors will be listed on the Silent Auction web page on the NACE National Meeting web site through July 1, 2007; and will be recognized during the Silent Auction.

NACE will photograph your donation for posting on the NACE web site and on the bid boards on-site at the National Meeting; however, if you prefer, you are welcome to send up to three photographs to represent your donation.

Foundation is to foster leading-edge research and educational resources that facilitate the employment of the college educated. To that end, the Foundation has earned a notable reputation for publishing specialized research in these areas and for fostering educational training programs for college career services professionals, human resources professionals, and graduating college students.

The National Meeting will be paperless in 2007! Concurrent session PowerPoint presentations will be accessible online before the conference so you can review and download the sessions you want to attend in advance or pick up information on sessions you are unable to attend! Handouts will not be distributed at concurrent sessions.

Approximately two weeks before the conference, each full-conference registrant will receive information via e-mail about how to access a special area of the National Meeting web site where presentations will be available in PDF format. Review the sessions, print the presentations you want to attend, and take them with you to the meeting.

Following the opening remarks, you'll be tapping your feet and humming along to the memorable songs from the biggest Broadway musicals of the century. Featuring the stars of The Phantom of the Opera, Les Miserables, Cats, Jesus Christ Superstar, and Jekyll and Hyde and supported by an all star New York band, "100 Years of Broadway" recreates the biggest moments and most popular songs from the hit shows. You'll hear brilliantly revived arrangements of Broadway classics as well as fantastic numbers from Broadway's newest hit shows.

I hereby apply for membership in the National Association of Colleges and Employers covering the 12-month period commencing the month after this application is received by NACE. I understand that the membership dues for this 12-month period are $390 for director-level membership.

This information is used to determine the demographic mix of our membership and will be used only for statistical reporting purposes. Whether or not you choose to complete this section will have absolutely no bearing on your membership status.

Membership is institutional and available to a career services office at an educational institution granting associate, baccalaureate, or higher degrees that has been accredited by an official accrediting association. The primary contact for the membership is typically the individual whose primary responsibility is career services.

Explore opportunities for expanding membership by reviewing previous research on two member categories (community colleges and small- to medium-size employers) and identifying strategies for marketing NACE to prospective members from these groups.

Become knowledgeable about recent membership decisions and categories of membership; identify implications of the changes and provide feedback regarding the implementation of the new membership model; serve as advocates for the new membership model and potential opportunities to expand membership.

Plan and identify format and speakers for an interactive way to engage members in this discussion using available NACE programs and services (quick pulse surveys, virtual seminars, annual meeting workshop.

Review existing bylaws and identify changes needed based on new actions of the board and items that might be changed to clarify/streamline the bylaws; prepare changes for board decision by the January 2007 Board meeting or sooner.

General Information About Committee Membership: Committee members are appointed for one-year terms commencing July 1. Committee members may be re-appointed for successive terms. Committee appointments are made by the NACE president-elect. In addition, various teams and task forces are established to complete a specific, focused, results-oriented charge within a short time frame.

As a matter of belief in diversity, the National Association of Colleges and Employers does not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, color, national origin, religion, age, disability, or sexual orientation. Accordingly, NACE strives to have its elected Board and officers themselves reflect the rich diversity within the profession.

Employers in its effort to identify the diversity of the applicant pool for committees/task force positions, we would like you to supply us with the following information: Submission of this form is optional. If you choose not to complete the form, it will not have any impact on your nomination.

Members also have the option to purchase special reports. Regional reports are available in July and September. In addition, special reports let you customize critical information by location of the school, or by job location (city).

Eligibility Requirements: Retired professional membership may be granted to any individual who has retired and is no longer working in the career services or human resources, professional staffing, or recruiting/hiring field and who would not otherwise qualify for another membership category.

Career Center directors at NACE member schools asked the NACE Principles for Professional Conduct Committee to consider the implications of servinc alcohol during the recruiting process. In the first case, an employer employer decided to skip hosting the traditional on-campus company information session. Instead, recruiters invited students who were prospective job candidates to meet with them at an off-campus bar where students were treated to beer and mixed alcoholic drinks. The recruiters asked career services staff to make sure students knew about the change in plans.

In the preamble to The Principles for Professional Conduct, employers and career services professionals are encouraged to "Maintain a recruitment process that is fair and equitable to candidates and employing organizations."

Further, if an employer chooses to serve alcoholic drinks, the ethics document recommends that the amount be limited and handled in accordance with the law, with the college's policies, and with the employer's policies.

The committee concluded that it is wrong to require students, either implicitly or explicitly, to attend a social event where alcohol is served in order to obtain company information or to be considered for an interview.

A company that requires a job candidate to endure a situation that has nothing to do with the actual position for which he or she is interested in goes against the principle of "a recruitment process that is fair and equitable to candidates."

Employer committee members cited several examples of student recruitment activities that have been successful for their organizations. One employer said that she invites students to sporting events or holds intramural-type sporting events for potential hires. Another described casual receptions that allow candidates to meet company employees are popular with students.

Employers who choose to serve alcoholic beverages at a job-search reception should make sure that serving liquor does not violate school policy. Employers also should remember that many college students are below the drinking age in most states. Thus, purchasing drinks for those students could be a violation of a state's criminal laws.

Moreover, if the employer is using the reception to test a job candidate's ability to handle alcoholic beverages at a work-related function or other social skills, the employer should check with the organization's legal counsel about any discriminatory impact such selection criteria might have and whether the ability to drink alcohol is a job-related criterion.

The Principles Committee noted that career services staff should advise students that some employers may provide alcohol at social events to determine how well students can handle the situation. A student should be told to that it is acceptable to order a soft drink instead. Students who do drink should be advised that the reception is a professional function, and that they should not treat it as a party.

The committee does not believe that there is an ethical problem with the school's publicizing such an event. The career services staff should ask the school's legal counsel to determine if the school has a policy against advertising off-campus events that include alcoholic beverages for students. As a practical matter, the employer hosting a reception should create the advertisement or poster publicizing this event. The information should include the name of the employer's representative who will provide students with details of the event; the career services office should not be named as a contact.

The following letter was written by the NACE Principles for Professional Conduct Committee. It can be used by career services professionals to notify employers that the college or university career center endorses the Principles document and requires employers recruiting in their career centers to abide by the no-alcohol policy.

The categories for Directors shall be developed by the NACE Leadership Strategy and Sourcing Committee. There should be an equal number of employer/college Directors on the Board. The Leadership Strategy and Sourcing Committee shall create the ballot with this in mind, recognizing that a ballot may alternate from year to year in the number of college or employer Director positions available to create the employer/college balance.

Section 1. The Executive Director shall be employed by the Board at a salary fixed by the Executive Committee, shall be directly responsible to the President, and shall serve as Secretary-Treasurer of the Corporation.

Section 2. In addition to the powers and duties of the Secretary-Treasurer, the Executive Director shall manage and direct all activities of the national association, subject to the policies of the Board and through the office of the President. The Executive Director shall employ and may terminate the employment of members of the staff necessary to carry on the work of the national association and fix their compensation within the approved budget. The Executive Director shall define the duties of the staff, supervise their performance, establish their titles, and delegate the responsibilities of management as shall be in the best interest of the national association.

Section 3. The Executive Director shall serve as a nonvoting member of the Board, the Executive Committee, and the Finance Committee, and as a voting member of the strategic planning process. The Executive Director also serves as a member of the NACE Foundation Board of Trustees. The Executive Director may also be appointed by the Board, President, or Executive Committee to serve on the boards of other organizations, whether profit or nonprofit, to represent the national association to allied, professional, or liaison organizations.

Section 1.  There shall be an annual meeting of the Board of Directors. The annual Board meeting shall be held in the month immediately preceding the commencement of the fiscal year, or as specified by a vote of a majority of the voting members of the Board.

The officers-elect who are not members of the Board of Directors at the time of their election and the Directors-elect shall be invited as observers to the annual Board meeting immediately preceding the taking of office in order to provide for an orderly transition.

The act of the majority of the voting members of the Board present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board. If a quorum shall not be present at any meeting of the Board, the Members present thereat may adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present.

Any action which may be taken at a meeting of the Board may be taken without a meeting, if consents in writing setting forth the action so taken shall be signed by all of the voting members of the Board and filed with the Secretary-Treasurer. If voting is accomplished by mail or fax the consent and vote shall be signed by each voting member of the Board. If voting is accomplished by e-mail the consent and vote will be verified by the Board member designating a signature within the e-mail.

National Association of Colleges and Employers: charter, charter associate, regular, student, affiliate, and retired. The rights, duties, and criteria for membership shall be as provided in Articles IV through IX of these bylaws.

Nominations for the offices of Vice President-Employer and Vice President-College shall be drawn from the current or a previous NACE Board of Directors. Individuals nominated must be employed in the career services or human resources/professional staffing/recruitment/employment field and be employed by a member of NACE.

Both college and employer members are eligible to be elected as President-Elect of NACE except as otherwise provided herein, the position of President shall alternate between being held by college and employer members.

A. The Leadership Strategy and Sourcing Committee shall call for nominations for directors and officers from the NACE membership. Individuals may self-nominate or nominate another individual by submitting the nomination and supporting documentation to the Leadership Strategy and Sourcing Committee within the appropriate time frame as specified by the Leadership Strategy and Sourcing Committee.

B. The Leadership Strategy and Sourcing Committee shall develop a slate for officers and director positions. Selected candidates should be broadly representative of the diversity of the profession and possess demonstrated knowledge and expertise relevant to the profession.

A. Electronic votes must be cast by midnight no later than 30 days after the ballot is sent (if that date falls on Saturday or Sunday then that following Monday will be the date used) to be considered a valid vote. Officers and directors will be elected by a simple majority of the ballots cast in their favor.

B. The election results will be announced to the NACE Board, nominees, and membership by May 1. Officers-elect and directors-elect shall attend the annual Board meeting and their term of office shall commence at the start of the fiscal year. The election results will be made part of the minutes of the annual Board meeting.

Fill the vacancy now created in the Office by selecting an individual from the current Board and/or an individual who has previously served on the Board. If an individual is selected to fill the vacancy, he/she shall be from the same constituency as that of the vacated position.

The newly selected officer would only serve until the next scheduled election and if not eligible to run or elected to that position, would have to retire from the Board at the end of the term he/she had filled.

Choose to permit the vacancy to remain open until the election would normally be held. If the Executive Committee determines that the vacancy will not be filled, the President shall delegate the duties and responsibilities of the vacant position to other officers on the Executive Committee.

The Executive Committee could determine that it is necessary to hold a special election for the vacated position. If so, the procedures outlined in the Nominations and Elections Process of the Board Operations Manual and the bylaws will be followed. However, the time line will be shortened and modified as necessary for purposes of expediency.

Copying and/or downloading of any of this information for the purpose of distributing it to others is prohibited without the specific written permission of NACE. All other rights are reserved by NACE. Any individual making unauthorized copies or downloading any NACE material will be subject to the penalties as set forth in the federal and state copyright laws. Members may request permission to reprint these documents by completing a permission form.

The materials on this page are provided to you as a resource for your organization to develop policy and procedures. The legal information provided should not be construed as legal advice for any specific situation, nor can NACE's general counsel provide you with specific legal advice regarding your policies, procedures, or forms. It is strongly recommended that you seek advice from your institution's legal counsel.

In addition to demographic information, the Online Directory can provide you with the detailed information you need to identify and connect with schools of interest. Use the advanced search feature, and cut down on hours of research.

NACE communities. We have included information on formatting e-mail to the communities for maximum value. There are also prohibitions on using the communities as a way to advertise or promote products or services.

Do not rely on your messages being confidential or private, even if a message is sent privately, to one person only. Do not send anything via the Internet that you would not be willing to say face-to-face to a co-worker or your employer.

While a general discussion of professional resources is welcome on within the NACE Communities, discussion of a specific vendor, product, or resource will not be tolerated. NACE is not responsible for statements made by subscribers to any of the Communities as to the legitimacy of any business.

If you wish to get opinions or recommendations of a commercial product, please ask that all e-mail be directed to your e-mail box and not to the discussion group. Please share a summary of that information with colleagues by private e-mail only. Discussions of specific vendors or commercial products may not go through a Community.

If you post a question of interest to your colleagues, please collect the answers and send a summary of responses to the list. Your summary should include one copy of your original question and excerpts of the responses you receive. Include the e-mail addresses of the people who answer your question.

If information comes from a book, a newsletter, a magazine, a web site, a news group, another e-mail discussion group, or any other publication, the material may be copyrighted. Any copying and/or downloading of copyrighted material to a NACE Community must be with express written permission of the person or organization that owns the copyright. This includes copying of NACE materials. If you have any questions, contact Claudia Allen, NACE permissions editor.

Community members should indicate in their discussions whether they want to hear from vendors or suppliers. Vendors should reply to postings only to forward the discussion or to add information or ideas.

Include a subject in the "subject line" of your message. This will help other Community members choose among the messages to read and respond to, and will make your questions/answers/discussion easier to find in the archives. For example, if you are discussing behavioral interviewing, use the words "behavioral interviewing" in the subject line. If you are offering a summary of information in answer to a particular question, use "summary of [topic]" to give community members an idea of what they will read when they open your message.

While you own the copyright to your individual messages and materials that you place on a Community discussion group, NACE compiles the messages and materials on its server and owns the compilation of messages and materials.

An exploding offer requires a student to choose a job offer within a very short amount of time or face having the offer rescinded. The Principles Committee examined this recruiting practice and developed the following position paper, which was approved by the NACE Board of Directors.

Maintain an open and free selection of employment opportunities in an atmosphere conducive to objective thought, where job candidates can choose optimum long-term uses of their talents that are consistent with personal objectives and all relevant facts.

Employment professionals will refrain from any practice that improperly influences and affects job acceptances. Such practices may include undue time pressure for acceptance of employment offers and encouragement of revocation of another employment offer. Employment professionals will strive to communicate decisions to candidates within the agreed-upon time frame.

They will inform students of the means and resources to gain access to information, which may influence their decisions about employing organizations. Career services professionals will also provide employing organizations with accurate information about the educational institution and its students and about the recruitment policies of the career services office.

Committee that employers give students a minimum of three weeks to return a decision on a job offer during the recruiting season. The Board and the Principles Committee understand that not all employers recruit during certain times of the year, e.g., fall semester or spring semester, and that recommending specific calendar dates would not be appropriate. The Board believes, however, that providing time frames on offers and acceptances will assist employers in planning their recruitment strategy and allow students a sufficient period of time to evaluate the employment opportunities offered to them while allowing them to participate fully during the recruiting season.

The Principles Committee recommends that employers who make job offers at the beginning of a semester consider keeping their offers open until the end of the semester so that students can fully explore other opportunities and, ultimately, make the wisest decisions for all concerned.

The success of students in obtaining employment is important to a number of parties on the college campus. In addition to the students themselves, these parties include the professionals who work in the career center and in admissions, development, and alumni relations offices, and you, the faculty.

Usually, your role and that of the career services practitioner are complementary. Occasionally, however, helping students in their job searches can result in unanticipated illegal or unethical actions.

The National Association of Colleges and Employers (NACE), to which a great number of academic and hiring institutions belong, provides a set of ethical standards for guiding the job-search process. Entitled Principles for Professional Conduct for Career Services & Employment Professionals, these standards are based on notions of fairness, truthfulness, non-injury, confidentiality, and lawfulness. In its foreword, the Principles document notes that colleges and employers share the common goal of "achieving the best match between the individual student and the employing organization."

If you or a colleague receive a job lead from an employer and choose only to refer a few individuals without publicizing the position to all students who may be qualified, you are not maintaining "a fair and equitable recruiting process."

Also, by identifying individuals for employment on a "regular" basis, you may be considered an "employment agency" for purposes of compliance with equal employment opportunity laws. For example, if it appears as if you are (innocently or otherwise) referring only male students or only minority students, you may be open to charges of discrimination.

A Suggested Course of Action: If you receive a request for student referrals, you can, of course, notify individual students who have declared an interest in such positions and encourage them to apply. However, also post the position in your department and announce it to your classes. At the same time, contact the university career center so that the position can be listed campus-wide.

There are practical reasons for these actions. The career services office may have an existing relationship with the requesting employer through co-op, part-time/summer job, internship, job fair, or other recruiting programs. Or, the career center practitioners may wish to develop a broader relationship with the employer.

Most employers have diversity objectives in their college relations programs. Accordingly, they will make a special effort to identify and attract minority candidates. You will probably be asked for help in accomplishing this task.

The NACE Principles document endorses compliance with EEO guidelines and adherence to affirmative action principles by both college and staffing professionals. It is illegal to discriminate against protected groups. It is considered appropriate for career center practitioners to inform members of protected groups about employment opportunities, especially in areas where minorities are underrepresented. Similarly, employers are encouraged to inform minority populations of special activities, e.g., information sessions or career fairs that have been developed to help achieve an employer's affirmative action goals. You can participate in all of these activities.

While it is lawful and ethical for you to assist employers in reaching out to minority groups, it is inappropriate for you to identify only minority individuals who might fit the needs of an organization. You have an obligation to provide a "fair" system, i.e., one where all students have access to information about career opportunities.

A Suggested Course of Action: If you receive a request for minority candidate referrals, you can make announcements in class, post signs in your department, notify minority students' organizations (e.g., societies of black, female, or Hispanic engineers), pass the request on to the career center, and encourage the employer to contact the career center directly. You can also refer the employer to your college's minority student advisory office (if one exists). That office may be authorized to provide a full list of the members of a requested population.

When you are asked by an employer for a student's reference, confidentiality becomes a major concern. Simply, information about a student should not be shared unless the student has furnished you with prior authorization. Once permission has been obtained, you should provide information that is based on facts, not conjecture, and not on personal information unrelated to the student's qualifications for the job in question.

A Suggested Course of Action: When you are asked to provide a written or oral reference for a student, obtain written permission from the student. All reference information should be based on firsthand knowledge and, if possible, written documentation. When providing information, you should avoid personal matters (e.g., marital status, health, disabilities, race, religion, etc.) that by law should not be included in employment decisions, even if you believe that such information might enhance the student's candidacy.

The goal of student employment is most likely reached when all parties involved work cooperatively, ethically, and within the law. There may be instances when you are unsure of how to help your students and stay within the law. On those occasions, call the career services center for more information.

You and your colleagues on the faculty are encouraged to offer comments to your career services center practitioners regarding these guidelines and the issues this guide addresses. Please feel free to note issues that may not be covered.

A growing number of HR/staffing professionals are concerned about the liability their organizations may face through their student internship programs. Some employers have asked colleges and universities to sign a "hold harmless" or indemnity agreement as a condition to the employer's hiring one of the school's students as a paid or unpaid intern.

These agreements may require the school to assume responsibility not only for the actions of the intern in the workplace but also for any loss that might arise out of the internship relationship; the agreements also may require the school to defend the employing organization and pay its legal fees should the intern sue the employer.

An internship program is either mandatory or elective. In the case of a mandatory program, the student is required to perform an internship as part of a course of study, to earn a specific degree or certificate, and/or to graduate; in this case, the school is involved in selecting the internship site and has a degree of involvement with the intern and the internship experience. In an elective program, the internship is not an academic requirement, and the school's involvement may not extend beyond posting information about the internship opportunity.

In most internships, the employer's risk of liability is greater than that of the school, as the employer typically has a greater degree of control over the internship experience and environment than the school does.

While no study supports or refutes the concern that sponsoring interns is risky, the increased demand for hold harmless agreements indicates that some employers perceive a liability in hiring interns. To mitigate that liability, some employers are requiring indemnity agreements as a means of sharing liability with and/or passing liability to schools.

There are a number of things to consider when signing or asking another organization to sign an agreement. In general, such agreements are only as good as the parties that make them. What does this mean?

Third, the school must have the legal authority to agree to pay for a separate entity's losses. In certain states, the law may bar a public entity (a state university, for example) from entering into such an agreement.

First, an underlying premise of the Principles for Professional Conduct is that career services and employer professionals should create a recruitment process that enables a student to make "an informed and responsible decision regarding a career choice, in an atmosphere conducive to objective thought." This guides employers and schools to work in a collaborative fashion to create this atmosphere for the student. When a hold harmless agreement becomes part of this process, there is the potential to change this collaborative relationship into an adversarial one. This is especially true when the employer does not discuss the agreement with the school prior to interviewing students and instead sends the student into the career services office with the agreement as an "after the fact" condition of employment. The student is expected to put pressure on the school to sign the document. Using the student in this manner does not "support informed and responsible decision making." This also places the school in the position of being seen as the obstacle to a student's internship if the school does not sign the agreement.

In those cases where there is little or no relationship between the school and employer, requiring an indemnity agreement as a condition of internship employment is not within the framework of "professionally accepted recruiting, interviewing, and selection techniques" (Employer Principle 2). This is not the same as requiring a drug test, credit check, or background investigation as a condition of employment, which are accepted preemployment conditions and relate to whether the student fulfills the employer's requirements.

Further, the employer has not "supplied the student with accurate information about the organization" (Employer Principle 3) when it does not advise a student about the indemnity agreement up front. By not informing the student of the requirement, the employer has misrepresented the organization. Often, the student does not understand the purpose of the agreement. Believing the agreement is just another "form" to be completed by the school, the student then does not understand why the school would refuse to sign the agreement. By not providing accurate information about its indemnity agreement requirement, the employer fosters the student's misperception.

If the school is unwilling or unable to sign the agreement, the student may be placed at a disadvantage, especially in those cases where the internship is scheduled to begin shortly or has already begun. When an employer changes its commitment to a student, Employer Principle 3 directs the employer to "pursue a course of action for the affected candidate that is fair and equitable." However, when an internship is revoked after it has begun or shortly before it is scheduled to begin, this is not possible.

A hold harmless agreement is not appropriate in those cases when the school's involvement with assisting employers in recruiting interns is limited to providing access to students by posting the opportunity, scheduling on-campus interviews, referring resumes, including the employers in career fairs, and the like. In such a situation, the school has no involvement in the selection of the student by the employer. The employer controls the workplace, work rules, and the intern. Under these circumstances, it is a violation of the Principles because the agreement is not within the framework of "professionally accepted recruiting, interviewing, and selection techniques" (Employer Principle 2).

The agreement is between the employer and the school. Therefore, the employer, not the student, should send the agreement to the authorized individual at the school for review, negotiation, and execution of the agreement. The student should not be involved in delivering or apprising the school of the agreement.

The employer and school must engage in negotiations to draft an agreement that meets the needs of both organizations. It is more likely that a school will agree to indemnify the employing organization if the agreement addresses risks that the school can control. The agreement should be crafted based upon the respective responsibilities of both the school and the employer as they relate to the internship.

Job Choices for Business & Liberal Arts Students highlights career opportunities with employers in the nontechnical fields, including accounting, insurance, retail, finance, and more, and provides career planning and job-search advice for students pursuing degrees in the nontechnical disciplines.

Job Choices for Science, Engineering, & Technology Students highlights career opportunities with employers in the technical fields, including engineering, science, computer science, and healthcare, and features career planning and job-search information tailored to the student pursuing a degree in a technical field.

Job Choices: Diversity Edition highlights career opportunities with employers in a variety of industries and fields, features career planning and job-search information, and addresses issues relevant to students of diverse backgrounds.

Each magazine also features indexes to help narrow your search: Use the "Opportunities by Employer" index to target a specific organization. Or, target a specific occupation with the help of the "Opportunities by Occupation" index. Looking for opportunities in a specific part of the country? Scan the "Opportunities by Location" index, where employers are listed by country, state, and city. Find out about the culture, history, and work of companies by surfing your way to employer web sites with the "Employer Web Site" index.

The latest edition of Job Choices is being shipped to member colleges. Use the following customizable press release to let students know that your career center has the magazine in stock and that you want them to come in to visit! Just fill in the text set apart by brackets ( [ ] ) to personalize the release for your office.

In spite of the positive outlook, Koncz cautions against sitting back and waiting for a job. "Students need to be proactive in the job search; they can start by going to their campus career center for guidance and resources.

Network: You'll gain an edge by building a network that can help you learn about organizations and their opportunities. Your network contacts may help you get your resume into the right hands or your foot in the door. In fact, many employers reward their current employees for referring candidates. And, your network can help you throughout your career.

In the latest issue of Job Choices, you'll find information on the job market for the class of 2007 (including what employers say you can do to make yourself a more attractive candidate), resume and interview advice, tips on completing online applications, and more.

Plus, you can use the Job Choices magazines to identify employers interested in new college graduates. Open your copy of Job Choices and narrow your job search by using the "Opportunities by Employer" index, and target a specific organization. Or, target a specific occupation with the help of the "Opportunities by Occupation" index. Looking for opportunities in a specific part of the country? Scan the "Opportunities by Location" index, where employers are listed by country, state, and city. Find out about the culture, history, and work of companies by surfing your way to employer web sites with the "Employer Web Site" index.

Employer: benchmarking internships; background checks and the law; students with disabilities; using new media to recruit the millennials, developing an effecctive university relations program; creating marketing that drives student participation, and many more.

College: branding and marketing a new office; creating an alumni-student connection; make your web site more effective; sexual orientation and career decision making; combining high touch with high tech, strengthening liberal arts education with business principles, and much, much more.

Career staffs are expected to exercise sound judgment and fairness in maintaining the confidentiality of student information, regardless of the source, including written records, reports, and computer data bases.

All students, regardless of personal or educational background, should be provided by career staffs with equal and full access to information on career opportunities and types of employing organizations. Career staffs are also expected to inform you how and where to obtain information which may influence your decisions about an employing organization.

Employers are expected to maintain the confidentiality of student information, regardless of the source, including personal knowledge, written records/reports, and computer data bases. An employer shouldn't disclose information about you to another organization without your prior written consent, unless necessitated by health and/or safety considerations.

Employers are expected to provide accurate information about their organizations and employment opportunities. This includes, but is not limited to, positions available, responsibilities, career advancement opportunities, and benefits.

If an employer is required by changing conditions to revoke a job offer that you've accepted, you're entitled to a fair and equitable course of action. That can include, but is not limited to, financial assistance and outplacement service.

Appear for all interviews, on campus and elsewhere, unless unforeseeable events prevent you from doing so. And, if you can't make the interview because of an unforeseeable event, notify your career center or the employer at the earliest possible moment.

When you an accept an offer, you should have every intention of honoring that commitment. Accepting an offer only as a precautionary measure is misleading to the employer and may restrict opportunities for others who are genuinely interested in that employer.

If you accept an offer or decide that full-time graduate or professional studies are for you, notify your career center and withdraw from the on-campus recruiting process immediately. And, let employers that are actively considering you for a job know that you are now out of the running.

It's best to review a site's privacy policy before publishing any personal information. Make sure you know who will have access to your information (and under what circumstances) and whether you can remove information or photos at a later date.

NACE Principles for Professional Conduct for Career Services and Employment Professionals The following is an annotated version of the Principles for Professional Conduct. Articles related to various parts of the Principles are indicated as Related Links below.

Career services professionals will exercise sound judgment and fairness in maintaining the confidentiality of student information, regardless of the source, including written records, reports, and computer data bases.

The idea for the Users Guide to the Principles for Professional Conduct first was conceived in the early 1990s, at the time when the Principles for Professional Conduct document was undergoing a major overhaul. The committee working on this project thought it would be helpful to have a companion piece which explained in more detail the thinking underlying the profession's ethical principles.

The NACE Principles for Professional Conduct Committee has developed this guide to help NACE members and others in the fields of career services and human resources/staffing determine the right course of action.

The Principles for Professional Conduct for Career Services and Employment Professionals, provides ethical standards for our profession. It is a set of "rules" for career services and human resources/staffing professionals and third-party recruiters.

These principles are based on the fundamental moral tenets of fairness, truthfulness, and lawfulness; they include respect for human autonomy, privacy, and dignity; and they disallow abuse, injury, and mistreatment.

It is common to be caught in an ethical dilemma. Ethical dilemmas often come about when we find ourselves pulled between competing moral duties, or when organizational expectations or personal needs conflict with accepted ethical practices. There are also occasions when an action we are contemplating "feels" wrong, although we are not certain why. In these instances, a clarification of our professional ethical code can help in solving the dilemma.

This reference letter is provided at the request of (or with the written authorization of) [name of former employee]. It is my understanding that [individual's name] has applied for the position of [job title] with your organization. The information contained in this letter is confidential and should be treated as such. It should not be disclosed to anyone within your organization who would not be involved in the hiring decision regarding this individual. Moreover, it should not be disclosed to anyone outside of your organization without the written consent of [individual's name].

This reference letter is provided at the written request of [name of student], who has asked me to serve as a reference on [his/her] behalf. It is my understanding that [name of student] is being considered by your organization for the position of [job title]. Please be advised that the information contained in this letter is confidential and should be treated as such. The information should not be disclosed to [name of student, if student has waived access] or anyone in your organization who would not be involved in the hiring decision regarding this individual. Additionally, the information should not be disclosed to anyone outside of your organization without the consent of the student.

If a student has waived his or her right to inspect or gain access to a letter of reference, avoid reviewing the letter or giving opinions to the student on whether the letter is positive or negative. Explain to the student that by waiving his or her right to inspect, he or she cannot expect to obtain information about the letter from you or your staff.

Obtain signed written consent to disclose student credential files, resumes, transcripts, or letters of reference, before disclosing such information. Written consents are not necessary for release of "directory information" (e.g., name, address, major, activities, and awards) from the credential file.

Establish a time period and procedure for maintaining information contained in student credential files and a systematic procedure for destroying such records. Advise students of your record-retention policy.

Advise employers that your office does not verify student credentials or conduct reference or background checks on students. If you agree to verify students' credentials, be sure your verification process is thorough. Only agree to verify that to which you have access-for example, grades, courses taken, major, and on-campus activities. Don't become a "guarantor of the student's behavior."

If you are aware of student conduct or information about the student that you believe may be of concern to an employer, counsel the student as to whether it is appropriate for him or her to divulge the information. Do not make the decision on your own.

Designate one or two individuals to respond to all reference inquiries. Advise all employees, especially members of management who may be called upon to give a reference, to be aware that they are not authorized to give references. Advise these individuals that they must refer all reference inquiries to the designated individuals.

Prior to providing a reference, obtain consent from the person about whom the reference will be given. If you are unaware that the job applicant has named you as a reference, ask the prospective employer for verification that the individual has given consent for the reference. Such verification could include a copy of the student's signed application listing you as a reference, your name listed as a reference on the student's resume, or verbal confirmation by the student to you.

Discuss the type of reference that you will provide with the person who asks you to be a reference. If you cannot provide a good reference, be honest with the individual. Don't promise a "glowing reference" and them provide merely a "glimmer."

If references are handled in a centralized fashion, advise the prospective employer that even though you may be named as a reference, your organization's policy prohibits you from providing the reference.

If "to whom it may concern" reference letters are requested, document that this is the type of reference requested and that the student or job applicant takes responsibility for disseminating the letters to the proper persons.

Avoid giving personal opinions or feelings. If you make subjective statements or give opinions because they are requested, clearly identify them as opinions and not as fact. If you give an opinion explain the incident or circumstances on which you base the opinion.

Do not include information that might indicate an individual's race, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, citizenship status, sex (unless by the individual's name it is obvious), or marital status. Do not base an opinion of performance on stereotypes about an individuals, for instance "for a woman, she excels in math."

REFERENCES: Whether it is a letter from a faculty member evaluating a student's work in class, an evaluation of a student teacher on a teaching assignment, or a report from an employer on a student's progress in his/her cooperative education assignment, what can the evaluator say or write? Reference writers want to know if they will get in trouble if they write that the person has a performance problem or needs to improve in certain areas.

For example, a student has a cooperative education assignment in a publishing company. After the first three months, the student is evaluated and her supervisor identifies certain areas for improvement, discusses the evaluation with her, and places it in her personnel file at the company. Over the course of the assignment, which spans several semesters, three more evaluations occur and are placed in the student's file. Her performance is uneven, and each of the evaluations indicates her weak areas. At the end of the assignment, the vice president of the company has to determine if the student will be offered a full-time position after graduation. To make this determination, he asks the supervisor to share with him the student's written performance evaluations. Based on the evaluations, the student is not hired for a full-time position.

The supervisor shares these evaluations with the school's cooperative education coordinator and the student's adviser. The adviser works with the student on some of her weak areas. Later, when asked to give a reference, the adviser prepares the reference outlining the student's strengths and weaknesses based on the adviser's own observations and on information contained in the supervisor's performance evaluations.

This letter becomes part of the student's credential file, which is communicated to other employers. After a year, the student remains unemployed Does this scenario sound familiar? How appropriate are the supervisor's and the adviser's actions? How would the law look at this scenario?

"Harm to one's reputation" must result in some tangible harm to the person, e.g. loss of money, business, or employment. A substantially true statement may be defamatory if it is incomplete and misleading.

The general rule is that no defamation is committed unless the statement is written or spoken to someone other than the person about whom the statement is made. This can be a communication within a company or institution or a communication outside of an organization.

Some courts have held that if the communication is among managerial personnel of the same organization and concerns business issues, such as performance problems of employees, it is not a publication to a third person.

That is, while the remarks may still be untrue, if the conditions of the privilege are met, the communicator has a complete defense against the defamation claim. A qualified privilege to the communication exists as long as the speaker makes the communication in good faith and has a public or private duty, or legal, moral, or social obligation to do so, and as long as the person receiving the information has a corresponding duty or interest in the communication. Some courts have held that qualified privilege applies to personnel evaluation information or intra-company communications regarding an employee's fitness.

A statement loses its privileged character if the communicator is motivated by ill will, if there is excessive communication of the statement, or if it is made without grounds for believing it is true. The issue is not only the factual accuracy of the statement.

An employee must also show that substantial evidence exists that the supervisor made his statements without believing them to be true or that he lacked grounds for belief in the truth of the statements.

For example, qualified privilege applies when a current employer discloses the reason for an employee's discharge to a prospective employer, and when a supervisor is informed of his/her employee's improper conduct. The privilege may be lost if the defamatory communication reaches people who do not have a legitimate interest in the subject.

The first communication is made in the performance evaluations, which are sent from the supervisor to the vice president of the division so he can make a hiring decision. This is an intra-company communication given to an individual in the company who has a legitimate interest in the information. Unless the student can show that there was ill will underlying the evaluations-that the supervisor had an ax to grind with the student-this communication is qualified.

Had the supervisor sent these performance evaluations unsolicited to others in the company who did not request the information or had no reason to obtain the information, qualified privilege would be lost due to excessive publication. If the supervisor made inaccurate statements, and verification for accuracy was practical, then qualified privilege would also be lost.

If the agreement between the school and the employer specifically states that reports will be made to the school regarding the student's progress, then the adviser has a contractual right to this information.

It is not clear under the law whether the adviser should be receiving these reports if there is no agreement for him to do so. One could argue that there is an educational need to know; that is, the adviser needs to have this information to work with the student in her weak areas. I suggest that the student be told this communication will occur and advised of its purpose.

It is not clear whether an adviser's reference to a prospective employer would be given the same qualified privilege as a prior employer's communication to a prospective employer. In any event, the reference letter is subject to the conditions of qualified privilege.

Certainly, it was communicated to other individuals with a good-faith need to know. In fact, the student controlled who would receive it by placing it in her credential file. It would be different if the adviser were sending the letter to employers or providing employers with the information indiscriminately. The flaw is the use of the supervisor's performance evaluations as part of the letter. The adviser did not collect this information, nor did he make an attempt to verify its accuracy. The result could be a loss of qualified privilege.

The current situation: Twenty-six states have passed reference immunity legislation, which essentially provides protection from civil lawsuits against employers who provide references on former employees. Individuals other than employers who provide references must rely on the common law defenses-truth or qualified privilege-against charges of defamation.

Evaluations of an individual's performance, whether at work or in the classroom, are an integral part of the world of work and education. Communication of this information is necessary and appropriate.

There is nothing illegal about using this information and communicating it to individuals who need it to make employment decisions. The only caveat is to make sure the information is correct and disclosed only to those individuals who need to know.

The answers to these questions lie in another set of questions: Who will see this information? Is that person entitled to the information? What is the purpose of the information? Is the information accurate? Is the information misleading?

A statement also loses its privileged character if the communicator is motivated by ill will, if there is excessive communication of the statement, or ifthe statement is made without a reasonable belief that it is true.

For a statement to be defamatory, it must be shown that substantial evidence exists that the supervisor knowingly lied or had no idea (reckless disregard for the truth) whether the statement was true.

Reference letters should be communicated in good faith to other individuals with a need to know. In fact, the student controlled who would receive it by placing it in her credential file, and the adviser cannot provide employers with the information indiscriminately.

Reference providers who become concerned about defamation liability may fall into another trap. They may overcompensate and provide a glowing reference, when in fact the student may have done something wrong or been a problem performer.

The court found that a reference should give the complete picture, especially if there is good reason to believe that the prospective employee will cause physical harm to others. The alternative, the court said, is to refuse to provide a reference.

Moreover, providing references for only certain individuals based upon race, age, sex, national origin, disability, or religion, will expose the reference provider to potential liability. Individuals who provide references that seem to be generally positive for members of certain groups and generally negative for members of other groups on a consistent basis could be liable for discrimination.

Prospective employers requesting information should not ask for information that they could not request from the job applicant. However, the prospective employer may ask questions regarding dependability, absentee record, and use of drugs/alcohol on the job. If the position involves the safety and security of others, questions pertaining to violent behaviors can be asked.

Note: The following text is to help you guide your students in their dealings with third-party recruiters. NACE college members can reprint or adapt this text in a printed publication or on their web sites without seeking reprint permission. All others should contact Claudia Allen at callen@naceweb.org.

Employment Agencies: Employment agencies list positions for a number of organizations and receive payment when a referred candidate is hired. The fee for listing a position is paid either by the firm listing the opening or by the candidate who is hired. If the job listing does not include the phrase "fee paid," be sure to ask who pays the fee before signing any papers.

Search Firms: A search firm contracts with employers to find and screen qualified persons to fill specific positions. The fee is paid by the employer. Search firm representatives will identify the employer they represent.

Resume Referral Firms: A resume referral firm collects information on job seekers and forwards it to prospective employers. Data can be contained in resumes or on data forms (either paper or electronic).

The employer, job seeker, or both may pay fees. You must give the firm written permission to pass your resume to employers. Your permission should include a statement that expressly states to whom and for what purpose the information can be used.

How many job openings are there for someone in my field? If you have the opportunity, inquire about the positions being filled or the number of openings related to your field. These are important questions because, in some instances, recruiters may not really have the type or number of openings they advertise. They may be more interested in adding your name to their candidate pool as a means of attracting more employers or clients to their services. Or they may be collecting resumes from students for potential job opportunities. (Name of your institution/career center) does not allow third-party recruiters to interview students unless they are trying to fill actual job openings.

How is this information being used? A third-party recruiter is allowed legally to share your resume with the contract employer for positions that you are actually seeking. The recruiter must tell you, in clear terms, that your materials and information will not be shared outside the organization or used for any purpose other than with the company they represent at the time they interview you. The third-party recruiter cannot sell your information to anyone else. You may choose to authorize the recruiter to share your data elsewhere, but your authorization should be given to the recruiter in writing.

Are candidates treated equally and fairly? If you are qualified for the job opportunity, the third-party recruiter must pass your information to employers without regard to your race, color, national origin, religion, age, gender, sexual orientation, or disability.

Over the past 10 years college recruiting has undergone almost revolutionary changes as electronic tools such as web sites, resume data bases, job listing services, and applicant tracking systems have become imbedded throughout every aspect of the recruitment process.

In this process, there is a widening gap between employer practices that respond to the key values of productivity and efficiency, and student expectations that the recruitment process should engage them in a personalized manner consistent with their unique potential.

Students' opinions of employers are greatly shaped by the treatment they receive during the application and hiring processes. These college students want personal attention that is not currently met by job-search boards or through online applications. Because of this, growing numbers of college students purposely avoid certain employers due to their negative opinions of recruitment techniques.

The results of a web-based survey of college recruiters that was developed by the Committee (see appendix for detailed summary) strongly reinforce the central place of electronic recruiting on today's college campus.

Employers overall were most interested in using technology to promote current job openings, create an overall recruiting brand, and communicate information about typical job openings to prospective candidates.

Nationally-focused recruiters overall indicated that they thought electronic recruiting was more important to their recruitment efforts than did locally focused recruiters. Locally focused recruiters said they valued having typical job descriptions available for prospective candidates more than national recruiters did.

Overall, employers reported they had the most success in providing listings of current openings, creating an overall recruiting brand, and providing background information about their organizations to candidates with an online The survey illustrated that several aspects of electronic recruiting have posed overall challenges to employers, including developing applicant data bases for future openings, creating applicant tracking systems, encouraging candidates to reapply for future openings, and managing their overall recruiting brand.

National recruiters were more likely to encounter brand management challenges than local recruiters, while local recruiters found developing applicant data bases for future openings and applicant tracking posed more difficulty than did the national recruiters.

Local recruiters reported having a higher level of success in managing their recruiting brand than national employers, while national recruiters reported greater success with online application systems than local recruiters.

Recruiters reported five challenges they had most often "effectively mastered," including three of these concerns: integrating electronic and overall college recruiting, managing applicant volume, and effective and timely applicant screening.

Several sources reinforce that students are increasingly concerned that electronic recruiting strategies are impersonal and do not satisfy their needs for human interaction in the initial recruiting process.

Technological advances such as online applications, video conferencing, and e-mail have changed the ways in which employers interact with students. Although millennial college students are comfortable with technology in their everyday life, one cannot assume that they want technology to rule their job search.

This is a generation that is accustomed to being told, "you're special." They have established close relationships with their parents who have encouraged their need for individual attention. According to Millenials Rising, the Next Great Generation by Neil Howe and Richard Strauss, millenials have always felt themselves to be the focus of public attention.

Many career centers have seen this issue evident in greater student demand for individual appointments. The question is, will this group be satisfied with a recruitment process that is moving toward a focus on employer productivity and efficiency?

A student survey by the Scott Resources Group, for example, rated none of the typical electronic tools with over a 50 percent rating, and singled out video conferencing, job search boards, and online application processes as particularly troubling to students, with respective negative ratings of 91 percent, 84 percent, and 72 percent.

This shows that technology is appreciated by students when used in the context of a personal connection with an employer. When receiving personal e-mail from a representative of the employer, students feel valued as individuals. This kind of attention gives the student an initial positive opinion of the company culture. When students are treated in a generic way, they are concerned that this is the way the employer would treat them as employees.

Dave Lefkow of TMP Worldwide suggests that companies use technology to personalize the process. They should avoid the "go to our web site" philosophy used by some employers at career fairs. Instead, Lefkow suggests using the company web site to help establish the organization's brand and give job seekers an understanding of the work environment. The employer must then follow up with some high-touch techniques to reinforce this brand.

To explore these issues further, the Committee conducted student focus groups with a cross section of students from Clark University, a small New England liberal arts college. Participating students represented a broad range of academic disciplines and had a variety of career interests.

While many of the undergraduate and graduate students recognized the value of information access afforded by the use of the Internet in their job searches, many also complained of the dehumanizing nature of the electronic recruitment process.

Students also commented about the amount of time required to complete online applications and the generic nature of the response or lack of any follow-up or feedback. Some students expressed concern that the applicant could not ever really get a good feel for the organization and that face-to-face contact with people is the best way to convey the organizations' values.

One student argued that the recruitment process could be outlined on the web site so that individuals would understand when and how they would be contacted. Another participant suggested that instead of a job seeker receiving a generic e-mail automatically generated from a department, the applicant could receive a personal e-mail enabling the applicant to feel closer to the company and more in control of the selection process.

In addition, focus group participants believe companies that did not post job opportunities on their company web sites, but do offer online applications, should include a step called a "preliminary inquiry." In this inquiry, an applicant would briefly describe his or her background and goals. The employer would return an e-mail encouraging the job seeker to complete the application or tell the job seeker that his or her skills/interests weren't currently a match for the company.

The topic of web site content validity came up again and again with the focus group. Dates associated with job descriptions and openings should be revisited frequently in order to ensure that the candidates have the most up-to-date information.

The focus group participants reinforced the need that valuable time needs to be spent on both sides: applying to the jobs and responding to those who have shared their time, skills, and other personal information, etc., in the application process. Right now the perception is that the electronic recruitment process is one-sided.

It is clear that both employers and students have solidly-formed opinions on the issue of electronic recruitment. Employers are primarily concerned with productivity and efficiency while students expect a more personalized experience. This provides the college career center with a prime opportunity to add value as they help employers and students connect with each other in the job-search process.

While traditional recruitment methods have relied heavily on career center involvement to succeed, some have suggested that the emerging recruiting technology allows for a diminished role for college career centers, with employers marketing themselves directly to students.

Learning Resources Inc., suggested "a career center may offer the student useful training in interviewing or help them discuss choices, but [contact with the career center] is really not necessary for corporate recruiters."

Wheeler asserts that traditional on-campus recruiting is expensive and inefficient. He sees the role of the career center as changing from the "gatekeeper to the corporation" to a provider of career development counseling." According to Wheeler, the career center can assist students in adapting to the changing nature of recruitment by providing them with online tools and instructing them on how to conduct a job search using technology. Wheeler suggests that employers maintain a connection with career centers. He acknowledges that career centers have an influence on student opinion. He maintains a positive relationship between employer and career center can help the employer maintain a presence on campus, albeit a virtual one.

The gap between the efficiency demands on employers and the personalization expectations of students suggests a better alternative to Wheeler's recommendations. Electronic recruitment tools promise greater efficiency in executing the large number of transactions imbedded in the recruiting process, and thus provide effective ways to collect and disseminate resumes, post information related to current openings, provide background information on employers, and schedule interviews. The emergence of sophisticated tools in these areas over the past 10 years does not replace the need to build long-term recruiting relationships between employers and schools, since these relationships are critical to success in the highly competitive market that all demographic predictions describe in the upcoming decade.

As electronic recruiting tools have become standard, career centers are challenged to help students understand how employers are using these tools. It is especially important to address students' inaccurate or counterproductive assumptions that could lead to unnecessary barriers in their job-search process.

This also includes addressing the privacy issues (the subject of another white paper written by this committee). Likewise, career centers should help employers understand how their electronic recruiting practices potentially function to create such barriers, including developing partnerships with employers to minimize such barriers and to take advantage of the network of faculty, staff, and alumni resources that can be so critical in an effectively operating recruiting program.

For example, both employers and students are concerned about using electronic recruiting to personalize rather than depersonalize the recruiting process. This offers a key opportunity for career centers to develop concrete, clear interventions that help both of these key constituents understand each other's perspectives and communicate effectively across this gap. This is likely to be one of the greatest ongoing challenges as electronic recruiting technology expands, and presents the best opportunity for colleges to work with key recruiters to help them understand, manage, and respond to student expectations.

It is interesting to note that in the committee's survey of employers, recruiters who indicated success in their online application process specifically stated that they have a "strict online philosophy" and they "don't accept resumes."

Conversely, a recruiter who indicated her organization was experiencing challenges with its online applications process stated that because, "all applicants do not apply online, we still must maintain a file of paper resumes, which are not so easily sorted." These examples emphasize the challenges implicit in moving to an electronic application process. Although the process can be more effective when employers solely use an online application system, recruiters noted the applicants' desire for a more personal approach indicating that, "Many candidates reply to a personal e-mail but fail to submit to our online employment data base" and "The most difficult thing is getting people to the web site to apply. They want to send resumes, not search for jobs."

The overlap suggests that these challenges may define a shared space where best practices are both critical and emerging. It may be particularly fruitful to focus on these challenges in conference presentations, networking activities, and future research.

Even given the limitations of self-reported success, it is clear that there are a number of successful examples (and a few less than successful ventures) related to most of the aspects examined in the employer survey. It is critical for NACE and the regional ACEs to facilitate and support an ongoing dialogue to identify and share best practices in order for employers, colleges, and students to benefit in the future from this technological investment.

Some colleges may be responding to the expansion of electronic recruiting by de-emphasizing employer relations activities and responsibilities, while others may be returning to older "placement" models that de-emphasize student development services. While there is no universal model, it is clear that a dialogue among college members reflecting upon the appropriate balance between these activities may be important to assert appropriate influence in institutional decision-making processes.

It is also clear that NACE and the regional ACEs should provide an ongoing forum to discuss several issues raised in this white paper, particularly as they relate to the issues of recruiting efficiency versus personalized communications. Ideally our practices will develop in a way that integrates both rather than these being in opposition.

In any case, there is no doubt that a continuing dialogue concerning the issues and opportunities raised by electronic recruiting is essential. One way to facilitate this dialogue could be to initiate regional round tables to bring together students, employers, career center professionals, and leaders in higher education.

The first step to improving electronic recruitment for all parties lies in communication and strategic planning. It is the hope of The NACE Technology Committee that this white paper supports this effort.

The Principles for Professional Conduct document says students/clients should not be charged for career services by a third party. Fees should be paid by the employing organization. Third-party career counseling/job-search arrangements are not unethical or inappropriate for alumni. In this case, the job-search firm approached the alumni office. Any college/university office, including the career services office, may be approached by a vendor wishing to offer products or services to students or alumni.

Is there an implied endorsement, even though the alumni office (or any university office) may not back the third-party service? Will alumni assume the service is reputable because of its association with the university or college?

A potential conflict of interest exists when a college or university department takes a rebate for referring graduates or students to a third-party organization. Even if the department does not endorse the third-party service, alumni/students may question whether the vendor was chosen for its quality or for the rebate it offers. Although some campus offices need to raise money or increase revenues, the Principles Committee recommends that departments avoid accepting rebates for referred clients.

Many colleges have exclusive arrangements with vendors that provide services and products, such as beverages and snack foods, so such an arrangement is not a foreign concept. However, it is important to remember that the Principles for Professional Conduct document says that a system of open, free selection of candidates is an important fundamental in career services. The Principles Committee recommends that departments refrain from endorsing any one vendor and make it clear in writing to all concerned-the third-party firm as well as alumni.

If the alumni office chooses to endorse the third-party firm, the department implies that it has reviewed the vendor's services and judged them to be competent and ethical. In most cases, professionals in the career services center are better qualified to examine and judge a third party's offer of career development and job-search services. Minimally, the alumni office should consult with the career center staff before offering an endorsement.

If your answer is "yes," then it is advisable that you find out how resumes will be handled. The alumni office has an obligation to find out how resumes will be used by the service provider. The vendor should be asked if resumes will be forwarded to help locate jobs or if they will be sold. If the service were working directly with the career center and current students, the redistribution of resumes without a student's consent would be considered an unacceptable practice.

The vendor's intentions should be clearly spelled out in the contract with the college or university office. It must be clear that the firm needs written consent from each participating graduate or alumni before a resume can be passed to a potential employer or a resume data base.

The Principles Committee recognizes that the ultimate goal of career centers is to help students, and when possible, alumni, secure the most effective and professional career development services available. The Principles for Professional Conduct document provides the foundation for safeguarding the rights and well-being of students and graduates when any campus office engages in the career development process. When an outside service provider wishes to provide career services through the alumni office or another campus department, the career center staff can work collaboratively with that office to make sure that alumni are receiving the best services possible.

I value the benefits that I receive through my membership in the National Association of Colleges and Employers (NACE) and I highly recommend that you join. NACE is a member-driven nonprofit association that provides resources, including publications, professional development events, and products and services.

Taking advantage of NACE's resources, career development opportunities, and contacts will help you succeed and achieve your professional goals. Now more than ever, membership in an organization such as NACE can help safeguard a career.

I am eligible as my organization is a member of NACE, and I have worked in recruitment/employment or in a combination of recruitment/employment and the career services fields for at least three years.

Class size is strictly limited to 60 participants in order to maximize the educational value of the program. It is strongly recommended that you mail or fax your registration form to NACE as soon as possible. You can see a copy of the preliminary schedule.

Tuition is $1,849 for NACE members. This rate includes a single occupancy guestroom with complementary Internet access, five continental breakfasts, five lunches and the opening dinner on Sunday, and all materials used during the program.

This session will help you understand some of the more practical aspects of transitioning into management in your group. Topics include: supervision of students and direct reports, performance management reviews ,motivation, negotiation skills and conflict management.

Various aspects of career center management, particularly efforts to connect students with employers, have legal and ethical implications for practitioners. Use working case studies to discusss actions and consequences surrounding career center management.

This section of the MLI program focuses on learning how to develop your own self. We will discuss communicating your talents and skills to perpetuate your professional future, how to balance work and the other functions of your life, setting and achieving goals personally and professionally, learning to enjoy who you are and what you do, and realizing that your career is a journey and not a destination.

This online form is designed to make it easy to apply for the NACE Management Leadership Institute. This is not a form you can submit online. Use your computer to complete the form. When you click the "print" button, the form will be printed by the printer in your office. Sign the form, then mail or fax it to NACE.

Roundtable. NACE invites its employer members and relevant others in and around the host organization's area to attend the roundtable. NACE sends out invitations by e-mail approximately seven weeks prior to the roundtable.

Follow up: Participants are asked to complete a questionnaire when they register. After the roundtable, NACE will provide all participants with results from those questionnaires along with a list of participants to promote additional networking.

"It came at 5 p.m. as I was getting ready to take these important people out to dinner," says Hansen, now the director of recruiting for Deloitte & Touche. "It was my boss letting me know that at 9 a.m. the next day, our company would be filing Chapter 11 [bankruptcy].

Bates Parker has been a career services practitioner for 25 years, including 19 years as a director. During that time, many things have changed within the profession, including the diversity of the practitioners.

"Many of us who have interacted with Linda over the years have recognized that hers has truly been a national voice, especially on issues relating to career development, recruitment, retention, and work force diversity," explains Tim Luzader, director of the center for career opportunities at Purdue University and former NACE President, who nominated Parker for induction in the Academy of Fellows.

Julie Cunningham had a passion for career development. Now president of The Cunningham Group, a firm that provides college relations training and consulting services to employers, she says that passion has only grown.

Cunningham also conducts conference workshops, and her consulting work and recruiter training help college relations managers and recruiters to be productive. In addition, she mentors others working in college recruiting.

In nominating Kathy Sims for induction into the NACE Academy of Fellows, Dave Bechtel explained how she has exceeded the criteria for fellowship on every count: excellence in professional practice, leadership, and advancement of knowledge in the field.

UCLA Career Center, where her initiatives have ranged from championing an early outreach model to include career center sponsorship of numerous student groups to launching an annual campaign and special events, which accounted for a substantial increase in career center revenues.

Sims also is active in national benchmarking networks for university and corporate practitioners, and is a founding faculty member of the Career Services Institute, a professional development program.

Over the years, Bechtel has kept up with the changes in his profession, and his efforts were rewarded this year when he was inducted into the NACE Academy of Fellows. The Academy recognizes career services and human resources professionals for their advancement of knowledge, leadership, and excellence in professional practice.

In his 30 years of overseeing career center operations at the University of Illinois campus, Bechtel has faced a number of challenges, including three recessions and increasingly complicated federal regulations governing the hiring process.

Before joining the Penn State staff, Rayman served as career development and placement center officer for the College of Science and Humanities at Iowa State University, Ames. He also was an assistant professor in research at Western Maryland College.

"The CTA serves as a 'first step' for those in career transition to identify and prioritize required actions for successful employment," says Nancy Wajler, manager of the Glen Ellyn, Illinois school's Career Services Center.

The CTA system identifies seven major components of a career transition: stress management, time/change management, career goal and objectives, research management, resume/portfolio development, networking, and interviewing effectiveness.

"This system provides our career counselors with knowledge and better understanding of their clients allowing for more productive, action-oriented meetings," Wajler says. "Clients can retake the assessment numerous times as they make progress and improvements in the seven key transition areas."

Award for its development of "Golden Opportunities," a program that offers first-year students more than 100 curricular and co-curricular activities relating to three areas: transitioning to college, discovering who I am and building personal skills, and finding the right career for me.

"Golden Opportunities' offerings include workshops, employer and alumni panels, externships, mentoring contacts with alumni, events, and web-based activities designed to help students master the skills necessary for success," explains Melanie Parker, Executive Director of CSEL at the Orlando, Florida school.

Opportunities Career Passport, in which students log their activities, complete reflection exercises, and create a final career action plan that is reviewed by a CSEL staff member. CSEL staff communicate with participants weekly, tracking their progress and coaching them through completion of the program.

Last year, more than 4,300 students participated in the Golden Opportunities program. More than 80 percent reported that the program helped them better define their career and academic goals, and increased their confidence in making academic and career decisions.

Parker says. "In addition, students are declaring majors earlier and at a higher rate than in years past. Following last year's majors' fair, there was a more than 300 percent increase in the number of students declaring majors than in the same period for the previous year."

It also helped teach Carretta the value of strong leadership. In addition to her everyday duties at George Mason, Carretta has served on numerous NACE committees, task forces, and review teams. In addition, she served on the NACE Board of Directors.

As she looked at how the profession was changing during her career, she also saw how critical it was to have people in leadership roles at colleges and universities who could raise the visibility and credibility of career services to make people see the importance of the work career services does. Furthermore, effective leaders were able to demonstrate how critical this work is to the educational mission.

Those who worked with Kaplan or who solicited her guidance know that putting complex information into plain language is one of her gifts. Since 1985, Kaplan has provided critical information and expert guidance to NACE members.

Kaplan served NACE members by providing legal advice about policies, procedures, trademarks, copyrights, contracts, and governance and compliance issues to the NACE Board and staff; writing columns and articles for NACE publications about legal and ethical issues that affect the ways in which career services practitioners and human resources professionals operate; and making numerous presentations at NACE National Meetings, regional conferences, workshops, teleconferences, and web seminars. Her work is the core of the NACE legal department.

As a nonprofit association, NACE strives to provide safe and comfortable accommodations while operating in a fiscally conservative environment. Below is the travel policy for all NACE Board members, Committee members, and employees. This policy includes travel, lodging, and meals for NACE operations.

All expenses should be summarized on form in a legible manner; all original invoices/receipts attached Only approved expenses listed above Completed forms should be sent to NACE through U.S. mail Expense checks will be printed every Thursday and sent out by U.S. mail.

The Foundation is governed by a Board of Trustees composed of members of the National Association of Colleges and Employer's Executive Committee. The Trustees includes college career services and HR/staffing practitioners and the NACE Executive Director. The Trustees are responsible for identifying research and educational priorities and making all funding decisions.

Applicants should describe how data relevant to the project will be collected. Data collection instruments should be described and, if possible, samples of such instruments provided. Methods for data analysis should be clearly explained.

Allowable costs include, for example, printing, postage, telephone, and stipends for researchers. Unallowable costs include indirect institutional expenses, institutional overhead, permanent equipment, and capital expenditures.

Submit a final report electronically, based on research results. NACE will hold the copyright to the research project as written. The researcher may use the data for other research projects upon written approval of the NACE Foundation.

A career center expanding its data base of job postings by linking to an employer's web site or placing an employer's actual job posting on its site; and An individual using e-mail addresses from an online directory to send notices of products, services, publications, or career fairs to individuals listed in the directory.

While the Internet provides people with a wealth of information at the click of a mouse, this access doesn't come without responsibility, including compliance with copyright laws, proper use of proprietary information, and adherence to web site owners' terms and conditions regarding use of their information.

"Original" does not mean novel, creative, or even good; it means that material was developed and formulated by an individual who did not copy it from someone else. A work is fixed in a tangible medium even if it exists only in an electronic format.

"in the public domain." Works in the public domain are strictly limited to government documents and other items for which authors have clearly relinquished their copyright. A web site, other than a government site, offering material (text, data, graphics, and photographs) for the public to read does not put the material in the public domain. Thus, the use or copying of this information requires prior permission from the author, publisher, and/or web site owner.

"Copying" includes photocopying material, attaching it to an e-mail or distributing it to a listserv, and placing it on one's own web site. Some recent court cases have held that linking and framing articles are forms of copying that require permission.

Co. v. Tasini that permission by an author (or publisher) is not carte blanche to use the article in any format. Permission to copy or use an article, regardless of its format, is limited to the purposes for which the original permission was given. For example, if you receive permission to use an article for a staff/student workshop, this permission does not authorize you to place the article on your web site; e-mail it to your entire class, organization, or listserv; or place it in any other publication that you produce.

The "fair use" doctrine permits the reproduction of copyrighted works without permission for certain limited purposes. But there are grave misconceptions regarding fair use, which is a very narrow exception to the copyright protections. Attorneys who investigate copyright violations report being told that "I downloaded this information because I was doing training on this subject for students or employees," or "My listserv was discussing this topic and I knew that this article would be relevant to the discussion."

Such comments indicate a belief that as long as the individual is not selling information from a web page, it is fair use to distribute it free to others-on paper or electronically-for an educational purpose. However, using an article for educational purposes does not justify or provide a defense for unauthorized copying.

The purpose and character of the use. Purpose and character pertain to how a work has been changed transformed when it is posted on a web site or published in another format, and how it is being used, e.g., educationally or commercially. Using text verbatim or charging fees for or obtaining revenues from the use of the copied material weighs against a finding of fair use. The more a work is changed, indicating that the work is being used for research or commentary, the more likely a finding of fair use.

The nature of the copyrighted work. The more creative the work, the more protection the work will be accorded. Conversely, the more informational or functional the work, the broader the scope of the fair use defense. There are instances in which content includes both factual and expressive elements, such as an article on job-search strategies. In these situations, the more creative the article, the more likely it will be protected.

The amount and substantiality of the work used in relation to the copyrighted work as a whole. How much was copied in relation to the entire article or work? Even single articles that are part of a newspaper or magazine have the same protection as individual works, e.g. books. Therefore, copying an entire article weighs against a finding of fair use.

This includes the immediate financial effect and whether unrestricted or widespread use would cause the article to be devalued. If copying fulfills the demand for the original work and diminishes or prejudices the value of it, this is enough to justify a finding against fair use.

They do not want to give the impression that they are endorsing the other sites. "Borrowing" the logo or a trademark to use as a hyperlink also is restricted unless permission is obtained first. One final note on trademark: An important distinction between copyright and trademark law is that trademark law does not provide a fair use exception.

Examples of such information include salary data, survey results, benchmarking information, job postings, and the like. Another example worth noting is user information. Many users voluntarily provide personal data to web sites because they want to be notified when interesting information is added to the sites or they want to network with other individuals. At the same time, they do not want their personal information (such as e-mail address, postal address, telephone number, fax number) to be used for solicitation purposes, placed in another data base, or distributed on a listserv.

To ensure the proper use of this information, web sites are publishing terms and conditions that users must agree to before they can use the sites. These rules prohibit users from distributing information on the sites, via copying, linking, or framing, without the express permission of the site owners. Web sites that have directories of names and addresses typically prohibit the use of these directories as "electronic mailing lists" for purposes of group notification or solicitation of a product, service, or event. Users who do not agree to the terms or fail to adhere to the rules may be barred from the sites.

However, distributing the information to others via e-mail, making multiple printed copies, or placing the information on another web site would amount to the unauthorized use of proprietary information.

This does not authorize career center or commercial web sites to post the opening or create a link to it. Even framing could be a problem because it builds a border around the employer's web page to make it appear as if the information is owned by another site.

Display  This is an opportunity to visually describe your company with photographs and/or graphic creativity. A display is available in full-page four-color, full-page black and white, half-page black and white, and quarter-page black and white. Displays afford a great opportunity to arrest the reader's attention.

Profile  This is a narrative that is available in full-page, half-page or quarter-page sizes. It consists of text that you can tailor to your needs. Describe your organization to best advantage - who you are, what you do, and the employment opportunities you have to offer college graduates. For maximum effectiveness, go beyond that and tell your organization's story completely: size, locations, lines of business, details of entry-level positions, nature of work involved, typical career paths, training and education opportunities, benefits, and life styles associated with your firm and its locale(s).

Employers (NACE) has been the leading source of information about the college-educated work force. NACE offers you unparalleled access to graduating college students through its products and services.

NACE is not responsible for and will not correct HTML code that does not function properly or causes any problems. The client and/or the submitting agency must fix the banner and resubmit it to the NACE Production Department.

Java Applets: NACE web sites will accept banners which load Java applets. NACE requires a minimum of five business days to test banners for performance and stability and will reject any that do not function properly. Banners cannot launch sound without the user clicking on them. If sound is launched after clicking, an "off" button must be available and obvious to the user. NACE reserves the right to define what is obvious and what is not obvious to the user. Any action must be initiated by the user clicking on the banner.

Flash Animation: NACE web sites will accept Flash animation files (.swf). NACE requires a minimum of five business days to test banners for performance and stability and will reject any that do not function properly. Banners cannot launch sound without the user clicking on them. If sound is launched after clicking, an "off" button must be available and obvious to the user. NACE reserves the right to define what is obvious and what is not obvious to the user. Any action must be initiated by the user clicking on the banner. Maximum animation time is fifteen seconds.

NACE web sites meet W3C guidelines for accessibility: all banner ads require an alt tag of up to 10 words. Longer text descriptions, if needed, must be provided on a separate text-only page for vision impaired viewers, hosted on the advertiser's site.

Cookie Technology: Cookies must be limited to one cookie per user per banner. All banners submitted by a third-party agency that use cookie technology must submit a link to the agency's privacy statement page and those that do not comply will have their banner removed immediately.

If your products or services are aimed at career services practitioners who counsel college students or HR/staffing professionals who recruit new graduates, the NACE Journal is your best advertising buy.

Advertisers will be protected at their contracted rates for the duration of their present contracts. If fewer insertions are used within one year than specified in the contract, charges will be adjusted in accordance with established rates.

All advertising must be related to the professional interests of the subscribing constituency of the NACE Journal. The editors reserve the right to reject any advertisement that does not meet the standards of the Journal.

No cancellations will be accepted after closing of contracting for the appropriate issue. All cancellation requests must be in writing and authorized by the publisher. If cancellation of the space reservation is made after the deadline date, the advertiser or authorized agent will be liable for payment of the full billing amount.

Where this contract is executed by an agency, such agency agrees to make full payment for all space reserved. By executing this agreement, the agency affirms its authority to reserve such space on behalf of the advertiser and to bind the advertiser to the terms of this agreement. In the event that the agency fails to make payment for any reason, the advertiser will be obligated to make payment to the National Association of Colleges and Employers for the space reserved by its agent, regardless of whether the advertiser previously made payment to the agency for the space reserved.

As a membership association, NACE does not endorse proprietary products, nor may endorsement be implied in advertising included in any print or electronic publication. NACE or the National Association of Colleges and Employers may not be included in any advertising.

The National Association of Colleges and Employers (NACE) looks to the agency placing the space reservation for payment; however, NACE shall have the right to hold the agency and the employer jointly and separately liable for monies due and payable to NACE. The agency warrants by submitting the space reservation that it and the employer have accepted this responsibility.

By execution of this space reservation contract, the employer agrees that it is an equal opportunity employer. If the employer believes that it is exempt from the requirements of the federal equal employment opportunity laws, it must provide documentation of its exemption.

No endorsement. As a membership association, NACE does not endorse proprietary products, nor may endorsement be implied in advertising included in any print or electronic publication. NACE or the National Association of Colleges and Employers may not be included in any advertising.

The publisher looks to the advertising agency placing the insertion for payment; however, the publisher shall have the right to hold the advertising agency and the advertiser jointly and separately liable for monies due and payable to the publisher, and the agency warrants by submitting the insertion order that it and the advertiser have accepted this responsibility.

The publisher shall not be liable for any costs or damages, if, for any reason, it fails to publish an advertisement. Cancellations may not be made by the advertiser or agency after employer profile is live on JobWeb. Changes to the text of the buyer's guide listing can be made at any time during the term of the contract. Banner advertisments can be changed once every two weeks during the term of the contract.

Spotlight Online is an HTML e-mail newsletter. Advertisers can submit copy for their 25-word message electronically by e-mailing their message to  Laura Czuba. To ensure the accuracy of your message, be sure to provide complete contact information.

The advertiser agrees to pay for all listings in accordance with this contract. Such payment shall be made to the publisher within 30 days of the receipt by the advertiser or authorized agent of sample copy and invoice.

Association of Colleges and Employers (NACE), is a professional conference for HR/staffing and college career services practitioners. NACE reserves the right to determine the eligibility of any company, product, or services and the right to restrict, prohibit, or evict any exhibitor or product which, in the opinion of NACE, detracts from the character of the exposition or for any violation of the following Terms and Conditions. In the event of such restriction or eviction, NACE is not liable for refunding exhibit fees or any other cost incurred by the exhibitor. NACE will not accept advertising for tobacco, alcohol, drugs, or firearms, and/or products/services that promote nudity and/or pornography. Products and services in the exhibit hall must be related to career development or recruitment/selection. A company's participation in the exposition does not reflect a product endorsement by NACE. The exhibitor may not make any statements in print, orally, or electronically that state or imply such endorsement.

No walls, partitions, paintings, decorations, or other obstructions may be erected which will in any way interfere with the view of any other exhibitor. Exhibitors are required to submit their plan in advance for approval by NACE if such plans include the use of unusual effects or methods of production presentation. Exhibitors are required to ensure that their displays do not have a negative impact on the show environment through excessive noise, heat, light, etc.

This includes, but is not limited to, commercial services, products, and ventures provided by college/employer members to increase revenues, and the commercial products, services, and ventures of affiliate members.

Organizations/institutions not complying with this policy will be asked to remove any mention of NACE from their materials; failure to do so could be considered an infringement on NACE's trademarked name. If you have any questions about using NACE copyrighted or trademarked materials, contact Claudia Allen at callen@naceweb.org for a determination.

ASCAP/BMI. Plans for the use of music must be submitted to NACE on or before February 28, 2007. Exhibitors shall have the sole and exclusive responsibility to arrange for obtaining the necessary music licenses and the exhibitor will indemnify and hold harmless NACE for any copyright violations as a result of exhibitor's failure to obtain said music licenses.

Exhibit Space Assignments are made on a first come, first served basis. NACE reserves the right to alter an exhibitor's assigned space if it is deemed necessary in the best interests of the exposition. Before exercising its discretion, NACE will consult with the exhibitor.

Damage to Property caused by an exhibitor will be paid for by that exhibitor. Do not paint, tape, nail, screw, drill, or tack anything to the walls, columns, floor, or ceiling of the building; adjoining displays; or the official contractor's display material.

Americans With Disabilities Act. Exhibitor shall advise NACE no later than one month before the event if exhibitor requires an accommodation due to a disability for access to and around the exhibit area.

Fire Department Regulations must be observed. Display and packing material must be flame-retardant. Electrical equipment must be UL-approved and must be wired by a licensed electrician. Exhibitor shall confine their activities to conform to the specifications set out for the exhibit by the general agreements between NACE and the Anaheim Marriott.

Insurance. All exhibitors, their contractors, and suppliers working in the exhibit hall are required to carry liability and property insurance, and workers' compensation insurance. Exhibitors must operate and maintain their exhibit so that no injury will result to any person or property.

Hazardous and nuisance causing giveaways are prohibited. All exhibitors are strongly urged to obtain full-coverage temporary insurance for their merchandise and displays while in transit and while at the exposition.

Liability. Exhibitor shall make no claim of any kind against NACE, its agents or employees; or the Marriott Marquis, its agents, or employees for any loss, damage, theft, or destruction of goods; nor for any injury that may occur to itself or its employees while in the Exhibit Hall; nor any damage of any nature or character whatsoever, and without limiting the foregoing including any damage to its business by reason of the failure to provide space for an exhibit or removal of the exhibit or for any action of NACE or its participants, agents, or employees in relation to the exhibit or exhibitor.

Indemnification by Exhibitor. Exhibitor shall be solely responsible to its agents and employees and to all third persons, including invitees and the public for all claims, liabilities, actions, costs, damages and expenses arising out of or relating to the custody, possession, operation, maintenance or control of the leased space or exhibit, for negligence or otherwise relating there to. Exhibitor shall indemnify and hold harmless NACE and the exposition location for all liability related to Exhibitors' exhibit or any act or omission of exhibitor or any of its employees or agents; including accident or injury to invitees, guests, exhibitors, their agents, and employees and including loss or damage to personal property.

Food and Beverages must be purchased from Marriott Marquis, unless incident to the exhibitor's product line with written approval of the Marriott Marquis. IMPORTANT: there is no room service from the conference hotel to the exhibit hall. All arrangements for food and beverage for special needs over and above the planned functions must be made with the catering department by April 7, 2007.

Labor and Contractors. Exhibitors that plan to use outside contractors must notify NACE in writing 60 days prior to the exposition. Outside contractors are required to supply verification of liability insurance coverage. All labor must have local union clearance.

Soliciting outside the confines of the exhibitor's assigned space is prohibited. NACE reserves the right to distribute any National Meeting materials and NACE information to all attendees and exhibitors in the exhibit hall.

Competitive Events including but not limited to meetings, social functions, forums, sessions, off-site events, or scheduling attendee transportation which overlap or conflict with any scheduled conference or exposition event is strictly prohibited. Violation of this clause may result in expulsion from the exhibit hall and/or exclusion of the organization from exhibiting at future conferences at the discretion of NACE.

Right to Eject Exhibitors. Exhibitor understands and agrees that their attendance and participation at the exhibition must comply with all provisions of this Contract. If NACE determines the exhibitor is in breach of this Contract, NACE may terminate this Contract and eject the exhibitor from the show floor without a refund or liability to NACE. Exhibitor understands that a condition of exhibiting is adhering to proper exhibitor conduct at all times while participating in the show. Proper conduct includes, but is not limited to: exhibitor staying within the confines of his/her designated booth space, not soliciting attendees outside of your booth, not occupying another exhibitor's booth, or not distributing materials outside the designated booth area. Such activity will be deemed improper conduct and will be grounds for the exhibitor being removed from the exhibit floor at NACE's sole discretion.

Exhibitor Registration is limited to sales, marketing, management and special booth personnel. NACE reserves the right to limit the number of exhibitor personnel. Additional personnel will be required to purchase full conference registrations.

Installation, Show, and Dismantling hours and dates shall be those specified by NACE. Packing of exhibits prior to the close of the exposition is prohibited. Exhibitor shall be liable for all storage and handling charges for failure to remove exhibits by specified time and date.

Governing Law and Jurisdiction. This agreement shall be governed by the internal laws of Pennsylvania. The parties hereby submit to the exclusive jurisdiction of the state and federal courts in Pennsylvania governing any disputes concerning this agreement, and further agree that they are subject to personal jurisdiction in Pennsylvania in any such dispute.

Merger Clause. The parties agree that this Agreement (and, any other Agreement referred to herein), contain the complete agreement between the parties and supersede any prior understandings, agreements, or representations by or between the parties, written or oral, which may have related to the subject matter hereof in any way.

Cancellation of Exposition. If NACE should be prevented from holding the exposition for any reason beyond NACE's control (such as, but not limited to damage to building, riots, strikes breached by exposition location, acts of government, or acts of God), then NACE has the right to cancel the exposition or any part thereof, with no further liability to the exhibitor other than a refund of exhibit fees less a proportionate share of the exposition cost incurred.

Association of Appointments Secretaries, after the British position title, "appointments secretary," also known as "placement director" in this country. Of the 12 representatives who founded the pioneer organization, 11 were women. Their primary concern was teacher placement.

University of Pennsylvania, helped to establish the Pennsylvania Association of School and College Placement. He also was the editor of the first edition of School and College Placement, the first formal attempt to establish a national communications vehicle among all interested recruiters and placement officials.

In the 1990s, CPC continued to expand its services including roundtables for employers, a one-week management training program for career services, more research studies, and the introduction of JobWeb, the association's first Internet web site.

NACE is governed by a Board of Regional Directors consisting of one representative from each regional association plus six at-large directors and five officers. The Board of Directors meets twice a year.

NACE is the leading source of information for career services practitioners on college campuses who advise students and alumni in career development and the employment process, and for human resources professionals who recruit and hire college graduates. NACE represents the interest of more than 1,800 college career services offices at four-year, two-year, technical, and graduate schools and more than 1,000 HR/staffing functions in business, industry, nonprofit organizations, and government.

NACE provides research and information to its professional members through NACEWeb, quarterly surveys of starting salary offers to new college graduates, a quarterly journal, a biweekly newsletter, and surveys of employer and college members.

Vocational Rehabilitation Act of 1973 prohibits the federal government and federal contractors from discriminating against qualified individuals with disabilities and requires these employers to provide reasonable accommodations to disabled employees.

Buckley Amendment, protects the privacy of students from the indiscriminate collection, maintenance, and disclosure (release) of personally identifiable student information. The law gives students the right to inspect their educational records and prohibits educational institutions from disclosing a student's record without the student's consent.

EEOC, the U.S. departments of Labor and Justice, the Civil Service Commission and the Office of Revenue Sharing adopt Uniform Guidelines on Employee Selection Procedures (UGESP). The guidelines protect the rights of job applicants and employees to be selected on the basis of job-related standards. They require employers to justify the use of tests or other selection procedures that disproportionately exclude members of protected classes.

Act. IRCA states that employers can be sanctioned and fined for hiring illegal aliens, and prohibits employers from discriminating against those who are authorized to work on the basis of national origin or citizenship.

With Disabilities Act (ADA) gives civil rights protections to individuals with disabilities similar to those provided to individuals on the basis of race, color, sex, national origin, age, and religion. It guarantees equal opportunity for individuals with disabilities in public accommodations, employment, transportation, state and local government services, and telecommunications.

National Association of Colleges and Employers, recognizing the new structure as well as the value of both member constituencies. JobWeb, NACE's new web site, goes live. Individual membership is offered to staff at member organizations.

Management and shareholders, among others, now hold the college recruiting function of organizations accountable for how staff spend time, how they recruit, and the number of successful candidates they bring to the organization, explains Vanessa Strauss, senior advisor to director and deputy director, division of administration for the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and NACE Past President.

Innovations in technology have been and will continue to be an integral part of the forward progression of the career services and HR/staffing profession as well as the association. Could those who published the first issues of School and College Placement in black and white have envisioned the colorful magazine that the NACE Journal has become? Telephone technology now enables NACE committees and task forces to hold conference calls, saving time and the cost of bringing people together from all over the country. Those attending the first programs offered by NACE probably would have been skeptical if told that the association eventually would offer virtual seminars that members could attend without leaving their offices.

Established in June 1994, the NACE Academy of Fellows recognizes those individuals who have contributed to the career services and HR/staffing professions through the advancement of knowledge, leadership, or excellence in professional practice.

Has she ever. In fact, for Camacho, that's nothing new. Camacho was one of seven children growing up in rural Texas. Her father was a custodian; her mother a housewife. Her family also worked as migrant workers who took jobs as far away as California. It was hard work.

"I didn't want to work in fields the rest of my life," Camacho says. "I wanted to be educated. My life helped me to develop a strong work ethic, but I didn't have support [as a college student] because I was first-generation."

As SCCC's director of career services and cooperative education, Camacho would attend functions with a white co-worker. People who met the pair automatically assumed that the co-worker was the director, Camacho says.

"In the 27 years that I've been in this field, I've had to stand up for students and be an advocate for them, especially in discrimination issues," Camacho explains. "These are people making positive changes in their lives. Through my work, I've forced myself to be more comfortable with who I am."

Camacho strives to serve all students as effectively as possible. Of today's minority students, Camacho says, "They are more aware of their options. Many of them are first-generation [college students], and a lot of them didn't know what was out there. But today, they have broadened opportunities, experience outside what they have traditionally known, and the confidence to pursue higher education beyond a bachelor's degree."

During a press conference in July 2003, President Bush praised community colleges for their adaptability and accessibility. This is an example of a shift in perception that Jeff Nardo, career services coordinator at Coastal Carolina Community College in Jacksonville, North Carolina, has noticed during his 12-plus years at the school.

"The perception has changed from the stereotype of two-year schools as those primarily offering 'basket weaving' and other fluffy classes," he explains. "People are realizing that we are an affordable, quality option for individuals to pursue the first two years of their studies toward a four-year degree."

"As most people in the field of career development are aware, there has been substantial growth in careers requiring two years or less of training, for which employers have job openings and [in which] job seekers are interested as a viable option to jobs/careers requiring a four-year degree."

Nardo explains. "[President Bush] has addressed this in some of his initiatives, realizing that the work force of the 21st century will depend significantly on skills that two-year schools can develop."

Explains Nardo: "It is of critical importance for those of us at two-year schools to participate [in Salary Survey for Associate Degree Candidates] because it provides us a resource to be more effective in providing accurate, up-to-date information on a topic of importance to our students, in careers for which information resources that surveys graduating students is limited or non-existent."

"Also, we will have to effectively evaluate, select, and use technology to enhance delivery of all services, while not becoming overwhelmed with options, and do so without losing the 'personal touch' that sets many two-year schools apart from others."

Sam M. Walton College of Business. "Life is so serious, but learning should not be; it should be exciting and fun. Students tend to be nervous, uptight, overconfident, not confident enough, and wavering about their job search, and if we can get them to relax with a bit of added humor, it only makes it easier for them."

Stiefer has a wealth of hilarious experience to draw from. Her first job was as a ranch hand on a dude ranch in Colorado. In addition, she has conducted legal research on personal injury and criminal cases for a law firm, sold waterbeds and prepaid legal services, and was a day care teacher while trying to figure out what she "should do" for a career.

Stiefer notes. "We actually have faculty members and administrators that come and sit in our office to visit for no reason or they stop by our office for a cup of coffee on their way to their office. [Our career center has] a staff of four and one of us usually has a funny story for that morning. Faculty members are very open to our office, and, because of the fun atmosphere that we have created, they like to be a part of it and are terrific partners for us. They send students to us and help us connect with employers."

Stiefer explains that it is critical that leaders separate humor and creativity from silliness and goofing around. Creativity, she says, involves drawing on the career center staff's unique capacities, outlooks, and insights.

If there is a positive atmosphere in a career center, then it can only help those who enter there to view challenges as opportunities. We have to constantly be recreating our offices, recreating ourselves, recreating culture. Change is inevitable, but growth is optional, and if career center administrators aren't growing, then I would be very concerned."

"Humor and laughter are great stress relievers and I am a strong proponent of both of them," Stiefer says. "I believe that humor can contribute to an organization's goals, make it a better place to work, and lead to happier, more productive, and less-stressed employees."

Stiefer explains that her personal prescription for health is to accomplish four things each day: drink plenty of water; exercise her mind and body; laugh as much as humanly possible, which involves looking at the world in a very different way; and meditate because everybody needs moments alone to reflect and refocus.

Stiefer explains. "It makes it so much easier to face each day to find the joy in living ... and if I don't, the fault lies within me. I take what I do very seriously, but I really never take myself seriously."

"I was hoping that the parents would see the card," Bowen says. "Because what it would promote is that we are personally interested in their sons and daughters and, hopefully, make a positive impression on them. Business is all about relationships with people.

Another challenge that has bridged the almost 20 years that Bowen has been in the HR function at GE is finding the proper balance between technological efficiency and value from establishing personal relationships.

Bowen says. "There have been a number of fads and trends that have come through our profession. As an old timer, I see them as such. The challenge has become finding the best technology to facilitate personal relationships. Technology should be used as a tool, but not as a driver."

A strong proponent of face-to-face interviewing ("You can read a lot about a person by meeting them") and accepting hard copy resumes at career fairs, Bowen hopes that technology doesn't permeate the profession to the point where these former standards are no longer valid.

"If the bulk of employers stop interviewing students face-to-face and direct students online to submit resumes, what's going to happen is students are going to feel as though they don't have to attend career fairs and that they can just do everything from their room," Bowen explains. "Where I still can and want to meet students to interview them and accept resumes, I may be driven toward the technological means because students may not show up to career fairs anymore."

"There are different things that affect people and how they think of employers," Bowen says. "I think it all comes down to understanding your customer. Is my customer the university or is my customer the student?

"It just carries through for this generation, who have planned their sons' and daughters' entire schedules as they grew up," Bowen says. "This generation of student has a good level of communication with their parents, and to some degree, they expect their parents to be a part of this process."

Chances are, the recruit got the point. Watching the exchange take place, Nagy certainly learned another lesson about how to deal with people, one that he reflected on as he spent time on both sides of the desk.

A five-year run as the manager of college recruiting and employment for Gulf Oil (and, after a merger, Chevron) was sandwiched around two stints at the University of Pittsburgh. He also worked at Moravian College and the consulting firm Drake Beam Morin.

"We viewed the other side as a type of 'grass is greener' situation," he says. "We aspired to move to the corporate side. We felt there was more money and more prestige. When we got there, we realized that it wasn't all it was cracked up to be. It was pretty nice on the college side."

"You're moving away from a helping profession to one that is profit- and goal-driven. You are responsible to line managers, who tell you their needs and if you can't meet them, they'll do it themselves. You're held accountable and the pressure is ratcheted up. That said, I really enjoyed my five years at Gulf Oil."

Chevron, as he didn't want to relocate to San Francisco. While at Gulf, he was responsible for helping to launch what is now the NACE/Chevron Award, which recognizes career services professionals for developing outstanding innovative programs.

Nagy says. "At the time, we knew how hard people used to work but would not get recognized for their innovative programs. I had a discretionary fund and was looking to do some PR work with colleges as well as recognize outstanding individuals in the college area."

The transition from HR professional to career services practitioner is a good one, according to Nagy. Just like he thinks every faculty member should go out and work in the business world so he or she can speak from experience, Nagy thinks HR professionals who transition to career services have an advantage. These individuals know how organizations hire people, what selection criteria they use, how they screen resumes, and what technology they use.

"The new challenge is helicopter parents," he says. "I was stunned by how much the parents of students get involved now. It's a whole different generation of parents, who maybe didn't get much support from their parents, and become very involved in their child's academic career and job search. I found that it's not uncommon for parents to jump in and negotiate job offers and salaries for their kids."

"If someone asked me about it a year ago, I would have had a different answer," Nagy says. "We were coming off a three-year recession, one in which a lot of experienced professionals left the field and a lot of young people without the experience moved in. Now it's cycling back, and I'm certain that as long as there are needs that companies have, there will be college recruiting."

According to the results of the Scott Resource Group's (SRG's) annual surveys, college students consistently report that organizations with the most effective recruitment programs are represented by staff members who favorably impress them.

Scott recalls. "I wound up interviewing students at the University of Michigan the next day  wearing a Notre Dame sweatshirt. To make matters worse, the guy I reported to at Aetna bled [Michigan] Blue."

Aetna, during which she became director of recruiting in what was then called the employment office, and beyond. She has seen many changes in the ways things were done and many similarities in the ways things are done today.

"Yet, despite the wild swings in demand, students' needs and expectations have remained remarkably consistent," Scott notes. "And that has reaffirmed my commitment to taking the longer view as regards emerging issues and trends, rather than getting caught up in the fad du jour."

That view led Scott to leave the corporate world in 1989 and head out on her own. She cites several reasons for forming SRG, chief among them, the desire to focus her career on university relations and recruiting by offering services to client companies. Concerned by the lack of unbiased information available to those in the staffing profession making major strategic decisions, Scott also wanted to provide the "voice of the customer" by gathering objective feedback from students that would be valuable to her clients.

Take, for instance, the issue of face-to-face interviewing. According to Scott, data from SRG surveys gathered over the years have found several immutable findings: First, company representatives have a powerful impact on students' desire to pursue opportunities with an employer. Second, students value personal contact and object to employers' replacing face-to-face contact with technology.

"To that point, I no longer survey students regarding their perceptions about video interviewing, because several years of ratings and commentary have been so consistently and overwhelmingly negative," Scott says.

"That said, there is an ever-growing array of products and services that enable organizations to introduce an electronic interface into the recruiting process, and there will no doubt be an increase in the number of organizations that contemplate using such products and services."

Every day, Kitty McGrath, executive director of graduate and undergraduate career management at Arizona State University's W. P. Carey School of Business, reminds herself that as intelligent and capable as students are, they are at a different place in their lives than she is.

"He had accepted a great job in Chicago but felt a bit out of place because everyone he worked with was at least 10 years older than he was," McGrath explains. "His astonishment was apparent when he talked about the informal staff lunches. He said, 'Kitty, they actually have long conversations about snowblowers!'"

The transition from a focus on campus recruiting and job placement activities to a career development emphasis was in full force. Career counseling centers were being created and others renamed to include career planning as part of the title.

"The office where I worked at Indiana University-Bloomington was just being established and was an all-campus career counseling center, separate from the decentralized placement centers in individual colleges and schools," McGrath notes.

"'Creeping vocationalism' was the phrase bandied about in academic circles, especially in the liberal arts," McGrath says. "Providing support for student career planning was perceived by some in academe to be anti-intellectual."

"We are being asked much more frequently than ever before to quantify the effect of our efforts and demonstrate our value-add," McGrath says. "Public-supported institutions have more external accountability than private institutions, but we are all under pressure to show that we make a positive difference in order to justify the institutional resources we use."

To effectively provide this evidence, practitioners must articulate their mission much more clearly, collect and disseminate much more data on student outcomes, and develop ways of measuring not just student participation, but indicators of the benefits they accrue from career services, McGrath says.

"The media that purport to rank schools and programs, the state legislators and the taxpayers who elected them, accreditation organizations, prospective students and their parents, and many other important stakeholder groups will all continue to demand that we quantify the difference that we can make in students' success," she says.

A large part of ensuring success is providing effective coaching. It's an area that McGrath says has benefited from the implementation of technology in the career exploration and job-search processes.

"Among the many ways technology has helped us, the ability to retrieve volumes of information on careers, companies, job opportunities, etc. via the web is probably one of the most important," she says.

McGrath notes that one size certainly does not fit all. For instance, the best balance point for her at a business school in a public institution with more than 60,000 students may be a world apart from what would work most effectively for a career services professional at a small, private, liberal arts school.

"The high-tech/high-touch debate is then a question of resource allocation," she says. "Making decisions on resources requires that we set aside any personal preferences for tech or touch and determine how we can best address the myriad career development needs of our students.

Steele made it his life work to provide for others what he did not have. Steele retired in 1982 after a long career that included work at Boston College, Harvard Business School, and The Ohio State University.

Even though college representatives were the primary leaders in the formation of nearly all of the placement associations, it was not because of a lack of employer involvement. In fact, as Steele points out, the leaders "had the support and cooperation of many industrial members who worked diligently behind the scenes to help the educators with their attempts to organize a formal structure."

"The IRS took the viewpoint that if an organization was profitable it had to pay taxes," Steele explains. "It believed that organizations that were run by college people were nonprofit, while those run by business people had to pay taxes on the income they brought in. To avoid being taxed, we had college people in all of the governing offices in the placement field. Slowly, this view relaxed and we finally got the IRS off our back."

Employers did a lot of advising then and, "because college people had small budgets, the employers were very helpful in paying the expenses of college people traveling to conferences," Steele recalls. "Chances are if we got along with each other, an employer would lend a hand with transportation. For instance, I remember being at Ohio State and Ford [Motor Company] flew planes in to Columbus to pick a group of us up for a meeting in Chicago."

Talk of collaboration among the regions gained steam. As the regional associations continued to grow in both size and complexity, it became obvious that coordination and communication on a larger scale would require the creation of a national association. That realization led to the work to form CPC.

One such call came during a meeting in the early 1960s, when the director of the United States Employment Services (U.S.E.S.) "admitted that the objective of his agency was to take over the placement function of all colleges in the United States," Steele explains. "The people who attended the meeting were furious."

The director went as far as to tell placement personnel attending the meeting that he would have their jobs within five years. Needless to say, college placement officials and employers were shocked by the government's plans.

CPC and the regional organizations joined together in the fight and according to Steele, after a lot of hard work, successfully rebuffed the U.S.E.S.'s attempts to take over the placement of college students.

"I still have that ad in my scrapbook," says Alan Goodman, director of career services at The Catholic University. "I laugh every time I read it. But I can't remember if anyone took the job or the outcome."

While the ethics of using poison to get a "whiskered pigeon" out of the woman's home are debatable, the ethical issues career counselors faced at the time the ad was posted were not. Safeguarding students' privacy was an issue that was front and center as the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA) was passed just eight years earlier.

"The use of alcohol in recruiting was also a big issue," adds Goodman, who has been in the profession for 31 years. "Employers would serve alcoholic beverages at recruiting events and it presented some problems. When the ethical standards were changed, career centers had a much easier way of dealing with employers who want to do this by simply saying 'Serving alcohol is against our standards.' "

Of course, organizations hiring college students face myriad ethical challenges, as well. Chief among them, Goodman says, is recruiting the best and brightest students in the most efficient way possible.

"Career centers are not going to pick [the best and brightest] out for them, and even when employers give money and support to a university, there's no guarantee that they'll get an advantage," Goodman says.

"You may have managers who do some of the recruiting in a pinch and are not trained in the ethical standards in our field," Goodman explains. "Some do things that are not in line with our ethical standards."

"Employers don't have to go through career services to access students," Goodman notes. "Some will go to faculty members for the resumes of their top students. The role of faculty in all this has really grown, which can present a conflict of interest if, for instance, the faculty members receive research funding from employers."

"Because, assuming you are reasonably competent, your standing in your institution ultimately depends on your good name," Goodman says. "If people know you're honest, that you make good on your commitments, and you intend to do good, they will be willing to trust and work with you. A lot of things we do are voluntary. A faculty member doesn't have to collaborate with you. An employer doesn't have to provide support. Our reputation comes down to how we play out our personal ethics."

When Julie Cunningham was in HR at Tellabs several years ago, one of the assignments she gave a committee of the company's interns was to choose the social event for the end of the summer. The committee had a budget and its members chose several events to consider. It was the responsibility of each individual to explore the feasibility of one event.

"I had no idea the intern had done this," she recalls. "The assistant said our CEO didn't have a yacht, and even if he did, she was sure he wouldn't lend it to the interns for a party. Although she and I had a good chuckle about this, I asked her to erase the message before Mr. Birck listened to it, which she did."

"One thing employers are facing is a lot more pressure for accountability than in the past," Cunningham says. "That usually translates into having to demonstrate your value to your organization as a non-revenue generating area, come up with some metrics, and devise a strategy that's in line with that of the business."

Another challenge for many employers, Cunningham says, is that they are being asked to focus their college recruiting programs primarily on diversity recruiting instead of making it one part of their college recruiting program.

And, of course, "There's always that shortage of resources: money, people, time," Cunningham says. "Part of that challenge is trying to get the job done without the ideal amount of resources. This affects both employers and career services."

Therefore, Cunningham explains that a real challenge for career centers is to not only identify appropriate employers, but to find the time and resources to go out and call on the employers and convince them that coming to campus would be a good business move.

Still, she doesn't see drastic changes in the way college recruiting programs or career centers will do business in the future. Experiential education programs, she says, will continue to be important and some employers will begin placing more emphasis on advanced degrees, but, overall, the bottom line is that it comes down to individuals and the connections they make.

"If you look at how people choose careers and jobs, it's a very personal decision," Cunningham explains. "Regardless of the person's major, or if they're a minority or nonminority, or female or male, that job-seeker is trying to choose an organization in which they're going to live out their career dreams and interact with the same people day after day year after year. To make a decision that they can be comfortable with, they must have the kind of contact that college recruiters and career centers facilitate.

"Although the tools we use to recruit may change over time, I think the big picture isn't going to change because, when you think about college recruiting and career services, it's all about facilitating the relationships that are at the very core of hiring and career decision making and hiring."

"Having met and worked with a number of professionals from the country's premier organizations gives me the ability to pick up the phone or send an e-mail, and voila, the answer," she notes. "Where else but NACE can you have folks on both sides of the equation available to you and eager to share their knowledge?"

Share your anecdotes and experiences as a career services or HR/staffing professional, discuss your views of the field today, and speculate on the future of careers and the job market for college graduates, and the roles that you and your colleagues will play.

Join your colleagues for the Opening Reception in the Exhibit Hall and mix business and pleasure! Enjoy hors d'oeuvres and cocktails as you mix, mingle, and visit the exhibits featuring cutting-edge products and services for the field. You'll also have a chance to see the Silent Auction items up for bid this year.

The intense recruitment of college graduates, combined with the explosion of the commercial job search industry, has provided many college career centers and academic departments with the opportunity and expectation of exploiting their relationship with the corporate world for the purposes of fund raising. This has raised the specter of preferential treatment and the improper use of student confidential information provided to selected employers and organizations in return for their financial support. There is considerable alarm in the career services community about the ethical dilemma posed by these concurrent developments.

Specifically, NACE has adopted the following position regarding the acceptance and solicitation of funds by career centers, and the offering of assistance by employers, in exchange for service, student access and employer prominence.

If employer funds provide greater prominence to the names and opportunities of specific organizations and their industries, the career center has an obligation to make every effort to provide students not interested in these specific organizations or industries with contact and/or information about alternate employers in keeping with their needs and interests.

NACE recognizes that the pressures to meet institutional needs and hiring needs create a difficult dilemma for career services and employment professionals. It is not always easy or clear how to adhere to these obligations while meeting the requirements of one's organization. The ethical fundamentals set forth in the Principles and strategies presented in the aforementioned Winter 2001 Journal article are ultimately based on the firmly held conviction that ethical practice can and will result in the most effective practice.

NACE wants to provide its members with a simple, easy to remember guideline to help members navigate ethical considerations relating to campus recruiting. In conclusion, NACE urges all its members to focus on the values upon which this association is based and act in what is in the overall best interest of their shared client - the student.

The NACE Diversity Advancement Committee has published a short brochure on the career services profession for anyone who is interested in exploring this line of work. You can get a copy of their booklet by clicking here.

The issue of privacy and technology is foremost in the minds of today's technological society. Our charge was to learn as much as possible about privacy policies and how to protect an individual's privacy online. Our goal for this white paper was to formulate "how-tos" for preparing a privacy policy for a career services or employer web site. We quickly discovered that the complexities and legalities surrounding this topic would prevent us from doing so.

Our investigation into the issue of privacy was greatly enhanced by reviewing a great deal of research and writings on privacy and the job search,and speaking with Pam Dixon, one of the founders of the World Privacy Forum and a journalist who has written on technology, the workplace, and privacy.

Privacy of an individual's personal information is an important and widely discussed technological issue facing society today. With the rampant development and use of various sources of technology, security of our personal data is more important than ever.

However, along with these advances has come the potential for misuse of the personal data collected. Thus, technology users have become increasingly interested in protecting their privacy online. This has caused many individuals to be reluctant to provide identifying information when using the Internet. This means, in order to attract, serve, and protect users, it is very important that web sites that gather identifiable information clearly spell out how personal information will be used and what steps web site owners have taken to protect it. The document that spells out how this information is used is called an organization's "privacy policy." All web sites gathering personal information have a responsibility, and in many cases, a legal requirement, to develop one.

Privacy policies are unique to each web site. Since privacy policies are based on each organization's individual practices regarding the collection, use, and sharing of personal information, one cannot take the cookie-cutter or cut-and-paste approach to developing a privacy policy for a web site. Within a given organization it may be necessary for various departments to have their own web site privacy policies.

If you are not familiar with privacy policies, a good starting place is to look at privacy statements posted by organizations similar to your own. From these statements you can gather ideas about key elements to consider including in your policy. Professional organizations related to your business may also provide information regarding best practices for creating and maintaining a privacy policy. Knowing what the privacy standards are for your business is important and may save you from having to make changes in the future.

Based on your research and organization's needs, you might consider developing a vision for what you would like your policy statement to be. With this vision in mind, your organization's practices and policies, and the resources you have accumulated, you are ready to create a draft.

We also encourage you to try one of the privacy policy generators available on the Internet. These generators ask leading questions about your Internet web site that address specific privacy policy elements. Your answers are tabulated and a privacy policy draft is created for you. The draft can be edited to fit your needs and business. One of the major benefits of using a generator is that it addresses operational issues you may not have thought about.

One area that is often overlooked in privacy policies is spelling out how you collect data from your users. Be sure to include what data collection features you are using. For example, if you use cookies, state this and clearly describe how cookies are being used, what information you are capturing, and how it will be used.

We recommend you include an opt-in/opt-out opportunity if you distribute personally identifiable information to third parties and/or use it for a purpose unrelated to the stated reason it was collected.

It is best to involve senior management and staff/employees responsible for key operational functions in the development of your privacy policy. It is also wise to consider your organization's long-term business plan. This will allow you to draft your policy to cover changes in procedures you may be implementing and avoid jeopardizing users' trust.

Further, remember that your privacy policy must be kept current with technological advances and changes in practices your organization implements after it is written. It is important to mark the text so these changes are easily recognized. Remember, to maintain your users' confidence in your policy, you should change it only when absolutely necessary. Prior to releasing your web site privacy policy, it is essential to have your management and legal counsel review it.

We advise your privacy policy be posted on your web site's main menu and/or navigation bar so it is available to users prior to the collection of personally identifiable information. In addition, you should include a link to the policy in multiple locations and provide links to your privacy policy from any page where users enter personal information.

Just as important as your web site having a privacy policy is how your organization implements and staff adhere to the policy. You may wish to develop an implementation strategy to teach and inform all staff when the new policy is in place. It is crucial to make sure the organization's procedures and employees are compliant with your policy. This means educating/training staff regarding all aspects of practices described in the policy and keeping them informed as changes are made.

Career services professionals are consistently encouraging students and alumni to use online data bases and partnering with vendors to "push" opportunities and content electronically to interested clients. For most career centers, the web site is just as important or even more important than the front door to the physical office.

This shift continues to be driven by students and alumni who are accustomed to having what they need available on the web when they need it. As career services centers rush to provide web content and services, and students become more reliant on the Internet, students have neglected to pay attention to protecting their privacy online. As career centers are charged with the education of students in the job-search process, it is important that career centers incorporate online privacy protection as an integral part of teaching the job-search process.

Many students and alumni have become so accustomed to providing information on the web that they may be unaware of the risks they take in the process of looking for a job. It is important that career centers provide information on some of the risks associated with an online job search.

Spam (junk e-mail): While junk e-mail may seem like more of an inconvenience than a risk, an e-mail box full of spam makes it difficult for a job seeker to maintain effective communication with potential employers. New legislation and software products have begun to address this problem; however, simple measures taken by the job seeker are much more effective in fighting spam.

Carefully reading and completing registration forms on job-search sites will also cut down on spam. On most sites, the registrant has the option of asking to not receive offers and mailings from "partners" of the web site. The default for this option is usually in favor of receiving these offers; opting out of the offers is typically as simple as unchecking a box. If this option is not provided, a job seeker should think twice about giving a web site a personal e-mail address.

In addition, the job seeker should provide detailed information about the type of job that he or she is seeking and the experience the job seeker can offer in order to allow the site to properly target and send "job-alert" messages.

In addition to these precautions, job seekers should use some type of spam-blocking technology. Many Internet service providers and companies providing free e-mail accounts have built-in spam blocking.

The worst part about identity theft in relation to new graduates is, it may take them a long time to realize that they have been victimized. It is only when an application for credit or a job is denied due to a bad credit history that a new graduate will realize the extent of the problem. Many of the same people who shred all of the credit card offers they receive in the mail might not think twice about entering their Social Security number when registering on a job-search site. In fact, they shouldn't. An employer should only require a Social Security number pre-hire if it is absolutely necessary. The job seeker has the right to ask if and why the information is required.

Resume shopping: Many job-web sites allow anyone who can pay a fee to search the resumes on the site. Some less than ethical commission-based recruiters shop these web sites for candidates to pitch to employers, which makes the resumes of job seekers less credible to employers. If job seekers know what to look out for, they can learn safer resume-posting habits that get their resumes to the employers that interest them or to ethical third-party recruiters that work in their best interests.

Perceived disloyalty: Currently employed individuals who are looking for work may be labeled as disloyal employees and miss opportunities at their current workplaces if their employers find their resumes online or intercept job-search related e-mail sent from the office.

Career services professionals as the on-campus job-search experts are in the right place to teach the skills necessary to fight these risks. In fact, career professionals were teaching privacy long before the Internet appeared. Most, if not all, resume workshops have covered the need to limit the personal information provided on a resume.

When the career center served as a physical intermediary between employers and job seekers, the career professionals took most of the responsibility for protecting the privacy of job seekers. Career services staffs have some methods of ensuring that information is only released to employers who may interest the job seeker and protecting an employed job seeker from having information sent to their present employer.

Limiting access to personal information is still the best way to protect an individual's privacy. Job seekers are in full control of the amount of information they share in a job search. Career professionals should remind job seekers at every opportunity to think twice before they provide information on the web.

Encourage job seekers to ask job-search web sites questions about what requested information is used for and why. It is also important that career services professionals encourage job seekers to notify them of any information request that sounds out of line. This allows the career center to verify the requests with an employer or to remove offending links from their career center web sites.

The most important section of a job listing web site is the privacy policy. Job seekers should be reminded to read each site's privacy policy carefully and to move on if it is not comprehensive. There are organizations (including BBBonline and TRUSTe) that provide "privacy seals" to web sites with policies that meet specific criteria.

In addition to a solid privacy policy, a job listing site should include an instant means to "opt out" of any direct or indirect contact from the web site owner or from web site partners as a result of registration. The ease of including this option gives legitimate job-listing sites no excuse for requiring job seekers to call or write a letter to get off mailing lists. However, this option is of no consequence if job seekers do not take advantage of it. Career professionals should remind job seekers to check privacy and "opt-out" policies often as these policies are often subject to change without notice.

It is also important to remind job seekers to post their resumes only on the sites they find valuable. "More" is definitely not "better" when posting resumes online. Job seekers should keep track of where they have posted their resumes, allowing them to know where any unwanted solicitations may originate. In addition, keeping track of where their resumes are posted will allow job seekers to remove their resumes when they have secured positions. Job seekers should also be encouraged to limit access to their resume when it is an option. This affirms their control of their information.

Provide constant reminders: One of the most important things career professionals can do is to remind job seekers of the importance of protecting their privacy. Simply including the information above in your job-search materials and presentations and/or adding a section on privacy in the job search to your web site will make a difference.

If you would suggest that a job seeker think twice before registering, don't link to the site. Check web-site policies annually for changes and don't be afraid to let a vendor know why you think an organization's policy is suspect.

The following resources were mentioned repeatedly while researching the topic of privacy policies. These will be of value when creating your privacy policy, keeping abreast of the issue of privacy, and preparing to educate students about privacy.

Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development The OECD describes themselves as: "30-member countries sharing a commitment to democratic government and the market economy. With active relationships with some 70 other countries, NGOs, and civil society, it has a global reach. Best known for its publications and its statistics, the orgainzation's work covers economic and social issues from education, development to science and innovation. This group developed the OECD Privacy Policy Generator which uses a questionnaire to learn about your personal data practices. Answers are then fed into a pre-formatted draft policy statement."

Forum is a nonprofit, nonpartisan organization that conducts research, investigates, and documents the state of personal privacy in the Information Age and explores the privacy implications of a range of technologies and policies for the purpose of educating the public and policymakers about these issues."

Our investigation into the issue of privacy policies was greatly enhanced by speaking with Pam Dixon (one of the WPF's founders) as well as reviewing her research and writings on privacy and the job search. Dixon is an author and journalist and has written on a variety of subjects including technology, the workplace, and privacy.

Privacy Benchmarks. This report addresses privacy issues in today's job search. It provides a look at what is happening to applicants' job-search data and resumes. It evaluates leading online job-search sites, resume writing services, employment kiosks, resume data bases, Internet profiling data bases, and resume distribution services. It also includes discussion of privacy issues such as use of Social Security numbers at job sites; resume sharing and cross-posting issues; use of third-party cookies at job/career sites; resume selling and theft; frequency and quality of privacy notices; and trust and seal programs on job sites.

The Center for Democracy and Technology says it "works to promote democratic values and constitutional liberties in the digital age. With expertise in law, technology, and policy, CDT seeks practical solutions to enhance free expression and privacy in global communications technologies. CDT is dedicated to building consensus among all parties interested in the future of the Internet and other new communications media."

The following organizations provide privacy seals for web sites to indicate that privacy standards have met their criteria. It might be helpful to look at the guidelines set by these sites to help write your policy.

BBB OnLine is the arm of the Council of Better Business Bureaus that specifically deals with web sites. Their Privacy Seal confirms that the company stands behind its online privacy policy and has met the BBB's program requirements regarding the handling of personal information.

Federal, state, and regional legislation must be adhered to when creating a privacy policy. Below you will find government resources that include relevant legislation regarding privacy and privacy policies or the disclosing of student information by schools. We urge you to check with your organization's legal counsel prior to creating and posting your privacy policy.

The Native American Achievement Program is a retention program for Native students, and is a collaborative partnership among several academic and student affairs departments at Arizona State University East, Main, and West campuses.

The tribes, which require their students to participate in the NAAP, provide financial aid and are responsible for determining eligibility criteria for tribal scholarships, selecting the students who receive the scholarships, and setting the scholarship award amount. ASU provides the academic and personal success support. Each NAAP participant signs a student agreement to accept the terms of the program, which include attending an on-campus orientation at the beginning of each semester; monthly meetings with NAAP staff; periodic meetings with instructors and academic advisers; workshops; social activities; and a recognition banquet at the end of each academic year.

A hallmark of this program is its extensive collaboration with existing campus programs, such as career and counseling services. Through extensive training, ongoing collaboration, and deep, personal commitment, the career and counseling offices, as campus partners, developed and delivered culturally focused and culturally relevant career programs to Native American students.

The NAAP has been successful on many levels, most notably in its retention outcomes. Over the last five years, NAAP students have persisted at higher rates than their cohorts. In three of those years, NAAP students persisted at rates ranging from 63 to 78 percent, 2 to 5 percent higher than all ASU freshmen. In all five years, NAAP students persisted at rates that were, on average, 14 percent higher than their Native American cohorts who did not participate in the program.

From its inception, career development was identified as a key component to the NAAP program. The departments of career services and counseling and consultation played central roles in helping shape and develop the program's career and life skills curriculum. One challenge to developing programs for college-age, predominantly Navajo students from urban and rural, traditional and secular backgrounds was the limited availability of research or models to use as a philosophical foundation. By combining what we knew of existing vocational psychology, career, human, and student development theories with applied learning from unique training opportunities, the program developers from both departments set out to create a culturally focused and culturally relevant career and life-skills curriculum for first- and second-year students.

This paper highlights the process by which this unique curriculum was developed, the factors that contributed to the program's overall success, and the lessons the developers learned along the way. This paper is not intended to provide a model that will work for all programs or for traditional program development; however, this process worked at ASU and contains some universal elements that can be applied to developing culturally sensitive programs.

First, staff from both the career center and the counseling office had specific knowledge of the cultural values of the population, such as the influences of family and traditional values, cultural taboos, and spirituality with regard to decision-making. Staff either attained this knowledge as members of the population with traditional cultural upbringing, or through a sincere desire to learn the culture through extensive training and immersion.

The second characteristic was our combination of education and training, which stemmed from our individual expertise in vocational psychology and career development. The third characteristic was that we were not willing to accept that the existing career development resources and tools were the best ones available. We were willing to question those traditional tools and adapt them to better fit the needs of the students in the program.

We studied career development and multicultural literature to learn as much as we could about the population we were working with. There was extensive and in-depth research relevant to the cultural values of Native Americans in general, but the limitations of that research were the unique issues of traditional and secular upbringing, and rural and urban issues, which influence the vocational interests of our students.

We sought out firsthand cultural knowledge through special training by tribal elders on the Navajo reservation, one-on-one consultation with program advisers from similar backgrounds, feedback from Native American students, and seminars specific to the populations we worked with.

We would need to conduct a more in-depth study of the program to single out the effects of the career development program. However, based on workshop evaluations, the students found the program to be helpful in learning and exploring in-depth the factors that influence career and life choices.

Applying what we had learned also required us to critically assess the current career development tools at hand. Many of the tools had to be adapted or modified to better meet the needs of the students we worked with. For example, to explain self-actualization and Maslow's hierarchy of need, we made analogies to the Navajo Philosophy of Life, which emphasizes trying to live life in perfect harmony and balance, and reaching a stage in life where such harmony, or self-actualization, could exist. We modified value card sorts to include cards that expressed traditional values not identified in the institutional pack. Elders were invited into the classroom to lend support and to facilitate program components. We instructed using active learning/cooperative learning principles, and relied very little on singular response activities or questions, which were typically adverse to the group dynamics of the culture.

We also had to be aware of how we helped students evaluate occupations that involved working with cultural taboos around death and dying, including occupations such as life insurance sales, nurses, doctors, morticians, forensic scientists, and emergency response personnel. We had to be able to talk about possible conflicts with cultural values and belief systems, and to help students work through these occupational concerns.

All our training and practical applications were focused on bridging long-standing academic practice with more culturally focused methodologies, yet we found our best attempts fell short in some areas, and that we still had much to learn.

Though the intent of this paper is to establish the framework for the career-life skills component of the program, a few lessons are important to keep in mind as similar programs begin to take shape and are implemented.

What worked for our institution's purpose may not work at other institutions or with other targeted populations. Do your homework and be creative and innovative in how you dialogue with the populations you wish to offer targeted services. Ask yourself, "What relationship do we have with this community? What really matters to those we want to work with? What are their concerns and aspirations? What role do we expect to play in facilitating growth? What role do they expect of us? What nonverbal messages does our office give about sensitivity to diversity? Does it make sense to promote the resources of our office, but not have staff, employers, or programs that have a culturally diverse or relevant foundation? What changes are we willing to make to create a more inclusive environment?"

We found that a good starting point was to consult the communities we wanted to serve about which resources they find most helpful. In doing so, Native constituents recommended a directory of all state tribal offices and their contact information. We would not have known about this valuable resource had we not asked.

Involve elders, talk more with members of the community you wish to serve and with key stakeholders (scholarship offices, education departments, economic development departments, as examples) to find out their experiences and concerns. Identify immediate barriers and be creative in overcoming those barriers so that important work can progress.

Go out into the community, in gathering places, and within enclaves and develop relationships within the community. Begin a dialogue to find out their needs. Embed yourself in the community to understand what really matters most to your students.

Find the business case and gaining organizational support for diversity recruiting, learn how to develop a sourcing and recruiting plan, find out how to evaluate your progress, and get tips on how to retain new hires.

Julie Cunningham is an independent consultant to employers on their college relations and recruiting programs. Previously, she was manager of global college relations for Tellabs and director of engineering career services at The University of Kansas. Cunningham has served on the boards of directors of the National Association of Colleges and Employers and the Midwest Association of Colleges and Employers, and as president of the Rocky Mountain Association of Colleges and Employers. She is a frequent speaker at regional and national college recruiting conferences.

Career services professionals may wish to share/adapt the "letter for colleges" with their President; Vice Presidents of Student Affairs, Institutional Advancement and Development, and Academic Affairs.

The Principles Committee believes that the practice of exploding offers is an issue for both career services and employment professionals, as it affects their mutual customers-students. The best employment decisions (for both students and employers) are those that are made with the greatest amount of information. Students given sufficient time to gather thorough information related to all available job opportunities are more likely to make good long-term employment decisions and less likely to renege on job acceptances. By the same token, however, the committee recognizes that there are legitimate business reasons for an employer to have an offer accepted or rejected within a specific time frame.

The committee decided that while cash incentives certainly influence a job decision, the short time frame in which a person must make a decision to accept or reject an offer should be considered "improper influence."

At the federal level, two laws regulate the disclosure of personal information. The Federal Privacy Act prohibits federal agencies from disclosing personal information about an individual without the individual's prior written consent. Similarly, the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA) prohibits educational institutions from disclosing information in a student's academic record without the student's prior written consent.

Some states have privacy laws that regulate personal or students records; others have constitutions that guarantee the right of privacy to all of their respective citizens. The personal/student record laws prohibit employers and schools from disclosing information about individuals, including students, without their consent. The state constitutional requirement typically applies to any state government action that could violate a person's right of privacy.

The common thread running through the statutory and constitutional requirements is that students and other individuals must give consent before information about them can be disclosed. Employers and schools can meet these requirements by obtaining written consent before disclosing salary information or by disclosing salary data without revealing the person's name. Salary Survey does not require employers to provide student names and does not publish them.

Two federal antitrust statutes apply to the dissemination of salary information among competitors. The Sherman Act prohibits any agreement or conspiracy between two or more entities that would result in an unreasonable restraint of trade. The Federal Trade Commission Act prohibits and remedies unfair methods of competition. State antitrust laws parallel these federal statutes.

At the same time, the courts recognize that it is legitimate for competitors to have information on prices because it leads to increased efficiency in the marketplace. Thus, the exchange of salary information among competitors is not illegal, per se. However, use of the information in a way that restrains competition-for example, if several major employers in the computer industry agreed to cap starting salaries for electronic engineers at $40,000-would be considered a violation of antitrust laws.

There are at least five firms reporting data, with no one firm representing more than 25 percent of the data. Additionally, any information must be aggregated in a way that will not allow recipients of the information to identify the prices charged or the compensation paid by any particular company.

NACE's Salary Survey meets all of these criteria. Data are provided by a large number of NACE member colleges and universities, the information is current, and it is grouped by industry, job function, degree, and major in a way that no employer's or job candidate's salary information can be identified.

Ryan, director of career services at University of Buffalo. Students with disabilities are a growing population on college campuses; however they find employment in significantly lower percentages than other students.

Dulce M. Ramirez-Damon, Concepcion L. Tuma, and Kyra A. Spence. Career services staff who want to help students hone and use their entrepreneurial skills to secure jobs in their fields will get ideas and examples they can use in their programs. This is a basic-level seminar.

Get the facts you need about your legal obligations as they relate to student information, learn what should be in your privacy policy, get a list of do's and don'ts of disclosure, and find out what your liability is when student's privacy is invaded. This virtual seminar will also cover issues that have arisen thanks to the latest privacy pitfall: social networking sites. Learn what is/isn't appropriate for employers to access, how to draw the line between due diligence and "snooping," and what constitutes responsible professional conduct. Nancy Conrad, Esquire, will also offer pointers for employers on obtaining information via the Internet and for career services professionals on how to guide students to protect their own privacy. This is a basic level seminar.

Counselor (LPC) in the Commonwealth of Virginia. Learn how one college turned its small etiquette dinner, which drained funds from the career services office, into a dinner that gave students a chance to practice their etiquette skills and meet potential employers at a real-life professional dinner, increased the office budget, and drew support from other campus departments and the community. This is a basic level seminar.

Section 1. Charter membership in the National Association of Colleges and Employers shall be granted to the founding Regional Associations of Colleges and Employers now known as Eastern Association of Colleges and Employers, Midwest Association of Colleges and Employers, Mountain Pacific Association of Colleges and Employers, Southeastern Association of Colleges and Employers, and Southwest Association of Colleges and Employers. Charter membership will also be granted to regional associations created as a result of a merger among the associations listed above.

Section 2. Other Regional Associations of Colleges and Employers may be granted charter membership at any regular meeting of the Board of NACE by an affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the voting Board members in office, provided that formal written application from that association has been received by the National Association of Colleges and Employers at least ninety (90) days before the date of the meeting at which it will be considered.

NACE only through their representatives to the Board of NACE. The number of representatives to the Board, the criteria for selection, and the rules of governance shall be as provided in Article XI of these bylaws.

Institutional college membership shall be granted to any degree granting college and university that is officially recognized either by an accrediting body recognized by the Council of Higher Education Accreditation or a subdivision thereof or by the designated governmental entity in the country within which the college or university is located and which provides career services including, but not limited to, career planning, counseling, and placement assistance for full-time, part-time, summer jobs, cooperative education, or internships, and which designates as its representative to NACE an individual to hold such membership whose primary responsibility within the institution is career services.

An institutional college member shall designate as its representative to the national association an individual to hold such membership whose primary responsibility within the institution is career services.

The designated representative shall be eligible to hold office in the national association, serve as a Director, or serve as a member of a NACE committee or task force/team. The designated representative shall have a vote in the national association's elections for Directors and officers. He or she shall also have a voice in the affairs of the national association through members of the NACE Board, committees, and task forces/teams.

Individual college membership shall be granted to any individual employed by an institutional college member at any location worldwide and engaged in providing career services including but not limited to experiential education (e.g., cooperative education and internships) to students and/or graduates.

An individual college member shall be eligible to hold office in the national association, serve as a Director, or serve as member of a NACE committee or task force/team. An individual college member shall have a vote in the national association's elections for Directors and officers. He or she shall also have a voice in the affairs of the national association through members of the NACE Board, committees, and task forces/teams.

Electronic college membership shall be granted to any individual employed by an institutional college member at any location worldwide and engaged in providing career services including but not limited to experiential education (e.g., cooperative education and internships) to students and/or graduates.

An electronic college member is ineligible to hold office in the national association, serve as a Director, or serve as member of a NACE committee or task force/team. An electronic college member shall not have a vote in the national association's elections for Directors and officers. He or she shall also have a voice in the affairs of the national association through members of the NACE Board, committees, and task forces/teams.

Institutional employer membership may be granted to any employing organization that is engaged in human resources, professional staffing, or recruiting and/or hiring of college graduates solely for its own work force or for a subdivision thereof and maintains college relations for its own organization. This does not include any organization which provides a service or product to career services or college relations/recruiting functions as more specifically defined in Article VIII.

An institutional employer member shall designate as its representative to the national association an individual to hold such membership whose responsibilities within the institution includes human resources, professional staffing, or recruiting and/or hiring for the organization.

Individual employer membership shall be granted to any individual employed by an institutional employer member at any location worldwide and engaged in human resources, professional staffing, or recruiting/hiring.

An individual employer member shall be eligible to hold office in the national association, serve as a Director, or serve as a member of a NACE committee or task force/team. An individual employer member shall have a vote in the national association's elections for Directors and officers. He or she shall also have a voice in the affairs of the national association through members of the NACE Board, committees, and task forces/teams.

Electronic employer membership shall be granted to any individual employed by an institutional employer member at any location worldwide and engaged in human resources, professional staffing, or recruiting/hiring.

An electronic employer member is ineligible to hold office in the national association, serve as a Director, or serve as a member of a NACE Committee/or task force/team. An electronic employer member shall not have a vote in the national association's elections for Directors and officers. He or she shall have a voice in the affairs of the national association through members of the NACE Board, committees, and task forces/teams.

Section 4. Regular institutional, individual, and electronic members shall be required to pay annual dues in the amount established by the Board, in order to remain a member in good standing and to be entitled to receive full privileges of membership. Renewal of individual and electronic membership will also be contingent upon the continued membership of the institutional member. The NACE Board may establish categories for dues and may set different dues for different categories.

Section 1. Individual student membership shall be granted to any individual who is attending school at an institutional member college and is sponsored by that member; is enrolled in at least six (6) credit hours per term; and is pursuing a career in career services or human resources.

Section 1. Retired professional membership may be granted to any individual who has retired and is no longer working in the career services or human resources, professional staffing, or recruiting/hiring field and who would not otherwise qualify for another membership category.

Section 2. The Board of Directors shall exercise all powers of the national association as shall be deemed appropriate to the accomplishment of the stated purposes of the national association, as set forth in NACE's Articles of Incorporation, as amended, and as stated in NACE's Mission Statement, as amended, except those powers which are allocated to the Executive Committee by these bylaws or are delegated to the Executive Committee by the Board.

C. The position of Secretary-Treasurer shall be filled by the person serving as Executive Director of the National Association of Colleges and Employers, who shall serve a continuous term at the will and pleasure of the Board of Directors.

D. The position of President shall be filled by the individual who held the position of President-Elect during the preceding term. The position of Past President shall be filled by the individual who held the position of President during the preceding term.

E. Each officer, with the exception of the Secretary-Treasurer, who serves as a member of the Board without a vote, will be entitled to one vote at any meeting of the Board or committee/task force/team to which he/she is assigned.

Officers shall hold office until their successors are elected and qualify in their stead, until they are removed by the Board, or until their positions are filled as otherwise provided in these bylaws.

The individual elected to serve as President-Elect will serve as an officer for a three-year term, the first year as President-Elect, the second year as President, and the third year as Past President.

Section 1.  Committees may be established, terminated, or changed in status by the Board, except as otherwise provided in these Bylaws. Committees may make and submit recommendations, but shall not have any directive powers.

Section 3. Task Forces will be identified on an annual basis and driven by NACEs content needs. They will be dissolved when their mission has been accomplished. The President or President-elect will appoint the chair and members to task forces. The size of each task force will vary depending on its mission.

Meet at the call of the President, or of the Secretary-Treasurer, upon request by a majority of the members of the committee, to review emergency financial matters affecting NACE. Any formal motion that may be made by the Finance and Audit Committee may be made without a formal meeting, if consents in writing setting forth the action so taken are approved by a majority of the voting members of the committee and filed with the Secretary-Treasurer.

The Leadership Strategy and Sourcing Committee shall implement the nominations and elections procedures as spelled out in Article XIII as well as provide structure and processes to source leaders, identify leadership competencies, and train members for leadership roles. The Leadership Strategy and Sourcing Committee will deliver ongoing communications with members regarding leadership information and opportunities.

Section 9. Honors and Recognition Committee: The President shall appoint the Honors and Recognition Committee which shall consist of a chair and six other individuals at least one of whom is presently serving as a Director on the NACE Board. The Honors and Recognition Committee shall work to increase the recognition of NACE members by serving as an umbrella for all NACE honors and awards, assuring consistency in the process of giving awards and determining when an award should be created or eliminated, and carry out such other charges as may be assigned by the President and the Executive Committee.

Section 1. Written notice of all meetings of the Board of Directors shall be given to all Board members at least thirty (30) days before the date of the meeting. The notice must specify the general business to be transacted. The Board, at the meeting, may, by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the voting Board members present, consent to transact other business not specified in the notice.

Section 2. Notices shall be delivered personally, telegraphed, faxed, or mailed to the members of the Board, as the case may be, at their addresses appearing on the books of the national association. Notice by fax, mail, or telegraph shall be deemed to be given at the time when same shall be deposited with the United States postal authorities or the telegraph office for transmission, or at the time it is faxed or from NACE headquarters.

Section 3. Whenever any notice is required to be given under the provisions of these bylaws, a waiver thereof, in writing, signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be deemed equivalent to the giving of such notice.

Section 4. Attendance of a member of the Board shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting except where said member attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.

Section 1. An annual audit shall be performed as soon after the end of the fiscal year as is practicable. The auditor's report shall be made to the Secretary-Treasurer, who shall cause it to be distributed to the members of the Board of Directors. The audit shall be contracted for by the Board and shall be made by competent specialists who are independent of any national association activity.

Section 2. A copy of the complaint shall be served upon the member complained of at least thirty (30) days before the next meeting of the Board of Directors, and such member shall have the right to submit a written defense and to appear in person and/or with counsel and be heard at a Board meeting and such complaint shall then be investigated. In case it shall be found by two-thirds (2/3) vote of the entire Board of Directors that the charges against the member under investigation are sustained and warrant censure, suspension, expulsion, or fine of such officer, Director, or member, a resolution to that effect shall be passed and executed and such action shall be final.

Section 4. If a hearing is to be held by the Board on this matter, the member or individual charged will be given thirty (30) days notice of the time, date, and location of the meeting at which he/she can appear and be heard.

Section 1. All checks or demands for money and notes of the national association shall be signed by such officer or officers or such other person or persons as the Board may from time to time designate.

Section 1. These bylaws may be amended by the Board of Directors by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the voting members of the Board in office, provided the proposed amendment shall have been mailed, telegraphed, or faxed to the members at least thirty (30) days prior to the date at which action on such amendment or amendments is to be taken.

Liability Act 42 Pa. 8363 related to standard of care and justifiable reliance; and the breach or failure to perform constitutes self dealing, willful misconduct, or recklessness. Moreover, this limitation of liability will not extend to criminal or tax liability of a Director or officer.

Section 2. Indemnification: The National Association of Colleges and Employers shall indemnify any person who was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party to any threatened, pending, or completed action, suit, or proceeding, including actions by or in the right of the Corporation, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative, by reason of the fact that such person is or was a Director or officer of the National Association of Colleges and Employers, or is or was serving while a Director or officer of the National Association of Colleges and Employers at the request of the National Association of Colleges and Employers as an officer, employee, agent, fiduciary, or other representative of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan, or other enterprise, against expenses (including attorneys' fees), judgments, fines, excise taxes, and amounts paid in settlement actually and reasonably incurred by such person in connection with such action, suit, or proceeding to the full extent permissible under Pennsylvania law.

Section 3. Advancement of Expenses: Reasonable expenses incurred by an officer or Director of the National Association of Colleges and Employers in defending a civil or criminal action, suit, or proceeding described in Section 2 shall be paid in advance of the final disposition of such action, suit, or proceeding upon receipt of an undertaking by or on behalf of such person to repay such amount, if it shall ultimately be determined that the person is not entitled to be indemnified by the National Association of Colleges and Employers.

Section 4. Other Rights: The indemnification and advancement of expenses provided by or pursuant to this Article shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which those seeking indemnification or advancement of expenses may be entitled under any insurance or other agreement, vote of the Board of Directors or otherwise, both as to actions in their official capacity and as to actions in another capacity while holding an office, and shall continue as to a person who has ceased to be a Director or officer and shall inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors, and administrators of such person.

Colleges and Employers shall have the power to purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a Director or officer, employee, or agent of the National Association of Colleges and Employers, or is or was serving at the request of the National Association of Colleges and Employers as a Director, officer, employee, or agent of another corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan, or other enterprise, against any liability asserted against him/her and incurred by him/her in any such capacity, or arising out of his/her status as such, whether or not the National Association of Colleges and Employers would have the power to indemnify him/her against such liability under the provisions of these bylaws.

Board of Directors (notwithstanding their interest in the transaction), the National Association of Colleges and Employers may create and fund a trust fund or fund of any nature, and may enter into agreements with its officers and Directors for the purpose of securing or insuring in any manner its obligation to indemnify or advance expenses provided for in this Article.

Section 7. Modification: The duties of the National Association of Colleges and Employers to indemnify and to advance expenses to a Director or officer provided in this Article shall be in the nature of a contract between the National Association of Colleges and Employers and each such Director or officer, and no amendment or termination of any trust or other fund created pursuant to Section 6, shall alter, to the detriment of such Director or officer, the right of such person to the advance of expenses or indemnification related to a claim based on an act or failure to act which took place prior to such amendment, repeal, or termination.

Section 1. Cooperative relationships may be established with other non-profit organizations whose purposes are complementary to, consonant with, and supportive of the mission of the National Association of Colleges and Employers The NACE Operations Manual shall provide specific guidelines for the review and determination of cooperative relationships. All such proposed relationships shall be reviewed by the NACE Executive Committee, at minimum, and will follow current Operations Manual guidelines.

A. You'll save between $175 to $320 on your registration as compared to nonmembers. Another way to save is to register while the early bird rate is in effect. The earlier you register for the meeting, the more you save.

A. The National Association of Colleges and Employers is recognized by the National Board of Certified Counselors as qualified to offer Continuing Education Units for National Certified Counselors. Some of the presentations and workshops will be available for recertification credits. Check at the registration desk for details and forms.

If networking is important to your professional development (as it is to most of us), why limit yourself to the people you happen to meet in the halls during the 2006 National Meeting in Anaheim, California?

Now, you can get to know other National Meeting attendees before the conference and make arrangements to talk face-to-face using a special software program that has helped other national associations successfully enable and facilitate professional-to-professional conference networking.

Foundation is to foster leading-edge research and educational activities that advance the understanding of the career development and employment decisions of college graduates. To that end, the Foundation has earned a notable reputation for publishing specialized research in these areas and for fostering educational training programs for college career services professionals, human resources professionals, and graduating college students.

Behavior-based interviewing (BBI) is the most respected interviewing technique available today: In fact, most Fortune 500 companies use this tool to determine a candidates future behavior based on recent, relevant past behavior. Join this lively session and learn how to use BBI to uncover a candidate's potential and pitfalls. You'll also learn how to develop effective interview questions and evaluate candidates, and review legal considerations related to recruiting and hiring.

Learn how to stand out from the herd, get better results, and wrangle more prospects your way. This workshop is packed with creative ideas and tangible tools you can use right away to make your marketing more effective and memorable.

Career center and corporate trainers alike will find the material in this preconference program extremely useful for all types of diversity training needs. Participants will learn about simulation gaming as a powerful training technique and how to use simulations in diversity training.

Simulations are a powerful diversity training technique approximating real-life situations, eliciting real emotions and responses, within the safety of a training exercise. This dynamic mix of reality and safety create a learning experience that promotes immediate personal and professional growth. Participants will also learn about how to balance "training intensity factors" against trainee readiness, so as to maximize the effectiveness of one's use of a simulation game and minimize trainee risk.

Learning sessions are designed to deepen your knowledge in many areas or build your skills in one! Choose sessions individually or by selecting any one of the topic areas listed below. Each session in a topic area covers a different skill or emphasis area.

National Meeting by setting a schedule in advance. Attendees can choose among eight tracks of concurrent sessions. Each track contains sessions geared to college or employer professionals; some sessions will appeal to both groups.

HR/staffing and college career services practitioners. NACE reserves the right to determine the eligibility of any company, product, or service and the right to restrict, prohibit, or evict any exhibitor or product which, in the opinion of NACE, detracts from the character of the exposition or for any violation of the following Terms and Conditions. In the event of such restriction or eviction, NACE is not liable for refunding exhibit fees or any other cost incurred by the exhibitor. NACE will not accept advertising for tobacco, alcohol, drugs, or firearms and/or products/services that promote nudity, pornography. Products and services in the exhibit hall must be useful to college career services practitioners and college recruiting professionals. A company's participation in the exposition does not reflect a product endorsement by NACE. The exhibitor may not make any statements in print, orally or electronically that state or imply such endorsement.

Booth Requirements. Exhibitors are required to observe the following height guidelines: booths consisting of 10' x 10' inline or corner space must not exceed a height of 8 feet. Exceptions may be granted where the booth(s) are located along perimeter walls. Exhibitors in Island booths may display to a height of 12 feet. No walls, partitions, paintings, decorations, or other obstructions may be erected which will in any way interfere with the view of any other exhibitor. Exhibitors are required to submit their plan in advance for approval by NACE if such plans include the use of unusual effects or methods of production presentation. Exhibitors are required to ensure that their displays do not have a negative impact on the show environment through excessive noise, heat, light, etc.

Food and Beverages must be purchased from Anaheim Marriott, unless incident to the exhibitor's product line with written approval of the Anaheim Marriott. IMPORTANT: there is no room service from the conference hotel to the exhibit hall. All arrangements for food and beverage for special needs over and above the planned functions must be made with the Catering Department by April 7, 2006.

The Proposal Review Team encourages proposals from different companies and organizations representing diverse points of view. The team requests that individuals limit the number of proposals submitted to two.

Any speaker substitutions, deletions, or additions must be approved by the NACE Education Department. The Education Department reserves the right to edit accepted presentations for publication on the web site and in the Conference Program Guide.

NACE Conference programs are noncommercial. Individuals should refrain from using brand names and endorsing specific products. Under no circumstances should an association podium be used as a place for direct promotion of a speaker's product, service, or monetary self-interest. Presenters also must refrain from overt statements, harsh language, or pointed humor that disparages the rightful dignity and social equity of any individual or group.

As a nonprofit educational association, NACE does not provide honoraria for presentations given at the National Meeting. Presenters must cover all of their individual travel and living expenses. One speaker per concurrent session is provided with a full complimentary registration.

Known as an emotional and dynamic speaker, Peters has been called a gadfly, curmudgeon, and professional loudmouth. He dares audiences to break workplace rules, leap organizational barriers, and revolt against bureaucracy. He advocates "breaking the mold" to become a leader. Peters advocates passion and enthusiasm in the workplace to replace apathy and whining.

Ph.D. from Stanford in decision science and organizational behavior. Peters is a Fellow of the International Academy of Management, The World Productivity Association, the International Customer Service Association, and the Society for Quality and Participation.

Steve Uzzell is a top advertising and corporate photographer who started in the photography business 31 years ago as the assistant to the editor of National Geographic and a member of their photographic staff.

He now shoots for a roster of clients that includes airlines, automobile manufacturers, and travel, shelter, and fashion magazines. His work has garnered international acclaim and won numerous awards, including 10 from Communication Arts. Along the way he has photographed two books, Maryland and The View From Sterling Bluff, and had editorial work published in more than 50 publications.

Posner is Dean of the Leavey School of Business at Santa Clara University, located in Silicon Valley. He received his Ph.D. in organizational behavior and administrative theory from the University of Massachusetts, Amherst.

Some years ago, Lalita Tademy found herself holding the Bill of Sale for her great-great-great-great grandmother Elisabeth. The receipt for $800 turned Tademy's "obsession" with old records and research trips to explore her family's roots in the little farming community in Louisiana into something more personal.

Cane River, published in 2001 and an Oprah Book Club Selection, covers 137 years of Tademy's family history. While the author says the book is fiction, it's roots lay in Tademy's family research and in historical fact, and traces the stories of real women who struggled to keep their families together in spite of slavery, racism, and the culture of the plantation.

With no time limit for your chapters and a quick assessment after each chapter, you learn the material at your own pace. And once you have completed the self-study guide, you will be ready to apply your knowledge within your organization.

With no time limit for your sessions and a quick assessment after each section, you learn the material at your own pace. And once you have completed the self-study guide, you will be ready to apply your knowledge within your organization.

This workbook is designed for use by managers and supervisors involved in mentoring. Focusing on helping mentors improve their mentoring skills, the workbook covers five broad topic areas: mentoring basics, the mentor in the mentorship alliance, the mentoring process, key aspects of mentorship programs, and summary points and tips. Published by the GEM Consortium (National Consortium for Graduate Degrees for Minorities in Engineering and Science), this resources is especially useful for those who do not have a formalized mentoring program to guide their efforts.

If you're training new recruiters or working with line managers to interview new hires, NACE's Guide to Inteviewing College Students, is a convenient guide that can save you hours of training time and help anyone who is representing your organization gain confidence in his/her interviewing skills. This inexpensive self-study manual covers all the basics, including typical interviewer mistakes, interview format, and how and what to ask-plus legal and illegal questions. The guide also offers practical exercises to reinforce guidance and an interviewing bibliography.

Returns for other resources that are postmarked within 30 days from shipping date are accepted for a full refund; returns postmarked 31 to 60 days from the shipping date will incur a 50 percent restocking fee. No refund available 61 days after invoice date.

NACE will accept returns on all products except for audio and video material. Audiocassettes, CD-ROMs, and videos sales are final unless product is defective. Prepayment is required. Returns for other resources that are postmarked within 30 days from shipping date are accepted for a full refund; returns postmarked 31 to 60 days from the shipping date will incur a 50 percent restocking fee. No refund available 61 days after invoice date.

Each member of the NACE Governance Task Force was given a specific research assignment, and then participated in several conference calls and a face-to-face meeting in order to prepare recommendations to the NACE Board of Directors.

Making? program is designed as a starting point for career services professionals to use to help GLBT students address the challenges they face as they move from the supportive environment of many college campuses to the uncertainty of the workplace.

Growth Properties (GGP), a Chicago-based real estate investment trust that focuses on the acquisition, development, management, and marketing centers, created a tool for future professionals that recognizes demands in the job market require college students to have hands-on work experience and professional development.

With their like goals as their foundation, NYU Wagner and Idealist.org launched the Institute on Public Service Careers, a two-day event that was held in December 2004 with 33 career services professionals from colleges across the country attending.

Harris and her staff envisioned a web-based resume creation tool that would be easy to use; accessible at all times; flexible enough to address varied majors, degrees, and experiences/activities; and, most importantly, suitable for the college-level population. To create the system, they collaborated with Optimal Resume, an online resume service that offers flexible resume development.

Since the implementation of Optimal Resume-College Version in July 2005, more than 10,000 resumes have been created and uploaded by students using this tool. Harris says that the UCS staff overwhelmingly agrees that Optimal Resume-College Version has resulted in far superior resumes, taking much less time to critique and correct, as compared to resumes submitted prior to the implementation of the program.

When the NACE Governance Task Force completed work on a new strategic plan in January, it was a significant accomplishment for Kathy Sims. Sims was on the NACE Board of Directors when the new governance structure was proposed in the early 2000s and served as chairperson of the task force.

Vanessa Strauss, past-president of NACE and senior advisor to the director and deputy director, division of administration for the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, nominated Sims for the Kauffman Award. Strauss appreciates the depth of understanding of NACE that Sims brought to the initiative.

But many of her interests cross lines with her career. For instance, her first trip to the United Kingdom was on behalf of NACE. And she is exploring creating video podcasts as a delivery channel of career information to her students at UCLA.

Goodman led or collaborated with the team of colleagues that developed white papers and policy statements addressing and providing guidance on significant and challenging issues surrounding college recruiting. Topics addressed include guidance about the recruitment process for faculty members, the use of alcohol in recruiting practices, exploding offers, commercialization of career services, interviewing with third-party recruiters, and firms that offer third-party alumni career services.

Expanding their chosen career opportunities and refining those industry research skills (Exploring and Evaluating Life Options: BA 243). Other academic departments were then encouraged to develop a similar course specific to their department/major curriculum.

Today, the program has grown to include more than 220 associates nationwide with a more than 60 percent success rate in advancing associates to leadership positions within the company, including 10 company presidents and 30 senior operations managers.

The primary audience for the Quest web site is students who are undecided about their majors or who have no idea where their majors can lead them professionally. The secondary audience is prospective students who want to identify Ball State programs that match their interests.

Users can also get a list of career options for specific majors. They also can take a personality assessment similar to the Myers-Briggs Type Indicator, and find majors and careers appropriate for their personality types.

The career services office reports that having a parallel virtual form of a live presentation is beneficial because those who attended can easily access supporting materials, and students who missed any presentations are able to access the seminars.

The Office of Career Services and Placement also has developed an exercise to use with the guide that prompts students to write about a competency-related experience, describing the situation, their role and actions, the outcome, and what they learned. This exercise has proven an effective way to get students to connect their academic, co-curricular, and personal experiences to marketable skills.

Activities included a luncheon program for academic advisers and an evening presentation for university and high school students. At the luncheon, attendees learned about opportunities available in public health and resources they can use to assist students interested in public health careers. During the evening presentation, a keynote speaker and career panel of public health scientists addressed the scope of opportunities available in public health at the local, state, and international levels, and what positions in this field entail.

After collaborating on this event, a partnership formed between the University of Texas and the Texas Department of Health (now the Department of State Health Services) to develop internship opportunities under the supervision of public health scientists in the Bureau of Laboratories and the Bureau of Epidemiology.

Students who know what career path they want to pursue use less time and fewer resources from a career center. The career services office at the Bloomberg School of Public Health at Johns Hopkins University helps students interested in a public health career through a web-based tool that can be used for industry career exploration and decision-making.

The Degree Planner aims to educate undergraduate students and others about opportunities within the field, to link public health majors to careers, to assist current public health students in defining their career options, and to market the Bloomberg School to prospective.

The demand for job-search information was great: From 2000 to 2003, the York University Career Centre experienced a fourfold increase in attendance for in-house workshops. This surge stretched center resources and prompted a change in career information delivery from a workshop format to a seminar/lecture format.

Robbins and her staff wanted to develop a way to get more and better job-search information to more students. On October 16, 2003, after a five-month development period, they launched the Career Cyberguide, a multimedia job-search resource. Online presentations by center specialists are based on the information components of the center workshops, and feature audio, video, and graphic elements of the live workshops in a streaming presentation.

The Career Centre staff taped workshops and divided them into 10- to 20-minute segments. Interviews with staffing professionals from employers help clarify student expectations and corporate recruitment strategies. Downloadable PowerPoint handouts and templates accompany each section, allowing students to work through the materials as they watch and listen.

In recent years, career centers have faced many challenges. These include how to engage small and mid-sized organizations that have underdeveloped or no human resources functions and have no history of interaction with a career center, and how to best address the mounting concern about new college graduates leaving their state.

To help career centers at colleges and universities in Indiana meet these challenges, the Purdue University Center for Career Opportunities, with funding assistance from the Lilly Endowment, developed a publication and PDF that contain content relevant to campus recruitment visits and provide information applicable to most career centers. Why provide help statewide?

Navigating College Career Services in Indiana promotes college career services to prospective employers that have not historically sourced candidates through college and university career services in Indiana.

To assist educators in integrating the skills-based competencies needed by entry-level accounting professionals and provide evaluation and educational strategy resources, the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants (AICPA) developed the Educational Competency Assessment web site (www.aicpa-eca.org).

The library contains the Core Competency Framework, a data base of the skill-based competencies developed by the AICPA, and additional related information about the competencies, such as competency levels and elements.

The library also houses the Education Strategies Database, which provides information and suggestions regarding effective strategies to help students develop a particular competency, and other information and examples to assess student performance and evaluate competencies coverage.

Presented since 1983, the award recognizes and honors a college member of the National Association of Colleges and Employers for its development of a groundbreaking program in the career services field.

Iowa State's College of Engineering career services office developed a set of metrics to assess student development and demonstrate the ability-based outcomes required for accreditation. Staff also developed a sustainable system to deliver the tools to students, faculty, advisers, and experiential education supervisors, and supports the program by delivering data about student development to faculty each semester.

"During the last five years, engineering programs across the nation have been hard pressed to 'measure the immeasurable' in order to comply with new competency-based standards required for accreditation," says Leigh Turner, vice president of the NACE Board of Directors and Executive Director of Texas A&M University's career center.

Employers has been the leading source of information about the college market, for career services practitioners who advise students and alumni in career planning and the job-search process, and for human resources professionals who recruit and hire college graduates. NACE maintains a virtual press room at www.naceweb.org/press/.

When recruiters from Cap Gemini Ernst & Young (CGE&Y) head off to campus career fairs, they carry with them a single CD that combines the simplicity of PowerPoint with the pizzazz of video to help students learn about consulting careers with the company.

To that end, the authors devote a page to each skill area and recommend classes and activities students can participate in to improve in that area. A final page offers students a list of places to explore opportunities, including the campus career center.

As a 120-year-old chain, Sears, Roebuck & Co. has a rich history and a remarkable track record. But those virtues often were lost on job-seeking college grads who grew up on The Gap. In the minds of many, Sears was a store where their grandparents liked to shop, not an employer offering unlimited career potential.

More than two decades have passed since Donald R. Katz stood before a class of eighth graders, but the teacher in him has remained, guiding him throughout a career that has focused mainly on university relations and campus recruiting.

In 1998, Katz left banking to become a Chicago-based university relations manager and senior recruiter for American Management Systems, Inc., an international business and information technology consulting firm. Three years later, when the company reduced its labor force, Katz was among those caught in the downsizing. Because he had begun to do some independent consulting several years earlier, Katz was able to expand his business and begin yet another phase of his career.

To engage high school students in early career planning, Coker and the Career Planning and Placement Services staff at Tyler Junior College developed a booklet that introduces them to the world of work.

From accounting to social work, the Hot Jobs Viewbook provides overviews of various fields, including information on the training necessary to obtain jobs, types of positions, salary ranges, and suggested subjects students can take to prepare for particular careers.

The package consists of four four-color booklets: one of inspirational quotes; one on success and company values; another outlining compensation, benefits, and professional development opportunities, and a booklet to help students determine where they might fit within the organization.

Services staff, is a single-page monthly newsletter designed to increase student awareness of career center programming and services, experiential education opportunities, and on-campus recruiting schedules.

TVI Community College developed this CD-ROM to help students and graduates conduct a job search, begin or advance their careers, and/or make a job or career change. The CD-ROM features job search, resume, and interview modules, plus a glossary of terms and extensive resource listings. It also can be used as a 24/7 student resource and classroom tool.

COMET (Career Opportunity and Management Employment Training), a 10-month program, was developed by Applied Industrial Technologies as a fast-track training program to build a pool of future leaders, recruit and retain more college graduates, and formulate a career network.

Since its inception in 1994, the ECAC web site has evolved into a comprehensive site for students and employers, featuring an online recruiting calendar; job-search articles and assistance; links to employer web sites and other job-search sites; information about programs, orientations, and workshops; salary surveys, student and employer manuals, and continuously updated career center information.

This web site challenges visitors to test themselves in four interactive cases that each address a fundamental dilemma facing e-business today. The cases are actual project experiences of consultants that provide visitors with decision making opportunities and allow them to share their thinking on business issues.

Cap Gemini Ernst & Young evaluates visitor responses for creativity, insightfulness, and analytical ability to identify recruitment prospects prior to the beginning of its traditional recruiting season.

Through the profiles, students gain access to employer information customized for the Berkeley campus, employers increase their visibility among potential hires, and the career center generates revenues.

Burke previously served as a Rohm and Haas manager in research recruiting and university relations, corporate information security/research security, and also as a senior research scientist and recruiting supervisor.

Association of Colleges and Employers (NACE). Burke merited this honor for his contributions to the college relations and recruiting profession through years of service, commitment to the professional associations, advocacy of the college relations field, and the mentoring of other professionals.

Palamara says that in the Temple presentation, in subsequent presentations at job fairs, and in the workbook, the Towers Perrin group emphasized the importance of asking employers about other aspects of the job, including opportunities for advancement, pay raises, employee benefits, company values, and work-life balance.

The career services staff developed the video primarily to address student concerns and misconceptions about career services, i.e., that the center only serves graduating students. The staff also wanted to emphasize the point that students can use career services throughout and beyond their college years.

During the competition, teams of students compete for a hypothetical job with a sponsoring employer. The competition includes a career resource scavenger hunt, requiring hands-on use of CRC resources; company and industry research; and an interview with a representative of the competition sponsor.

The program was developed by Steven R. Kravinsky, director of business/LAS career services, to enhance students? cross-cultural awareness and to facilitate global relationships among career services practitioners.

To address their mutual concerns, Beck and Karrer initiated plans for a project that would partner two university divisions: Student Affairs (Beck and the CDS staff) and Academic Affairs (Karrer and students in his multimedia design and production class).

The interview journey leads students and alumni through four phases of the job search: creating a resume, researching a company, dressing for an interview, and responding to interview questions. After completing the journey, visitors are scored on their responses to questions in each section.

Elsewhere on the site, the exploration section poses frequently asked interview questions and critiques the answers students and alumni provide. Additional information about interviewing and other job-search skills appears in the reference section.

International, Inc. (OMI), an international environmental firm headquartered in Englewood, Colorado. At OMI, Hunt directs the human resources department, with oversight for staff training, career development and college relations programs, and HR program development. He also directs the management information systems and administration group.

Before joining OMI, Hunt served as director of human resources at Morrison Knudsen Corporation in Boise, Idaho. In that capacity, he was responsible for strategic planning, staffing, employee relations, training and development, compensation, and affirmative action.

He previously held the positions of director of staffing and university relations at Morrison Knudson, senior employment representative at Bechtel, and personnel representative at CDI Corporation, all in Boise.

"Internship programs are a way for employers and students to test each other out," says Mackes. "Employers get the chance to see the students in action, to see how they perform and fit into the workplace.

About the Job Outlook 2006 survey: The Job Outlook survey is a forecast of hiring intentions of employers as they relate to new college graduates. Each year, the National Association of Colleges and Employers (NACE) surveys its employer members about their hiring plans for the upcoming class of new college graduates and other employment-related issues. The Job Outlook 2006 survey covers employers? hiring intentions and related issues for the college Class of 2005-06.

When asked about "soft" skills, qualities, and characteristics in job candidates, employers responding to NACE's Job Outlook 2006 report cited communication skills as most important. (See Figure 1.) At the same time, however, when asked about candidate "holes," most identified communication skills.

"For more than 10 years, we've asked employers about key skills, and they have consistently named communication skills as critical, yet have also said this is something many candidates lack," says Marilyn Mackes, NACE executive director.

"The candidate's GPA (grade point average) can also play a big role," says Mackes. "More than 70 percent of the employers who participated in our survey said they screen candidates on their GPA, and more than half of those said they look for a GPA of 3.0 and above."

In addition, "employers place a lot of importance on relevant work experience," explains Mackes. "For new college graduates, that experience is typically gained through an internship or participation in a cooperative education assignment."

"Finding a job really is a job," she says. "As our study shows, employers have a substantial set of criteria against which they judge potential employees. Students need to demonstrate to employers that they have what it takes."

About the Job Outlook 2006 survey:  The Job Outlook survey is a forecast of hiring intentions of employers as they relate to new college graduates. Each year, the National Association of Colleges and Employers (NACE) surveys its employer members about their hiring plans for the upcoming class of new college graduates and other employment-related issues. The Job Outlook 2006 survey covers employers? hiring intentions and related issues for the college class of 2005-06.

The increases, says Marilyn Mackes, NACE executive director, are not unexpected and "track with what employers told us earlier this year-that they expected more competition for this year's college graduates. That increased competition often results in higher starting salaries."

In the business disciplines, accounting degree graduates saw their average starting salary offer increase 5.4 percent over last spring to $46,188. Business administration/management majors also fared well, posting a 3.9 percent increase for an average starting salary of $40,976. The news is also good for economics/finance graduates; their average offer rose 5.3 percent to bring their average starting salary offer to $45,058.

Computer engineering graduates saw their average starting salary offer rise a healthy 5.3 percent to $54,200. The average offer to electrical engineers rose 3.9 percent to $54,053. Interestingly, although employers responding to a NACE survey earlier in the year cited mechanical engineers as among the disciplines they expected to target, mechanical engineering graduates haven't seen that interest bubble up into their salary offers; their average offer rose just 1.4 percent to $51,761.

Data on the various liberal arts disciplines are limited at this time of year, but looking at liberal arts as a group shows that these graduates are also doing better this year than they did last year. As a group, the average starting salary to liberal arts graduates stands at $30,958, up 2 percent from last year at this time.

"Overall, we believe that this year's graduates will fare well in the job market," says Mackes. "At the same time, the good job market shouldn't be an excuse for students to sit back and wait for employers to come to them.

Universities indicated that they offer career counseling; more than 94 percent provide workshops related to the job search, such as interview preparation and resume writing; and more than 93 percent sponsor career fairs to help their students connect with potential employers.

Moreover, in most cases, the assistance is free to students. None of the respondents reported charging students for career counseling appointments; less than 1 percent reported charging for access to job listings; and just 1.1 percent reported levying fees for taking part in workshops. Similarly, only a handful reported that they charge students for resume referral services.

According to Mackes, many career centers also try to keep parents in the loop by letting them know what job-search services are available to their student. Nearly 40 percent of respondents reported that they reach out to parents with career and job-search information tailored to them.

"Seven of the top-10 majors with the highest starting salary offers saw increases in their offers over last year," says Marilyn Mackes, executive director of NACE, of the organization's Winter 2006 issue of Salary Survey. "Engineering remains strong, and another high point comes for economics/finance graduates, who saw a spectacular 11-percent increase to their average starting salary offers."

NACE will continue to track the job market for the college Class of 2006 through additional surveys and reports. In April, NACE expects to release an update on employer hiring intentions and a new salary report.

Mackes, executive director of NACE, of the organization's Winter 2006 issue of Salary Survey. "By and large, the average salary increases employers offered to new college graduates were respectable, and some were standouts."

Among those disciplines that saw changes in their starting salaries, most saw increases in them. Even among those that saw their starting salaries decrease, average offers tended to dip rather than plummet.

In the business disciplines, accounting graduates were among those that posted a better-than-modest increase: Their average offer now stands at $45,723, a 6.2 percent increase. But this increase pales in comparison to the increase posted by economics/finance graduates, who posted a spectacular 11 percent increase in their average starting salary offer, which now averages $45,191.

Business administration/management graduates saw their average salary offer increase by a respectable 3.9 percent, boosting their average salary offer to $39,850. Meanwhile, the average salary offer to marketing graduates fell by 3.4 percent, lowering their average offer to $36,260.

During the 2004 and 2005 academic years, computer science graduates enjoyed watching their average starting salary increase steadily. That streak ends with this issue of Salary Survey; the average offer to computer science graduates fell 2 percent-to $50,046, still a very respectable starting salary in anyone's book.

Data for liberal arts and sciences graduates are very limited, as is typically the case at this time of year. However, when these graduates are looked at as a group-rather than as separate disciplines-one can get a sense of where they stand relative to last year. The average salary to liberal arts majors as a group is up a healthy 6.1 percent over last year and stands at $30,828.

Your registration is not confirmed until payment is received by NACE. Once payment is received, you will receive a confirmation via e-mail. All event communication will be distributed to the attendee via email.

Women make up more than 40 percent of the work force. Childbirth, eldercare, and downsizing can interrupt a woman's career. Working women should plan for re-entry into the work force before they leave. This session will present career planning strategies for women who are anticipating a long-term hiatus from college recruiting/career services.

Women comprise more than 50 percent of most campus populations, yet they represent less than 15 percent of top business leadership positions. Explore a creative program crafted by top business schools and leading corporations to educate and engage young women in the diverse career options offered by business, no matter what their undergraduate major. In addition, be the first to preview a new, online, interactive resource that will help young women identify their career passions, meet inspirational role models in business, and build an online community of other young women who share similar career interests.

Learn how to market career services programs and services by incorporating pop culture themes. Proven best practices will be presented to help you engage and entice your students to participate in career services programs and training events. Learn successful techniques to increase your cyber counseling abilities and leverage your online technology use with your student population.

The authors of Barron's The Complete Job Search Guide for Latinos present a highly interactive workshop covering diversity best practices for career centers and employers, culturally sensitive service delivery, and using the new Multicultural Inventory for Career Assessment, Search, and Advancement applying the R.E.S.P.E.C.T model for counselors and recruiters.

By sharing staff, resources, programming, and NACElink technology, Purdue is creating pipelines among knowledge silos through customized partnerships with academic colleges and regional campuses. Implementation challenges and strategies will be addressed.

With the growing popularity of social networking sites, blogs, and vlogs, corporate recruiters have access to a substantial amount of personal candidate information from the Internet. Discuss the legal implications of viewing this information and/or using it to make hiring decisions. Gain an understanding of the current legal guidelines related to using online, public information in hiring decisions.

Four hundred students from 10 universities who have recently engaged in an international internship were surveyed. Hear what students said about their experiences: the academic, career, and leadership value of the experience; how they located and funded the opportunity; and advice for other students and student advisers regarding preparing for and engaging in an international internship.

"As you look ahead to the world in 2017, how do you envision college students and graduates interacting and connecting with employers? Describe the players involved and the tools and processes that will be used. Specifically, describe the roles that professionals in higher education and in employing organizations will play in this process."

Hear what task force members and contributing essayists predicted and bring your own predictions. Discuss the common themes, the variety of issues, and the more provocative thoughts of your colleagues and peers.

Review the highlights from Universum's 2007 United States M.B.A., undergraduate, and diversity aggregate research and rankings from a survey of more than 45,000 students to discuss this year's recruitment trends. Employer branding best practices will be discussed from the perspective of employers, career services, and students to pinpoint best methods to attract, recruit, and retain top talent.

Background screening is a strategy many organizations use to hire the right candidate. Learn best practices of employment screening for risk management. Give yourself peace of mind that your organization is fully compliant legally while accessing all the information pertinent to making an informed hiring decision.

Recruiting consultant Mary Scott will present comparative quantitative benchmarking data, along with selected qualitative findings from her most recent survey, which reveals which recruitment best practices have the most influence and impact on campus brand and how students differentiate between "the best and the rest" as they consider potential employers.

Learn techniques for developing internships and other employment opportunities in multiple countries based on a case study of a university that was successful in their efforts. Discover how to define your niche as a school; partner with other schools; understand diverse cultures; define global educational trends; create a global penetration strategy; and more.

Services Office at the University of Wisconsin-Madison uses podcasts to reach students and increase employer relations. Learn how you can do the same in a step-by-step presentation that makes podcasting simple and easy to use.

Get the basics: hear a discussion of the the process, the pitfalls, and priorities for building a college recruiting program. Two experienced recruiters will offer a perspective from both a corporate level and on-the-ground recruiting.

In addition, UGA met other off-site counseling needs through CareerBeam, an innovative counselor-supported web site that is designed to be user-friendly and easily accessible to alumni located anywhere in the world and for those who do not have the ability to meet with career counselors during traditional Atlanta office hours.

When is it okay to say "no" to recruiters? Career services professionals often experience recruiting requests from employers whose type of business, job responsibilities, or circumstances of employment conflict with established office policies. Other conflicts arise when recruiters circumvent career services offices and regulations. Can the NACE Principles for Professional Conduct help in developing ethical and enforceable policies?

Discover the secret to politically and strategically correct approaches that will convince faculty of the importance of career services in a successful student experience. Address the challenges and concerns you and your colleagues in career services have in establishing and maintaining effective relationships with faculty. Learn about products that faculty will find useful and get your message across, and explore special considerations to make the entire process of developing and maintaining relationships with faculty more efficient, effective, and successful.

This presentation offers the results of that survey and compares what students had to say with employer views of this online tool. Examine the issues: the ethics, accuracy, and assumptions students and employers have about this popular online social networking tool.

Achieving a diverse work force is a recruitment goal that requires re-thinking recruitment strategies. By blending various techniques, including social networking, to reach out directly to diverse audiences, the U.S. Department of State has obtained a more diverse applicant pool and has received recognition as an ideal employer by minority students.

Internet applicant, identify the various ways an applicant can apply via the Internet, and determine how to record and maintain Internet applicant records. This presentation reviews the regulations and illustrates an approach taken by one employer to meet the established standards. Find out how you can apply OFCCP regulations to your own internal hiring practices.

What's new in your office? If you are doing things the way you did them last year, they are probably stale. Freshen things up for yourself and your students. Our profession is constantly changing and we are challenged to be innovative. Share with your colleagues what is cutting edge and what's "so last year."

Review assessment methods developed by your colleagues and peers in career services, and based on the new NACE Professional Standards for College and University Career Services. Assessment methodology addressed will range from writing annual reports to assessing learning outcomes. The use of NACE Professional Standards for College and University Career Services in assessment will be discussed. An array of evaluation approaches used by college career services will be provided.

For some gay and lesbian students, sexual orientation is an integral part of their identity, including work. Others prefer a separation between their personal and professional lives. Learn how to help all of these students prepare for entry into the work force.

Many companies dedicate huge amounts of energy getting candidates to accept their job offers-only to fumble the process getting those same employees onboard and up to speed. Learn how the best employers ease the transition from candidate to employee. We will discuss findings from recent WetFeet research examining the onboarding process from the perspective of the new employee.

Panelists representing employers and career centers with heavy M.B.A. recruiting focus will engage the audience in a discussion of best M.B.A. recruiting practices. Participants will discuss developing an effective M.B.A. recruitment strategy, maintaining and strengthening relationships, choosing core schools, and measuring return on investment.

First class job candidate customer service separates the best from the rest. Learn how to enhance the job candidate's experience through effective relationship management and personalizing the recruitment process. You will see how to best use various communication channels and implement an innovative onboarding program. Walk away with best practices to improve your candidate relationships and recruiting results.

Only 1 to 2 percent of applicants are contacted by employers, causing major frustration for candidates. Authors Jeff Hunter and Dave Lefkow promise to turn the conventional wisdom about job seeking upside down.

During this presentation they will present the "Brand Talent Plan" concept, introduce college career practitioners to a new set of career principles to teach students; show recruiters a new kind of job seeker and a different approach to making successful new hires; and provide a roadmap for employers and job seekers to make better, more meaningful career matches.

Future work force shortages and challenges of recruiting the right talent are obvious trends. How can organizations align themselves with campuses that help them build the best talent pool? How can campuses work with organizations to develop a customized approach to developing partnerships that will best utilize resources? This panel will offer successful strategies.

Examine current and historical perspectives of historically black colleges and universities (HBCUs) with regard to recruiting and career services, and learn statistical results from recent diversity surveys pertaining to recruiting and retention strategies. Information from several HBCU diversity forums will be shared. Panelists will include a diverse group of HBCU career center leaders, along with NACE employer members, to discuss successful recruiting and retention strategies. The panelists will share the unique qualities of HBCU environments and best practices on recruitment and branding strategies.

Many practitioners in college career services and employer recruiting are proud of our student-focused marketing. We strive to expand student usage of our career centers and interest in our entry-level opportunities through approaches that treat students as "customers." But is the customer always right? Has the customer metaphor shaped a level of student expectation our profession can no longer fulfill? Join us for this fascinating "point/counterpoint" style session on student expectations.

Find out how an off-site two day retreat gave direction to students who were undecided in their career plans. Interactive experiences used to assist students in self-reflection will be covered. Included will be a discussion of the collaborative planning efforts of three departments in Pitt's Division of Student Affairs.

Explore the factors influencing search committee decisions and hiring authorities requirements for key career services positions in today's market. Discuss the future of the profession and how this will shape the profile of a successful leader in the years to come.

Employers will learn which visas are available for hiring foreign grads, including costs, timing, and employer obligations. Career services practitioners will pick up information to educate foreign grads on strategies to get jobs in the United States. The session will provide the most updated information available, making it valuable even for those who have seen participated in work visa seminars already.

Marilyn Mayo, IBM; Patricia Jones, University of Michigan, Dearborn Learn how to identify specific benefits of a co-op or internship program and gain a better understanding of the career services-employer relationships in these programs. Come hear best practices, share your own, and leave with a variety of great ideas for your own organization.

Assessing student learning provides career services with a critical measure of program success. Learn how to write student learning outcomes, develop measurement strategies, and use your results to improve programs and services.

Explore how one career center took an honest look at their multicultural competence. Share activities that define multicultural competence, examine qualitative/quantitative data from client evaluations and counselor self-assessments, and hear anecdotes demonstrating multicultural competence best practices.

What is public service? Who fits well into this type of workplace? How do nonprofits make hiring decisions? Discover what public service careers entail and learn to use this information in your work with students.

Explore the process of responsible decision-making within the political context of an institution. Nationally-known career center directors will present case studies, allowing participants hands-on analysis in small director-led groups. Participants will develop a paradigm for decision-making within the political environments of their institutions.

Review and discuss the elements you should consider to determine your vision for your college hiring activities and your work force needs. Then, based on your organization's needs, develop a school analysis to assist in the selection of schools and create metrics to measure the success of your recruiting program.

Customer service matters. Excellent customer service helps develop critical, profitable relationships and increases your market share with students, organizations, and other stakeholders on campus. Learn why customer service is critical and pick up strategies to develop loyalty while advancing your organizational goals in targeted customer services terms.

What is the job market like in Japan? In Europe? In Australia? Take a look at global hiring trends, with discussion of the similarities and differences in various international locations. Hear a panel of colleagues from around the world discuss international internships, sourcing international candidates, and more.

Hear about a new global study that followed 125,000 students for five years. What were their career aspirations-and how did their decisions change over time. Who and what influences them. Presenters will review their methodologies and some of the fascinating results of the study.

Some students seek internship credit but are unable to receive credit from their department. University of Nebraska-Lincoln Career Services offers a variable credit hour internship course taught via distance education.

Prepare for the top 10 emerging business trends affecting both global and local markets! By understanding their impact on the job market, you will best serve new grads, train your staff, and attract recruiters. In this dynamic session you'll gain insights into these vital trends and see how to put those insights into use right away. This up-to-the-minute presentation will help you plan for the present and the future.

Two-year college students can meet your critical needs, reduce turnover, decrease recruiting headaches and replace retiring employees. Two-year college students are your next generation of talent. Join this interactive, multimedia presentation and discussion on developing recruitment programs based on skills, fit, and talent.

The Stony Brook University Career Center's credit internship program, based on a corporate model, provides opportunities in counseling, marketing/graphics, human resources, communications, and technology. We will share our program's design: intern orientation and training, professional development activities, and ongoing staff responsibilities, as well as how we involve faculty and employers.

Learn how to redefine diversity as a change management process linked to business strategy and organizational culture. Discover which qualities will make a company an "employer of choice" in the competition for talent in a work force where 70 percent of the new entrants will be minorities and women?

Moving beyond a transactional relationship towards a strategic partnership is essential to success. Employers: learn how to distinguish your company with career centers to improve your recruiting results. Career services: see how to distinguish your school with employers to become a preferred source of candidates and a "Tier One" school.

Join corporate and career center colleagues for an informal discussion on best practices in on-campus diversity recruiting, interviews, mentorship programs, and training. This session will discuss new trends while also highlighting proven methods for recruiting and retaining diverse talent.

In today's changing world, what is important? Strategic partnerships, innovative concepts, and students' awareness of the ever changing world they live in. Thus, NYU Center for Career Development has strategically partnered with The New York Times to create innovative co-curricular, peer-to-peer programming. This partnership has increased newspaper readership and created widespread branding opportunities for the Times while fostering the understanding, through the unique lens of peer education as a means of career development, that knowledge of current political and economic issues is paramount in the millennial job-search climate.

Learn to define and identify components of career information literacy; plan collaborations with librarians and other campus professionals for improving students' career information literacy; design assignments for assessing students' career information literacy; and develop and deliver a collaborative, interactive career development course; and gather strategies for building relationships with campus librarians in order to increase students' career development.

What are the unique career development needs of graduate students and how can we best meet them? This session, based on experiences at Syracuse and Columbia universities, addresses the development of effective collaborations with critical stakeholders in order to design, expand, and market valuable programs to the graduate population.

Lynda Weatherman, Economic Development Commission of Florida's Space Coast With employers facing intense competition for qualified talent, today's economic development organizations are embracing new initiatives to ensure a skilled work force is available for local employers. Find out how to engage your local economic development commission, establish partnerships, and develop programs to recruit and retain young professionals and new college graduates.

Employers and colleges are interested in students; college want to train students for the world of work; employers want to recruit them. Explore successful partnership activities among career services, employers, and students. Examples provided for how employers and colleges can work together to enhance the employer presence while helping career centers augment programming to students to advance career knowledge.

Working Overseas) will outline for college career counselors the step-by-step strategies required for building an international career and finding an international job after graduation. Learn about "The Ideal International Profile," your "International IQ," and more. Walk away with "Quick Reference Cards" that will help your students interested in international assignments.

Take a look at recruiting and hiring from the perspective of nonprofit employers: How do nonprofits recruit? What do they look for when they hire? Then, use this information to bring nonprofit organizations to your campus, create strong long-term partnerships with groups in your community and elsewhere, and advise students on how to market themselves to a nonprofit.

In 2003, the organization's CEO wanted recruiters to hire new college grads and interns and created a brand new relationship with new grads based global university relations program. Share the strategies, successes, and challenges this organization has faced over the past four years as the program developed.

Association of Colleges and Employers (NACE), the association for human resources and career services professionals. As members, we abide by the Principles for Professional Conduct, an ethics document that serves as the framework and foundation for practices within the career planning, placement, and recruitment processes.

The Principles document tells us that serving alcohol to job candidates is inappropriate and inadvisable. The principle states "Serving alcohol should not be part of the recruitment process on or off campus. This includes receptions, dinners, company tours, etc. "

That means, having an open bar, a paid bar, or holding a recruiting event in a bar is inappropriate. Given the whole notion of alcohol abuse and the problems college campuses are having with alcohol among students, serving alcohol at a reception is sending the wrong message. Further, many college students are younger than the state's drinking age, and many college campuses now have a zero-alcohol-tolerance policy in effect. Therefore, serving alcohol could be in violation of a state's law and a school's policy.

If you would like to read the history of why this principle is included in the Principles document, you can read an article composed by the NACE Principles for Professional Conduct Committee on NACEWeb at www.naceweb.org/about/legal98sm.html.

The NACE College/University Interview Form is designed to provide employers and colleges with a generic and uniform interview scheduling form. Please feel free to print the form from NACEWeb or to download it to your computer. Please read over the tips provided to ensure that you use the form to its fullest potential.

Because some schools charge employers to send resumes, resume books, or other requested materials, the form includes a space for you to specify your overnight carrier of choice and your account number with the carrier.

The NACE Legal Department developed the following article to respond to inquiries from career services practitioners and employers about placement/credential files and reference letters. The article summarizes the key points of the Family Education Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA).

FERPA requires federally funded academic institutions to obtain student consent before disclosing personally identifiable information in students education records to third parties. Disclosure pertains to the hand delivery, mail, fax, or electronic transmission of information, including access to career services data bases of student resumes. A third party is any individual or organization other than the student or his/her parents.

Finally, FERPA does not specify a time period for retaining credential/placement files or reference letters. The law merely provides that an education record may not be destroyed if there is an outstanding student request to inspect the file. The school has the discretion to develop a record retention policy and communicate that policy to its students. The policy should include a deadline by which students/alumni must respond if they do not wish to have their files destroyed. Once the deadline has passed, and there has been no request for retention, the records may be destroyed.

Obtain signed, written consent from a student before a school official, administrator, career services staff member, or faculty member releases (orally or in writing) personally identifiable information to an employer, third-party recruiter, or resume referral data base.

Remind faculty members that, under the law, they may not communicate information about students, such as recommendations, academic transcripts, and any other academic information, without first receiving student consent.

Notify employers, employment agencies/contract recruiters, resume data bases, or other entities that student records are subject to FERPA, cannot be redisclosed without student consent, and that improper redisclosure will result in denial of access to those records for five years.

Determine, clearly define, and communicate to students what information will be considered directory information. Students must be given a reasonable deadline to notify the school if they want to restrict access to this type of information.

Note that FERPA does not address the issue of placing amended letters of recommendation into students files. Each educational institution is responsible for establishing and consistently enforcing its own policy on this issue.

The employment reference, or recommendation, has traditionally been considered an important part of the college recruiting process. Career services directors encourage, and in many cases require, that graduating students include reference letters in their credential/employment files as further documentation of their credentials, motivation, and overall employment skills. Employers, on the other hand, often review reference letters and conduct reference checks to verify a graduate's background and qualifications.

Until the early 1980s, employment references served their purpose relatively well. They tended to be candid and were sometimes painfully honest. However, in recent years, faculty, administrators, and employers have grown reluctant to provide frank information about their former students and employees, either verbally or in writing.

At the same time, another trend has emerged. There has been a noticeable rise in the number of lawsuits against employers and referral agencies for hiring and referring candidates who were unfit for their jobs and who also harmed innocent third parties. Often, the basis of these negligent hiring and referral lawsuits is that the employer or agency failed to conduct a complete reference check on the candidate or misrepresented the qualifications and characteristics of the candidate. To complicate the issue further, this "negligence" results, in part, from fear of being sued by the job candidate or former employee on the grounds of invasion of privacy.

These two trends have created a new dilemma in employment law. Simply stated, how can employers conduct a thorough reference check when reference givers are increasingly apprehensive about providing candid reference information? This brief, Writing Reference Letters, outlines the law regarding references, gives tips on preparing references, and provides samples of reference letters and the types of information that may properly be released during a reference check.

I have known [name of student] for the past [number of months, semesters, years] as [he/she] has taken the following courses which I teach: [list courses, give brief description of content of course]. As [his/her] professor, I have had an opportunity to observe the student's participation and interaction in class and to evaluate the student's knowledge of the subject matter. I would rate the student's overall performance in these subjects as average. This is evidenced by [his/her] grades--[state the grades].

Act of 1974 (FERPA), (name of your college/university) may not disclose personally identifiable information from my education record to third parties without my signed written consent. I also understand that I can revoke this consent at any time with a written and signed revocation.

I authorize the director and staff of the career services office at (name of college/university) to disclose by mail, fax, e-mail, Internet, or any other means, my resume/credential file and any other files related to me to third-party recruiters who may, in turn, forward my resume to interested employers.

The Family Education Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 opens many student records for the student's inspection. The law also permits the student to sign a waiver relinquishing the right to inspect letters of recommendation. The applicant's signature below constitutes a waiver; no signature means the student has the right to read his/her references.

There have been few court decisions regarding the Family Education Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA) since its passage in 1974. However, the U.S. Supreme Court issued two decisions this year within four months of each other involving alleged violations of the law, which prohibits the release of a student's education records without the consent of the student or the student's parent (if the student is a minor).

The question before the Court was whether the assignment and resulting grade should be considered an "education record" maintained by the school. The Court responded unanimously that neither the assignment nor the grade constituted an education record. Therefore, the disclosure of grades that occurs in the course of peer grading is not unlawful.

The relevance of the decision to career services professionals is in the Court's discussion of the term "education record." FERPA defines an "education record" as "records, files, documents, and other materials" containing information directly related to a student that "are maintained by an educational agency or institution or by a person acting for such agency or institution."

The Court noted that the word "maintained" suggests that the record is kept in a "filing cabinet in a records room at the school" or on a "permanent secure data base." Moreover, the Court stated, "By describing a school official and his assistant as the personnel responsible for the custody of records, FERPA implies that education records are institutional records kept by a single central custodian such as a registrar, not individual assignments handled by many student graders in the classrooms." Nor are the student graders "acting for" the school when they place a grade on the paper.

If a student assignment is not considered an education record because it was created and controlled by the student, does that hold true for student-created resumes? In other words, how should career services treat resumes that are stored in electronic data bases and disclosed to employers electronically? Is signed written consent necessary prior to disclosure or can the resume be disclosed without this form of consent?

In light of the Court's decision, some view education records as only those records that are controlled and maintained by the university and have an element of permanency. They reason that since a resume is created and changed at the discretion of the student, it is not an education record even if it is stored in the school's data base. They also assert that if the resume does not contain any personally identifiable information such as GPA, the disclosure requirements of FERPA are not applicable.

Others, however, say there is no difference between storing a student's resume in an electronic format or in a file cabinet. They contend that if the student-created resume was considered an education record on paper, shouldn't it remain so online? Although the Supreme Court specifically mentioned records that are maintained on a "permanent secure database," it did not address the handling of the student-created record once the school stores it.

July 2, 2001) addresses the question of whether a student can bring a lawsuit for money damages against a school that violates FERPA. The Court, in a 7-2 decision, held that FERPA does not give individual students (or their parents) the right to sue the school if the school discloses confidential student information without the student's/parent's consent.

The case involved a lawsuit filed by a former student who charged that he was unable to get a teaching job because a school official told the state's teacher certification office that he had been accused of sexually assaulting another student. The student claimed a violation of his FERPA rights as well as negligence and defamation. The lower court awarded the student monetary damages in the amount of $1.15 million dollars, $450,000 of which were for violations of FERPA. After the State Supreme Court upheld the award, the school appealed the FERPA award to the U.S. Supreme Court.

In adopting the law, the Court said that members of Congress intended for the U.S. Secretary of Education to enforce its privacy provision by withholding federal funds to non-compliant institutions. According to the Court, FERPA does not contain any "rights-creating language" giving students (or parents) the ability to sue institutions that release confidential information without permission. Because the provisions speak only in terms of institutional policy and practice, not individual instances of disclosure, they do not provide grounds for individuals to sue educational institutions over specific disclosures.

Career services professionals who would like to forgo signed written consent, as a condition to disclosure of resumes or other student information, should review this policy change with their university counsel. In light of the recent Supreme Court decisions regarding FERPA, caution clearly outweighs convenience.

Your university's vice president for student life summons you to meet with her and the university's vice president for institutional advancement. The vice president explains that Bob Grates, an alumnus of the university, trustee of the board, and the CEO of Nothing but Net (NBN), a major high-technology company, has approached the university. This company is interested in a long-term relationship with your university, which will result in giving NBN the inside track into the university's "best and brightest" computer science and M.I.S. graduates.

NBN proposes to finance all of the technology needs for your career services office for the next 10 years, as well as provide a sizeable endowment for the career services office. The company will also fund scholarships and faculty research. In exchange, the career center will be renamed the "NBN Career Center" and the career services director is expected to place the NBN logo on all of his office's publications and on the office's web site. NBN will have permission to use the University's logo on its web site. Finally, NBN will have first option regarding on-campus recruiting dates and table locations at job fairs, and it will be permitted to sponsor an exclusive minority internship for African-Americans only. The VP for institutional advancement obviously is ecstatic about this and hopes that you will work with Mr. Grates to meet his requirements.

Specifically, "if employer funds provide greater prominence to the names and opportunities of specific organizations and their industries, the career center has an obligation to make every effort to provide students not interested in these specific organizations or industries with contact and/or information about alternate employers in keeping with their needs and interests".

From an ethical perspective, what Mr. Grates is proposing is essentially buying access to students. Principle 4 states: Career services professionals shall provide generally comparable services to all employers, regardless of whether the employers contribute services, gifts, or financial support to the educational institution or office and regardless of the level of such support. In addition, ethically, an employer cannot expect preferential treatment when it comes to setting up recruiting visits and placement at career fairs. Another ethical issue to consider - since the company is a high-tech, would this be a turn-off to non-technical students?

In reference to the minority internship for African-Americans only, it is recommended that this program be set up through the appropriate academic department or minority program office on campus. For example if Mr. Grates is interested in an engineering student for the internship, the Minority Engineering Program office would be the place to work through for this request 4. What are your options? What are the pros and cons of those options?

It is the career Center Director's job to negotiate this situation so that the career center upholds the ethical standards by which it operates as well as balancing the sensitive issues within the university in the arena of development and fundraising.

An employer concerned about meeting the company's workforce needs in the 21st century requests the career services office to supply him/her with a list of junior and senior African-American, Asian-American, Hispanics, Native Americans, and disabled students to invite to a special dinner at which time the company will present information about the firm and the available jobs within the company. This company has been a major financial contributor to the school's diversity retention programs. While there is no direct pressure, the career services director realizes that the company's high visibility on these issues may create some subtle pressure for her to comply with the request. In addition, the company has hired students from this school in the past and the students have done well professionally with the employer.

Referring all interested students for employment opportunities without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, age, gender, sexual orientation, or disability, and providing reasonable accommodations upon request; and c) Assisting recruiters in accessing certain groups on campus to provide a more inclusive applicant pool."

No-it is possible that the employer would subsequently invite only these students to interview with their organization, and this is problematic because career services' office has a duty to refer all students for employment opportunities without regard to race or disability status, according to Principle #6 for career services professionals. Alternatively, refer the employer to the multicultural students' office so this office can assist in publicizing the event to the student organizations with whom they work, and/or offer to send the invitations for the employer to students registered with the career services office.

This conflicts with Principle #6 for employment professionals that, in part, states "employment professionals will maintain equal employment opportunity compliance and follow affirmative action principles in recruiting activities in a manner that includes recruiting, interviewing and hiring individuals without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, age, gender, sexual orientation, or disability, and providing reasonable accommodations upon request." Therefore, if the company only interviews minority students, they violate this principle and can be vulnerable to allegations of employment discrimination.

As noted in the response to question 4 above, the CSO should refer the employer to the multicultural students' office so this office can assist them in publicizing the event to student organizations with whom they work, and/ or offer the CSO can offer to send the invitations for the employer to students registered with their office, if students identify themselves as minority students or students with disabilities.

A career center wants to do more to attract the minority student population to their office and their web site. The staff brainstormed with a focus group of minority students. Out of the brainstorming session bloomed an idea to develop a web page with resources, employment, and internship opportunities for students of color? One of the staff members checked and discovered that a number of career centers list web resources in their job-search resources for students of color.

African-American or Latino to handle minority students only. In this way, when a minority student walked into the office he or she would feel that there was someone "like them" who could understand their needs.

From an ethical perspective, one can pose the question "Is it appropriate and fair for the office to provide specialized resources and information to a particular group?" Also, if services are being offered for one group, minority students, should comparable services be offered to other groups such as international students, women, non-traditional students, etc?

Career Services, it is acceptable to provide resources for special populations who have unique needs related to career development and employment (page 15 of Professional Standards for College and University Career Services publication). Also, in the Principles for Professional Conduct, Principle 6-c states: Career services professionals shall maintain EEO compliance and follow affirmative action principles in career services activities in a manner that includes: Informing protected groups about employment opportunities, including those occupational areas where they are underrepresented and developing awareness of, and sensitivity to, cultural differences and the diversity of students, and providing responsive services.

If the decision is made to design a web page for minority students, it should only include resources targeted to that group, not job postings and should be accessible to all students. The job postings should be included in the office's current jobs' database with the provision that "women and minorities are encouraged to apply."

Since it is inferred that job listings include "employment and internship opportunities," having a separate web page with job listings for a selected population violates the preamble precept of an "open and free selection of opportunities" because it restricts access to other students. In addition, having a web page only for minority students may suggest that the precept of "maintain a recruitment process that is fair and equitable to candidates and to employing organizations" is violated, and, at the very least, there is the perception of preferential treatment.

Also, Employer Principle #6-a states that "Recruiting, interviewing, and hiring individuals without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, age, gender, sexual orientation, or disability, and providing reasonable accommodations upon request."

Some suggestions in the hiring process are to target recruitment efforts for the position to include employment resources specifically for minority candidates, and indicate that women and minorities are encouraged to apply.

Another point to consider in pursuing the hiring of a counselor of color to work with minority students may reinforce the erroneous assumption that only minority members can help other minority group members.

She has an undergraduate degree in communications and media ('81) and is completing her master's in English. Her thesis and area of greatest interest currently is in media literacy. It deals with educating the public about the impact media has on us, particularly the influence of violence.

She has developed a vision "disability" that is making any close work difficult for her. She is seeing specialists for this condition and is not losing her sight, but eyestrain causes her eyes to cross. As much as she really enjoys desktop publishing and proofing work, she has estimated that she could do this work only about 25 percent of the time.

Job Choices magazines, pointing out her rights to confidentiality. b) Request permission from the client to share detailed, confidential information on the list serve, prior to using it as a resource. c) Fully disclose the list serve membership, and its potential accessibility to the client. d) As an alternative, offer to discuss the issue with a select group of colleagues, as opposed to a list serve where the membership is unknown. Even then, steps a, b and c should be followed. e) If the client agrees to have information shared, whether on a list serve or to a specific group of colleagues, be sure to indicate to the group that the client's permission has been obtained.

Retrieve.com, an online systems vendor, has come to your campus to talk to you about outsourcing your student data base and placement files. The system requires a student to personally upload a resume for viewing by an employer. Only the student can upload the resume and it must be done from the student's account. The student can do this from his or her dorm room, apartment, or at the career services office. Only employers who are subscribers to the vendor's service and have a password can view the resumes. Retrieve.com assures you that there is no need for a written signature providing permission to disclose the resume to the employers. Since you have no student registration fee and are looking to streamline your efforts, eliminating a mandatory signature card would help.

EEO guidelines? f) What is Retrieve.com's privacy policy? g) Will the office have to run a parallel data base to coordinate campus interviews? h) Do employers pay a fee to Retrieve.com and is it significant enough to hinder access to your students? i) If you outsource your data base to Retreive.com, does it preclude you from working with other vendors, i.e., is it an exclusive relationship?

Therefore, at present, it is still advised that such disclosure requires the hand-written signature of the student on a consent form. c) Further, according to the Spotlight article, "Federal Agency Recommends Data Privacy Policies for Web Sites" (Nov.

There are certainly privacy issues: a) as noted above, students must give their written permission to disclose their information to a third-party; and b) the vendor may disclose personal information collected from the students and then pass that information on to other vendors, such as advertisers.

You have encouraged your professional staff to interact and brainstorm with each other when problem student situations arise. The interaction could occur in person or over the e-mail. Because everyone has e-mail there seems to be more e-mail interaction than person to person interaction, but that seems to be the new 21st century way of discussion.

In any event, several of your counselors have been e-mailing each other about Bob, a student who has had problems landing a job. Jill, the person with whom the student has been working, has pinpointed the problem as his poor presentation during interviews. Jill has been e-mailing Joe and Joyce about the problem and the way it should be addressed with the student. These individuals know the student and have also worked with him in the past. Some of the e-mails refer to the student's dress as "pimp-like," and refer to his communication abilities as if "he was high on drugs."

Pam, a student intern, in your office, just happens to see one of these e-mails and tells Bob. Bob is furious and storms in your office demanding an explanation. Pam also becomes concerned about what is being put in writing about her and demands to see all of the e-mails among the counselors pertaining to her.

Ethically, this scenario raises the issue of maintaining confidentiality of student information. As outlined in Principle #7 for career services professionals, "any disclosure of student information outside of the educational institution will be with prior consent of the student unless health and/or safety considerations necessitate the dissemination of such information." And while information about Bob was not shared outside of the career services office, the staff members in question did not "exercise sound judgment and fairness in maintaining the confidentiality of student information, regardless of the source, including written records, reports, and computer data bases", as further outlined in this Principle. Also, the fact that some of the counselors made the derogatory comments about Bob it calls into question their professional competence and whether they have appropriate counseling skills (Principle #2).

Further, as outlined in Principle #1, career services professionals shall not impose their personal values or biases, and their comments are troubling because they may not be based on fact, but stem from differences in values with Bob and students like him.

No. Clients, or students, as in Bob's case, share information with counselors with the understanding that their confidences will not be compromised. It would have been permissible for Jill to discuss his situation with other staff members if she had obtained his permission to do so. At a minimum, however, student interns should not have access to these confidential discussions.

Yes and no. Yes, to the extent that the exchange was not in writing, and therefore, did not constitute a permanent record and present greater opportunities to libel the student because of the ease of disseminating this information. No, to the extent that, no matter what the context of the discussion, the staff members exercised poor judgment by not restricting their discussion to factual information vs. subjective impressions and using unprofessional language.

It is possible that interns may at times have access to confidential student information, regardless of the source, but student interns, just as counselors, must be trained in the proper use of this information and abide by office policies and guidelines.

Corp. merges with Super Mega Inc. and will layoff 2,000 'redundant' workers. Mega has decided to lay off workers to avert impending bankruptcy." Jim calls the firm and the recruiter assures him that everything is just fine and reconfirms that Jim has great potential with the new company.

Based upon the facts as presented in the above scenario, and consistent with "Career Services Principle #10," the career services director should advise Jim against reneging on the offer as a result of information reported in the media. If the recruiter has provided assurances that "everything is just fine", until that fact is known to be untrue, the student has an obligation to accept this offer in good faith. The career services director should also offer to contact the company to verify the reported layoffs and that Jim's job is not in jeopardy.

This might include looking for other positions within the organization, assisting the candidate in finding positions elsewhere, or engaging the assistance of an outside firm to help the candidate obtain comparable employment.

In fact, they have given the school thousands of dollars over the years. The Company is committed to increasing the diversity of its work force. The company offers a summer internship for students between their junior and senior years in school. They will pay the students a salary during the summer, as well as their tuition, books, and lab fees for their senior year. As a condition of receiving the tuition for the senior year, students are asked to accept an offer of full-time employment with the company at the end of the summer. After acceptance of the offer, if the student revokes it, he/she must repay the tuition, plus interest, to the company.

Sandy Rodriquez accepts an offer of employment with Durable after her summer internship. Durable pays $5,000 to the school for tuition and lab fees, and pays $1,000 to Sandy for books. About four months later, she learns that Drygoods has a poor reputation regarding promotion opportunities for women and Hispanics. She also is offered another opportunity with a different company at a starting salary that is $5,000 more than the Drygoods offer. She tells Drygoods she is not interested in working for them.

Initial discussions with the company should focus on the alleged poor reputation regarding promotion opportunities for women and Hispanics to determine if these are, indeed, reflective of past practices or if such discriminatory practices continue.

An employer offered an internship to a student. After the student accepted the offer, the employer gave the student an "Indemnity and Hold Harmless" agreement that the student was to have the university career services office sign. The agreement covered injury to the student and any possible claims that the student could bring against the employer. It also required the school to pay the employer's legal expenses in defending a claim brought by the student. The internship is not for credit, and the student would be paid. While it was found through a posting in the career services office, it was not affiliated with the university in any way. The employer did not come on campus to interview the student. The university's legal counsel advised the office not to sign it. The employer said that without the school's signature, it would withdraw the offer (and it did). The intern and his parents were required to sign the agreement last year and this year the school was also asked to sign it. The student was quite angry that the school refused to sign the agreement, and he was now left without an internship position for the summer.

The purpose of the "hold harmless" agreement is to provide an employer a legal exemption from liability for injury or other damage or wrongdoing to an employee. In this situation, the employer is requiring the intern and his parents to sign a "hold harmless" agreement and is also requiring the Career Services office where the student attends school to sign the indemnity and hold harmless agreement. In effect, signing this agreement would make the parents and the Career Services office responsible for the student and would also make the Career Services office liable for any legal expenses if the student filed a claim against the employer. The employer assumes no responsibility or accountability for injury or "damages" to the student intern; it also protects the employer from incurring any legal expenses if the student intern files a claim against the employer.

No, it is not ethical to require interns to sign a "hold harmless" agreement in order to be accepted for an internship. Employers are responsible for the well being of their employees, intern or long-term employee, while they are on the job. If the individual is a contract employee, the contract employee agrees to assume all the risks on their own behalf. However, entering into an agreement with a prospective hire for an internship while the prospective hire is still in college without full knowledge of the ramifications of such an agreement is unethical treatment of the individual.

The employment agreement is between the student intern and the employer. In no way should the university be obligated to accept legal or financial responsibility of the intern while employed by the company. The Career Services office serves only as advisor and counsel to the student and facilitates the connection of the student with the employer. The Career Services office should not incur financial or legal liability for the well being of a student while they are working in an internship. The internship is short-term employment and the responsibility of the employee should rest with the employer.

No. Whether the internship is sponsored by the school, or the interviews are conducted on campus, the employment is between the intern and the employer. The university provides counsel, advice and facilitates the method that the student and employer become connected. The university should not assume any liability for injury or legal expenses of a sponsored or unsponsored intern on the work site of the employer.

Finally, Career Services should advise the employer of the reasons why the university legal counsel has advised the school not to sign the "hold harmless" agreement and encourage the employer to hire the intern in good faith without requiring the agreement with the student/parents or the university. Based on all of these concerns, the employer should be encouraged to require that all department hiring managers understand the ramifications of requiring "hold harmless" agreements as a condition of employment. b. The Career Services director, or representative should contact the student and review the ethical and legal concerns as outlined by Career Services and advise the student that the employer has been contacted and discussed alternatives to the their current recruiting and hiring requirements. Explain to the student that the ethical practices of a company are indicative of their philosophy, culture and values. Help the student evaluate the situation using sound judgment in relation to what kind of work environment, corporate culture and career opportunity the prospective employer offers.

Also, provide the student with other viable internships or resources to locate internships of comparable substance. This may include on-campus interviews, access to job listings, career advising, and access to alumni network. c.The employer should open a dialogue with both the student and the school to explain their reasoning for requiring this "hold harmless" agreement and to come to an understanding and/or a reconciliation with the school and the student about the requirement.

The employer should make sure all department hiring managers understand the legal, ethical and practical ramifications of requiring a student to sign a "hold harmless" agreement and re-examine their stance on the requirement. In most cases, it is unethical to require a student to sign a "hold harmless" agreement.

Everyone who you met at Global Oil Company was very impressed with your potential contribution to the Company. In that regard, we are pleased to offer you a position as a geologist at a starting salary of $60,000. Because we are making this offer well in advance of your start date, which is on or about June 1, 2003, the salary may increase pending market conditions.

"Employment professionals will refrain from any practice that improperly influences and affects job acceptances. Such practices may include undue time pressure for acceptance of employment offers and encouragement of revocation of another employment offer. Employment professionals will strive to communicate decisions to candidates within the agreed-upon time frame." b) Employer Principle #2: "professional knowledge"

"Maintain an open and free selection of employment opportunities in an atmosphere conducive to objective thought, where job candidates can choose optimum long-term uses of their talents that are consistent with personal objectives and all relevant facts."

According to Spotlight (June 15, 1994), "A student must be given a sufficient opportunity to consider an offer. Certainly, if the student is offered a cash incentive and is also told that he/she must accept the offer within a short time frame, then there is improper influence." That is certainly true of the two-week preemptive first deadline. If a signing bonus is felt to be necessary, make it contingent on accepting the offer to work for the company by a reasonable date. While a minimum of three weeks to return a decision on a job offer is generally recommended, "Exploding Offers" suggests that employers who make job offers at the beginning of fall semester ought to consider keeping their offers open until the end of the semester. Perhaps move this back to December 1, which is totally reasonable. Students who do not accept the December 1 offer could still be considered for positions through January 1, but without a bonus.

Katherine beamed with excitement as she took the very thick envelope from Company A out of her mailbox. Since it was Friday, she thought this was a wonderful way to begin her weekend. Katherine had visited the company only two days ago and had not been given any indication that she would hear from them so soon. Graduating in six months, Katherine had worried that the tightened economy might lead to a scarcity of job offers for her.

Introduced to Company A at the career fair on Monday, Katherine had been invited at that time to visit the company's facilities on Wednesday. During the site visit, recruiters discussed the fact that every employee had made a six-figure salary within nine months, even though the company had offered employees starting salaries lower than most in the industry. While at the facility, Katherine was given the opportunity to speak briefly to two employees. Unfortunately, neither employee discussed salary during this session. Although Katherine had some reservations, she believed she could work for the company.

B, a large, well-established company with a solid reputation. She had been interviewed by the firm last week, and was told she would be contacted within the next week. Katherine planned to travel home next weekend, and looked forward to discussing her prospects with her parents. She also wanted to gather more information on Company A next week, in order to make a more informed decision regarding any potential offers.

Monday. The letter stated that the quick deadline existed because so many people desired the few positions that were available. The letter emphasized the fact that the company would not grant any extensions.

A's offer to allow her more time to research the company even though she might later renege on the offer. What advice would you give her? Would your advice be different if she were given three business days vs. three calendar days to make a decision?

No. According to Principle #1 for employment professionals, "employment professionals will refrain from any practice that improperly influences and affects job acceptances", and these practices may include "undue time pressures for the acceptance of employment offers".

Committee Position Paper on Exploding Offers. The document recommends that employers give students a minimum of three weeks to return a decision on a job offer, noting that "the best employment decisions (for both students and employers) are those that are made with the greatest amount of information". Importantly, it is also noted that students given sufficient time are less likely to renege on job acceptances. Company A's deadline restricts Katherine's ability to gather more information about both Companies A and B.

A's offer even though she might later renege on it later. What advice would you give her? Would your advice be different if she were given three business days vs. three calendar days to make a decision?

Offer to assist Katherine by calling Company A and discussing the value of providing her with more time and referencing the NACE Position Paper, as well as the policy, if there is one, of the career services' office regarding offer timelines. Assist Katherine in comparing the two offers, given the limited information she has about them.

Additionally, assist her in gathering further information quickly by contacting colleagues to determine if they have any experiences, good or bad, with Company A. No, the advice would be the same, but with the additional time, you could assist her in gathering even more information.

As noted above, offer to assist Katherine by contacting the company and discussing the situation with them. It is important to emphasize that even if she declines the offer, you should have this discussion with the company because their actions likely represent a recruiting practice and not an isolated incident. Therefore, without intervention, their actions will cause problems for other students and for other career centers.

A top-notch applicant applies for two jobs. Company A extends an offer to the student first and tells the student that he has 24 hours to accept or the offer is no longer extended. The student has not heard from Company B. In order not to lose the job offer, the student feels compelled to accept the offer of Company A. Two days after he has accepted A's offer, Company B extends a better offer. The student has the potential to move faster and go further if he joins Company B. He reneges on Company A. The career services office learns of this after the student had reneged upon the job offer.

"Employment professionals will know the recruitment and career development field as well as the industry and the employing organization that they represent, and work within a framework of professionally accepted recruiting, interviewing, and selection techniques." c. Career Services Principle #10 - "educating students about obligations"

Career services professionals will advise students about their obligations in the recruitment process and establish mechanisms to encourage their compliance. Students' obligations include providing accurate information; adhering to schedules; accepting an offer of employment in good faith; notifying employers on a timely basis of an acceptance or nonacceptance and withdrawing from the recruiting process after accepting an offer of employment; interviewing only with employers for whom students are interested in working and whose eligibility requirements they meet; and requesting reimbursement of only reasonable and legitimate expenses incurred in the recruitment process."

A Principles for Professional Conduct Committee Position Paper." f. Similarly, consider making special note of this issue in the orientation literature and verbal presentations to students regarding on-campus recruiting and other employment programs run by the career services office.

Neither the career services director nor the supervising faculty were notified of these occurrences. When the director found out, she called the company. She was told that because this was an employment matter, the company had to treat that information confidentially.

The director was upset about not having been contacted, yet there was nothing in the participation agreement between the school and the employer that obligated the employer to do so. The director is concerned on several counts. These students are enrolled in a course (albeit non-credit) verified by the registrar's office. When the students leave the work site prematurely, for whatever reason, they are considered as having dropped the course and are no longer enrolled in school. The director is concerned about the liability while the student is on the work site, and also after the student quits or is terminated from the internship, and before the student commences taking courses again. Also, students who are terminated mid-stream can lose scholarships. Compounding the situation is that a significant number of students are slated to go out on these assignments this summer.

Yes and no. Yes, because the receipt of academic credit does have serious impacts upon a student who quits or is discharged from the work site before the end of the semester and because the awarding of academic credit requires a higher level of interaction between the college and the employer, i.e., a stronger partnership. No, because even if the internship did not receive academic credit, and hence, the relationship was less formal between the college and the employer, the nature of the situations are disturbing and merit disclosure to the college.

Yes, but in doing so, the employer should exercise careful judgment to ensure the application of fair and consistent standards in all other similar situations. However, a student's academic status should not preclude the student from complying with company policies and procedures. The company should follow normal disciplinary policies and procedures as with any other intern or employee of the company (e.g., some policy violations are grounds for immediate dismissal, where other violations may require a verbal or written warning, or a corrective action plan).

They should take quick action to determine through their discussion with the employer and possible further investigation (i.e., interviewing other interns) whether Greenwood Technologies provides a safe and sound working environment. If it does not, then they should assist the students in obtaining other work experiences for the summer.

Additionally, the participation agreement should be revised to include, if it does not, information for the student that describes the expectations and policies/procedures of the employer as well as the risks of losing a scholarship and other related student opportunities or benefits of the internship program.

An employer revokes an employment offer a month before Sandy Dee was to begin work for the employer. She is told that when the employer made the job offer, the company's personnel needs for the coming year were overestimated. While apologetic, the employer does not offer her any financial assistance. The employer, however, offers to send her resume to other companies that are hiring and to give Sandy a good reference, i.e., "We would have hired her had it not been for the miscalculation in staffing needs." Fortunately, Sandy has not relocated because the job was local.

"Employment professionals will supply accurate information on their organization and employment opportunities. Employing organizations are responsible for the information supplied and commitments made by their representatives. If conditions change and require the employing organization to revoke its commitment, the employing organization will pursue a course of action that is fair and equitable." b) Employer Principle #2 - "professional knowledge"

Fall 2002 start date, the candidate is under no further obligation to the employer. She has been compensated as a result of waiting, as specified within the terms of the original delayed offer. However, it is still May 2002 and she should be up front with B&B, Inc. about her consideration to reactivate her job search. It is really the candidate's decision as to "wait it out any further".

However, nineteen months is a long time to delay one's job search, and the pattern for continued delays described above does not bode well. As a career services professional, I might advise her to commence job search activity at this time, and advise the employer as to her concerns and actions.

Two years ago a faculty member received a modest research grant of $100,000 from Corporation X. Now the corporation's senior vice president for research and development, a university alum and generous contributor, announces to the faculty member that the organization is contemplating a fuller, ongoing relationship with the university that could very well lead to gifts totaling in the millions of dollars.

This money would provide many scholarships and assistantships for current and future students, along with funding for faculty chairs that would attract and retain top research faculty. Given the university's shaky financial situation, this is exciting news.

The faculty member agrees to do so and even rank orders the students for the recruiter. The word gets out to seniors in the department and they are angry. Several meet with the career services director to register their complaint. They ask if Corporation X had listed its job with the office. The director discovers that the company has not listed the job with the office, and it has declined invitations to take part in on-campus recruiting and the fall job fair. The students are upset and believe it to be unfair since the selection of the top five was not necessarily based upon grades, but the faculty member's subjective opinion of the students.

The director takes this up with the faculty member. The faculty member points out the "facts of life" in these hard economic times. She states that this is a win-win situation. These students get service, the school gets funding. The director pursues this with the department head, then the dean, and is rebuffed with the same attitude.

There are several relevant facts that frame this case. Two years after funding a faculty member at a modest level of support, Corporation X publicly announced its intention to consider a major, long-term, broadly distributed investment with the financially troubled university.

"Neither employment professionals nor their organizations will expect, or seek to extract, special favors or treatment which would influence the recruitment process as a result of the support, or the level of the support, to the educational institution or career services office in the form of contributed services, gifts, or other financial support." Number 10 reads: "When employment professionals conduct recruitment activities through student associations or academic departments, such activities will be conducted in accordance with the policies of the career services office."

The ethical issues in this situation center around special treatment for an employer and an undeniable appearance of favoritism towards some students by a faculty member. A collateral issue, not necessarily a moral one, may be departure from the policies of the career services office because of ignorance of its protocols.

What are the pros and cons of those options? Reflex responses to the situation could include the Career Services Director (CSD) contacting the recruiter and correcting him/her. Another might be for the CSD to request a meeting involving the dean, chair, faculty member, and to hash things out. Both of these approaches could become confrontational.

Yet another would be to use a positive approach that treats the dispute as an educational opportunity for all, i.e., to learn from the experience in order to achieve greater goals and, not coincidentally, to align everyone's conduct with Career Services' practices.

To limit interviews only to top students actually makes it harder for the employer to recruit the right people into most jobs since most jobs do not require an employee whose principal strength is intellectual excellence. Instead, they draw on a portfolio of capabilities.

The pros and cons of those options are evident. Acting out one's frustrations rarely leads to anything useful and often create barriers to cooperation. On the other hand, openness to learning from experience and willingness to assume that most errors originate from ignorance rather than from arrogance enable the CSD to engage everyone as a contributor to a useful solution. People support plans to which they have been invited to contribute.

Some additional information could be useful in order to reach a conclusion on how to proceed. For example, there may be ignorance of the nature of the proposed expanded relationship between the university and Corporation X. A company's direct intention in such relationships almost always deals only with obtaining intellectual property rights and promoting the company's general reputation.

Greater access to top talent is an indirect intention, based on the belief that students will want to pursue careers with a highly visible and generous employer. Thus, there should be no need for the company to limit its recruiting efforts to top prospects nominated by faculty. The CSD should acquaint himself/herself with the terms of the proposed relationship to assure that they are consistent with such standards.

The vice president of the company, who will be interviewing the students is in attendance, and there are some "age appropriate" employees who are to mingle with the invitees and chat with them about the company. The VP plans to make less than a 10-minute presentation because he does not want to ruin the party atmosphere by a serious presentation.

The VP approaches Jane because he knows that she is one of the top candidates that Cosmic is interested in hiring. He begins to make small talk, and then offers her a margarita. Jane says that she would really just like some bottled water. The VP is incredulous at first and teases her a little saying it is "okay to loosen up" and "I won't tell your mother," but soon realizes that bottled water is what Jane wants. After a few more awkward moments, the VP goes to talk to someone else and Jane leaves not sure whether she wants to work for Global.

What if this employer's culture did promote 'controlled drinking,' that is, every Friday afternoon the employer throws a beer, wine, and chips 'TGIF party' for its employees. Does that change your view of the employer holding such an event?

He offers her an alcoholic beverage, but she replies she would like water. g. The VP teases her about her refusal, then gets her water. h. Their interaction has become "awkward," and he leaves here to talk to someone else. i. The following day, the VP reminds the students that all job offers are contingent on passing a drug/alcohol screen.

Principles. If the company wants to offer an event that presents a "fun" view of its culture, it would be advised to provide the same type of event but without the alcohol. If the Vice President insists on having alcoholic beverages, make sure that invitees understand that attending is not a requirement and that they will not be judged negatively for not being there. If there is important information to be conveyed, do a formal presentation first, then invite students who wish to stay to do so.

In this way students who are interested in "real" information about the organization and its activities can gain that without having to be part of an event that includes alcohol use. The director should also be clear on university policies governing alcohol use in off campus events for students. d. The career services director should make certain that literature sent to employers at the start of each recruiting year include the NACE "No Alcohol in Campus Recruiting Policy" letter. e. The career services office should make a special effort to prepare students for the possibility that they will be involved in such activities and how they may respond. f. The career services director should encourage the college relations head to explore the company's legal liabilities with its legal department.

The presentation can be adapted to a variety of audiences for members' use at professional conferences, in their own organizations, and with individual staff members. It is suggested that when the presentation is given to large audiences at a professional conference that both college and employer professionals co-present to enrich the discussion and to address how all parties can work together to address ethical concerns in our profession. The presentation can also be used as a training tool within members' work settings to instruct new employees, serve as a refresher for current employees, or be used as part of a regular program of in-service training. Further, it may not always be possible to train employees in a group workshop and, thus, individual employees could view the presentation alone when combined with discussions with their supervisors.

In the Power Point presentation, key phrases are listed for the essential points of the Principles document. Please refer to the following resources for further explanation and for helpful examples to use in fleshing out each of the points.

And, finally, although this presentation is intended to be taught in a single 90-minute session, you can modify the format to teach it in two sessions. For instance, the first session could consist of a review of the Power Point presentation, with follow-assignments to read the above resources, and concluding with a second session for further discussion and case studies.

Bentley Contract Recruiters attends a career fair on behalf of three different employers. The names of the employers represented are disclosed to the career services office sponsoring the career fair. At the career fair, Sally Smiley, one of Bentley's representatives, talks to the students who are interested in the job opportunities offered by her three client/employers. Robert Swift, the other Bentley representative, walks around to the different employer booths giving out the firm's card and soliciting new business. During his walk around the career fair, Swift spots Queen Legal Associates, an employer/client that Swift normally represents, but is not representing at the career fair on this particular occasion. During the course of the day, Swift and Smiley speak to many students and gather resumes of those interested students. Swift advised several students who were not interested in the three clients he was representing at the fair to consider Queen Legal Associates. He subsequently noticed several of these students handing in their resumes to Queen.

A few days after the career fair, Swift sent a letter to Queen advising them that should Queen Legal Associates consider for hire any students from the career fair, Queen will be responsible to pay Bentley a fee for the hire. Queen is furious at this letter.

The recruiter Sally Smiley appears to be the lead recruiter, since she conducted all the interviews. The recruiter Robert Swift had no assigned function at the career fair. He may have been a trainee, but maybe not. His status is not relevant to the facts of the case, but could be to its resolution. The other relevant fact is that Queen, a regular client of Bentley, had not engaged Bentley as its recruiter at this career fair. And yet Bentley's representative, unasked, referred students to Queen's recruiter and then billed Queen as if it had authorized Bentley to be its contingency-fee recruiter at the career fair. Queen objected to being billed for unauthorized services. As a separate issue, other employers complained about Bentley's intrusive conduct.

The client, or clients, that the third-party recruiter is representing and to whom the student's credentials will be disclosed. Career services will be permitted to verify this information by contacting the named client or clients. In a case of a resume referral entity, a list of clients that use the services of the entity must be made available." d) Principle 7 states: "Third-party recruiters attending career fairs will represent employers who have authorized them and will disclose to career services the names of the represented employers."

Queen for hires resulting from his referrals. By contrast, there is nothing in the case description to suggest that Sally Smiley failed in any way to comply with the Principles. This situation suggests that Swift was acting on his own initiative.

The director would point out that Swift's actions were inconsistent with Bentley's standards, that they were disruptive, and that the future of Bentley's potential business with the other employers was unnecessarily jeopardized. The director might then ask Smiley how they should proceed regarding Swift. Would Smiley recommend that the director have a "one-on-one" discussion with Swift; or would Smiley, whose firm has a stake in the outcome, prefer to correct Swift according to a checklist of items provided by the director? Either way, a corrective discussion with Swift is in order.

The director should also consider barring Swift from participation in the campus's career services functions for a period of time - say, a year - to emphasize the seriousness of the transgression and to reinforce the message.

Recently, Jetspeed downsized and eliminated many of its middle managers. One individual whose job was eliminated was Barbara Smith, assistant director of procurement and purchasing. Barbara was a satisfactory employee. She was also a casual friend of yours.

A few days later, you receive a telephone call from the Vice President of Human Resources of Whatajet, whom you met several months ago at a professional meeting. Since then, you and she actually had lunch once or twice.

There is not currently a principles that directly relates to these issues. The closest is Principles for Employment Professionals #2 - "Employment Professionals will know the recruitment and career development field as well as the industry and the employing organization that they represent, and work within a framework of professionally accepted recruiting, interviewing and selection techniques."

Do the changes in the employment environment, (i.e. employees changing jobs more frequently, companies not keeping employees long term, employees being released or downsized through no fault of their performance, employers being held accountable for not checking references for problem hires) merit changing verification only policies?

Ethically, you need to follow the reference policy of your organization, even though your colleague assures you that your response will be "totally off the record." You might want to suggest an alternative of having Barbara get copies of her evaluations to share with the potential employer.

For the future, you might want to re-evaluate the company's "verification only" policy to provide employees who have left the company a chance to have their employment record shared with potential employers. With multiple changes in state laws, it would be beneficial to see if your state provides protection against litigation concerns.

Carl, director of the career services office at Northern University, a major mid-western institution, walked out of the administration building shaking his head. His boss, the Vice President for Student Life, had just delivered news that Carl had a feeling might come some day. Budget needs and priorities were shifting, and the evil eyes of the bean counters had wandered his way.

Nicole, the VP, explained that she had no choice. In spite of the institution's outstanding academic reputation, especially in its engineering, computer science, and business programs, financial priorities required that monies be shifted away from some areas and into others. The institutional budget committee, in reviewing various options, concluded that the career services operating budget could be sustained from external sources. Moreover, it was not unreasonable from the committee's point of view to fund the office's current and future physical needs from revenues generated through the various services and events held by the center. The idea of having students pay a career services fee had been floated at one meeting, but was rejected. The office would have to become entrepreneurial.

The next day, at the weekly staff meeting, Carl quickly went through the agenda and then shared the news:"I've been informed that we must assume a growing responsibility for the operational funds needed by this office. This will begin effective next fall semester.

Then he continued, "I raised all the objections that you might expect, but Nicole said her hands were tied. By the end of this week we have to submit a report on how we will deal with this. I've been up all night wrestling with this and have drafted a proposal.

Career services e-mail to targeted students (minority group students, specific majors, students with high GPAs) promoting organizations and specific "quick-to-fill" openings: $20 per student contacted.

Packaging: Three levels of partnership (Platinum, Gold, and Silver: $25,000, $10,000, and $5,000 per year respectively): depending on contribution, includes registration and priority scheduling for on-campus interviewing, priority placement and logo sponsorship credit at career fairs, lunch with deans and key faculty, student leadership luncheon tickets, tickets to basketball and football games, four university golf course passes, free university parking for one year, and acknowledgement of support for one year in career center reception area.

"The Kept University," corporate research sponsorship in public higher education has risen dramatically while government support has fallen. The authors write, "universities, once wary beneficiaries of corporate largesse, have become eager co-capitalists, embracing market values as never before." In this context, then, what is so wrong about the above proposal?

Career Services Principle 4: Career services professionals will provide generally comparable services to all employers, regardless of whether the employers contribute services, gifts, or financial support to the educational institution or office and regardless of the level of such support.

Might not be politically tenable in all institutions of higher education, unless it is optional. On the other hand, it could be implemented. It could also be a service-specific fee structure. It would set up some expectations that might be unreasonable, e.g., "I expect x number of job referrals, etc. due to paying this fee."

As a regional recruiting manager for a large chemical company, one of your responsibilities is to hire experienced personnel for senior technical or management positions. In response to an ad that your office placed in a trade web site, you received the resume of a candidate who appeared to be extremely well qualified, possessing advanced degrees and significant experience. Subsequently, an interview was arranged with the candidate and this went quite well. Also, you checked the references that the candidate provided. The references were positive, reinforcing the impressions that you and other employees in your company had of the candidate.

However, just two months into the new position with your company, the employee is not working out. It is would also seem that the candidate and/or his references overstated his qualifications. Your company's probationary period ends in three weeks, and you have a decision to make. Do you terminate this person and prevent bigger problems in the future, or do you try salvaging the situation and working with him?

From professional meetings, you are on friendly terms with a former colleague who happens to work at your employee's former company and is familiar with his work. Something feels "wrong about this," but you decide to call your colleague and inquire about the seeming disconnect between the employee's performance and the reference provider's estimation of his abilities. In response, your former colleague confesses that there were problems with the candidate but that the company generally gives positive references because of the increasingly litigious environment in human resources.

You have some leeway since the employee is still within the probationary period and can be dismissed without extensive repercussions. However, to preclude future problems like this, what should you do?

Employment Professionals Principle #2: Employment professionals will know the recruitment and career development field as well as the industry and the employing organization that they represent, and work within a framework of professionally accepted recruiting, interviewing, and selection techniques.

However, rather than following the established procedure of reviewing the resumes of students who met their hiring criteria (i.e., major, date of graduation, degree level, and citizenship status), the employer requested that the career center staff provide him with the names of 10 students they would recommend for an interview. Further, the representative made it clear that he would work with another school if the career center did not comply with his request because he does not "have the time to review 20+ resumes."

Referring only selected students violates precepts of "open and free selection" of employment opportunities; fair and equitable recruitment process; and support informed and responsible decision-making by candidates.

The career center becomes a referral entity vs. an employment liaison and is, therefore, liable to claims of employment discrimination, especially if subjective and non-work-related criteria are used in the selection of referred students.

Decline to comply with the request, citing the ethical and legal concerns. Explain further screening tools as noted above in question 5. If Vanity Corporation is an influential employer, such as a major donor, it would be prudent to discuss the situation with the appropriate campus leadership and to keep them apprised of communications with the employer.

If the employer is a third-party recruiter, it would only make a difference because many career services offices have policies in place that allow these recruiters to only post vacant positions vs. interviewing on campus and having access to candidate resumes.

If the request were made of a faculty member, it should not make a difference because faculty members are also be liable to claims of employment discrimination, as would the career center, if they routinely referred some students vs. posting the opportunity for all students of their department.

Individuals whose autonomy is respected will be asked questions, provided information, or directed to resources that they can evaluate and use in making career decisions. Career services professionals recognize that they are often regarded by students as experts, and thus their suggestions or comments may carry considerable influence. This places a responsibility on the career services professional to be aware of his/her values or biases and to make a concerted effort to keep them out of dialogue with the student.

Even if the odds are truly against the individual, the counselor can address this issue without imposing a particular point of view. An approach would be to explore the challenges the counselor sees in pursuing desired careers or positions and examine what it will take for the student to meet these challenges. The counselor could present potential roadblocks in a way that simply adds to the student's information. The information should not be phrased to dissuade the student from a difficult course.

Individuals whose autonomy is being respected by an employment professional will be provided with valid and complete information about the organization and position, and will be given a reasonable amount of time to make a decision about an offer. On the spot offers requiring quick decisions, signing bonuses that will be revoked quickly if the offer is not accepted within the tight timeline, and arbitrarily long delays in letting the student know about the outcome of an interview, violate the spirit of this principle.

An organization employing interns makes an offer to an exceptional rising senior at the end of the summer. The offer is for a full-time position effective immediately following graduation. As the organization is desperate for students with this background, a generous signing bonus is included. However, the employer stipulates that the student must give an answer before the end of September, at which time the bonus and offer will be withdrawn.

Employment Agencies/Organizations that list positions for a number of client organizations and receive payment when a referred candidate is hired. The fee for listing a position is paid either by the firm listing the opening (fee paid) or by the candidate who is hired.

These are organizations that contract to provide individuals qualified to perform specific tasks or complete specific projects for a client organization. Individuals perform work at the client organization, but are employed and paid by the agency.

B. Unwanted intrusion or disclosure of personal facts to the public or a third party C. No compelling reason to do so D. Specific areas are prohibited from disclosure, such as medical information, age, race, national origin, marital status, sex, religion, and disability.

Career Center to release information contained in my placement file to employers, educational institutions, and foundations for the purpose of assisting me in obtaining employment, admission to graduate school, fellowships, and/or scholarships.

There is no doubt from the responses that electronic recruiting is very important to employers. Sixty-seven percent (67 percent) of the employers reported that electronic recruiting was very important in their overall recruiting strategy, and another 28 percent reported it was somewhat important. National recruiters rated the overall importance of electronic recruiting higher than local recruiters (74 percent vs. 58 percent). Overall, electronic recruiting was most important in "Providing listings of current job openings for which you are actively recruiting," with 81 percent reporting this aspect was very important.

This was the most frequently mentioned aspect, and was selected by 41 percent of all recruiters: 41 percent of national recruiters and 58 percent of the local recruiters as one of the two aspects where they had been most successful. Two other aspects most frequently mentioned by the total group were "Creating an overall recruiting brand to convey a positive image to potential candidates (33 percent)" and "Providing background information on your organization to potential candidates (32 percent)."

There were also some clear differences between the national and local recruiters related to success in three other aspects listed in the survey. Twenty-six percent (26 percent) of the national recruiters reported most success in "Creating an overall recruiting brand to convey a positive image to potential candidates" compared to 54 percent of the local recruiters. Twenty-seven percent (27 percent) of the national recruiters selected "On-line application for positions currently available" compared to only 15 percent of the local recruiters.

"Our online platform allows job seekers to search and apply for positions that interest them, in addition to posting their resume to a general pool that recruiters can use to search for additional candidates. The system is revolutionary in terms of applicant tracking, as seekers enter all information that was scanned or manually entered before. Though we still struggle with the usability of the platform, which we feel can sometimes negatively impact a seekers impression of our employer brand."

"Several of these areas are growing in importance, but we have not yet incorporated some of the improvements into our design. Those items that are checked are things that are more firmly established in our current processes. Branding is consistent throughout our web site, printed materials, and other presentations, and our data base is growing with potential candidates, although they are not yet screened to the point that we might like to screen them in the future."

"Part of the brand experience is to interview quickly and get them [applicants] a response back in 24 hours. Brand is more than just the appearance of the web site but the experience the applicant has with our company. We still want them as a customer. In addition, it is key to be specific in the job descriptions to be respectful of the candidates' time and our time."

"Students have the ability to see and better understand what [our organization] is all about, and we get a chance to view many students' resumes. None of this however, can replace the benefit of one-on-one discussions/interviews and follow-up."

"We have a marketing department that creates all sorts of positive external marketing materials. We are devoted to maintaining a high profile at the college and university levels and are very visible at all school functions."

"We do not have our own electronic application at this point but we have used a variety of other systems, including our web site, to provide an overview of our company and our typical college-related programs."

"Although communicating with current applicants is important, that is not part of our recruitment unit responsibilities. Communicating with the actual applicants in the process is the responsibility of our pre-employment unit."

Informing qualified applicants who were not selected that although the position for which they applied has been filled, they are encouraged to apply for other positions (29 percent)," and "Creating an overall recruiting brand to convey a positive image to potential candidates (28 percent)."

Again, there were clear differences in the responses of national vs. local recruiters related to most difficulty. Thirty-six percent (36 percent) of the national recruiters vs. 23 percent of the local recruiters reported they had encountered the most difficulty in "Creating an overall recruiting brand to convey a positive image to potential candidates." Thirty-four percent (34 percent) of the national recruiters vs. 46 percent of the local recruiters reported they had encountered the most difficulty in "Creating an applicant database for future openings within your organization."

"Our use of technology is focused on our high-volume recruiting functions, but because the process is not used consistently throughout the organization, it is not useful for complete applicant tracking.

"The creation of a data base proved to be more difficult than originally thought, because the contents become "stale" so quickly and turn over so rapidly. Because of the many different units, applicants sometime become lost between units, we have been able to correct most of the problems."

"Because we have such a high volume of applicants, we do not personally communicate with each candidate. However, we send out either an email or mailed acknowledgement to each applicant which explains the employment process."

"Effective and timely screening of candidates based on electronically submitted applications (28 responses)," and "Developing approaches that use recruiting technology to personalize rather than depersonalize the process (27 responses)."

Candidate must be employed in the career services field at a NACE member organization (if elected, candidate working at an organization that does not hold NACE membership will be expected to have his/her organization join).

Please Note:We recommend that before you accept the nomination for an officer position, you seek a commitment from your employer for the time required to fulfill the responsibilities of a NACE officer.

The NACE Directors serve a three-year term, beginning on July 1 and ending June 30, three years later. Employer and college members serve in these roles on an alternating basis so that NACE has a balanced number of college and employer members on the Board.

Directors and officers will serve on committees, task forces and action teams. They will serve as Board liaisons to these groups and share information as appropriate. Meetings occur most often via conference calls. Directors may spend several hours on conference calls throughout their tenure.

The use of professional standards in career services is intended to facilitate excellence in the creation, maintenance, and delivery of programs and services. Professionally derived standards, representing the perspectives of diverse practitioners, and promulgated under the aegis of a professional association, provide an exceptional opportunity for practitioners to engage in processes of self-assessment and self-regulation that are internally motivated and directed.

The Professional Standards for College and University Career Services was written broadly to reflect variations in career services provided by individual colleges and universities. Some standards may apply to several functional areas within career services; overlap does exist. Not every standard will apply to every career services office or school. Therefore, their use should be interpreted according to the circumstances of the individual institution.

The standards pertain to programs, not staff members. They reflect dimensions of career services that affect program performance and quality. To localize the standards, individual institutions and career services offices should provide examples of how they are meeting or not meeting each applicable standard.

Career services supports the mission, academic programs, and advancement of the institution. Within this context, the primary purpose of career services is to assist students and other designated clients in developing, evaluating, and/or implementing career, education, and employment decisions and plans.

Career services considers the needs of all students of the institution when designing the program and delivering services. Since career issues are addressed by different units within the institution, career services provides linkages and/or coordination among career-related programs and services where appropriate.

Career services works collaboratively with academic divisions, departments, individual faculty members, student services, employers, and other relevant constituencies of the institution to enhance students? career development.

Career services provides resources to help students assess and relate their interests, competencies, needs, expectations, education, experience, personal background, and desired lifestyle to the employment market Career services provides information on current and projected employment opportunities and on employers to ensure that candidates have the widest possible choices of employment.

Career information facilities are staffed with persons who have the appropriate counseling, advising, and information technology competencies to assist students in accessing and using career information.

The institution provides experiential education programs that include student employment and/or cooperative education, work-based learning, apprenticeships, internships, volunteer jobs, service learning, and shadowing experiences.

Experiential education programs help students obtain career-related experiences with organizations that provide adequate supervision and opportunities for students to reflect upon their learning and career development.

Career services leaders develop a mission statement, program goals and objectives, and strategic and operational plans for fulfilling the mission and goals of the program. Goals are reviewed and updated annually and communicated, as appropriate, to administrators, faculty, staff, and other appropriate institutional constituencies. Career services staff conduct regular program evaluations to improve operations and to adjust to changing client needs and environmental threats and opportunities.

Evidence of appropriate structure could include current and accessible policies and procedures; written job descriptions and regular performance reviews for all employees; functional workflow or organizational charts; facilities appropriate for career services functions; and defined service standards. Evidence of effective management includes strategic and operational planning processes; clearly defined areas of responsibility; effective communication practices; decision-making and conflict resolution procedures; accountability systems; sound fiscal management practices; and proof of continuous improvement. Reviews of policies, procedures, and budgetary issues should occur on a regular basis.

Career services leaders coordinate efforts with other career services providers in the institution to integrate career services into the broader educational mission. Key constituencies of career services are identified and their needs reflected in the mission and goals of the unit. Priorities for services are defined. Career services leaders are advocates for the advancement of career services within the institution.

The external and internal organization of career services, including its place within the institution, supports its mission. Career services is structured to ensure effective functioning of student services. The career services function is organized to develop positive relationships with students; academic, administrative, and student affairs colleagues; employers; and alumni.

The internal organization of career services is clearly defined through an organizational chart. Staff titles, roles, and reporting lines support the efficient and effective delivery of career services and programs.

Career services has an adequate number of qualified professional and support staff to fulfill its mission and functions. Career services embraces fair employment practices and is proactive in attracting and retaining a diverse staff. Career services has instituted hiring and promotion practices that are fair, inclusive, and nondiscriminatory. Programs and services employ a diverse staff to provide readily identifiable role models for students and to enrich the campus community.

Career services is staffed by persons who, in combination, provide the core competencies to perform primary program functions effectively. Primary program functions and their related core competencies and knowledge domains are defined below.

Needs assessment and satisfaction measures; program design, implementation, and evaluation; strategic and operational planning; program integration and integrity; staffing; staff development and supervision; budget planning and administration; political sensitivity and negotiation skills; synthesize, interpret, and report current and longitudinal information.

Systems theory; organizational development; research design; statistics; accounting and budgeting procedures; revenue generation; principles; purchasing; staff selection; supervision; performance appraisals; management of information systems; customer service; marketing.

Identification of relevant and desirable student learning and development outcomes; outcome-oriented programming; research-based evidence of program impact on student learning and development outcomes.

Needs assessment and diagnosis; intervention design and implementation; test administration and interpretation; counseling; feedback; evaluation; advising; empathy and interpersonal sensitivity; work with individuals and groups; use of career, occupational, and employment information.

Career development theories; adult development theory and unique issues for special populations; statistics; counseling processes; evaluation of person-job fit; job analysis; career decision making; behavior management; job search, interviews, and resumes.

Needs assessment; program/workshop design and delivery; researching, evaluating, and integrating information; effective teaching strategies; career coaching; career mentoring; work with individuals and groups; work with diverse populations; use of technology for delivery of content.

Needs assessment and goal setting; written and interpersonal communication; public speaking; domestic and international job and experiential learning opportunity development; relationship development and management; effective use of print, web, personal presentation methods; sales and closing techniques; development/fundraising strategies; marketing principles/strategies.

Career services professionals engage in continuing professional development activities to keep abreast of the research, theories, legislation, policies, and developments that affect career services. Staff training and development is ongoing to promote knowledge and skill development across program components.

Career services leaders at various levels are selected on the basis of formal education and training, relevant work experience, personal skills and competencies, and relevant professional credentials. Career services leaders also demonstrate potential for promoting learning and development in students, applying effective practices to educational processes, and enhancing institutional effectiveness.

If career components are offered through multiple units, the institution designates a leader or leadership team to provide strategic direction and align career services with the mission of the institution and the needs of the constituencies served.

Career services leaders coordinate efforts with other units in the institution providing career components to integrate career services into the broader educational mission. Key constituencies served by each unit are clearly identified and reflected in the mission and goals of the unit.

Careers services leaders are advocates for the advancement of career services within the institution. Career services leaders participate in institutional decisions about career services objectives and policies.

Career services leaders participate in institutional decisions related to the identification and designation of students and others served. Decisions about students served include type and scope of services offered and the fees, if any, that are charged.

Career services professional staff members hold an earned graduate degree in a field relevant to the position they hold or possess an appropriate combination of educational credentials and related work experience. Professional staff members have the requisite qualifications and competencies to perform effectively in their defined roles with students, alumni, faculty, administrators, and employers, as well as in highly specialized functions, such as career and employment counseling, employment opportunities, cooperative education, internships, work-study, graduate school advising, computer technology, etc.

Paraprofessionals, interns, and graduate assistants are carefully selected, trained in helping skills and institutional procedures, closely supervised, and evaluated regularly. Degree or credential-seeking interns are qualified by enrollment in an appropriate field of study and by relevant experience.

Student employees and volunteers are carefully selected, trained, supervised, and evaluated. They are trained in how and when to refer those in need of assistance to qualified staff members and have access to a supervisor for assistance in making these judgments. Student employees and volunteers are provided with clear and precise job descriptions, preservice training based on assessed needs, and continuing staff development. Training includes customer service, program procedures, and information and resource utilization.

Each organizational unit has adequate administrative and technical staff adequate to accomplish its mission. Such staff are technologically proficient and qualified to perform their duties, knowledgeable of ethical and legal uses of technology, and have access to training. The level of staffing and workloads are adequate and appropriate for program and service demands.

Career services has adequate facilities and equipment to fulfill its mission and to perform its functions effectively. Career services has private offices for professional staff to permit them to perform career advising/counseling or other confidential work; support staff work areas; reception and student waiting area; career resource center; storage space sufficient to accommodate supplies and equipment; and necessary office equipment, including computers for staff and student usage.

The facility has Internet connectivity and access to conference rooms and large group meeting rooms that have an appropriate level of technology to support service delivery. Sufficient information technology is available for students and staff to support career services functions. Equipment and facilities are secured to protect the confidentiality and safety of records.

Facilities are accessible to persons with disabilities and comply with the Americans With Disabilities Act (ADA). Accommodations for students with special needs are provided by career services or in conjunction with the department that serves this population.

Career services is located conveniently on campus. Career services projects a welcoming, professional atmosphere for students, employers, alumni, parents, and others. Career services provides office hours at times appropriate for its constituencies. Parking for visitors is adequate and convenient.

Career services offices are informed about the array of career-based technological applications. Based upon program design, mission, budget, and staffing considerations, career services offices implement appropriate technological applications to career programs and ensure that appropriate technology is used to deliver services. Career services offices ensure that adequate hardware, software, and staff are available to support existing technological applications to career services. In light of the rapidity of change associated with technology, career services offices develop plans for the replacement/updating of existing hardware and software and plan for the integration of new technically-based or supported career programs. Technological applications to career services, including web sites, are consistent with and integrated within the college or university technology infrastructure.

Employers are both vital partners in the educational process and primary customers for college/university career services. Each career services office develops policies and practices for employer relations and services.

Career services understands the variety of needs and employment practices among small businesses, large corporations, government, and nonprofit organizations. Career services defines the types of employers it will serve and articulates policies that guide its working relationships with various types of employers.

Career services offers a variety of services to employers that reflect student interests and employer needs. These include, but are not limited to, site visits; campus recruiting; resume referrals; information sessions; meetings with faculty members; prerecruiting activities; student access to employer information; posting and publishing of job openings; career and job fairs; providing information on academic departments and students within legal and policy guidelines; assistance in recruiting student populations; experiential learning options, which may include shadowing experiences, internships, or cooperative education; videoconference interviewing; salary information; advertising and promotional vehicles; career center advisory board memberships; and individual employer recruiting and college relations consultations.

Career services professionals are knowledgeable about accepted and current professional practices and are responsive to those obligations and limitations imposed on the operation of their program areas by relevant civil and criminal laws, institutional policies, and any contractual commitments.

Career services staff members use appropriate policies and practices to protect students and limit the liability exposure of the institution, its officers, employees, and agents. In this regard, the institution provides access to legal advice for professional staff as needed to carry out assigned responsibilities.

Career services? operating policies and procedures do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, age, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, disability, marital status, or veteran status.

Career services provides educational programs that help students from diverse backgrounds and individuals with special needs to identify and address their unique needs related to career development and employment.

Systematic quantitative and qualitative program evaluations are conducted in support of career services? mission and goals. Although methods of assessment vary, a sufficient range of measures are employed to maintain objectivity and comprehensiveness. Data collected include responses from students, employers, and other affected constituencies.

Evaluation results are used in revising and improving programs, services, and staff performance. In order for institutions to employ comparable methods for evaluation, resources such as The NACE Sourcebook for Conducting Evaluations and Measurements of Career Services are consulted. Career services offices collaborate with institutional research units, state agencies, accrediting bodies, academic graduate programs, and other evaluative groups that generate and assess evaluation information.

Career services prepares and disseminates annual reports as well as special program evaluation reports addressing career services mission, goals, programs and services activities/outcomes, and graduate follow-up information.

Career services gathers, participates in, and/or conducts relevant research on career development; academic success; institutional issues such as admissions and retention; student learning; employment trends; and career interests.

Beginning in 1980, members of 22 professional associations in higher education student services and student development, under the aegis of the Council for the Advancement of Standards, began work on the development of standards. This resulted in the publication of the CAS Standards and Guidelines for Student Services/Student Development in 1986. That publication included general standards, applicable across all areas, as well as functional area standards, which included standards and guidelines for career planning and placement.

The NACE Foundation will fund nonresearch grants for educational projects that develop the knowledge and skills of college career services and HR/staffing professionals in their work with college students. The Foundation also will fund educational projects that advance the knowledge and skills of college students in their career development and decision-making.

Cover Page to include contact information for all individuals involved in the project (name, title, organization, address, city, state, and zip; phone; fax; e-mail); date of submission, and a 100-word abstract describing the nature of the project, tool, program, or publication.

These stressful and challenging work conditions may be intensified among young entrants into the work force. As their expectations of the job are not met, they become more likely to turnover.3, 4 Organizations may therefore realize a loss of unique knowledge, experiences, and perspectives to pilot organizations into the future.

Although realistic job previews may significantly increase the likelihood of job survival, there is significantly more that organizations can do to retain diverse employees.5, 6 Past research has suggested the following retention strategies as specifically helpful in retaining a diverse work force: implementing mentor programs, accommodating the special needs of diverse employees, forming multicultural teams, providing diversity training for traditional employees, forming organization-supported network groups for diverse employees, and promoting diverse employees into key positions within the organization. These are good starting points, but still treat diverse employees as a monolithic group with similar needs and values. This article suggests an orientation beyond that of traditional approaches to retaining these highly valuable employees. By applying an internal marketing orientation (IMO), organizations could establish and strengthen internal relationships targeted at specific employee segments within the organization, which may be a critical tool in gaining focus in organizational retention efforts.

Full-page PDF documents must be created exactly 1 inch larger than the height and width of the trim size of the magazine. This can be accomplished by creating the postscript at this size. For a full page in Job Choices, your PDF document should be 9" x 11.5".

At your request, NACE staff will format and lay out your profile in our standard two-column format, with your logo placed in the upper left-hand corner. Just send us your copy on a PC formatted disk accompanied by a printed hard copy. Copy for a full page should be about 500 words, about 225 words for a half page, or about 125 words for a quarter page. Or, e-mail your copy in a Word document.

In fall 1956, women accounted for just 34.5 percent of all enrollments in institutions of higher education; in 2004, they accounted for 57.2 percent. This trend has been steady over the years, indicating that women will continue to account for a larger and larger portion of enrollments.

Figure 8.) Not surprisingly, as opportunities (and salaries) have grown over the years, computer and information sciences degrees and degrees in health and related clinical sciences now account for a significantly larger portion of degrees conferred.

Demographics are important both to effective college recruiting efforts and to effective career services programming, as they enable professionals to model their programs to a portrait of the candidate/ student. Reviewing demographics through the lens of the past half century suggests what professionals can reasonably expect in coming years: 1) a college candidate pool that is increasingly female and diverse; and 2) shifts in types of degrees students will pursue.

In career centers, practitioners report increased demand for accountability from internal stakeholders, such as administrators, faculty, and students, and external stakeholders, including parents, alumni, employers, accrediting organizations, and state agencies.

In the 1980s and 1990s, Carretta says career centers began placing more emphasis on user information, especially as services expanded to include career counseling/advising, career/jobsearch preparation workshops, career resources, job fairs, and more.

During the last several years, Ratcliffe says, there has been a shift from demonstrating productivity (for example, student contacts) to adding satisfaction measures to indicate effectiveness using a consumer-based management model to defining desired student learning outcomes and documenting specific institutional or unit influences on the achievement of those outcomes.

Over the past 50 years, technological developments have touched on all aspects of the career services and HR/ staffing profession, changing and improving how NACE members counsel, recruit, and hire college students and new graduates.

Technology helps career services connect employers and students, deliver jobsearch information and services to students, and even provide counseling services. It also plays a part in helping the career center market its services. Web sites, e-mail, web-based recruiting systems, online tutorials and assessment tools, and other technologies help career services deliver their offerings to students, employers, and other audiences.

For example, popular iPods are used as a learning tool on many college and university campuses. Career services practitioners can and do adapt their programs and workshops to this new form of delivery as educators are already sending lectures, podcasts, and/or supplemental material to the devices.

And, technology can create new issues that have to be dealt with. In the past year, for example, many practitioners have found themselves having to educate (often disbelieving) students about the potential pitfalls of social networking sites.

Telephone technology now enables NACE committees and task forces to hold conference calls, saving time and the cost of bringing people together from all over the country. Those attending the first programs offered by NACE probably would have been skeptical if told that the association eventually would offer virtual seminars that members could attend without leaving their offices.

A department secretary was uncertain about using the word processor at first, Shepelak says. But after he showed her how much faster it was to type letters on the word processor, she learned how to use it.

Even those slightly newer to the profession have seen changes in the way technology is used. Caroline Ceniza-Levine has been in the HR/staffing field for nine years, the last four with Time Inc., which publishes more than 150 popular consumer magazines worldwide. She says her job has been made more efficient by a more widespread use of e-mail.

In 1998, NACE Board members began communicating via a listserv between biannual meetings. Eventually, NACE introduced listservs dedicated to its members varied interests, including global issues, two-year college topics, recruitment of the college-educated work force, and technology.

Also in 1998, NACE began sending broadcast e-mails to its members, updating them on developments in the field and the association. In 1999, NACE published Spotlight Extra, an online newsletter featuring pertinent news items, polls on hot topics, legal advisories, technology updates, and so on. Later, the membership directory, previously a print-only publication, also was offered online, ultimately becoming an online-only feature.

For directors, there is a challenge in allocating time to take on leadership roles because one also must continue to readjust and meet the new expanding or different priorities of the institution, to stay aligned with the university? goals and objectives.

The importance of co-curricular programs and working with faculty members will continue to grow, she says, which is all part of demonstrating value and results to obtain the necessary resources to keep helping students.

Some in the profession wanted an even more placement-oriented association, so in October 1926 at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, the Eastern College Personnel Officers (ECPO) was established. ECPO aimed to provide professional improvement for members through conventions, meetings, and presentations by experts in the field.

What does the future hold for the profession? NACE is seeking predictions on the future of career services and college recruitment to feature online in the 50th Anniversary site, and may be included in NACE communciations, newsletters, publications, and other materials.

Through our professional development programs for people who work at business schools, and through the information we provide to potential business school applicants and the media, we help people around the world realize success and fulfillment through the MBA and other graduate management and professional degrees.

AfterCollege? powers the job sites of individual academic departments and student groups at universities. Through its network of sites, AfterCollege allows clients to recruit directly out of 900+ academic departments and student groups, producing extremely targeted results, and helping employers reduce their cost per college hire by up to 80%. AfterCollege helps employers target students not only by university, but also by discipline and by group affiliation.

Knowing that clients who are treated with respect will return, Maximum Management works hard to foster long-term relationships. We accomplish this by responding to each clients unique needs and handling each assignment with equal importance. The approach we take is a consultative and creative one, based on designing highly personalized solutions to a complete range of HR issues. And we are dedicated to saving our clients time and money. By following this path and remaining aware that honesty and reputation are paramount in this field, we are able to point to more than 15 years of success.

Prospects.ac.uk is the essential guide to graduate careers and postgraduate study in the UK and is used by students, graduates, careers advisers and recruiters alike. Prospects.ac.uk is published by Graduate Prospects, and is just one part of a portfolio that includes graduate marketplace reports, the Prospects series of graduate recruitment and postgraduate course directories and magazines and career planning software. The organisation was established in 1972 and was known as CSU for the first 30 years of its existence. In 2003, CSU became Graduate Prospects, a name that more clearly communicates the relationship between the highly successful Prospects brand and the company that publishes it.

On-Campus Resources, Inc. (OCR) is an outsourcing company that is hired by Human Resources and/or Executive Management to augment or replace some part or all of their organizations' college-recruiting programs. Clients utilize OCR most often to manage the full cycle process at any number of selected schools, in addition to those they traditionally cover themselves. In short, OCR provides employers with customized interim, seasonal, or ongoing expert college recruitment support services of any type on a preset fee-for-project basis.

Trend Integration, LLC (TI) was formed in 2002. Its mission was to develop a simple, user-friendly, solution that would make screening job applicants more efficient and less painful for all members of the hiring team. To date, thousands of applicants have been successfully screened using InterviewDirect across a wide variety of industries such as finance, healthcare, information technology, telecommunications, and retail. Additionally, new applications for the technology continue to emerge. Most recently, InterviewDirect was successfully used to screen prospective college graduates prior to on-campus interviewing at over 70 colleges and universities nationwide.

Specialize in the placement of a very select group of college graduates that we call Project Staffers, who tend to be recent college graduates and are either between careers or still seeking out the right opportunity.

InternationalStudents4hire.com connects US international students and graduates with available employment opportunities from US and Global employers who hire international candidates (eg H1-B). Our University Services Program empowers Career Services Directors to support their international student needs in their streamlining their job search, while providing current immigration information and resources dedicated to international students - all in one place. We enable global employers to connect directly with a world-class, exclusive talent pool - U.S. International Students and Graduates. Our mission is to make InternationalStudents4hire the go to online recruitment site for International Student graduates in the U.S. seeking global employment. InternationalStudents4hire.com is owned and operated by 3Kaya LLC.

LanguageCorps offers year-long programs providing talented college graduates with a unique opportunity to learn and apply new skills and develop a first-person perspective of the diversity of cultures and populations around the world - all within the security of a salaried job and a highly organized and supportive community.

SIFE is a global business and higher education network workign to prepare the next generation of entrepreneures and business leaders. SIFE empowers university students to realize their own potential to make a difference by applying the business concepts they learn in the classroom to develop programs that create economic opportunity for others.

The Total Higher Education (T.H.E.) Loan Programs are a product of NorthStar, one of the most respected names in the student loan industry. NorthStar's loyal customers include nearly 500,000 students at participating schools located in all 50 states. Since 1991, NorthStar has processed more than $1 billion in medical student loans and more than $1.3 billion in graduate student loans. And every day the list of satisfied students and participating schools grows, making NorthStar one of the top student loan originators in the country.

Career services professionals' obligation is formed by contract, standards expected by the institution by which they are employed, and agency, the obligation to work in the interest of the student, i.e., as his/her agent, and to do this requires that professionals possess the necessary knowledge and skills.

Career services professionals also are commanded by the requirements of fidelity to their clients and institution. Loyalty requires that they be able to render their services in a manner that meets institutional and student expectations.

Finally, career services professionals are expected by their employers to be able to provide information that facilitates successful recruiting, both in deciding upon which schools to recruit at and how to accomplish this in the most successful manner possible.

Students will be empowered to explore and evaluate the fullest range of career and employment options possible. Employers will be able make the most informed judgment possible about their recruiting options.

Enticing employers to recruit at the college with misleading information not only does employers a disservice, it speaks poorly for the college and ultimately harms the students, providing a poor image that may discourage employers from considering their applications.

The basis of this principle is fairness. The career services professional allows all bona fide employers to compete for students on a reasonably equal basis. Employers with greater resources can conduct recruiting activities in a more extensive fashion; however, success in attracting candidates or in advancing the organization's name should be the result of the quality of the recruiting effort, not from special favors granted by the career center.

Scenario A: An employer sends a letter to a career services professional indicating that for every referred student who is hired and works a certain number of hours, the career center will receive a bonus.

One of the career services professional's fundamental obligations is to "maintain an open and free selection of employment opportunities...where job candidates can choose optimum long-term uses of their talents that are consistent with personal objectives and all relevant facts." Students regard a career center as a student service, i.e., it is operating with the student's best interests in mind. Students who are referred to the organization in the scenario may question whether they have been sold out to the highest bidder. They may ask whether they were referred because the company and the job was a good fit or simply because the career center wanted the bonus.

When offered a fee for special services, the Principles Committee recommends that the career services director inform the organization, in writing, that based on the Principles document, accepting fees for individual placements places center staff in a situation where there is the appearance of a potential conflict of interest.

So at face value, the employer is doing nothing wrong by asking for a priority schedule. However, if the employer alludes to that contribution in the request, one interpretation could be that funding will dry up if special treatment is not provided.

This may be seen as coercion. Or if the employer provides contributions with the expectation, explicit or otherwise, that special treatment will ensue, he/she is walking on the unsteady ethical ground of bribery.

Even if there is no harm to the other employers, what about fairness? The underlying "morality" of our economic system is that of free competition. Ostensibly, those who work the hardest, are the most ingenious, and do the best job should be the most successful. According to our notion of fairness (justice), that is proper. And the result should be the most benefit to society as a whole, as it is receiving the best products and services. Applied to recruiting, employers may compete fairly with each other for the best candidates, and they are both entitled and encouraged to use the most effective, ethical methods at their disposal. However, if an organization's success in recruiting is due to buying special favors, then competence and hard work have not been rewarded. That is unfair.

From a career center's perspective, there may be no harm in granting special favors such as priority schedules to organizations that make contributions to the institution. Moreover, when gifts are received, even if there is no expectation of reciprocation, there is a subtle understanding that there is a bottom line for the employer, i.e., maintaining or enhancing its relationship with the school, and, in the employer's mind, the school fully understands that. That concept is even strong, one could argue, if the school solicited the contributions. However, where does this stop? What favors are appropriate, which are not? Is one not in danger of creating an environment where student interests are subordinated to the institution's desire for research money or new equipment for the career center? While this may seem a bit far fetched, there is a real risk of losing sight of the primary objective, i.e., serving student needs.

If the career center would not grant this favor to any organization, and it must answer "yes" to either questions two or three, it should strongly consider turning down the request. Instead, it should explain to the employer that in keeping with the Principles document, i.e., the principle of providing comparable services, it cannot grant this request. At the same time, it would be happy to work with the organization to identify the best ways of maximizing the effectiveness of its recruiting efforts.

In doing so, the career services professional removes him/herself from a potential conflict of interest. A conflict of interest exists when an individual has a personal interest in a business transaction that might lead him/her to act against the best interests of his/her employing organization. If a career services practitioner provides special treatment to employers who make special contributions, the practitioner risks ignoring his/her primary responsibility to maintain a fair and equitable recruitment process and to support informed and responsible decision making by candidates.

Employers recruiting for work outside of the United States are expected to adhere to the equal employment opportunity (EEO) policy of the career services office. They will advise the career services office and the students of the realities of working in that country and of any cultural and foreign law differences."

This principle is driven primarily by the need to balance the right of students to gain access to the broadest range of opportunities possible with the obligation to ensure that employers with special methods or needs respect appropriate recruiting practice.

Section (a), expanded upon in the third-party segment of the Principles document, sets forth the fundamental understanding/expectation that a career services office make it clear to third-party recruiters that it has, on behalf of its students, an obligation to request information that will verify that the positions and organizations being recruited for are legitimate and appropriate for the school.

Part (b) acknowledges that cultural and legal expectations in other countries may impose certain restrictions or expectations on employers seeking to fill overseas positions that would be considered discriminatory or objectionable in the United States. In adhering to this principle the career services office is expected to look out for the well-being of students by reinforcing the expectation that employers honor job discrimination protections. Simultaneously, the career services office expects to ensure that students understand the culture-based circumstances that may influence recruitment practice and subsequent working conditions. In short, this goes back to the importance of establishing conditions through which students can make informed decisions about their career and employment options.

However in the scenario above, the career services office is faced with a dilemma of a conflict between U.S. law, international law, and culture. Moreover, this conflict is resolved in different ways depending upon whether it is a U.S.-incorporated company with operations outside of the U.S., or a foreign-based company hiring for its operations outside of the U.S., or whether there is a treaty that supersedes both.

The scenario is intentionally unclear on this; because in most cases the career services office will not have sufficient information to know which laws are applicable. Nor are career service professionals expected advise employers or students on the intricacy of what happens when foreign law and U.S. law conflict.

Thus, from an ethical perspective, career services is expected to have the employer explain the realities of working in a certain country to students and the cultural and legal differences that may impact his/her hiring decision. Career services can make the determination as to whether compliance with its internal EEO policy would be necessary based upon discussion with the employer on the reasons for the particular practice.

In the particular scenario, if the career services professional has contact with a certain third-party recruiter before interviewing takes place on campus, he or she would advise the recruiter to discuss these issues with all candidates. If the recruiter does not, then career services determines what action to take. If the career services office does not advise the recruiter before the interview takes place, career services should contact the recruiter and ask the recruiter to explain the situation to the alumna who is complaining.

One note for those of you who are interested in the legal niceties, a U.S.-based employer must comply with EEO law in its operations outside of the U.S. unless to do so would cause that employer to violate a foreign law. Foreign-based employers are generally not required to comply with EEO law when hiring for operations outside of the U.S.

The challenge to career services offices is posed by the apparent contradiction between the messages of this principle and the notion of providing equal services to all students. Sections (c) and (d) of this principle are at the core of this dilemma. Section (c) directs or at least legitimizes that career services professionals reach out to minority group members, though the purpose is to broaden the pool of applicants. That implies that the pool needs broadening. This is comparable to stating, "Women and minorities are encouraged to apply," in a job listing. The concern may be "will nonminority students take this to mean they should not bother to apply?" And if so, what can the career services office do to make sure that all students know that their applications are welcomed? At the same time, would a nonminority student be justified in claiming that by aiding employers in accessing minority students, the career services professional is not providing equal treatment?

In short, adhering to section (c) does not automatically mean unfair treatment for nonminority students. The key is in how the career services office works with the employer. Minority-only recruiting schedules would not be an acceptable response.

Section (d) expresses the duality of this principle but also offers an acceptable, even laudable rationale. It begins by reaffirming the underlying value system of the profession, i.e., full and equal opportunity for all students. It implies that notifying only minorities or women about certain jobs or organizations is not the intention of this principle. At the same time, it reminds us that access for women and minorities to certain fields has been traditionally limited or blocked, either intentionally or through the belief that these fields were "off limits."

This section promotes the idea that employer affirmative action programs can be assisted if career services professionals alert minorities and women to the opportunities that they may have ruled out. White males generally do not need to be told that they can become engineers, geologists, dentists, or other professionals.

Privacy must be guarded. By maintaining confidentiality we protect individuals from being harmed by information falling into the wrong hands. We are also protecting them from the embarrassment and sense of personal violation that often accompany having had their confidentiality breached.

Students should receive only valid information with which to make decisions about career and employment choices. Correct information about instrumentation should enable them to make an informed decision as to whether or not the undergo testing and what meaning it might have for them.

Respect for the human right of autonomy, i.e., being able to function independent of the control of others, serves as the foundation of this principle. Individuals whose autonomy is respected will be provided information or directed to sources of information that he/she can evaluate and use in making a career decision. Choosing to take a career interest inventory should be based on correct information about the purpose, meaning, and potential value of the test to the student. Only a trained, knowledgeable professional is in the position to work through that decision with the student.

Second, career services professionals recognize that they are often regarded by students as experts, and thus their suggestions or comments, as well as the printed results of a career test, may carry considerable influence. This places a responsibility on the career services professional to be qualified to work with the student to understand the meaning, especially the limitations, of the test results.

"If the charging of fees for career services becomes necessary, such fees will be appropriate to the budgetary needs of the office and will not hinder student or employer access to services. Career services professionals are encouraged to counsel student and university organizations engaged in recruitment activities to follow this principle."

Career services and other campus offices, including student organizations, should not assess fees or develop fee policies that result in limiting students from using services or having access to all employers.

While outside fees are essential for many career centers, this need must be balanced with the primary obligation of equal and full access for all students. In addition, a career services office that claims it has an educational mission may be on thin ice if it charges students for basic services, given that tuition and fees are intended to cover a student's educational expenses.

Even if charges are acceptable within the framework of the institutional fee structure and philosophy, charging employers amounts well beyond the cost of running an event raises questions of honesty and fairness. Moreover, some organizations may not be able to or wish to pay these fees, thus depriving students of direct access to potential employers.

"Career services professionals will advise students about their obligations in the recruitment process and establish mechanisms to encourage their compliance. Students' obligations include providing accurate information; adhering to schedules; accepting an offer of employment in good faith; notifying employers on a timely basis of an acceptance or nonacceptance and withdrawing from the recruiting process after accepting an offer of employment; interviewing only with employers for whom students are interested in working and whose eligibility requirements they meet; and requesting reimbursement of only reasonable and legitimate expenses incurred in the recruitment process."

Students should act according to the same principles of honesty and fair play to which employers and career services professionals are held. Career services professionals are expected to educate students about this responsibility and enforce it when necessary.

Career services professionals have an ethical responsibility to ensure that the recruiting process is fair and equitable to candidates and employing organizations. Student obligations and ethical behavior in the recruiting process are important to members of our profession. However, the Principles document cannot establish direct standards that can be monitored or enforced by NACE, as students are not members of the organization, nor are they a party in the Principles document. Rather, student behavior is best monitored by the institution. The career services professional must instruct students in their obligations and develop mechanisms within the institution for encouraging compliance.

Scenario A: The career services office becomes aware that a student has been signing up for interviews and then not showing up for the interview. Career services feels restricted because the student is the son of the dean of students.

All students should be advised that if an unforeseeable event prevents him/her from appearing for an interview, the student should notify the career center or the employer at the earliest possible moment. Appropriate counseling by the career center staff should impress upon the student the importance of keeping his/her interview appointments.

A career services office that has a student who habitually fails to keep interview appointments could restrict the student from further participation in the on-campus recruiting process. All career services centers should develop and post a strictly enforced policy regarding students' obligations in the recruiting process.

Resolution B: Once the student has accepted employment, the student must live with that commitment and withdraw from the recruiting process. The student should notify career services and all other employers with whom he/she is a potential candidate for employment that he/she has accepted an offer for employment.

This enables the employer to then consider alternative candidates for positions with their organizations and eliminate the possibility of the employer being left with positions to fill and no remaining viable candidates for consideration.

While an offer of employment should be given with the full intention of being honored, it is very possible that an employer may give several offers of employment based on certain criteria and later find that he/she must withdraw the offers (e.g., due to downsizing, non-awarded contracts, etc.). A student may have several offers and continue interviewing until an employment offer is accepted.

"Career services professionals will provide services to international students consistent with U.S. immigration laws; inform those students about these laws; represent the reality of the available job market in the United States; encourage pursuit of only those employment opportunities in the United States that meet the individual's work authorization; and encourage pursuit of eligible international employment opportunities."

International students are accepted for study in the United States with the understanding that they are to return to their home country for employment or other pursuits upon completion of their studies.

Subsequent to 12 months of post-degree practical training employment, an international student may then petition his/her employer to request a new visa status that will allow continued employment in the United States.

While the career services professional has a professional obligation to assist international students with their career development, including participation in experiential opportunities which complement and enhance their classroom education, there is a parallel responsibility not to encourage or enable students to get around the regulations.

While a number of principles have been adopted which are specifically identified for career services professionals, the behavior outlined in these principles must be observed by all campus offices and employees in order to ensure recruitment processes that are fair and equitable to candidates and employing organizations. All areas of the campus should basically be expecting to "play by the same rules."

Yet these other campus parties, most notably students and faculty, are generally not members of NACE. Thus it falls upon the career services professional to serve as an educator and advocate for these standards on his/her campus. This can bring him/her into conflict with campus members, primarily faculty and institutional advancement professionals, who would employ methods that violate our principles.

It is not uncommon for employers to contact a faculty member to request names of students as potential job candidates. While it may seem harmless to provide names, there are some potential legal and ethical pitfalls. By referring students for employment on a regular basis, the faculty member could be considered an "employment agency" for purposes of compliance with equal employment opportunity law. If the faculty member is, innocently or otherwise, referring male students only, or not referring minority students, the faculty member is open to charges of discrimination. When the faculty member refers only three candidates, and does not publicize the position to all who may be qualified, the doctrine of fairness is violated.

The best course of action would be to contact the career services office so that the position can be listed for all who qualify. The faculty member could also post the position within the academic department and announce it in his/her classes.

There is an assumption among students that the employment professionals recruiting at their school are using a process that produces appropriate hiring decisions: competently administered recruitment process that contributes to valid decisions by candidates about employment offers.

Career services and employers form a partnership that is intended to benefit all parties involved in this process. This demands that employers be able to function within accepted professional standards and represent their organizations accurately to the career services office.

Finally, employment professionals are relied on to attract and hire the best candidates possible for their organizations. Not only does this require basic competence, there is also the need to attract candidates whose reasons for choosing the organization match with the reality of that organization. Otherwise, turnover and the costs associated with these errors will result.

The second part of this principle pertains to fairness, honesty, and fidelity. Under this principle employers are expected to make offers for openings in good faith, i.e., those that, based on their best professional estimate, will be there for candidates when they are graduated and ready to begin employment. Put simply, the employer is expected to keep his/her promise.

It is only fair to the employer that he/she have the option of taking this step. At the same time, given the possible cost to the candidate who is losing this offer, it is only right that the employer compensate the candidate, who may have turned down other offers, by taking reasonable steps to assist him/her in finding another position.

In the fall, an organization expects to hire 75 entry-level engineers nationwide and recruits accordingly. By February it has extended offers and positions have been accepted. Students who accepted these positions have honored their obligation by withdrawing from their respective on-campus recruiting programs and notified other organizations from which they received offers. In April, the recruiters are notified that some major federal contracts have not been granted to the organization and many of these new hires will not be needed.

If the recruiting practices were based on a good intentions and the need to cut hires was unforeseeable, the organization still has the obligation to make a good faith effort to help the students recover from their loss. This can include looking for other positions within the organization, assisting the students in finding positions elsewhere, or engaging the assistance of a outside firm to help the students obtain comparable employment.

Organizations contributing to a career services office or its college is not inherently immoral. A contribution can be a means of bringing attention to the organization, as well as an investment in the institution from which candidates are hired. The problem, at least from the standpoint of the Principles document, emerges when a recruiting organization seeks treatment that in some way threatens the intended fairness of the recruitment process for students and other employers with whom the college collaborates. When contributions are intended or have the effect of crowding out other, less affluent employers, then students may in effect be denied ready access to the full range of opportunities they would like to consider and are entitled to have.

The recommended approach is to make all efforts to educate the two vice presidents about the realities of this situation. Not all students expect or want alcoholic beverages at a recruiting event. Some, possibly the best candidates, may be uncomfortable with this situation and turned off by the implication that drinking is expected or acceptable at a business function. While some organizations still make alcohol a part of the recruiting function, many recognize that this contradicts the philosophy that underlies their substance abuse stance. Third, given the concern that colleges have with student alcohol abuse, making alcoholic beverages a part of recruitment might not engender positive relationships with the institutions from which the company is recruiting.

The challenge to employment professionals recruiting on college campuses mirrors the dilemma that in some respect is experienced by any individual or organization that believes in a just hiring process. Equal employment opportunity is based on the concept of distributive justice. Distributive justice in part has to do with the way in which economic decisions are made, which includes hiring, compensation, and promotion. Several principles can be used to determine the most equitable way in which to determine the fairness of distributing benefits, most notably merit. Employees hired or promoted based on merit are viewed as having done the best, most related work, as well as possessing the most necessary qualities to perform the tasks required by the position being filled. Race, gender, age, ethnicity, religion, etc., would not be seen, except in the rarest of circumstances, as having anything to do with merit or having a legitimate place as a selection factor.

It should also be noted that both the private and public sectors have come to believe that affirmative action is a means of creating more diversity in their work forces, which is seen as definite benefit to the organization, even a need. From an organization and, indeed, a societal standpoint, an effective affirmative action program allows for greater use of talent, not to mention empowering organizations to relate more effectively to their diverse clienteles, be their customers, or clients.

At the core of an effective affirmative action program is recruitment, i.e., attracting the interest of targeted populations. Thus employment professionals in NACE member organizations seeking to meet their affirmative action goals view campus recruiting as a means of inviting minority and females to apply, interview, and ultimately accept an offer of employment. And given their partnership with career services offices in the recruitment enterprise, employment professionals will ask for cooperation in reaching these students.

The issue here is not whether or not to court the interest of these candidates, rather it has to do with how this effort is carried out. Career services professionals are obliged to provide equal service and opportunity for all students. But for them to single out students based on race, ethnicity or gender is unthinkable.

Instead, the employer should conceive of a recruitment effort that encourages minority interest and reaches out to minority group members, but also is inclusive of all students who might qualify for the management training program. This effort is most likely to be successful if it is comprehensive. Advertisement to students may include wording that encourages minority and female applications, while also making it clear that all qualified applicants are welcomed.

Asking the career services professional to single out students or announce minority- or female-only opportunities is not acceptable, nor is it likely to be warmly received. Similarly, skirting the career services office and going directly to faculty in an effort to have them engage in this sort of activity would not be in keeping with the ethical standards of the Principles.

Privacy is an important right that must be guarded. By maintaining confidentiality we protect individuals from being harmed by information falling into the wrong hands. We also protect them from the embarrassment and sense of personal violation that often accompany having had confidentiality breached.

Letters of recommendation for candidates are occasionally requested by employment professionals. Whether they are provided by the career center, a third-party organization, or directly by the letter writers, these documents should be used for the express reason they were requested and none other. Once used, they should be destroyed. They should not be circulated to others in the organization unless there is a need for others (e.g., managers) to know and the student provides written consent. Similarly, they should never be forwarded to outside individuals or organizations unless the student provides written permission. This permission should never be coerced, and the student should have full understanding as to why this is being requested and how it will be effected.

"Those engaged in administering, evaluating, and interpreting assessment tools, tests, and technology used in selection will be trained and qualified to do so. Employment professionals must advise the career services office of any test conducted on campus and eliminate such a test if it violates campus policies. Employment professionals must advise students in a timely fashion of the type and purpose of any test that students will be required to take as part of the recruitment process and to whom the test results will be disclosed.

Justice and the respect for the human right of autonomy, i.e., being able to function independently of the control of others, serve as the foundations of this principle. Some tests, notably those that assess personality or intelligence, may heighten student anxiety.

That the selection process is fair to a large degree means that the candidates are chosen based on their qualifications for the position. In that spirit, tests should accurately determine the presence of the qualities in question. In addition, those qualities should be ones that successful employees actually need. Otherwise, selection decisions can be unwise. Moreover, if the test disproportionately screens out women and minority group members and if the qualities it is assessing cannot be shown to be needed by successful employees, a charge of job discrimination can be filed and enforced in the courts.

The recruitment-related policies of the career services office are created to provide for a fair selection process that includes all students who wish to participate. Faculty and student organizations are not members of NACE and thus not necessarily aware of the ethical and legal foundations to a professional recruitment effort. Since the career services office may not necessarily know of all activities a recruiting organization may be involved in on campus, the responsibility rests in large part with the employment professional to see that these ethical standards are not violated.

The policies and procedures of the career services office are intended to honor the three precepts of the Principles document, i.e., maintaining "an open and free selection of employment opportunities,"

While unforeseen changes in hiring needs create a legitimate reason for canceling or postponing an interview date or withdrawing an offer of employment, the employing organization's recruitment plan should reflect careful and professional planning. Likewise, when offers must be withdrawn due to unforeseen circumstances, the employer should engage in a good faith effort to minimize the harm done to the student.

Employers seeking to fill positions in their internationally-based offices may be dealing with customs and laws that are not acceptable in the United States. This principle affirms that organizations recruiting to fill positions through campus recruiting in the United States, may not screen out students who, due to their American citizenship, might not be fully considered back in the home country. At the same time, so that American students are able to make a fully rational decision about interviewing, it is imperative that they understand that they may not be seriously considered or might run into roadblocks that would not be placed before them in the United States. For example, an American woman looking for work with an American company in their Middle East offices should be aware of restrictions placed on women in those countries. The student is then free to decide whether or not to pursue these opportunities.

There is an assumption by students that the third-party recruiters recruiting at their school are using a process that makes for appropriate hiring decisions. A competently administered recruitment process contributes to valid decisions by candidates about employment offers.

From the career services perspective, there is also a partnership with employers that is intended to benefit all parties involved in this process. This demands that employers be able to function within accepted professional standards and represent their organizations accurately to the career services office.

Finally, third-party recruiters are relied on by their clients to attract and hire the best candidates possible. Not only does this require basic competence, there is also the need to attract candidates whose reasons for choosing the organization match with the reality of that organization. Otherwise, turnover and the costs associated with these errors will result.

Inherent in this principle is the notion that employment justice, as currently defined and implemented by the American court system, adheres to the notion that (1) hiring must be done in a nondiscriminatory manner (EEO) and (2) American society has the moral obligation to remedy the effects of past employment discrimination, known as compensatory justice. While there is much debate about the merits of affirmative action, its moral foundation is a basic tenet of this association.

The challenge to third-party recruiters recruiting on college campuses mirrors the dilemma that in some respect is experienced by any individual or organization that believes in a just hiring process. Equal employment opportunity is based on the concept of distributive justice. Distributive justice, in part, has to do with the way in which economic decisions are made, which includes hiring, compensation, and promotion. Several principles can be used to determine the most equitable way in which to determine the fairness of distributing benefits, most notably merit. Employees hired or promoted based on merit are viewed as having done the best, most related work, as well as possessing the most necessary qualities to perform the tasks required by the position being filled. Race, gender, age, ethnicity, religion, etc., would not be seen, except in the rarest of circumstances, as having anything to do with merit or having a legitimate place as a selection factor.

A third-party recruiter is retained by an client organization that is seeking to recruit college women and members of minority groups for a management training program as part of its diversity enhancement effort.

Principles document, namely 1) to maintain an open and free selection of employment opportunities in an atmosphere conducive to objective thought and 2) to maintain a recruitment process that is fair and equitable to candidates and employing organizations.

This writing of this principle is driven primarily by the need to balance the right of students to gain access to the broadest range of opportunities possible with the obligation to ensure that employers with special methods or needs respect appropriate recruiting practice.

"Third-party recruiters will not disclose to any employer, including the client-employer, any student information without obtaining prior written consent from the student. Under no circumstances can student information be disclosed for other than recruiting purposes nor can it be sold or provided to other entities."

Career services professionals must endeavor to prevent practices that violate the Principles by educating the campus community about the ethical issues of concern. This includes others in Student Life, Institutional Advancement, and faculty. Career services professionals should work with the campus community to educate them about the potential for ethical abuses that commercialization poses and to develop practices that respect student rights while honoring institutional needs.

Career services professionals must be diligent in enforcing the NACE Principles for Professional Conduct not only as the Principles impact their offices, but also as they relate to faculty and staff throughout their respective institutions.

Faculty and other campus members, including alumni, who attempt to provide employers with information to which they are not entitled (e.g., confidential student information) or access to only "certain" candidates (and thus are not providing all students with equal access to information about opportunities), are breaching the ethical standards of our profession. It is imperative that these behaviors be confronted.

In seeking and accepting employer contributions, career services offices and academic departments must make every effort not to compromise their duty to provide full and equal service to students and employers. If employer funds provide greater prominence to the names and opportunities of specific organizations and their industries, the career center has an obligation to make every effort to provide students not interested in those specific organizations or industries with contact and/or other information about alternate employers in keeping with their needs and interests.

Career services professionals should not seek to charge fees or seek funds from employers to such an extent that the full range of student interests and needs are not met. For example, fees for services that prevent smaller organizations from either participating or being reasonably visible have the effect of violating all three core precepts of the Principles.

Employer professionals must not seek treatment or student access in ways that violate the Principles. Attempting to trade funding or equipment for special access and/or confidential information about specific potential candidates ("the best and brightest," members of certain groups, e.g., minority computer science majors) is inappropriate. Employers who seek these individuals should work with the career services office to develop marketing strategies that will enhance the visibility of their organization while maintaining a recruitment process that is fair and equitable to all employers and students.

The National Association of Colleges and Employers is a professional association of corporate human resource professionals engaged in college relations and recruitment and college student personnel professionals engaged in career services and career counseling.

Ethical Considerations of the Commercialization of Career Services and College Student Recruitment Functions draws attention to a continuing ethical dilemma for employers that centers on corporate sponsorship/funding of career center operations on the college campuses where we recruit.

Such funding can be problematic in that it may imply a demand for preferential treatment for the company or special access to students in return for funding or favors. These actions discourage an open job market for students.

This paper does not suggest that employers desist from giving money to the colleges that provide valued new employees. Rather, it urges employers, in the face of such challenges, to do everything possible to ensure that students continue to receive the full measure of service and attention that they deserve.

Such funding can be problematic in that there is a potential for offering preferential treatment for some companies, denying some employers equal access to our graduate population, and discouraging an open job market for our students.

This paper does not suggest that colleges desist from pursuing their funding goals. Rather, it urges career centers, in the face of such challenges, to ensure that students continue to receive the full measure of service and attention that they deserve and that employers who recruit our students be given equal access to our graduates.

Los Angeles and 90 miles north of San Diego. Its central location makes it an excellent place to base a Southern California vacation. The county itself spans more than 700 square miles of some of the best known and exciting sights in California. For more information: Anaheim/Orange County.

The NACE National Meeting does not include formal tours of the area, however; we encourage you and your family to take advantage of this idyllic location with one of the following optional tour activities. Register online to see the sights while you're in California.

Explore Southern California's most popular beach communities. Begin the day at one of California's broadest beaches, Huntington State Beach. Head south to Newport Beach and enjoy the scenic Pacific coastline. Corona Del Mar offers quiet sophistication and charm. Finish the day in scenic, eclectic Laguna.

A fun filled day! Start with a visit to Roger's Gardens, a seven-acre landscape display, and end the tour in Newport, one of California's busiest harbors. Along the way, you'll stop at Balboa Island, a charming island community located in Newport Harbor. Take the ferry from Newport Harbor to the Balboa Peninsula and enjoy a one-hour cruise of Newport Harbor Historic Hollywood Tour What is it about Hollywood that has captured the imaginations of people all over the world for nearly 100 years? Find out on the Historic Hollywood Tour! Who was Sid Grauman? Where was the first Oscar ceremony held? Where did Ronald Reagan begin his political career? The answers to these and other questions can be found on the Historic Hollywood Tour.

Women For Hire Exhibit Booth. Women For Hire productes high caliber career expos that connect leading employers with graduating seniors and professional women. As a participating employer, you'll receive a booth space at any one of our 20 annual events. Value: $2195.

Explore the results of NACE's 2006 Experiential Education Benchmark Survey in depth. Examine data on conversion rates, salaries, retention rates, and more. A panel discussion will follow in which employers will discuss their specific internship and cooperative education program(s).

Many universities are consolidating student services, including academic advising and career services. Get an overview of the integration processes for combining those two offices, including branding and marketing strategies, staffing, training, program development.

Hear a panel discussion about bridging the gap between student organizations, career services, employers, and the community. Learn from some the best practices being implemented around the country to promote student involvement and discuss how to deal with the challenges.

Many employers choose specific schools or departments as recruiting partners instead of working with the career center. Learn how to form alliances among departments, career services, and employers to ensure overall success.

Move beyond your basic information session and develop presentations that engage and excite the students in your target market. Learn how to generate presentation topics, link your presentations to your recruiting strategy, and develop and implement your plan. Through this process, you can improve your brand recognition on campus.

You must know something about students in order to successfully market to them. This interactive session will show you how to capture important contact information for students and prospects, and identify their behavior and demographic characteristics. Then, you can trigger print, digital, and electronic marketing campaigns based on that information.

Old Dominion's Cyber Career Center incorporates multiple career, web, and communication technologies into a comprehensive delivery capability that stresses high touch communication from a staff of "cyber career coaches," while electronically reaching out to students and alumni no matter where they are. Learn why, how, and who put high tech and high touch together.

If you are trying to build a new university relations program from the ground up, trying to re-launch an existing program, or want to enhance your current program, this workshop will provide you the tools, ideas, and direction to develop an effective all-around college or university relations program. Discover how to create and develop a detailed university recruiting strategy; identify key implications and initiatives of the program; prioritize action items; and identify issues and concerns that may potentially limit the success of the program.

The corporate recruiting web site has evolved from an information source to a critical influencer in candidate's employment choices. Learn what candidates want to find on a web site, what causes them to get frustrated and leave, and exactly which sites they feel are the best and why. The session will present research findings from actual candidates and demonstrate how to make your site more effective.

Summary: The Partnership will share initial findings from a national pilot project that is examining cost-effective and sustainable ways for schools and federal agencies to promote government opportunities on campuses.

Key highlights of employer branding best practices will be discussed from the perspective of top employers, career services, and students to pinpoint best methods to attract, recruit, and retain top talent.

Career services staff developed a hybrid model of the corporate self-managed teams concept to engage staff in dynamic program improvement. Discover how a year-long process of transformation from a traditional career office to self-managed teams resulted in working groups empowered to make and implement decisions regarding key programs.

As the economy grows stronger, finding and attaining top talent is becoming more difficult. Discover a five-phase hiring process that can make your hiring process easier and retention rate higher than it ever has been.

Review a strong model of constituency collaboration augmented by the effective presentation, use, and integration of data, survey, results, statistics, and other resources and information. This model, when used proactively and properly, can power a career services office that can be seen as the engine driving student affairs and more. Career services can be a strategic partner in institutional marketing, the allocation of resources, and academic/curriculum decision making. This presentation will highlight how you can make this happen on your campus.

Will a combination of aging population demographics, a growing economy, and fewer qualified workers to fill the void cripple our economy and make labor a scarce commodity? Or will increases in offshoring, immigration, and delayed retirements mitigate a potential crisis? Explore what a potential crisis may mean to recruiters and employees alike.

The war for talent is an ongoing battle. Many companies spend countless hours and thousands of dollars to woo a recruiter, then have their employment offer rejected. What happened? You may be doing the right things, but sometimes yesterday's tactics do not work with today's candidate. Examine some best practices that can help you increase your offer-to-acceptance rate.

Explore the issues regarding the employment of foreign graduates. For employers, the program will provide information about visas available for hiring foreign grads, including costs, timing, and employer obligations.

Discuss the recently released Vault/INROADS Guide to Diversity Entry-Level and Internship, Co-op and Entry-Level and analyze statistical trends in the industry along with highlights of top diversity practices. Identify the resources available to assist your company in creating and/or developing your diversity program.

Raytheon uses a variety of internal and external data to quantitatively evaluate their school selection. Hear how using data from the Engineering Workforce Commission, corporate contributions, research studies, and previous hiring history contributes to the decision making and gains buy-in from all parties involved.

When recruiting at more than 100 schools nationwide, how does one manage the whos, whats, wheres, and whens of recruiting? Raytheon shows you how they mastered the art of on-campus recruiting by streamlining the process through the use of technology. See a demonstration of their in-house data base and learn the process used in its development. Also, get a personal company assessment to determine your own needs.

Regardless of how much experience you have in the field of college recruiting or career services, it's not what you know, it's how you make people feel. As we approach yet another worker shortage, the role of college professional will be more critical than ever. It's time to adopt new skills and techniques that will boost your confidence, improve your personal style, and help you gain your professional/personal goals.

Liberal arts students have a steep learning curve when they enter business careers. Explore innovative programming ideas, including a noncredit course, investment club, etiquette dinner and employer site visits, that together allow students to receive the "business fundamentals" needed to begin their careers with confidence and knowledge.

Daphne Nadal, Michelle A. Foley, and a student leader panel, University of California - Irvine Find out how you can collaborate effectively with student clubs and organizations through a lively discussion with a University of California-Irvine student leader panel. Then share best practices with your colleagues and walk into the 2006-2007 academic year prepared to reap the rewards of enhanced student partnerships.

Duke University and other schools now provide free iPods to their students to improve learning. In this interactive, nuts-and-bolts session, you'll learn how podcasting can be a cutting-edge tool for recruiting and career counseling. Online recruiting expert Steven Rothberg will demystify podcasting and illustrate how it catches the attention of today's mobile graduates.

Learn best practices of employment screening for risk management and better hiring decisions. Find out if your organization is fully compliant legally while accessing all the information pertinent to making an informed hiring decision.

Others may prefer to maintain separation between their personal and professional lives. This workshop provides practical steps to work with the gay or lesbian individual through career search techniques, interview preparation, and resume building (coming out on the resume).

Explore the basics of great recruiting and staffing excellence: develop an understanding that recruiting and human resources is about building and cultivating relationships. Learn how to take advantage of opportunities and challenges we face.

However, faculty can be misinformed, dismissive, or apathetic. Identify effective, comprehensive strategies to work with faculty, including a range of communication, resource, and programmatic solutions within the current faculty reward structure.

Senior managers are called upon to participate in change management processes in their organizations. This session provides leaders with a framework for engaging in a strategic planning process. This model provides a foundation upon which an organization may advance its direction from an informed perspective, and intentionally shape the vision for the future.

Do you know what Friendster and Facebook are? Are you familiar with these communication communities/technologies? Yet...the students you want to hire use these online forums every day. Employers will find out how they can use these new technologies for maximum recruiting impact. Career center colleagues will learn how to coach students on avoiding common mistakes in new media communication.

For job seekers and employers, two advantages of job fairs are convenience and personal contact. Commercial virtual job fair and "in-house" products may fit the bill for convenience, but do they offer personal contact? For Palm Beach Community College, the answer was yes.

Join this game show complete with hosts, staging, challenging recruiting and resource questions, and real prizes. Learn how to use this game show to present sound recruiting principles while having fun.

Use this form as a guide to draft your electronic proposal. It is exactly like the form you must submit electronically. You can print this form to edit your proposal, then return to the electronic form to submit your proposal.

In 50 words or less, describe the benefits to be gained by participants in your session. Please indicate at least two (2) skills, ideas, procedures, etc. that attendees will take away from this presentation.

I understand that my conference presentation is not a showcase for promotion of my business, practice or product, and I will not sell my products or services from the NACE speaker platform. I also understand that press may be present during my session and that I will be notified about the status of my proposal no later than November 15, 2006.

Brandon Kilburn is pursuing a Ph.D. at the Fogelman College of Business and Economics at the University of Memphis. His major area of concentration is management. He received an M.B.A. from the University of Tennessee at Martin. His primary research interests include leadership, employee motivation, issues facing diverse employees, and exchange of information within organizations.

The internal application of marketing principles to relationships with employees, particularly in terms of market segmentation, will allow organizations to identify specific values and retention criteria for target populations within the organization. This, in turn, can lead to a cohesive sustainable strategy for retaining diverse employees. IMO works largely through developing and enriching relationships between employees and organizations. These stronger relationships should result in more positive attitudes, such as job satisfaction and organizational commitment, increased identification with the organization, and lower turnover. A conceptual model illustrating the components of an IMO plan focusing on the retention of diverse employees is presented in Figure 1.

Steps in the implementation of IMO are outlined in Table 1. The activities necessary for the realization of employee potential through IMO begin with the generation of employee information. Information generation methods typically include focus groups, surveys, and interviews. HR managers have used these methods of collecting data for decades. However, such data have rarely been subject to the comprehensive marketing-driven uses described here. A marketing approach to information generation allows organizations to gather information specifically regarding how different groups of employees feel about the organization and the things they consider most important, and focuses on tailoring strategic responses to these groups. The organization is also able to steer its corporate branding effort through IMO, gauge how employees feel about the corporate brand, and assess employee knowledge of and alignment with the corporate brand.

Information generation activities may include collecting employee value attributes, identifying exchanges of value among employees, segmenting the internal market according to their specific value attributes, evaluating external market conditions facing employees, and, finally, developing retention strategies for each of the employee segments. After information has been collected from internal customers, it is imperative that the information be communicated throughout the organization. Open communication among managers and between managers and their subordinates facilitates the effective use of valuable employee-provided information. As an organization responds to the information, it will provide employees with tangible evidence of their efforts to understand the information provided by the employees (e.g., job redesign, improved communication channels, alignment of reward systems, training and development opportunities, management consideration, and responses to external market alternatives).

Research has not provided a valid and reliable measure of internal market orientation.14, 15 Given the IMO focus on relationship building with employees, the authors developed a measure of employee perceptions of IMO activities. Following the conceptual identification of the likely important dimensions of IMO, new items to tap these dimensions were generated and some items from a widely used market orientation scale were adapted.16 These items focused on information generation, information dissemination, responsiveness, and branding.

The responsiveness items loaded on two factors, one that seemed to represent responsiveness, and one that seemed to address segmentation. This resulted in four dimensions, each exhibiting good reliability: information exchange, responsiveness, segmentation, and branding.

A second pilot study was conducted with 66 employed adults who were also graduate and undergraduate students. Results of both exploratory and confirmatory factor analysis suggested that a 14-item scale representing the four dimensions noted above has a reasonably stable factor structure with acceptable reliability (as regards the internal consistency of items in a multi-item measurement scale). The authors also began the process of assessing the convergent and discriminant validity of the IMO measure.17 Patterns of correlations within dimensions, with measures of job satisfaction and turnover intentions, and with a measure of self-monitoring provide some preliminary evidence of both convergent and discriminant validity. Of particular interest, each dimension of IMO was significantly positively correlated with job satisfaction, and significantly negatively correlated with turnover intentions.

The final 14-item internal market orientation scale is presented in Table 2. This scale captures four related but distinct dimensions of the internal market orientation construct. Preliminary data in two pilot tests suggests these measures have acceptable reliability, a relatively simple factor structure, are positively correlated with job satisfaction, and are negatively correlated with turnover intentions. Despite these promising early results, this measure requires further confirmatory testing before use. A well-developed IMO scale will be useful in helping organizations assess their present level of IMO activities and to focus their development of an IMO plan.

Many organizations desire to develop retention strategies and practices that focus on specific, high value, high turnover segments of their work force, and the potentially unique factors driving these employees decisions to participate in the organization. Organizations can establish and strengthen internal relationships consistent with their corporate brand by applying an IMO, which can be a critical strategic tool in identifying diverse employees and responding to their needs. IMO activities enable organizations to tailor their retention strategies to specific employee segments. The IMO scale developed in this study can be used by organizations to gauge their current level of IMO, while the model and implementation strategies can serve as a starting point for organizations desiring to adopt or improve their IMO. In sum, the internal application of marketing principles to relationships with employees, particularly in terms of market segmentation, will allow organizations to identify specific values and retention criteria for target populations within the organization. This, in turn, can lead to a cohesive sustainable strategy for retaining diverse employees.

Association of Colleges and Employers, copyright holder, to download and photocopy this article for internal purposes only. Photocopies must include this copyright notice. Those who do not hold membership, or who wish to use the article for other purposes, should contact Claudia Allen, callen@naceweb.org, 800/544-5272, ext. 129. Electronic reproduction of this article is prohibited.

Organizations value diversity because diverse employees may bring unique knowledge, experiences, and perspectives to the workplace. These contributions may lead to additional knowledge of underused resources or underexploited markets, as well as potential links to and relationships with customers that traditional employees may not be able to obtain.

Although important, the practical implications of turnover research are not always straightforward. Perhaps the most important limitation of current turnover research is the implicit treatment of all employees as similar without recognizing that different types or groups of employees may have different needs and values. Previous work does little to address the potentially unique issues faced by specific employee segments and by organizations trying to retain them.

Since IMO focuses on targeting specific entities, it may be especially effective for developing relationships with diverse subpopulations of employees. By establishing relationships with employees, IMO enables organizations to obtain information from employees concerning their needs and desires.

Organizations are then able to use that information to establish, develop, and maintain internal processes and alter job characteristics in order to increase retention rates. IMO activities are used to identify employee segments that possess similar characteristics, needs, desires, and/or job experiences. In addition, the information gathered from employees may also point out specific areas of concern, such as whether a particular group feels valued by and integrated into the organization. Organizations are therefore able to tailor their retention strategies to specific employee segments. IMO focuses on relationship-building in order to influence employee behavior through three main dimensions: information generation, information dissemination, and responsiveness.

Information generation involves internal market research on employee needs, values, perceptions, and opinions. These data are then used in several ways: identification of exchanges of value; segmentation of the internal market; identification of external market conditions; and development of segment retention strategies. It is important to identify those exchanges or organizational characteristics that are of most value to the employee group or groups of interest, as well as which employees are most valuable to the organization. Organizations can then segment their internal market into groups of employees with shared values and perceptions. In conjunction with data on external market conditions, this enables the development of retention strategies for each segment. For example, an organization might discover that women managers are more concerned about a particular issue (e.g., career path opportunities) than other employees. The organization might then revise career paths based on the needs of this group, especially if women managers have been identified as a high-value group at greater risk of turning over.

Information dissemination is the sharing and use of information within an organization. The information dissemination stage of IMO provides an opportunity for organizations to share the maximum amount of information among employees, and between employees and the organization. Communication is especially critical in an organization comprised of diverse employees.

Gathering and disseminating information are necessary but not sufficient steps for an organization to take in order to establish relationships with its employees; organizations must also be responsive to the information.

Therefore, based on information provided by employees, organizations can respond by tailoring jobs and working conditions to employees or segments, thereby treating employees with different needs differently. Internal responsiveness may include implementing segmentation strategies, improving communication channels, designing jobs to meet employees needs, aligning bonus/salary systems, providing management consideration to training programs, and reacting to employment alternatives facing employees. Implementing segment retention strategies in these ways can foster trust, identification, and commitment toward the organization.

Finally, internal branding can be used to provide an overarching vision to IMO strategies. Branding is not necessary for using IMO approaches to managing retention, but can provide a common theme to all employee communications and employee relations activities. Branding begins by choosing the desired image and relationship with employees. The next step in branding is to make sure that all employee relations, communications, and processes are consistent with the desired brand image. IMO involves extensive communication with employees, so it is important that information collection, information dissemination, and responsiveness be consistent with the desired brand image.

In addition, Cunningham has presented a number of web seminars for NACE and written or edited books for NACE on topics that members say are important to them, such as diversity, internship programs, interviewing, and college relations program management.

Over the years, she faced numerous challenges, but says the biggest was taking the Tellabs college relations program from one that hired about 30 new college graduates per year in Illinois to a program that hired hundreds of students and new grads per year in multiple locations around the world.

Cunningham says the things that will help NACE continue to be strong include providing leadership and professional growth that might not be available on the job; offering networking opportunities to share information and support ideas and a big-picture view; helping members to view what they do as a profession, not just a job; and addressing the human need to connect with others in similar situations.

As for the profession, Harris says that people look to an organization like NACE for information and resources on areas such as assessment and benchmarking, and networking, especially for those new to the profession.

Since 1995, she has served as director of the UCLA Career Center, where she supported an outreach model that included career center sponsorship of student groups. She also started a career center annual campaign and special events that significantly increased career center income.

In 1948, the General Electric Corporation held a conference in which recruiters from major companies and placement officers from colleges and universities met for a discussion of issues facing both fields. Two important outcomes were that a recruitment code of ethics was developed and there was interest in forming other regional associations similar to the Rocky Mountain organization.

Talk of collaboration among the regions grew; although the groups decided to be independent, as their activities expanded, many conferences and projects overlapped, and it became obvious that coordination and communication on a larger scale would require the creation of a national association.

In June 1955, the presidents of the eight regional associations held a meeting in Philadelphia, which the Journal reported on in its October issue. Discussions during this meeting explored the development of a national advisory council. The proposal was brought before the eight regional groups for action to facilitate establishing a formal national organization.

An executive committee and the administrative boards of the eight regional associations met at Lehigh University in Bethlehem, Pennsylvania, in June 1956 and unanimously approved the constitution for the new national advisory council. The name College Placement Publications Council was retained.

In the 1980s, CPC published professional standards for its members, offered more training and development opportunities, held three National Meetings, included legal columns in publications, and instituted an awards program to recognize member accomplishments. CPC also published benchmark research studies in the 1980s.

NACE continues to provide the information that has made it a valuable professional organization to its members and their constituencies over the last 50 years. "As we look ahead, NACE will strive to anticipate trends and changes in the profession, so that we may serve members with the same conscientious foresight as those members who built its solid foundation," says Vanessa A. Strauss, NACE president.

Choosing and attaining meaningful post-graduation employment is an important challenge for college students. To aid this process, your career center and employers develop connections and programs, such as on-campus recruiting, resume referral services, and job fairs, in which you and your fellow students are active participants.

Raytheon Company, a leader in technology, constantly strives to encourage young students interest in math and science. In this spirit, we have created a basket containing a Remote Control Robotic Dinosaur and several MathMovesU and MathCounts items. MathMovesU is Raytheon Company's national initiative to improve young students' perceptions about math and science.

If you know you have the correct Web address, but are encountering an error, please send an email to the site administrator or click here to return to the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority home page.

The flight guide is intended to provide flight information for Ronald Reagan Washington National (DCA)and Washington Dulles International (IAD) Airports. It contains direct flights and selected connecting flights. Flights are listed by time of day, showing the published flight number, stops and transfer city if applicable. International flights are listed separately. Schedule changes may occur after publication. You are advised to confirm all information with the airline or travel representative.

Shuttles leaving the Main Terminal for the C Gates now depart from a new location in the Main Terminal. Passengers may board the shuttles directly after passing through the security screening checkpoints. The new location is marked with signage. Passengers going to the A, B, D, H, and Z-gates are not affected by this change. Click here to view the Terminal Map.

Most of the food and beverage facilities at Dulles have been completely renovated and enhanced to meet the needs of today's traveler. There is also a restaurant located in the Main Terminal prior to the security screening checkpoints. Click here for retail and restaurant listings.

The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority and the Commonwealth of Virginia have entered into a Memorandum of Understanding regarding the future of the Dulles Corridor. Documents may be viewed by clicking on the links below.

Privacy Statement and Website Policy for www.mwaa.com				Disclaimer: The material on this website is historical and has been posted for the convenience and general information of persons interested in such historical material, speaks only as of its date, and has not been updated to reflect subsequent developments.

We use this information to help us make our site more useful to visitors, to learn about the number of visitors to our site and the types of technology our visitors use. We do not track or record information about individuals and their visits. We do not utilize "cookies" (A "cookie" is a file placed on your hard drive by a web site that allows it to monitor your use of the site.) except for short duration cookies that enable us to limit the repetition of informational "pop up" windows that may appear while visiting sections of our site.

If you choose to provide us with personal information as in an email to one of our online email boxes, or by filling out a form with your personal information and submitting it to us through our web site we use that information to respond to your message and to help us get you the information you have requested. We treat emails the same way we treat other communications sent to the Authority, but we do not collect personal information for any purpose other than to respond to your request. We collect personally identifiable information (name, email address, Social Security number, or telephone number) only if specifically and knowingly provided by you. We only share the information you give us with another organization if your inquiry relates to that organization, or as otherwise required by law. Moreover, we do not create individual profiles with the information you provide or give it to any private organizations. We do not collect information for commercial marketing.

Our web site has links to other organizations web sites. This does not constitute an endorsement of their policies or products. Once you link to another site, you are subject to the privacy policy of the new site.

We ensure that our web site remains available to all users by using a computer system that employs software programs to monitor network traffic to identify unauthorized attempts to upload or change information, or otherwise cause damage.

All photographs contained on this web site are protected by United States copyright law. You may browse, search, retrieve, view, download, store or print photographs from mwaa.com for your personal, noncommercial use only. Otherwise, photographs on this web site may not be copied, reproduced, modified, distributed, transmitted, displayed, published or broadcast without the prior written permission of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority. You may not alter or remove any trademark, copyright or other notice from the content on this web site.

The Airports Authority operates a two-airport system that provides domestic and international air service for the mid-Atlantic region. The organization consists of more than 1,300 employees in a structure that includes central administration, airports management and operations, and police and fire departments.

The Airports Authority is not taxpayer-funded but is self-supporting, using aircraft landing fees, rents and revenues from concessions to fund operating expenses. The Dulles Development Program is funded by bonds issued by the Authority, Federal and State Airport Improvement Program funds, and Passenger Facility Charges.

The link below leads to the Digital Assurance Certification, LLC (DAC) website. The DAC investor relations platform enables issuers to post vital information pertaining to their bonds that is accessible to investors free of charge. The DAC website also allows the public to contact issuers with specific inquiries. Once answered, the inquiry and issuer response are posted to the Investor Communication Platform.

The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is an independent body created by the Commonwealth of Virginia and the District of Columbia. It has been approved by the U.S. Congress to operate and maintain Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport and Washington Dulles International Airport. The Authority is a public body, corporate and politic and is independent of all other bodies. It is not an agency of the Commonwealth of Virginia or the District of Columbia, nor is it a federal agency.

The U.S. government owns most of the airport property. Pursuant to a lease signed by the U.S. Secretary of Transportation and the Authority, the U.S. Department of Transportation transferred control of the Airports to the Authority on June 7, 1987, for a 50-year period; in 2003, the lease was extended an additional 30 years. The lease established the terms and conditions of the Authority's control of the Airports, most significantly, that the property be used only for "airport purposes."

Airport revenues from aircraft landing fees, rents and airport concession fees support the Authority. While it does receive federal and state grants for construction projects like any other U.S. airport, the Authority receives no taxpayer funds or appropriations from any government for its operating costs. The Airports also collect a $4.50 passenger facility charge for each passenger for spending only on government-authorized projects, mostly for capacity and safety.

When the federal government operated the Airports prior to 1987, both had a Washington, D.C. postal address. To help identify the service area more easily for travelers, the Authority did not change the addresses.

The Virginia Department of Transportation built the toll road on airport property. The Virginia State Police and Fairfax County Police have primary jurisdiction over the toll road. The Authority Police also have jurisdiction on the toll road.

Links of Interest		Links to Other Sites: Our web site has links to other organizations web sites. This does not constitute an endorsement of their policies or products. Once you link to another site, you are subject to the privacy policy of the new site.

Air Service		The Authority is continually striving to improve the level of air service offered at Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport and Washington Dulles International Airport as we further integrate with the world around us in a changing aviation industry.

With one of the best concession programs in the country the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority offers a favorable climate for a variety of business enterprises at Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport and Washington Dulles International Airport. Concession opportunities include; parking, rental cars, food & beverage, retail, customer service, taxicabs, terminal advertising and general aviation. When a contract expires or the need for a new concession is determined a Request for Proposals will be posted on the Authority's web site. Please go to Currently Available Concession Opportunities. Successful Proposals are selected through a competitive solicitation process.

It is the policy of the Authority to aggressively seek MBE and WBE participation in its contract opportunities through all lawful means. The Authority has two programs for achieving this policy objective - an LDBE Program for contracts that do not include any federal funds and its DBE Programs for federally-funded contracts and concession opportunities.

The Authority's LDBE Program provides opportunities to local small business firms without regard to race or sex. These LDBE firms are eligible for any Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority contract that requires LDBE participation. An LDBE is defined as a small business concern which is organized for profit and located within a 100-mile radius of Washington, DC's Zero Mile Marker. Those business entities located within counties that fall partially within the aforementioned boundary were also eligible to participate in the Authority's LDBE program. The average gross receipts, based on the firm's last three years of receipts, must not exceed the small business size standard established by the Authority for the services or goods that will be provided in an Authority contract. The receipts of all affiliates are counted in determining size. Business concerns are affiliates of each other when, either directly or indirectly, (1) one concern controls or has the power to control the other, or (2) a third party (or parties) has the power to control both. Consideration is given to such factors as common ownership and management, contractual relationships and overlapping authority.

The directory also provides a listing of Minority Owned Business Enterprise (MBE) and Woman Owned Business Enterprise (WBE) firms who have been certified as a DBE. The DBE Program covers contracts that are funded in part or in whole with federal dollars. This program provides opportunities to firms who meet the federal eligibility standards for DBEs. The Authority must comply with Department of Transportation regulations in 49 CFR Part 26, when certifying DBEs. To qualify as a DBE under 49 CFR Part 26, a business must be a small business (as defined by the Small Business Administration) which is at least 51 percent owned by one or more socially and economically disadvantaged individuals. African American, Hispanic Americans, Native Americans, Subcontinent Asian Americans, Asian-Pacific Americans and women are presumed to be socially and economically disadvantaged. The management and daily business operations must be controlled by one or more of the socially and economically disadvantaged individuals who own it. The receipts of all affiliate companies are counted in determining size.

The Authority is a public body politic and corporate, created with the consent of the Congress of the United States by the District of Columbia Regional Airports Authority Act of 1985, as amended, and Ch. 598, Virginia Acts of Assembly of 1985, as amended. The purpose of this entity is to plan, provide and actively manage world class access to the global aviation system in a way that anticipates and serves the needs of the National Capital area.

The Purchasing Agents and Buyers are responsible for procuring the following goods and services for requisitions valued at $25,000.00 and under, in addition to supporting a warehouse which stocks approximately 2,500 line items.

If you are considering a job opportunity with the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority, we want you to know that pay represents only a portion of total compensation. The benefits available to you as an Authority employee can assist you while you are working and help you plan for a comfortable retirement. A typical benefits package with the Authority usually represents an additional 30 percent of pay.

Understanding the benefits available to you is the best way to determine if the Authority could be your next employer. Below is a summary of the different benefits offered to all regular, active employees with the Authority.

The Authority typically offers two different health care plans to provide you and your family with protection when you incur health care expenses. Employees may select from a Preferred Provider Organization or a Health Maintenance Organization. You may elect to cover yourself, yourself plus one other dependent, or yourself and your entire family. Either plan offers comprehensive medical services at a reasonable bi-weekly contribution rate. These programs include prescription drug and vision benefits.

The Authority automatically covers employees in one of two different defined benefit plans  either the Retirement Plan for General Employees or the Retirement Plan for Police Officers and Firefighters. An employee is covered in their respective plan as of their date of hire.

Police and Firefighters contribute 1.5 percent of their base pay on a pre-tax basis and are eligible for a full pension at age 55 with at least 5 years of service or at any age with at least 25 years of service. An early retirement option is available before age 50 with a reduced benefit.

The Authoritys RSP is designed to help you accumulate capital for your retirement by allowing you to voluntarily save a portion of your pay on a pre-tax basis through payroll deduction. The Authority matches a portion, up to 3 percent, of the amount you save. There are many investment options available and your contribution rate may be changed at any time. The annual maximum tax deferred savings limit is currently $15,500, and the age 50 provision is an additional $5,000. In addition, investment earnings credited to your account accumulate tax-free until you receive a distribution. This plan is governed by Sec. 457 of the IRS Code.

This program provides partial income protection to employees when they become ill or disabled until age 65 or older depending on the age at which the disability occurred. Our LTD plan is designed to integrate with the Authoritys leave programs, workers compensation, retirement and social security benefits. The Authority provides, at no cost to the employee, the normal 90-day waiting period before benefits become available. Employees may elect shorter waiting periods (60 and 30 days) at a reasonable additional cost.

This program provides benefits to your survivors if you die on or off the job from accidental or natural causes. These benefits supplement your own personal life insurance program. You and the Authority share the cost for basic life insurance. Supplemental and Dependent coverage is also available at reasonable cost to the employee.

The Authority offers most new employees the opportunity to accrue annual and sick leave for their personal use during the course of their employment. Within specific guidelines, employees may use their leave for events such as vacations, illness or injury, and to care for family members. We observe 10 Federal holidays each year. Lastly, the Authority provides leave for an on-the-job injury or illness, administers a donated leave program, and provides for court and military Leave. The Authority manages all programs in accordance with the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993.

An FSA enables you to save money on certain health care and dependent care costs by paying for eligible expenses with pre-tax dollars. Since your contributions are deducted from your paycheck before taxes, your taxable income is actually lowered. This means that you pay fewer income taxes and have more money to spend! The maximum you may defer each year is $2,500 for health care expenses and $5,000 for dependent care expenses. The Authority offers direct deposit reimbursement and account management services with the plans.

The Authority's programs - health and life insurance, retirement and retirement savings, long term disability, leave programs, flexible spending accounts tuition assistance, metropool subsidies and other miscellaneous benefits add up to a comprehensive and generous benefits package.

Positions Currently Open		The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority operates a two-airport system that provides domestic and international air service for the mid-Atlantic region. The organization consists of more than 1,300 employees in a structure that includes central administration, airports management and operations, and police and fire departments. In addition to operating Ronald Reagan National and Dulles International Airports, the Airports Authority is responsible for capital improvements at both airports.

The department maintains a highly trained workforce through daily in-station and out-of-agency training. The department also participates in the National Fire Protection Association Professional Firefighter Qualifications Certification Program through the Commonwealth of Virginia, Department of Fire Programs. All personnel are certified Emergency Medical Technicians through the Commonwealth of Virginia.

I encourage you to consider a career as a firefighter with the Authority's Fire & Rescue Department. We seek highly qualified individuals who wish to use their training and expertise to provide the best services possible to our airport communities and the flying public.

One year of experience in the control and extinguishment of fires as an active and regular member of an organized fire department. The one-year of experience will be credited against an average of 56 hours per week or 2912 hours per year. To be creditable, volunteer experience must have included regular attendance at regularly scheduled training sessions and must also have included regular and actual participation in fighting fires.

Candidates must provide a copy of current valid driver's license from state of residence at time of interview. [Note: Maryland residents must have Class B endorsement] Candidates are also subject to a job knowledge test, an oral interview, a physical agility test, a thorough background investigation (to include a full employment history check; a credit check; a criminal history check; and a driving record check. A pre-employment medical examination, to include drug testing, will be performed. Employees will be assigned to one of three (24-hour) shifts working an average 56-hour work week. Employees must pass annual medical testing criteria.

Once hired, the Firefighter Medic must be accepted by the Authority's Occupational Medical Director for independent practice as a Firefighter Medic within the first year of employment. Failure to maintain required certifications, in accordance with proper procedures, will result in removal from the position.

Employees will be assigned to one of three (24 hour) shifts working an average 56-hour work week. Employees must pass annual medical testing criteria. Firefighter Medic employees must maintain a performance level fully acceptable to the Authority's Operational Medical Director's established standards of proficiency and competence in order to function under his/her medical auspices. Failure to maintain a satisfactory performance level may be considered cause for termination or demotion, under proper procedures.

The Office of Public Safety is committed to providing a safe and secure environment to the Metropolitan Washington airports community through organized response to emergency situations and proactive education and prevention activities. Public Safety provides a broad range of programs to protect the airports community from the adverse effects of crime, fire, sudden medical emergency or exposure to dangerous conditions.

The Office of Public Safety shall accomplish its mission by providing an organization that is attuned to the needs of the airports, by training its personnel to continuously improve efficiency, by allocating personnel in accordance with workload demands and by using the latest technologies available to Public Safety providers.

The Airports Authority Police Department is a full service law enforcement agency with the same responsibility as a county or municipal police agency to enforce the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia. Authority Police also enforce Federal Regulations pertaining to airport operations.

Authority Police serve as the first professional law enforcement contact to the traveling public. Our patrons come to the Nation's Capitol from all over the world. The image our police project speaks volumes about our country. This is a responsibility we accept with pride.

Commercial Photography/ Filming Procedures				Due to increasing demand for the use of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority (the Authority) facilities as a location or background for commercial photography or video, motion picture, and television filming, the Authority has established fees for these activities to recover associated costs. The Authority has established policies related to insurance, hold harmless agreements, and security that are a prerequisite for obtaining permission for filming and photography activities.

See data showing aircraft operations, passengers, mail, and freight statistics for every year in the Airport's history. This page also has links to more detailed passenger and operational data for every month and year dating back to 2000.

Dulles Environmental Studies				The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority (Airports Authority) is currently undertaking a capital improvement program, called d2, to provide new facilities and replace and upgrade existing aircraft, passenger, and support facilities at Washington Dulles International Airport.

Several separate studies look at the potential environmental impacts of three major proposed project groups: 1) a new concourse, a new airport passenger train system, and associated projects that will replace the existing Concourse C/D complex and the mobile lounge shuttles; 2) a replacement, modernized airport traffic control tower; 3) and two new runways and associated projects.

The studies are prepared in compliance with the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of 1969, as amended, the regulations of the President's Council on Environmental Quality (CEQ) for NEPA compliance, and Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) Orders 1050.1E and 5050.4A. NEPA requires federal agencies to consider a wide array of potential environmental effects when proposing actions including: noise; compatible land use; social and socioeconomic characteristics; air quality; water quality; geology and soils; historic, architectural, archaeological, and cultural resources; biotic communities; endangered and threatened species; wetlands; floodplains; coastal zone management; coastal barriers; wild and scenic rivers; prime and unique farmland; energy; light emissions; visual aesthetics; solid waste, hazardous waste, and pollution prevention; and design, art, and architecture. These studies are decision-making tools that analyze the potential environmental effects of a proposed action and its alternatives and provide a forum to address both regulatory and public concerns.

The Tier 2 Concourse is the major component of the Proposed Action (Build Alternative). The new concourse will replace the existing Concourse C/D, which has neither the necessary space nor appropriate updated passenger amenities to serve present-day or future needs of United Airlines, the largest airline at IAD and the principal tenant on the existing Concourse C/D. The project will consist of the construction of a permanent midfield concourse south of the existing Concourse C/D. In addition, a baggage tunnel containing a baggage conveyor system, a tug tunnel, and a pedestrian walkback tunnel will be constructed as part of the Tier 2 Concourse project. After completion of the new concourse, existing Concourse C/D will be demolished.

Another major project that is part of this study includes the construction of the Automated People Mover System (APM). The APM system project will consist of a new underground train system that will connect the midfield concourses and the Main Terminal. The train system will be electric-powered and will substantially reduce the use of the existing Mobile Lounge service. The project will include 6 miles of tunnels, eight stations, and connections to the Main Terminal, to the concourses, and to a maintenance facility. Two separate APM systems will be constructed: one for domestic passengers and one for arriving international passengers.

Please take a moment to review the website to learn the latest information about the study including a summary of the Public Hearings held in February 2005, the EIS process, and the Final Environmental Impact Statement.

The study team appreciates all the citizens and agencies that have participated throughout this process. All of your comments have been reviewed by the team, summarized, and included as part of the public record. The study teams responses to the summarized questions and comments have been detailed in the Final Environmental Impact Statement.

The array of shopping and dining opportunities offered at Washington Dulles includes nearly 100 privately-owned and operated food and retail shops located throughout the airports concourse buildings. Many nationally and internationally recognized brands operate at Dulles. Concourse B is the centerpiece of the retail program, featuring 13,000 square feet of retail space. In all, the retail and restaurant program occupies more than 50,000 square feet at the airport. An airport-wide Food Redevelopment Program began in 2005 to address the changing needs of the traveling public. The shopping and dining concessions at Dulles Airport are managed by Westfield Concession Management, Inc.

To confirm information, call the airline or check the airline's website for the most up-to-date flight arrival and departure times. The Airport Main Terminal and Concourses also have flight display boards.

The airlines have gates at the Main Terminal and midfield Concourses. Passengers arriving on international flights are transported by mobile lounges from the airplane to the International Arrivals Building (IAB) located on the lower level at the West end of the Main Terminal.

The construction currently underway at Dulles is part of a major capital investment program known as Dulles Development, or D2. The program was approved in 2000 by the Airports Authority Board of Directors to enable the Airport to keep pace with air service growth and accommodate the future traveling needs of the Washington region.

When the federal government operated Reagan National and Dulles prior to 1987, both Airports had Washington, D.C. postal addresses. To help identify the service area more easily for travelers, the Airports Authority did not change the postal addresses.

Or, for door-to-door directions using an internet mapping website, enter "IAD" or "Washington Dulles" as your destination. Some websites allow you to select from a list of airports since the address is not commonly known.

According to Transportation Security Administration (TSA) security measures, only ticketed passengers or authorized personnel are allowed through security checkpoints. Special arrangements can be made with your airline for accompanying children or others needing assistance to get to the gate. Please check with your airline for details.

Passengers are generally urged to arrive 1  to 2 hours before domestic flights, and 2  to 3 hours before international flights to allow time to get through airline ticketing and security. Contact your airline for more specific instructions.

You will clear customs at Dulles before transferring to another flight. Only after you collect your baggage and clear customs will you be allowed to make your connection. Passengers arriving from Canada may have the option to pre-clear customs; check with your airline to see if this option is available.

The Transportation Security Administration (TSA) prohibits weapons, explosives, and incendiaries. Other items that may seem harmless but may be used as weapons are also prohibited. Visit www.tsa.gov for guidance.

All electronic items such as laptop computers, cell phones, pagers may be subjected to additional screening. Be prepared to remove your laptop from its travel case so that both can be screened separately. Also, be prepared to turn on all electronic devices for screeners.

All lighters are prohibited as carry-on items. Lighters without fuel are permitted in checked baggage, but lighters with fuel are prohibited. If you are uncertain as to whether your lighter is prohibited, please do not bring it to the Airport.

You may be subject to random security checks, which are regulated by the Transportation Security Administration (TSA). These are strictly random and, according to code, you will need to have your carry-on items available for more detailed inspection.

Note: Increased TSA security measures are in place and passengers are required to have a government issued photo ID, such as a driver's license or current passport. You can help expedite clearing security by having your boarding pass and photo ID readily available prior to entering the security screening areas.

Please note that Transportation Security Administration (TSA) security measures require screening of all carry-on luggage. Passengers are urged to leave any sharp objects (e.g., pocket knives, scissors) at home or in their luggage checked in at the ticket counter.

Foreign currency exchange is available at the Business Service Centers at the east and west ends of the ticketing level in the Main Terminal and in Concourses B, C and D. There are also two Thomas Cook Foreign Exchanges in Concourse C and one in Concourse D. Hours of operation at each location vary, but range from 7 a.m. until 9 p.m.

Although Washington National Airport (now Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport) had been open only since 1941, the need for a second airport to serve the National Capital Area had become apparent shortly after the end of World War II. To meet the growing demand for airport capacity, Congress passed the second Washington Airport Act of 1950 (and amended it further in 1958) to provide for ". . . the construction, protection, operation, and maintenance of a public airport in or in the vicinity of the District of Columbia."

After a thorough study of many possible locations around the region, a 10,000 acre site, 26 miles west of Washington, D.C., was selected by President Dwight Eisenhower in 1958. The site, located in Fairfax and Loudoun Counties in Virginia, was surrounded by open farmland and was far enough from other airports to provide adequate airspace for arriving and departing flights.

The immense size of the new site allowed for an airport, the first in the country designed for commercial jets, to be buffered from its neighbors. Only 3,000 acres of the 10,000 acres were graded for the new airport and boundaries were established at least 8,000 feet from the end of all runways. This planning, in conjunction with the actions of local governments to properly zone the land around the site, helped the new airport to be a good neighbor in the Virginia countryside.

In May 1958, the engineering firm of Ammann and Whitney of New York was selected by the Civil Aeronautics Administration (forerunner of today's Federal Aviation Administration) as the prime contractor for the airport planning, design, and construction supervision. Other professional firms associated with Ammann and Whitney included: Eero Saarinen and Associates of Hamden, Connecticut, architect for the design of the terminal building, control tower, and service buildings; Burns and McDonnell of Kansas City, for the design of the mechanical, electrical, and utility installations; and Ellery Husted of Washington, D.C., as the master planning consultant.

Architect Eero Saarinen, wanted to create something more than just another airport -- he wanted to find "the soul of the airport." He designed the terminal building and the control tower in that spirit and called it "the best thing I have ever done." The terminal building was selected for a First Honor Award by the American Institute of Architects in 1966.

The building of the airport started on September 2, 1958, seven and a half months after the site selection. When it opened four years later, in 1962, Dulles International Airport had a strikingly beautiful terminal building which would become a landmark to travelers worldwide. The terminal was a compact, two-level structure; 600 feet long and 200 feet wide. While it was built without extensions onto the airfield for aircraft loading, it was designed to be expanded up to 320 feet at either end (this expansion was actually completed 34 years later in 1996). The terminal was "topped off" with a distinctive 193-foot high, glass-enclosed, control tower cab which provided the air traffic controllers with an unobstructed view for many miles in all directions.

The concept that made the new airport outstanding and unique from the passenger's view in 1962 was the specially designed mobile lounge, used to transport the passengers between the terminal building and the aircraft parked on a jet ramp  mile away from the terminal. The mobile lounge was designed by the Chrysler Corporation in association with the Budd Company.

The mobile lounge was constructed as a 54-foot long, 16-foot wide, 17 1/2-foot high vehicle, and could carry 102 passengers, 71 of them seated, directly from the terminal to the aircraft on the ramp. This protected the passengers from weather, jet noise and blast, and also eliminated long walking distances. Because of the mobile lounge, passengers had to walk only 200 feet once they entered the terminal until they were seated in the lounge for the short trip directly to their aircraft.

Today, Dulles operates 19 mobile lounges and 30 plane mates, which are similar to the lounges but can transport passengers from the terminals, directly onto the airplane by attaching itself to the aircraft.

As Dulles was being designed, a complete study was made of the possibility of adjusting plans for future state and federal highways so that the airport would have access to adequate transportation arteries. This did not prove feasible, and the decision was made to construct an access highway as part of the airport development project. FAA, in cooperation with local communities, selected four tentative routes which were the subject of several public hearings. The final selection was a 16-mile route from the airport to a point near Falls Church, Virginia, where it would be connected at a later date to the then proposed Interstate Route 66 and the Capital Beltway. The first 13.5 miles of the highway were built at the time of the original airport construction work, connecting the airport to Routes 495 (the Capital Beltway) and 123 near McLean, Virginia. Upon completion of I-66 through Arlington, Virginia, early in 1983, the Airport Access Highway was extended the last 2.5 miles to connect directly with I-66.

The soaring beauty of the new terminal building and the airport's unique mobile lounge operations, impressed the many sightseers, travelers, foreign visitors, and diplomats who came to the airport. Dulles was also one of the first airports in the country to adopt the Accelerated Inspection System where representatives of the U.S. Customs Service, U.S. Immigration and Naturalization Service, and U.S. Department of Agriculture work together to process arriving international passengers.

During this time, the airport underwent a major Capital Development Program to start to accommodate the growth. The Main Terminal was expanded in 1996 to meet the original vision of Eero Saarinen. The expanded terminal contains 1.1 million square feet of floor space, measures 1,240 feet in length and replicates the curved roofline and glass curtainwall of the original design. Passengers can now benefit from the expanded baggage and ticketing areas and wider arrival and departure roadways. The construction also added a new International Arrivals Building in 1991, improved flight and baggage information display systems, new roadways and overpasses, new aircraft gates and aprons for additional aircraft parking, and taxiway and runway improvements.

Several new cargo buildings were added throughout the mid 1990's to meet the double digit growth in cargo flying through the airport. Additionally, Dulles increased its parking capacity by 111% in just two years and now has more than 23,000 parking spaces.

As the 21st Century begins, Dulles has emerged as one of the fastest growing airports in the world and a major East Coast gateway for domestic and international travelers as well as cargo activities. The airport is achieving the potential its planners had envisioned, and more. Dulles Airport has been an economic engine for the surrounding communities, providing over 15,000 direct jobs and billions of dollars in business revenue. The "Dulles Corridor" is now synonymous with growth and future potential for the region.

Just as it was the vision of Eero Saarinen that the Main Terminal of Washington Dulles International Airport could be expanded to meet future growth, so is it the mission of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority to ensure that the entire airport continues to meet the growing aviation needs of the region.

In the summer of the year 2000, the Airports Authority launched the Dulles Development Program (D2) that will take Dulles closer to its full potential. The Program includes building two new parking garages, a fourth runway, a new concourse, a new Air Traffic Control Tower, pedestrian walkways and an airport train system.

This program will continue to develop Dulles as was envisioned in the Master Plan. At full build-out, Dulles will handle 55 million passengers a year (150,000 a day) and become one of the world's major airports. The story of Dulles continues to unfold as it meets the passenger and cargo needs of the 21st century.

The Property Release Form is stored in Adobe Acrobat PDF (portable document format) format. To view and print PDF files you must first download and install the free Acrobat Reader. You can download the latest version of Acrobat Reader by clicking on the Get Acrobat Reader icon here.

Please advise the shipping company that they must complete the air bill and provide the packaging for your item(s), the Airport Police cannot. All arrangements and payments must be made by the requesting party. The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority does NOT pay for shipping.

The Dulles Central Lost and Found will attempt to return phone calls within 24 hours however, due to the high volume of calls received this is not always possible. Calls are first returned to customers whose items have been found.

To pick up arriving passengers, drivers should follow signs to the Arrivals Level curbside. Arriving passengers proceed from Baggage Claim up a ramp and outside to the Arrivals Level curbside to meet transportation.

Wheelchairs and assistance are available through airline representatives at each airline counter. Visual paging is available in the Main Terminal and Concourse B. Telephonic Devices for the Deaf (TDDs) are available throughout the Main Terminal and concourses.

Baggage for arriving domestic flights at Washington Dulles International is transported by airlines to the Baggage Claim Level of the Main Terminal. Baggage on international flights is processed in the Federal Inspection areas. Baggage Information Display Boards located throughout the airport show the location of the baggage claim area for each arriving flight.

Nearby Hotels				Updated 09/19/06. Hotels and motels are listed alphabetically within each city. Cities are listed by approximate distance from the airport, and most are within 10 miles of the airport. This is in no way a comprehensive list of the hotels and motels near Washington Dulles International Airport. Contact the Webmaster if this information should be updated.

Washington, DC, is considered one of the most accessible cities in the United States. The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is working to ensure that this very important gateway to our Nation's Capital is also accessible to all patrons.

In all terminals, wheelchair accessible TDD (Telecommunication Device for the Deaf) phones can be found at various locations throughout each building. Most telephones are equipped with volume control. At most locations, one telephone in each bank is wheelchair accessible and is equipped with a shelf and outlet to accommodate a patron's portable text telephone. All accessible telephones. have clear pathways for wheelchair patrons.

At the A, B and T Gates, a Visual Paging System is used in addition to the Audible Public Address system to broadcast airport information to the general public. At the A Gates, visual pagers are prominently located in all waiting areas. At the B Gates, they are located in the shuttle docks and at the telephone banks. At the T Gates, visual pagers are located above the telephone banks. At the A and B Gates, within each airline waiting area, visual announcements of boarding information and procedures appear on monitors so that all passengers are able to participate equally in the boarding process. Flight Information Display System (FIDS) boards are placed throughout all terminals.

Restrooms are fully accessible with toilet stalls for individuals with disabilities. Most toilet stalls have infrared flush devices. All sinks in each restroom are placed at an accessible height, and infrared devices are used to activate the water at most locations. Baby changing stations have been placed at an accessible height in both men's and women's rest rooms at mast locations A unisex companion care restroom is provided adjacent to the public restrooms at many locations.

You may arrange for a wheelchairs at any terminals through your airline or with any Skycap at the Airport. Please notify your airline in advance of your visit so that they can better serve your needs.

There are three alternatives for parking at Washington Dulles International Airport: Hourly, Daily and Economy. Within these areas there are public parking spaces designated for individuals with disabilities. In Hourly and Daily lots, these spaces are located on the closest possible path to the Main Terminal or to ground transportation. In the Economy lots, spaces are located next to each shuttle bus shelter.

For current flight schedules and status information, please contact the airline directly. Phone numbers and links to airline Web pages are provided for your use. Information contained here is provided by the Airlines and others and is passed on by the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority as a service to the traveling public. The Authority is not responsible for any errors or omissions. This information is subject to change without notice.

Dulles provides daily garage, hourly, economy and valet parking with more than 25,000 parking spaces. There is no charge for vehicles exiting within 20 minutes of entry at Daily, Hourly and Economy parking. Free shuttle service is provided from Daily and Economy parking, at 10-15 minute intervals, for passengers 24 hours a day, seven days a week. Dulles has two Daily Parking Garages with easy covered access into the terminal.

All Security Screening Checkpoints are located in the center of the Terminal. Security checkpoints previously located on the West end of the terminal have closed to allow construction to move ahead on the Terminal Station for the future automated Airport Train System which will provide convenient and comfortable transportation between the Terminal and Concourses. Thank you for your patience during construction.

Dulles Airport provides video information screens above the Security Screening checkpoints. The security information video playing will provide passengers with important information about the screening procedure and tips to speed your way through security.

Passengers are required to show a boarding pass and government-issued photo ID, such as a driver's license or current passport at the security screening checkpoints. Passengers may obtain a boarding pass from the airline ticket counter, at curbside check-in or if available, at airline self-service kiosks and on-line at the airline websites.

TSA security measures require careful screening of carry-on luggage. Passengers are urged to leave any sharp objects (pocket knives, scissors, etc) at home or in their luggage checked in at the ticket counter.

For passengers with medical conditions that require you to carry a needle and/or syringe on your person or in your carry on baggage you must also have the medication that requires such injection on your person. The medication must be packaged with a pharmaceutical label or professionally printed label identifying the medication.

All electronic items, such as laptops, cell phones, pagers, may be subjected to additional screening. Be prepared to remove your laptop from its travel case so that both can be X-rayed separately. Also be prepared to turn all electronic devices on for screeners.

Passengers are urged to arrive 1  - 2 hours before domestic and 2  - 3 hours before international flights to allow time to get through airline ticketing and security. Contact your airline for more specific directions on this.

Only ticketed passengers or authorized, badged personnel will be allowed through security checkpoints. You can help expedite this process by having your ticket readily available prior to entering the security screening areas. Special arrangements can be made with your airline for accompanying children and those needing special assistance to get to the gate.

Dulles Airport has approximately 127 gates located in the terminal and four concourse buildings. After proceeding through security, passengers should follow signage to the appropriate walkway or shuttle to reach their departing gates. Shuttles depart every 5 minutes most of the day, but every 10 minutes during off-peak hours.

When Washington Dulles International Airport opened in 1962, it was the first U.S. airport built for commercial jet aircraft. Airline travelers were in a distinct minority, and those flying machines at the Airport were seen as an exotic form of transportation to far away places. But increases in passenger jet travel made aviation a prominent fixture of the nations economy.

The airlines have taken note of the remarkable growth in the Washington region and the resulting increased demand for air service and expanded their presence at Dulles International. Todays traveler can fly to 40 different foreign destinations and 85 U.S. cities from Dulles. To support this level of service, about 20,000 people are employed at the airport and thousands more have jobs closely associated with airport activities.

During Dulles Airports early years, the facilities met or exceeded demand. Aircraft parked away from the Main Terminal, and flights were met by Mobile Lounges which transported passengers above the ground. In the mid-1980s a temporary Midfield Concourse was built to allow more aircraft to use gates with jet bridges. Mobile Lounge service began operations between the Main Terminal and this new Concourse. As passenger levels grew, so did the investment in airport infrastructure.

From 1987, when the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority was created, through 1999, the Airports Authority invested $1.5 billion in an expansion program which doubled the size of the Main Terminal, added two permanent Midfield Concourses, expanded Customs and Immigration facilities, modernized ticket counter and baggage claim space, improved the roadways, and added cargo facilities.

Growth projections for both passengers and aircraft operations highlighted the need for even more airport facilities in the future. In 2000, the Airports Authority Board of Directors approved a second phase of capital investment. The Board approved $3.4 billion in projects which are part of D2, the Dulles Development program.

The D2 projects completed so far include two new Daily Parking Garages, passenger walkways with moving sidewalks connecting the garages to the Main Terminal and connecting the Main Terminal to Concourse B, reconstruction of Runway 12-30, new permanent Z-gates at the Terminal, and the renovation of the original 1962 Eero Saarinen-designed terminal, including improved ticketing counters and new baggage claim devices.

Projects currently underway include improving the roadways, expanding Concourse B, building a new Airport Traffic Control Tower, and constructing an automated Airport Train System and train stations. A new Security Mezzanine is also included in the construction of the Main Terminal Train Station.

Future D2 projects call for expanding the Z-gates, constructing a fourth and fifth runway, and building a new permanent Concourse beyond the present location of Concourse C and D. Dulles is in a constant state of evolution and improvement. The challenge for the Airports Authority is to continue to keep pace with growth in air service and meet the future traveling needs of the Washington region.

D2: Dulles Development				Dulles Development (D2) is a capital construction program for future growthin passenger traffic and airport operations. The major D2 projects are designed to improve the traveling experience and accommodate increased use of the airport. Please click the links below for information.

All photographs Copyright  Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority (MWAA). All rights reserved. All photographs contained on this web site are protected by United States copyright law. You may browse, search, retrieve, view, download, store or print photographs from mwaa.com for your personal, noncommercial use only. Otherwise, photographs on this web site may not be copied, reproduced, modified, distributed, transmitted, displayed, published or broadcast without the prior written permission of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority. You may not alter or remove any trademark, copyright or other notice from the content on this web site.

The automated Airport Train System will replace most of the current Mobile Lounge system that is used to transport passengers between the Main Terminal and the Midfield Concourses. The train will operate on an underground dual track system. This phase of the project will connect the Main Terminal to Concourses A, B, and C. The stations will be located at convenient points along the concourses to minimize walking distances to the airline gates. Passengers will reach the Main Terminal station through two new spacious subsurface Security Screening Areas. This phase is scheduled to be completed in 2009.

With more than 509,000 aircraft operations at Dulles in 2005, expanding the current three-runway system is now a necessity. This project adds a fourth runway and paves the way for a future fifth runway. The proposed fourth runway will be a north-south runway, approximately 9,500 feet long and 150 feet wide, while the fifth runway will be an east-west runway approximately 10,500 feet long and 150 feet wide. Both will include high-speed exit taxiways and be equipped with an instrument landing system and associated lighting systems. The fourth runway is expected to be completed in 2008. Construction dates for the fifth runway will be set in the future.

This walkway provides passengers with an alternative to the Mobile Lounges today and the future underground Airport Train System, as a way to connect the Main Terminal and Concourses. The approximately 1,000 foot long walkway is equipped with moving sidewalks. The project included the construction of a structural shell and architectural finishes for the 40-foot wide and 27-foot high tunnel, including elevators, escalators, stairways, and moving sidewalks. The first segment opened in 2004--connecting passengers between the Main Terminal and Concourses A and B. In the future, this walkway will be extended to connect Concourse B with a future permanent Concourse C.

Renovation of both the ticketing and baggage claim levels of the original 1962 section of the Main Terminal was completed in 2005. This project had the most impact on passengers as the Airports Authority worked to provide more efficient ticketing and baggage claim facilities. Ticket counter kiosks and baggage claim devices were upgraded to match the facilities in the east and west extensions of the Terminal. An additional below-grade baggage basement supports the expanded Terminal baggage systems with a 97,000 square foot facility that is linked to the Terminal via a tunnel.

The first phase to expand Concourse B added four airline gates to the west end of the building and was completed in April 2003. The addition is approximately 440 feet long and provides approximately 131,000 square feet of functional space. The final phase of the expansion of Concourse B will complete the build-out of the facility to the west, providing 12 additional aircraft gates attached to a two-level concourse building. The addition will add approximately 240,000 square feet to the existing building, bringing the total square footage of Concourse B to more than 800,000 square feet. Constructing the Concourse B station of the Airport Train System (ATS) is also part of this project. Completion is scheduled for August 2008.

Runway 12-30 was built in 1962 and certain portions of the original pavement required replacement. This project replaced these portions of the Dulles East-West runway with new pavement. In the process, additional drainage features and strength improvements were be added, accommodating aircraft much heavier than those estimated in the original design. This entire reconstruction project was completed over the summer of 2004.

New permanent airline gates were constructed in the lower level of the Terminal to replace temporary T-gates. The first completed phase of the Z-gates is located to the east of the airports original Airport Traffic Control Tower. The building features gates furnished with counters, holdrooms, restrooms, concessions, airline operations offices and other terminal services. The finishes are similar to the Terminal facilities already in place, in keeping with the character of the original design of the Dulles Terminal.

Traffic lanes and signaling devices are being added to improve the efficiency of the Airport roadways. Roads and ramps connecting the Airport Access Highway have been improved and the circle in front of the Main Terminal has been expanded to include additional travel lanes and entrances to the parking facilities. Roadways to the north of the circle are also being improved and widened as part of this airport-wide project.

A new, permanent midfield concourse will be constructed to replace the existing Concourse C/D, which is a temporary structure. Its location will be integrated with the base of the new Airport Traffic Control Tower at its center point. This three-level structure will have 44 airline gates and will provide the amenities of Concourse B. The concourse includes a dedicated mezzanine corridor with moving sidewalks to serve international passengers.

Customer Benefit:Dramatic changes in the aviation industry over the last thirty years have required airports to ensure that their facilities meet the needs of modern aircraft and air traffic control procedures. The existing Airport Traffic Control Tower, part of the original 1960's construction of the Dulles Airport, will be replaced in accordance with modern air traffic control requirements and to enhance coordination of aircraft movement on the current and additional future runways and taxiways at the airport. The travelers and airline employees who use Washington Dulles International Airport will benefit from the state of the art equipment and tower facility.

Project Description:This project constructs the structural shell of a new Airport Traffic Control Tower (ATCT) and a support/base building. The new tower is an adaptation of an FAA Standard and was designed so that it will not visually compete with Dulles' existing ATCT, which is an integral element of the historically relevant design of Dulles' Terminal.

The ATCT will be connected to the 16,500 square foot base building on two levels, and includes provisions for a one-story connection to the future permanent Concourse C. The overall height to the cab level is 300 feet and 325 feet to the highest point. The base building, on the south side of the ATCT, will be a two-story steel-framed structure, providing administrative and utility support for the ATCT. A service yard will be east of the base building and includes 84 parking spaces. The base building finishes will match those of the future permanent Concourse C.

This project is being closely coordinated with the Federal Aviation Administration. Once the building shell has been completed FAA will finish the project by installing all of the necessary airport traffic control equipment.

Main Terminal Renovation				In 1996, the Airports Authority completed an architectural milestone with the expansion of the original 1962 Terminal to its design length. Careful attention to the design documents of Eero Saarinen and painstaking construction resulted in a seamless building with accompanying expanded roadways at its front door.

The challenge now is to build the interior facilities in the Terminal that will make the original core building as functional and customer efficient as the facilities found in the expanded areas of the Terminal.

Construction of a new two-level east baggage basement, a 40,000 square foot facility, will provide space for additional baggage carousels. It also provides space for future facilities once the existing temporary baggage building is demolished.

Customer Benefits: Airline passengers will have a convenient and comfortable train system that will handle more riders and move more efficiently than the Mobile Lounges currently in use at Dulles. The station locations in the concourses will also reduce walking distances. The underground system will eliminate the need for Mobile Lounge service to the Concourses and reduce vehicular traffic on the airfield.

Customer Benefits:These are the first parking garages built at Dulles Airport. The convenience of covered parking enables the Airport to greatly improve customer service and add thousands of parking spaces to meet a major demand for Daily Parking.

Project Description:As passenger activity has grown, so has the need for parking at Dulles. This project provided two five-level parking garages close to the Terminal. The 1.2 million square foot Daily Garage 2, constructed of cast-in-place concrete, provides parking for approximately 3,700 cars. The 1.5 million square foot Daily Garage 1 of similar construction provides parking for approximately 4,800 cars. Garage 1 also has an underground pedestrian walkway that connects to the Baggage Claim level of the Terminal. The walkway is 1,200 feet long with moving sidewalks. Daily Garage 2 has a covered passenger walkway accessible from Level 3 that connect to the West side of the Terminal.

Customer Benefits:This project will provide passengers with an option to using the Mobile Lounges today as well as the future underground automated Airport Train System, as a way to connect the Terminal and Concourses A and B. The walkway will be equipped with moving sidewalks.

Project Description:Included in this project is the construction of the structural shell and architectural finishes for the 40-foot wide and 27-foot high tunnel, including elevators, escalators, stairways, and moving sidewalks. The walkway is approximately 1,000 feet long. Passengers will be able to walk between the Terminal and Concourses A and B. In the future, this walkway will be extended to connect Concourse B with a future permanent Concourse C.

Flight Information				For current flight schedules and status information, please contact the airline directly. Phone numbers and links to airline Web Pages are provided for your use. Information contained here is provided by the Airlines and others and is passed on by the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority as a service to the traveling public. The Authority is not responsible for any errors or omissions. This information is subject to change without notice.

The Washington Flyer Magazine and Travel Guide is an informative publication and website with information on the latest Hot Spots, Travel Tips, and business information for the traveler visiting Washington, DC.

The Manassas Battlefield Park was the scene of two major battles fought during the American Civil War in the years 1861 to 1865. While the Park is worth visiting for historical purposes alone, the area also has a well developed hiking/horseback riding trail system.

Exhibits and programs educate visitors on the first canal system built in America. This 800-acre park has views of the falls, 15 miles of hiking/nature trails and 5 miles of trails for horseback and biking. Picnic facilities and fishing. Open daily year round.

The cell phone waiting area is an ideal place to wait in your car until your arriving party calls you on your cell phone to let you know that their plane has arrived. Tell your party to proceed up any Arrivals Ramp and to look for a door number designated outside. The car waiting in the lot will locate that door number on the Main Terminal map that is posted inside the cell phone waiting area and will then drive to the Arrivals Ramp level to meet you.

The cell phone waiting area is located at the intersection of Rudder Road and Autopilot Drive. From the Dulles Access Road heading towards the Airport, follow the signs that say, "Cell Phone Waiting Area". This will lead you to Rudder Road. Go past the Economy Parking lot entrance on your right. Just past the traffic light at the intersection of Rudder Road and Autopilot Drive, you will turn left into the Cell Phone Waiting Area.

Just call 703-572-6240 and have the flight number ready. You will hear prompts asking you to key in the flight number from your phone. This phone system is directly tied to the in-airport flight information displays.

Metrorail is the regions rapid-transit system, providing access to Downtown Washington, DC and other destinations. A rail line to Dulles Airport is currently in the design phase. At present, the nearest Metrorail station is the West Falls Church Station on the Orange Line. Direct transportation to this station is available from the Washington Flyer Coach Service. Enjoy a comfortable, climate-controlled ride equipped with reclining seats and ample luggage space. Each coach is handicapped accessible. Buses depart approximately every 30 minutes and boarding announcements are made inside the airport.

Board any Orange line train headed towards "Vienna/Fairfax/GMU." Exit the train at the West Falls Church station, and follow the signs directing you to the Washington Flyer bus stop. Tickets can be purchased on the bus from the driver. All Washington Flyer buses departing this location go directly to the front door of the Main Terminal at Dulles Airport. Click here for schedule and ticket prices.

Outbound service: No reservation is required. Simply come to the "Taxi Passengers" area on the lower level of the Main Terminal, where a Taxicab Dispatcher is on duty 24 hours a day. Wheelchair-accessible minibuses can accommodate one person in his/her wheelchair plus three additional passengers. Smoking and non-smoking vehicles are available by request.

The Washington Dulles International Airport Taxicab Advisory Panel was established by the Airports Authority to review and advise the Authority about the handling of customer and cabdriver comments, complements or complaints about the Washington Flyer taxicab system. The Panel is made up of a citizen representative, a representative of the drivers, a representative of the taxicab company, an Airport police designee and a representative of the Airport Manager. The Panel is interested in your comments about the Washington Flyer taxis.

There are no shuttles providing direct service between Dulles and these points. You might want to try Greyhound, but you would need to use another ground transportation option to reach the Greyhound stations from Dulles.

Dulles provides two daily parking garages with a combined 8,325 spaces close to the terminal. Both garages provide easy access to the terminal and are equipped with an automated space counting system, which indicates how many open spaces are available on each level of the garage. The signs, which provide this information, are located at the top of the ramps at each level of the garage.

Handicapped-accessible parking is provided in the Hourly lot, the Daily Parking Garages on the first level, and at the Economy parking lots in spaces adjacent to the shuttle bus stops. Disabled-Accessible courtesy shuttle service is available between the Economy parking lots and the Main Terminal by calling (703) 572-4500. This service may also be requested in the Economy parking lots by using Customer Assistance Call Boxes.

PAY & GO is a new automated system designed for quick and easy exiting from the parking facilities at Dulles Airport. PAY & GO is available in all Daily, Hourly and Economy parking areas. PAY & GO machines are located in the lower level of the Terminal near the east and west exit doors and on the pedestrian bridge, which connects the Terminal to the Daily Parking Garage.

Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport is one of the most stringently noise-controlled airports in the United States. National's nighttime noise rules are among the most restrictive in the country. Under the Authority's regulations, aircraft may be only operated after 9:59 p.m. and before 7:00 a.m. if the noise level for the aircraft type and model meets National Airport's strict noise standards which are designed to minimize sleep interference. If the noise limitation is violated, the aircraft operator is subject to a civil penalty up to $5,000 per violation.

National's procedures specify that pilots of turbojet aircraft departing to the north fly northwest over the Potomac River corridor or fly northeast over the Anacostia River corridor, and those departing to the south follow the Potomac River corridor.

In good visibility, pilots departing to the northwest follow the Potomac River corridor to the vicinity of the Georgetown Reservoir about four miles from the airport. There they have the option of continuing to follow the river corridor visually or follow an instrument heading until they are approximately ten nautical miles from the airport. After this point, they are turned by air traffic control either west or east to their departure route. When aircraft take off to the south, they follow the Potomac River for at least five miles before being turned to their departure route. Pilots using the Anacostia River route follow the river to a point five nautical miles from National before being turned to their departure route. When visibility is poor or when strong wind conditions exist, pilots are directed by Air Traffic Control to follow specific headings.

Pilots are urged to use thrust management, a procedure in which pilots of departing flights cut back on the amount of power they apply during takeoff. At an altitude of 1,500 feet, the thrust is reduced to a level that would allow the aircraft to climb at approximately 500 feet per minute. Normal climb power is reapplied when the aircraft is 10 miles from the airfield.

National's prescribed procedures were developed to provide relief to the greatest number of residents throughout the region. Regrettably, many people living close to the rivers are exposed to the noise from these operations --a problem that has recently been greatly reduced as older, noisier aircraft have been replaced by newer, quieter equipment.

A computerized aircraft noise monitoring system is used for National Airport aircraft. Permanent remote noise monitoring stations have been installed at strategic locations keyed to the primary arrival and departure paths at National Airport. Each noise monitoring station measures and analyzes noise events as they occur. The ability to directly measure aircraft noise at these specific locations helps the Airports Authority to identify the extent of community noise impacts, to predict trends for the future, and to monitor compliance with National's noise abatement procedures.

Partners in Progress Public participation is a key element in the Airports Authority's effort to improve its noise abatement performance. The Airports Authority works closely with local government officials, concerned citizens, the FAA, airlines, pilots, and other representatives of the aviation industry to meet the challenge of reducing aircraft noise. Public hearings, meetings with civic and homeowner associations and informal information sessions provide opportunities to discuss prospective noise abatement measures. The Authority coordinates its noise compatibility studies with local planning agencies so projected airport development and flight activity trends might be considered in land use and zoning decisions.

The Airports Authority works closely with the Metropolitan Washington Council of Governments on noise and other issues at the airports. The Committee on Noise Abatement and Aviation at National and Dulles Airports (CONAANDA) is the primary body for these issues. For more information on the committee please see their website at http://www.mwcog.org/environment/airport/conaanda.

Although particular emphasis will be placed on the community participation component of the study, the Advisory Committee will review and comment on all results and recommendations regarding noise monitoring and abatement for Reagan National Airport. The Advisory Committee is composed of elected officials and citizen representatives from the six jurisdictions impacted by noise from Reagan National, business groups, environmental groups, airlines, air traffic control and MWAA.

The study began in May of 2001, but was put on hold after the terrorist attacks on September 11, 2001, and was resumed in July 2002. The Advisory Committee held 12 planning meetings. To ensure adequate public involvement during development of the Noise Compatibility Program Update, the Project Team held two sets of public information workshops, the first set (two workshops) was held on June 18-19, 2002, and the second set (three workshops) was held on April 28-30, 2004, at which citizens provided oral and written comments about the Airport and Airport-related noise concerns. The Council of Governments also conducted a Community Outreach Survey to research the public's attitudes and perceptions about aircraft noise in the environs of the Airport. This survey included a series of telephone surveys with over 1,200 residents in the Washington Metropolitan area, structured interviews with regional stakeholders or people of relevant community stature or influence, and focus groups with residents living underneath the flight paths to and from the Airport.

The Advisory Committee has completed its work and identified and recommended a number of potential noise abatement and mitigation measures.This document below is a summary of the Committee's work on the noise compatibility program.

In the future, Historic Terminal A will undergo a renovation project to restore the Terminal to its 1941 design and architecture. The Historic Terminal will continue to serve passengers and provide airline gates, ticket counters, and concessions - all within the framework of what the Airport originally looked like.

Terminal B/C opened on July 27, 1997. The Terminal has 1 million square feet of floor space spread over three levels with direct connections to the Metrorail public transportation system and public parking garages via two enclosed pedestrian bridges. The Terminal's two-level roadway system improves traffic flow through the Airport by sorting arriving and departing traffic.

Public parking is available for nearly 7,900 vehicles providing hourly, daily and economy options. Terminal A is served by an hourly lot and daily parking garage. Terminal B/C is served by hourly and daily parking garages. Courtesy shuttle buses are provided to and from all Terminals to the Economy Lot.

Taxicabs serving the Airport queue in a two-level 118,000 square foot structure designed to accommodate 500 vehicles. About 5,000 taxicabs are dispatched at the Airport every day. SuperShuttle, a shared-ride van service picks up passengers at their homes, businesses or hotels within the metro area and transports them to the airport. The Airport is also served by five car rental companies located on site.

You can see the planes through the window walls of Terminal B/C and Terminal A without going through the security checkpoints. At the north end of the upper level (ticketing) of Terminal C, beyond Door 6, there is a North Terrace area from which you may view the planes and also see the U.S. Capitol in the distance.

Or, if using an internet mapping website, look for "places of interest" or a list of airports. Reagan National is also known as DCA. Most of these websites have an airport list since the physical address is not widely known.

Metrorail, shuttles, taxis and rental cars are available from the Airport. Reagan National has its own Metrorail stop for passengers traveling to the immediate Washington, Maryland and Virginia region. SuperShuttle and taxis offer door-to-door service. You can take Metrorail from Reagan National Airport to West Falls Church and catch a Washington Flyer Coach to Dulles. You can also make connections to Amtrak stations using Metrorail, shuttles and taxis. Please click here for rates, pickup locations and contact information for specific questions.

Passengers are generally urged to arrive 1  to 2 hours before domestic flights to allow time to get through airline ticketing and security. Contact your airline for more specific directions. For airline contact information, please see this link.

Some curbside check-in is available at Reagan National. However, this service varies by airline because of Transportation Security Administration (TSA) restrictions. Check with your airline ahead of time.

Note: If the national threat level is raised to Code Orange, or high risk of terrorist attack, curbside check-in may be closed. You can find more information on the current threat level and others at http://www.whitehouse.gov/homeland/.

All electronic items such as laptop computers, cell phones, and pagers may be subjected to additional screening. Be prepared to remove your laptop from its travel case so that both can be screened separately. Also, be prepared to turn on all electronic devices for screeners.

Approximately 150 of the phone banks also have a data-jack, which allows for Internet hook-up. These phones are scattered throughout the Airport for your convenience. The cost for this service is the same $0.50 you would pay to make a phone call from the pay phones; you only need your laptop, phone cord, and the 1-800 number for your Internet service provider.

The airlines that utilize Reagan National are familiar with the requirements of traveling with pets. For details and to make travel arrangements, contact your airline. Once you have entered the terminals, pets must be in a carry case. Only seeing-eye dogs are allowed on a leash inside the terminals.

Note: There is no grassy area for pets after passing through security. If you are catching another flight and a pet needs to use the grassy area, you will have to exit the terminal. Remember to take your photo ID and boarding pass outside with you so you can re-enter through security.

Reagan National has more than 30 eateries, 36 shops, and 17 retail carts throughout the terminal. Concession hours vary. You will need to check with each vendor individually to confirm hours of operation. The Airports concessions and their contact information are listed at this link.

There are many hotels very close to Reagan National, many of which provide free, direct shuttle service. However, the Terminal is open 24 hours a day to passengers. Seating may be limited. Restroom facilities are available but concessions typically close down at night.

Throughout the early 20th century, airport facilities in Washington, D.C. were seriously inadequate. Hoover Field, located near the present site of the Pentagon, was the first major terminal to be developed in the National Capital area, opening its doors in 1926. The following year, Washington Airport, another privately operated field, began service next door. In 1930, the economics of the Great Depression caused the two terminals to merge to form Washington-Hoover Airport. Bordered on the east by Highway Onewith its accompanying high-tension electrical wires, and obstructed by a high smokestack on one approach and a dump nearbythe field was less than adequate. Incredibly, the airport's one runway was intersected by a busy street, Military Road, which had guards posted to flag down traffic during takeoffs and landings.

Before the final site selection, flights were made over the area with representatives of airline pilots, and year-round studies of weather conditions were made by the U.S. Weather Bureau. It was found that the approaches to proposed runways from eight directions were clear for such distances as to provide flight angles of 40 to one. Several government agencies cooperated with the newly formed Civil Aeronautics Board, predecessor agency to the Federal Aviation Administration, in the construction of Washington National Airport.

The first step in construction was to erect a dike around the riverside perimeter of the site. The second task was to clear the runway locations of silt so that sand and gravel could be pumped on top of a stable base, eliminating the possibility of settling. Four hydraulic dredges, among the largest and most powerful at that time, cleared 11 feet of silt from the future runway locations to a width of 200 feet. Next, sand and gravel were pumped from the riverbed into the canals which formed the runways up to a height of 20 feet above the river level. By this method, the runway base was so stabilized that paving could be laid within six months after the fill was completed.

National Airports designers faced a difficult problem. How would they create the most modern of facilities while honoring the spirit of classic architecture of the Nations Capital and the colonial history of the site? The design, reminiscent of nearby Mount Vernon, represented a unique attempt to create a modern structure while still integrating architectural references to the Colonial and Neoclassical style. An observation terrace allowed visitors a spectacular view of the airfield.

National Airport opened for business on June 16, 1941. President Roosevelt attended a ceremony and observed the first official landing. The airlines drew straws to determine who could land at National Airport first, and American Airlines won the honor. The plane was piloted by Bennett H. Griffin, who later became the manager of National Airport in 1947. The second inaugural landing was made by Eastern Airlines. On opening day, just one hangar was completed and in operation. Five hangars were under construction with a seventh in the planning stage.

When it opened, National Airport was considered the last word in airports  a concentration of the ultramodern developments in design of buildings, handling of planes, air traffic and field traffic control, field lighting, facilities for public comfort and convenience, and surface vehicle traffic control.

National Airport became a success, but a controversy over legal jurisdiction began to brew. Was the airport located in Virginia or the District of Columbia? The District "owned" the Potomac River to Virginia, claiming the boundary had been set in 1846 at the high water mark along the shoreline. But since the airport was built on a fill, a new eastern shoreline was created. The question arose as to whether the District's authority ended at the new shore or the original one.

The problem went unresolved until 1945 when Congress approved a bill that fixed the airport boundary at the mean high water mark, regardless of changes, which placed the airport in Virginia. However, the Congress established exclusive federal jurisdiction over National Airport.

The federal government relinquished direct control of National and Dulles Airports when President Ronald Reagan signed the transfer bill that authorized the creation of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority in 1987.

The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is an independent interstate agency created by legislation enacted by the Commonwealth of Virginia and the District of Columbia, with the consent of the United States Congress, for the purpose of operating Washington Dulles International and Ronald Reagan Washington National Airports.

The Airports Authority operates this two airport system, which provides domestic and international air service for the Metropolitan Washington region. The Airports Authority is a financially self-sustaining agency. In addition to operating both Dulles and Reagan National, the Airports Authority is responsible for capital improvements at both airports.

On July 27, 1997, National Airport was transformed by the official opening of the new Terminal which offers modern, efficient facilities that include direct connections to Metrorail and new parking garages via enclosed pedestrian bridges. The three-level, one million square foot terminal houses 35 aircraft gates and National Hall, a main street for shops and eateries on the concourse level.

The terminal provides 100 ticket counters, 12 baggage claims, three piers where airline gates are located and a passenger connector the Terminal A. To enhance the spacious, passenger friendly environment, the terminal offers an unparalleled view of the Nations Capital and works of art from 30 artists are incorporated into the structure of the terminal using various designs glass, marble, mosaic, terrazzo, murals, balustrades and sculpture.

Renowned architect Cesar Pelli designed a Washington landmark that is both functional and aesthetically pleasing. Pellis design included a large window overlooking airport operations and the Washington, D.C. skyline, and the building is adorned with 54 Jeffersonian domes that establish a connection with the architecture of the region.

The modernization of National Airport, with the opening of the new terminal in 1997, has not deterred the Airports Authority from ensuring that the legacy of the airport and its environs is preserved.

Thank you for taking the time to fill out this short Customer Satisfaction survey for the Lost and Found Office at Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport. Your participation in this study is completely voluntary. It is very important for us to learn your opinions. Your survey responses will be strictly confidential. If you have questions at any time about the survey or the procedures, you may contact the DCA Lost and Found Office at (703) 417-0673 or by email at the email address specified below. Thank you very much for taking the time to help us better our level of customer service provided.

Nearby Hotels - Reagan National Airport				Updated 12/28/06. Hotels and motels are listed alphabetically within each city. Cities are listed by approximate distance from the airport, and most are within 10 miles of the airport. This is in no way a comprehensive list of the hotels and motels near Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport. Contact the Webmaster if this information should be updated.

Public TelephonesIn Terminals B and C, TTY units are located throughout the Airport and are clearly marked with blue and white signs above each unit. In addition, each group of pay phones has a clear path to a wheelchair accessible unit. All pay telephones are equipped with volume control, are hearing-aid compatible, and have Braille or raised numbers. Over one-third of our public pay telephones are equipped with connections for portable computers, and several of these units also have power connections available for PC users.

Public Address and Information SystemsA Visual Paging System is used in addition to the audible Public Address System for the broadcast of airport information to the general public. The Visual Page is prominently above each of the Airport Directories throughout Terminals B and C. Within the holdrooms at each airline's gates, visual boarding announcements appear on monitors in order that all passengers are able have information about the boarding process. Flight Information Display System (FIDS) boards and Baggage Information Display System (BIDS) units are placed throughout the Terminals and have been carefully situated to minimize glare and ensure readability.

Concerned about delays at an airport? The Federal Aviation Administration's Air Traffic Control System Command Center provides current airport status for many airports around the country including National Airport.

There is no charge for vehicles exiting within 20 minutes of entry at any of the parking facilities. Free shuttle service is provided from all parking facilities, at 6-7 minute intervals, for passengers 24 hours a day, seven days a week. Hourly parking is intended for a stay of less than two hours. Daily parking is intended for a stay of one or two days. Economy parking is intended for extended stays.

Reagan National Airport provides video information screens above the Security Screening checkpoints. The security information displayed provides passengers with important information about the screening procedure and tips to speed your way through security.

Passengers with medical conditions that require them to carry a needle and/or syringe must also have the medication that requires such injection in their possession. The medication must be packaged with a pharmaceutical label or professionally printed label identifying the medication.

During non-peak travel times, passengers are urged to arrive 1  - 2 hours before flights to allow time to get through airline ticketing and security. Contact your airline for more specific directions on this.

Gates at Reagan National are divided among three airline piers in Terminal B/C. Some airline gates are also located in Terminal A. Please see the terminal map for information on where your airline gate is located.

The Architectural Enhancement Program (AEP) integrates commissioned artworks in the architecture of the Terminal. Each piece is integral to the building. The 30 individual works have been executed in a great variety of materials: stained glass, marble and glass mosaics, terrazzo, cast bronze, hammered aluminum and copper, painted steel, porcelain enamel and traditional paint on board and canvas. Numerous local and national organizations were contacted to reach out to the widest possible variety of artists for the program.

The sites for the artwork include 10 floor medallions on the Concourse; 11 balustrades that overlook the Concourse; 5 murals; 1 bridge sculpture; 1 sunscreen panel on the south wall of the ticket level lobby; and 2 stained glass friezes on the concourse-airside curtainwall.

General Flight Information				For current flight schedules and status information, please contact the airline directly. Phone numbers and links to airline Web Pages are provided for your use. Information contained here is provided by the Airlines and others and is passed on by the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority as a service to the traveling public. The Authority is not responsible for any errors or omissions. This information is subject to change without notice.

DCA Flight Status		Due to the many factors impacting flight schedules, we suggest you contact your airline directly for up to date flight status information. The contact information for Airlines serving DCA can be located by clicking this link.

Airport Regulations allow you to pre-arrange any vehicle of your choice, including Super Shuttle, to pick you up at the airport. The operator of the service vehicle must be able to show a docket of the arrangement to traffic enforcement officers or Authority personnel. Service vehicles other than Super Shuttle will pick you up at the second curb outside Terminal B&C.

The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is responsible for the overall operation and management of Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport and is committed to providing the best customer service possible. Thank you for using the Taxicab Dispatch service at the Airport. To help us serve you better, please take a moment to answer the questions below to let us know how our services, attitudes and responsiveness met your expectations and needs.

Courtesy shuttle bus service is available from all parking areas to all terminals, 24 hours a day. Shuttle buses operate along established routes between the parking lots approximately every six to seven minutes.

Reagan National is pleased to offer our customers a new parking option  Valet Parking. This door-to-door service allows you to make reservations in advance for the Valet Parking service located in front of historic Terminal A. On the day of your flight, drive directly to the Valet Parking lot and an attendant will give you a claim check to retrieve your vehicle upon your return. You will then be driven directly to the terminal entrance of your airline in a comfortable, efficient shuttle van. Its that easy.

To make a reservation, simply call (703) 417-1234 and provide the operator with your credit card information. You will then be given a reservation number and well be waiting for you. Reservations canceled more than 8 hours in advance of your arrival time will not be charged.

The route utilizes Airbus 340 aircraft, offering customers state-of-the-art amenities for long-haul travel including a comfortable Economy Class cabin recently reconfigured to provide extra legroom, and a Premium Business Class cabin featuring the airlines award-winning 180-degree, lie-flat Business Class seat.

The Building Code Department requests a 48 hour notice for an inspection, but will make every effort to accommodate next day requests. Inspections should not be scheduled prior to 7:00am or after 3:00pm.

Procurement and Contracts Department				The procurement function at the Authority is accomplished through several offices. The Procurement and Contracts Department provides procurement support to the entire Authority to include Ronald Reagan Washington National and Washington Dulles International Airports. It is responsible for the acquisition of goods and services such as architect/engineering services, professional services, specialty consultants, maintenance services, equipment, vehicles, and furniture in excess of $25,000, and construction projects in excess of $2,000. Purchases for lesser dollar amounts are generally handled by the Materials Management Divisions at each airport.

The Authority is committed to a competitive procurement process and ensures that its contracting actions adhere to published Authority policies, sound contracting methods, and the highest standards of integrity and ethical conduct. As a part of this commitment, the Authority uses full and open competition and publicizes current needs through the Contracting Opportunities On-Line website.

The Contracting Opportunities On-Line website provides comprehensive project information for construction, architectural and engineering, goods, services, and concessions opportunities with the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority. The information contained within the site is updated on a daily basis in order to provide the latest, most complete project information available. The site is designed and managed by Mike Giardina, the Authority's Procurement Technology Specialist. If you have any questions regarding the site or need additional information about contracting opportunities with the Authority, you can send an e-mail message to contracting@mwaa.com or call us at 703-417-8672.

Printed copies of documents may be ordered or picked up in person at the MWAA Plans Room as listed below. Note that there is a per-copy fee for printed documents. CLICK HERE for additional instructions on obtaining printed documents.

Every effort is undertaken to ensure the accuracy of all information within the Contracting Opportunities On-Line website as of the date posted on each page. In the event of a discrepancy, information contained in the official Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority documents shall take precedence.

All Planholders Lists are provided for informational purposes only, with the understanding that the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority does not endorse any of the firms listed. Additionally, the lists reflect only those firms that have either registered as a planholder on-line or have purchased printed copies from the Authority as of the date shown, and are only as accurate as the information provided at the time of registration.

The DBE Program covers contracts that are funded in part or in whole with federal dollars. This program provides opportunities to firms who meet the federal eligibility standards for DBEs. The Authority must comply with Department of Transportation regulations in 49 CFR Part 26, when certifying DBEs. To qualify as a DBE under 49 CFR Part 26, a business must be a small business (as defined by the Small Business Administration) which is at least 51 percent owned by one or more socially and economically disadvantaged individuals. African American, Hispanic Americans, Native Americans, Subcontinent Asian Americans, Asian-Pacific Americans and women are presumed to be socially and economically disadvantaged. The management and daily business operations must be controlled by one or more of the socially and economically disadvantaged individuals who own it. The receipts of all affiliate companies are counted in determining size.

All firms with LDBE certifications were advised of their classification under the NAICS codes and eligibility under the revised small business size standards after the conversion. Firms with DBE certification have also been notified of the conversion of their SIC codes to NAICS.

LDBE firms currently working on Authority contracts who become ineligible as a result of the adoption of the NAICS code and SBA small business size standards will be permitted to complete their current contract requirements.

Description: The Contractor shall furnish all necessary labor, materials, tools, equipment and supervision for airfield pavement rehabilitation and replacement on Taxiway Q at Washington Dulles International Airport. The work includes replacement of individual Portland Cement Concrete (PCC) panels, partial depth spall repairs, bituminous linear crack repairs, replacement of joint sealant material and sawcut and sealing of linear cracks.

Description: The Contractor shall furnish all necessary labor, tools, equipment and supervision to remove and dispose of sludge, grease and grit from five sanitary waste lift stations at Washington Dulles International Airport on a quarterly basis. The scope involves removal, transportation and disposal of approximately 60 tons/14,000 gallons of non-hazardous waste per quarterly event and the work must be conducted at night and will include confined space operations.

Description: The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is seeking proposals from all interested and qualified Offerors desiring to operate, manage, and maintain the taxicab dispatch and commercial vehicle curb management concession at Washington Dulles International Airport.

Description: The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is seeking separate proposals from all interested and qualified Offerors desiring to operate and manage a shared ride van service concession at Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport and / or at Washington Dulles International Airport.

Description: The Contractor shall provide professional consulting services to assist the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority's Office of Human Resources. The Authority needs support in developing strategic Organization Development programs that add value to the Authoritys performance through effective development and management of human capital. This assistance will involve but is not limited to conducting research, developing recommendations, and implementation strategies related to: organization development support, compensation program support, employment services support, and consulting assistance. Work may also involve developing recommendations for integrating Human Resource systems and activities to support the Authoritys changing business strategies and organization designs.

Description: Expand airport parking space in the vicinity of Cargo Building 6. The Portland cement concrete apron will serve cargo carriers and include area lighting and the construction of storm drainage.

Description: Relocate airport functions that are in the existing Shop 1 Annex. Provide interior and exterior demolition, installation of new overhead doors, construction of demising walls in open bay area, architectural finishes, and mechanical and electrical fit-out for shops and offices.

Description: Construct a new fire fighting facility approximately 16,000 sq. ft. to house personnel and emergency vehicles. Included in this project will be apparatus bays, living quarters, administration space, a parking lot, utilities, and limited improvements and modifications to the existing roadway. Demolition of abandoned buildings is also included.

Description: Provide a comprehensive ventilation interface, control system and procedures for the APM tunnel ventilation fans, station smoke management systems, central control facility, and the alternate central control facility.

Description: Provide interior fit-out for construction of queuing lanes required for airport security screening. This project will also include power and communication distribution, lighting, fire protection, signage, furniture and equipment.

Description: Construct a south electrical distribution center with the capacity to handle the anticipated south airport electrical loads. This new center will provide a 34.5 KV distribution system to accommodate the additional electrical loads for the expansion of facilities in the south.

Description: Construct a pedestrian ramping system for direct concourse level aircraft access at Concourse B to accommodate the new A380 aircraft. The project involves modifications to existing concourse facilities including sterile corridors and apron areas at Gates B30/32 and B42/44.

Description: Construct two facilities in support of the new north/south runway. A deicing facility will consist of a single story metal structure with a mezzanine personnel support area. Also included as part of this building will be a deicing truck loading area for glycol delivery/recovery and a glycol storage and blending area. The second facility is a support facility with various storage and maintenance functions.

Description: Construct a building beneath the ticket level roadway of Terminal B/C to accommodate the new 100% in-line baggage system. The new building will be structurally supported independent of the existing structure. The project will include extensive phasing, maintenance of traffic, and staging in the existing baggage level roadway.

Description: Construct a westerly 86,000 sq. ft. expansion of the International Arrivals Building. This addition will provide additional baggage claim capacity and passenger queuing. The baggage basement will be expanded by approximately 94,000 sq. ft. to provide space for seven new devices for baggage stripping.

Description: Construct new building to house equipment including chillers, high temperature hot water generators, auxiliary and electrical systems. The project will also include electrical distribution equipment to serve the heating and cooling equipment, a new 4-million gallon domestic water storage tank, and a distribution pumping system.

Description: Provide the final layout of the passenger security queuing lanes as part of the new people mover station at the Main Terminal. The project will also include power and communication distribution, lighting, fire protection, signage, furniture and equipment.

Description: Provide cross field taxiways connecting the new north/south runway and the existing runway 1L-19R. All work is within the object free area of the existing runway 1L-19R complex. This work will include new PCC pavement, bituminous shoulders, installation of associated drainage, lighting, signage and markings. Seeding, topsoil and mulching is also included in this project.

Description: Relocate baggage service offices and provide a new connector between the current Terminal A lobby and the 1958 terminal lobby. The current entrance/exit to the1958 terminal will be reopened to improve circulation and traffic flow of passengers. Restrooms will be updated for ADA requirements.

Description: Modify the existing BHS in existing Bag Basement area. Construct a 3-story underground concrete framed structure complete with all HVAC, electrical, plumbing, life safety and security systems. The work will also require selective demolition and relocation of existing building mechanical, electrical, plumbing, life safety and security systems in the existing Bag Basement to allow for the modifications required to the BHS.

Description: Provide advertising agency consultant services on a task order basis for ongoing marketing counsel, advertising and media support for the creation, production and placement of media advertising and, institutional video production on a local, national and international basis.

Description: The Contractor shall conduct a recurring passenger survey program and perform research projects designed for the development of airport services at Ronald Reagan Washington National and Washington Dulles International Airports.

Description: The Contractor shall provide the services of an airport consultant to assist in the evaluation of the financial effects of Authority programs, focusing on the financial feasibility of constructing facilities in relation to the revenue streams available; provide feasibility reports on the facilities to be financed, which will be an integral part of the Official Statement in public debt offerings; serve as a resource to the Authority for developing policies, practices and agreements relating to users and tenants of the facilities; and provide day-to-day support for the Authority's rates and charges forecasting model.

Description: Provide consulting services to provide air service proposal documents, strategic input and counsel as well as ongoing economic research to support the Authority's Air Service Development Program. Economic and strategic analyses of potential air service routes are the primary focus of the Authority's air service proposals as well as discussions with domestic and foreign airlines, integrated carriers, freight forwarders and government officials.

If you do not currently accept Visa, the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority's (Authority) payment term is Net 30. Three copies of the invoice are required with the Purchase Order number clearly stated on the invoice. If three copies are not provided or the Purchase Order number is missing, the invoice shall be returned unpaid until the required information is provided. The Authority shall only pay from an original invoice. Copies and faxes will not be accepted.

Day-to-day operation and management of the Airports Authority is the responsibility of the President/Chief Executive Officer. Dulles and National Airports are self-supporting with operations funded through revenues derived from concessions, aircraft landing fees, space rental, and utilities sales. The Capital Construction Program aimed at improving both airports is financed through the sale of revenue bonds and, in some part, through federal and state programs.

The purpose of this Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority Media Guide is to provide local and national news media organizations with information to work most effectively with the staff at the Airports Authority.

Media inquires regarding any aspect of airport operations, concessions, parking, or public safety should be directed initially to the Public Affairs Office at the Airports Authority. This includes requests to cover any news stories which may take place at Reagan National or Dulles International Airport.

A Public Affairs representative will assist the media by providing information about the Airports Authority and the operations of Reagan National and Washington Dulles International Airports. The Authority website (www.mwaa.com) provides an extensive amount of information as well.

We will make every effort to work within the media deadlines, however, we ask that you give us ample time, particularly when requesting an interview or detailed information that might require some research.

News releases may be issued to describe changes in services, airport construction, notices to travelers during severe weather, etc. A list of the wire services, local newspapers, television and radio outlets is used to send releases by email. Please advise a public affairs staff member if you would like to be placed on our email list or if your contact information changes.

When the Airports Authority has a major announcement that will affect travelers, or would like to draw the public's attention to an issue of importance at the airports, a news conference may be called. Advance media advisories will be issued to alert you of the upcoming event and press releases and other material will be provided at the event.

All requests for interviews with Airports Authority representatives should be made in advance to the Public Affairs Office. We will try to provide a spokesperson who can best address the topic of the interview. Requests to film at the airports should be made to the Public Affairs Office. If no one is available in the Public Affairs office (such as after hours), please contact Airport Operations. Remember, security restrictions are critical to airport safety and will take top priority in every instance.

Certain airport operations fall under the jurisdiction of different agencies working within the airport. The media is requested to go through the appropriate agency public affairs department for interviews and information.

Individual airlines are responsible for issues relating to that particular airline: labor issues, on-time performance, flight schedules, baggage issues, weather delays, etc. Members of the media who join our email list will periodically receive updated airline public affairs contact lists. The Air Transport Association (202-626-4172) also maintains a list of airline media contacts.

Airport security is a highly confidential subject. Authority policy is to limit the information made public regarding security procedures used by airport and federal personnel. The only information we are able to release is that which is readily visible to the public. The level of airport security is established by the Transportation Security Administration and implemented by airport and federal personnel. For more information regarding airport security, contact TSA Public Affairs at 571-227-2829.

Live Trucks may park on the upper roadway level in front of Terminal B/C adjacent to the north or south terraces. Parking is provided for live trucks only  no other crew vehicles. In the event of large numbers of live trucks, the Airport Operations Office and Airport Police will direct trucks to alternate areas. There are no designated live truck parking locations at Terminal A, but space may be temporarily allocated there if specific needs arise.

The areas that are leased by the airlines and other tenants, such as ticket counters, boarding locations and waiting areas, private offices, stores, and restaurants, are under the control of those parties, and media access to those areas must be approved by the appropriate airline or business.

The security screening areas are operated through the Transportation Security Administration (TSA). Filming and photography is not permitted within 20 feet of any screening device at the airport. For media access to the screening area equipment or TSA employees, you must obtain approval from TSA Public Affairs.

Airfield access is rarely granted and strictly controlled. Requests for filming in the aircraft movement areas and near the aprons will be handled by the Public Affairs Office on a case-by-case basis. Prior notification is essential to ensure adequate staffing exists to perform escort duties. Requests for access will be accommodated to the extent manpower and operational considerations permit. In the event of an emergency situation or other event that requires the full attention of the Airport Operations staff, a prearranged escort may be canceled.

If a criminal investigation is underway, coordination of press activity will be the responsibility of the Authority Police Department Officer in Charge and the Public Affairs Office representative. Filming of crime scenes, or other investigative events will be controlled by the Authority Police Department.

Only during severe weather (heavy snow, hurricane, tornado) would the airport close for any extended period of time. However, flights may be delayed or canceled due to weather in the surrounding area or at the flights destination.

Briefings may be conducted by the Airport Manager or Public Safety Manager as the situation warrants. If an aircraft accident is involved, the National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB) investigating team will take charge of the investigation and the release of any information relative to that investigation. In circumstances where only property damage occurs, the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) may conduct the investigation. Other federal agencies, such as Federal Bureau of Investigations (FBI) and others may be involved.

Only members of recognized media organizations with appropriate visible identification will be permitted at media briefings and on the Air Operations Area (AOA) or transported to the scene of the emergency. At times, it may be necessary to pool media resources.

Until the arrival of the Public Affairs Manager, Media Relations Assistant Manager or Communications Office representative, questions regarding the emergency or access to the site will be decided by the Airport Operations Duty Officer or the Public Safety Fire or Police official in charge.

Based on the nature of the situation at hand, the official in charge will determine any restrictions on the movement of the media that may be necessary to allow a safe and orderly response to an incident.

Photographs and videotapes may be taken from any area where access has been permitted, however, Public Safety and Airport Operations personnel may restrict the use of flash, strobes, and other high intensity lighting that might affect the response to the situation.

While the Airports Authority recognizes the importance of interviewing victims of an aircraft or other emergency situation, we believe our first responsibility is to the victims and their families and their right to privacy. If any individuals are reluctant to be interviewed or photographed, the Authority will support their decision.

Media representatives are asked not to resist, obstruct, oppose or interfere with any law enforcement officer in the lawful execution of his or her duties, and are not exempt from any federal, state or local laws and will be treated in the same manner as any violator if arrested.

Reagan National Airport - North terrace of Terminal C, located on the upper (ticketing) level, outside Door #6.Only TV live trucks may park at these locations. Other parking for the media is available in the public parking lots.

In a non-aircraft emergency situation, the Public Affairs Manager, Assistant Media Relations Manager or other representative will coordinate the release of information with the Public Safety officials or Operations Officer in charge of the emergency response. Airports Authority Police are in charge of investigating traffic accidents and criminal activities on airport property. Fire officials handle fire and rescue and ambulance operations.

The cause of an aircraft crash or incident is released by the National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB) after an investigation has been conducted. Until then, no agency will speculate about the cause of the incident.

Initial confirmation of any deaths resulting from the crash of a plane is made by the coroner, medical examiner, or other designated law enforcement officer, and information will not be released until family members are notified.

The Airports Police Department is responsible for establishing and maintaining a security line at the incident site and ingress/egress points and patrol the airfield. The law enforcement officers will also maintain constant patrol of the airfield area. When the fire/rescue effort is complete, Incident command is transferred to the Police chief for crash site security. The police department also provides a variety of professional services such as crime investigation; canine explosive teams; and special operations.

The Airports Authority Fire Department is responsible for firefighting and emergency medical rescue operations at Dulles and Reagan National Airports, and river rescue at Reagan National Airport. When fire or rescue effort is imminent, incident command is transferred to the Fire Chief in command.

The NTSB and the Transportation Security Administration (TSA) are the federal agencies that investigate aircraft accidents. They also take custody of the aircraft and its contents from the time fire/rescue activities are concluded until a full investigation is completed, or a release is given. Upon the arrival of the NTSB investigating team, the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority Public Affairs Staff may assume a support role to the NTSB or the FAA at their request.

The NTSB also operates a Family Assistance program intended to provide for the family members of those involved in an aircraft incident, and work with the affected airlines family assistance officials.

Various branches of the FAA have responsibilities in an aircraft emergency. The FAA operates the control towers at Dulles and Reagan National Airports and would control the air traffic during an emergency to permit rescue equipment to proceed to the accident site. Once an alert is initiated by the FAA Air Traffic Control Tower at the Airport, the Airport Operations Office assumes control of the airfield until the emergency is ended.

This agency is responsible for airport security screening of passengers and baggage and other security functions at the nation's airports. In an emergency, TSA representatives will work with Authority personnel and public safety to work the incident as well as maintain the security of the airport and processing of passengers through security screening. The Department is also responsible for the Air Marshal Program and Customs and Border Protection.

The FBI has jurisdiction if a hijacking or hostage taking incident occurs aboard an aircraft that is still on the ground. If the aircraft is in flight, and a hijacking or hostage-taking incident occurs, the FAA has jurisdiction with assistance from the TSA and FBI. Other potential emergencies will involve the FBI as well.

The Authoriy's mission is to develop, promote, and operate safely National and Dulles Airports, continually striving to improve our efficiency, customer orientation, and the level of air service offered at National and Dulles. We will be the best managed airports in the United States.

An Environmental Assessment (EA) is a study under the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) of 1969 to determine whether a proposed federal action has the potential to cause significant environmental impacts. An EA is a decision-making tool that analyzes the potential environmental effects of a proposed action - in this case, a new midfield concourse, automated train system and other related projects - and its alternatives. The process provides a forum to address both regulatory and public concerns, and identifies potential impacts, including: air quality; water quality; noise; compatible land use; social and socioeconomic characteristics; geology and soils; historic, architectural, archaeological, and cultural resources; biotic communities; endangered and threatened species; wetlands; floodplains; coastal zone management; coastal barriers; wild and scenic rivers; prime and unique farmland; energy; light emissions; visual aesthetics; solid waste, hazardous waste, and pollution prevention; and design, art, and architecture.

The purpose of this Environmental Assessment (EA) is to evaluate existing conditions and environmental effects for the proposed Tier 2 midfield concourse and related projects. These include the new Tier 2 Concourse, a passenger walkway between concourses, baggage tunnels, two underground airport train systems and associated tunnels, a new utilities building, and adaptations to existing facilities and utilities facilities.

This process is being conducted in several phases. The process started in 2001 with significant data collection. A draft EA was completed and as part of this process, the draft EA will be presented to the public and comments will be accepted until July 8th. Agency and public comments will be addressed in a final EA that will be issued by FAA later this summer.

The economic uncertainties facing commercial aviation following the events of September 11th 2001, have affected the schedule for implementation of the proposed projects. Some of the projects under consideration in this Environmental Assessment will begin shortly after completion of the NEPA approval process. These projects include Apron VII, a portion of the domestic people mover system with an interim connection to Concourse C and the utility improvements needed to support these projects.

Other projects primarily related to the Tier 2 Concourse, consisting of Tier 2 itself, the International Arrivals APM, portions of the domestic APM to Tier 2, baggage tunnels, the South Utility Building and the demolition of Concourse C/D are being deferred. The Authority expects to proceed with these projects when circumstances are appropriate. Therefore, all of the projects in the Proposed Action are being retained in this environmental assessment because the Authority expects to proceed with them. For purposes of impact analysis, an aggressive schedule has been assumed, under which all projects would be completed by 2008.

NEPA (National Environmental Policy Act) of 1969, as amended, establishes a broad national policy to improve the relationship between humans and their environment, and sets out policies and goals to ensure that environmental considerations are given careful attention and appropriate weight in decisions of the federal government.

An EA is a public disclosure document, which analyzes various environmental impacts and alternatives to the proposed action. The purpose of the EA is to provide officials, decision-makers, and the public with an understanding of the potential environmental consequences of a proposed project. The Draft EA addresses the environmental consequences of the Proposed Action (Build Alternative) and No Build Alternative, as well as other issues including noise, air quality, water quality, endangered and threatened species and wetlands.

The events of September 11, 2001 and the economic uncertainties facing commercial aviation have affected the timing of the proposed Tier 2 Concourse and Related Projects. MWAA has determined that some of the projects in the proposed action will commence shortly after the completion of the NEPA approval processes. Other projects are being deferred, principally for economic circumstances. For the purposes of the EA, all of the projects in the Proposed Action should be viewed as proposed for construction. Therefore, even the deferred projects are being evaluated on environmental grounds in this assessment.

Approximately 26 acres of wetlands may be altered as a result of the implementation of Tier 2. MWAA has submitted a Joint permit Application to the Virginia Department of Environment Quality for Tier 2. These wetlands will be replaced by new wetlands that are being created through the Airports Authority's Wetland Banking Program.

Air emission sources at Dulles Airport include stationary sources (e.g., heating equipment, emergency generators) and mobile sources (e.g., mobile lounges, traffic). Air emissions will be within the air quality permit limitations.

The proposed projects are not expected to result in an increase in airport operations (types and number of aircraft used, runway layout, and runway utilization). The number of people in the surrounding communities that live and work within the area influenced by the noise contours is not anticipated to increase as a result of these projects. Therefore, no noise impacts are expected to occur as a direct result of the implementation of the proposed projects.

Overall, the proposed projects are not expected to cause adverse social or socioeconomic impact on the communities surrounding the airport. Since the proposed projects involve construction located entirely within the airport proper, the projects will not result in the relocation of residences and businesses or disrupt established communities or planned development. The Tier 2 improvement projects will not affect noise levels, and therefore would have no impact on nearby schools, hospitals, and places of public assembly.

Traffic is not expected to increase as a result of the Tier 2 Concourse and Related Projects. The proposed projects are intended to replace existing facilities and enhance services that are currently provided at Dulles Airport.

The ROD completes a thorough and careful environmental and decision making process, including FAA's public disclosure and review by the FAA decision maker of the analyses and impacts described in the August 11, 2005 FEIS. The ROD documents FAA compliance with several procedural and substantive requirements of aeronautical, environmental, programmatic, and related statutes and regulations that apply to FAA's decision and actions on proposed runway development and airport expansion projects. FAA arrived at these determinations and approvals by reviewing the environmental analysis in the FEIS and all other relevant documents that comprise the Administrative Record. Read the FAA ROD and the FEIS for more details.

If you would prefer to read a hard copy of the FAA ROD and the FEIS, scroll down to find the location in Fairfax or Loudoun County that is most convenient to you. Both documents should be available for viewing; the documents cannot be checked out. To view the document at MWAA or FAA offices, appointments should be made in advance.

The purpose of this group is to plan, provide and actively manage world-class access to the global aviation system in a way that anticipates and serves the needs of the Metropolitan Washington DC region. Governed by a 13-member Board of Directors with five members appointed by the Governor of Virginia, three by the Mayor of the District of Columbia, two by the Governor of Maryland and three by the President of the United States, the Airports Authority operates a two-airport system that provides domestic and international air service. The Airports Authority is self-supporting, using aircraft landing fees and revenues from concessions to fund operating expenses. The Authority is not taxpayer-funded.

A cooperating agency is an agency that has jurisdiction by law or special expertise regarding any environmental impact resulting from a proposed project or reasonable alternative. The U.S. Army Corps of Engineer (USACE) was invited by the FAA to participate as cooperating agency for this EIS.

The goal of involving various agencies was to ensure that the FAA was assisted in the preparation of the EIS such that the document contained all the information each cooperating agency needs to fulfill its NEPA responsibilities and for the agencies to make independent decisions on resources and issues under their respective purview(s). As such, the USACE began participation in the NEPA process at the earliest appropriate time. Their actions have included making staff support available, exchanging relevant information throughout the EIS process, submitting independent recommendations, and assisting the FAA in developing responses to "designated resource" comments received on the Draft and Final EIS. The USACE was not responsible however, for the actual preparation of any portion of the EIS or related technical reports.

The EIS process involves gathering and analyzing data in order to assess and document potential environmental effects of building and operating the new runways. This EIS documents the need for the new runways; identifies possible alternatives for the location of the runways; evaluates environmental impacts and identifies mitigation options.

The EIS process also provides a forum for review and comment by appropriate governmental agencies and the public. These comments help guide the direction and focus of the EIS to ensure that local and regional priorities and objectives are properly addressed.

The EIS process ends with the issuance of a Record of Decision (ROD) by the FAA. If the project is approved from an environmental standpoint through the ROD, the Airports Authority may be eligible to receive federal funds for the construction of the project. After a ROD is issued supporting the preferred alternative for the runways, it typically would take another two to three years to construct the proposed improvements.

The EIS is a source of detailed information on the environmental impacts of the alternatives under review. This information is designed to assist the FAA in making its decision on the proposed project.

Presentation boards were used to show the most up-to-date alternatives evaluation including impacts to noise, air quality and wetlands. Comment forms, the latest newsletter and copies of the presentation boards were distributed at registration. A total of 18 attendees provided comments before a public hearing officer. Attendees were encouraged to provide written or verbal comments at the meeting or to mail their comment forms to the FAA Project Manager by March 7, 2005. Approximately 380 comment forms were received during the comment period.

The open-house workshops were designed to gather further public input in the EIS process and to present the preliminary environmental impacts. Presentation boards were used to show the most up-to-date alternatives evaluation including impacts to noise, air quality and wetlands. Comment forms, the latest newsletter and copies of the presentation boards were distributed at registration. Attendees were encouraged to provide written or verbal comments at the meeting or to mail their comment forms to the FAA Project Manager by May 7, 2004. Court reporters also were available at both meetings in order to record verbatim verbal comments.

Two meetings were held, one in Loudoun County and one in Fairfax County to present the Purpose and Need for the two new runways, preliminary Alternatives under consideration and the Affected Environment. The Purpose and Need presents a justification for the proposed project. The preliminary alternatives have been developed out of information gathered from the Public Scoping Meetings held last year, past and present studies in the region, public and agency comments, and passenger and cargo traffic analyses, among other sources. The Affected Environment data represents the culmination of work accomplished over the last year to identify environmental and social/cultural resources in the EIS study area.

The first phase in the EIS process was conducting "Scoping" meetings with agencies and the public. These meetings offered the public the opportunity to provide written and verbal inputs on the proposed project ensuring that the full range of issues were identified. The public was asked to suggest ideas, alternatives, concerns and expectations for the study.

An Agency Scoping meeting held at the Dulles Marriott on 26 June 2002 involved 27 representatives from stakeholder agencies. During each meeting a video presentation was shown and attendees were invited to view study information and speak directly with study team members. All comments received, both verbal and written, were added to the public record, coded and analyzed. All comments received will be included verbatim in an Appendix to the Draft and Final EIS's.

Council on Environmental Quality - Coordinates federal environmental efforts and works closely with agencies and other White House offices in the development of environmental policies and initiatives.

Virginia Department of Aviation - The Virginia Department of Aviation (DOAV) is a state transportation agency. The mission of the DOAV is to "progressively develop and maintain a safe, technologically advanced, market-driven air transportation system that provides the citizens of Virginia with convenient and efficient access to the expanding world community."

Environmental Impact Statement - A document prepared to describe the effects for proposed activities on the environment. "Environment," in this case, is defined as the natural and physical environment and the relationship of people with that environment. This means that the "environment" considered in an EIS includes land, water, air, structures, living organisms, environmental values at the site, and the social, cultural, and economic aspects.

The right to use or access property for a certain time limit without owning it - similar to property "rental." When you secure an easement you pay the owner for that right, but you do not retain ownership of that property.

Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority - Governed by a 13-member Board of Directors with five members appointed by the Governor of Virginia, three by the Mayor of the District of Columbia, two by the Governor of Maryland and three by the President of the United States, the Airports Authority operates a two-airport system that provides domestic and international air service for the mid-Atlantic region. The Airports Authority is self-supporting, using aircraft landing fees and revenues from concessions to fund operating expenses. The Authority is not taxpayer-funded.

Record of Decision - An official document that states the responsible federal agency's findings on the proposed project and sets forth conditions under which federal approval of a proposed project is granted.

Visual Flight Rules - Rules that govern the procedures for conducting flight under visual conditions. The term "VFR" is also used in the United States to indicate weather conditions that are equal to or greater than minimum VFR requirements. In addition, it is used by pilots and controllers to indicate type of flight plan.

There is a blue "i" button on the front of each machine. When pressed, you will be connected to a customer service representative who will assist you in operating the machines. Should you continue to experience difficulties, you will be directed to a cashiered exit lane, where a cashier will assist you in making payment for your parking. In addition, customer service representatives will be available in the Main Terminal in order to assist you. Look for their white shirts with the Pay & Go logo.

Once you pay at the Pay & Go machines, take the ticket that the machines return to you and go to the exit plaza. Drive to a Pay & Go lane and insert your ticket into the exit machine. The machine will recognize that you made payment at a Pay & Go machine and raise the gate so you can be on your way! Please note that you will not get your ticket back at the Pay & Go lane once you insert it.

Yes, you can still pay at a cashier booth in the exit plaza in each parking facility. However, the number of cashiered exit lanes has been reduced to accelerate the exiting of patrons using Pay & Go. The Hourly and Economy Lots each have three cashiered exit lanes and the Daily 1 and Daily 2 Garages each have two.

The Pay & Go machine encodes your ticket with your payment information and returns the ticket to you. The machine in the Pay & Go exit lane will read the encoded information on this ticket and recognize that you paid.

You will be unable to make payment for your parking at a Pay & Go machine without your ticket. If you forget your ticket, proceed to a cashiered exit lane. Remember to keep your parking ticket with you on your next visit.

A specific number of minutes, called a "grace period," are set for each parking area. The grace period allows sufficient travel time to get to the parking area on-foot or via a shuttle bus, as well as adequate time to proceed to the exit plaza.

These times have been determined based on average passenger exit times for each parking area. Should you exceed this grace period, you will be prompted to pay an additional fee at the exit lane using a credit card.

The purpose of these meetings is to solicit comments from the public on the proposed abatement and mitigation alternatives regarding regional aircraft noise. A court reporter will be available at the meeting to receive public comments and made part of the official record of the study. The Airports Authority initiated a major update of the Noise Compatibility Study for the Airport in 2001. During the study period, the Authority, along with the Metropolitan Washington Council of Governments and the Study Advisory Committee, held 13 working meetings and five public meetings.

This study, conducted in accordance with the regulations of the Federal Aviation Administration's process, is designed to forecast future noise contours at Reagan National and to examine possible abatement and mitigation actions to reduce community noise impacts.

The current Noise Compatibility Program includes noise abatement flight corridors, aircraft thrust management procedures, nighttime aircraft noise limits and restrictions on nighttime engine run-ups, and was last revised in 1993 in accordance with Part 150 of Title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations, which establishes the Federal Aviation Administration's standards for noise impact evaluation and guidelines for airport noise compatibility programs.

Because of the importance of this issue to the community, the Metropolitan Washington Council of Government's Committee on Noise Abatement and Aviation at National and Dulles Airports (CONAANDA) partnered with MWAA throughout the process. A Community Advisory Committee was established consisting of elected and citizen representatives of the six surrounding jurisdictions as well as representatives from the airline industry, pilot organization, Federal Aviation Administration, Environmental Protection Agency, National Park Service and other organizations to assist and advise the Airports Authority in this study.

Even during its inaugural year (that means first year in business), the Airport was a popular attraction for travelers and visitors alike. While the Airport handled only 344,257 passengers in 1941, more than two million people came by the new Airport to visit it.

In 1998 under another huge addition was made to the Airport when a new Terminal building with one million square feet of space was added. The New National now houses many of the concessions, eateries, ticket counters, baggage claim areas, and aircraft gates for the whole Airport.

The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority (MWAA) didnt just want to build a standard building, though; it wanted an elegant and artistic building. Thats why the outside of the building has rolling Jeffersonian domes and why the new building houses beautiful window wall tiles, wall-hangings and floor medallions, like the one on the right.

Dulles Airport is an important part of the economy of the Washington, D.C. area. It employs thousands of people and generates billions of dollars of business. Houses and businesses continue to be built around the Airport. Now the challenge for Dulles and its neighbors is to grow in a way which makes life better for everyone.

Ronald Wilson Reagan was born on February, 6, 1911 and was destined to be one of the most influential Americans of his time. He grew up in Illinois and upon graduating from high school, he attended Eureka College. In college, he studied economics and sociology, played on the football team and acted in school plays. He was such a charismatic young man that after graduating from college, he caught the eye of Hollywood producers who made him into a star. Ronald Reagan starred in 53 films and became famous not only in the United States but also around the world for his performances on the big screen.

By serving as a leader in the film industry, he had proved that he was able to effectively represent the views of others. In 1966, he was elected Governor of California and was then re-elected for a second term in 1970. After serving as Governor, he moved on to the national stage of politics. Ronald Reagan won the Republican Presidential nomination in 1980 and then was elected President of the United States later that year. He served as our nations leader for eight years. Ronald Reagan died in Los Angeles on June 5, 2004.

John Foster Dulles was most famous for the hard work and initiative he showed while serving as our countrys Secretary of State under President Dwight D. Eisenhower. Born on February 25, 1888 right here in the nations capital, Dulles was very active in government and politics from a very young age.

Watch your bags while you are at the Airport and don't accept packages from strangers. Be prepared to answer questions about who packed your bags and whether you might have left them unattended at any time.

Do not joke about having bombs or firearms in your possession. Security personnel are trained to react when they hear these words. Penalties can be severe, and can include the possibility of time in prison and/or fines.

Air service maps show us where all the planes in and out of Dulles and Reagan National fly to and from, or in other words, all the places that are served by the Airports. Lets look at the places you can go if you fly through the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authoritys two Airports.

Are you flying or planning to fly within the United States? Look at all the places served by Reagan National Airport on the map below! Reagan National, as its name suggests, serves much of the nation. It is also located about three miles from the U.S. Capitol Building. Reagan National Airport is located at the star marked DCA on the map. Have you been to any of the other places on the map before?

You can also fly to lots of places within the United States if you fly through Dulles Airport. On the map below you can see all the places served by Dulles Airport within the United States. Dulles Airport is located at the star marked IAD on the map.

Document Ordering Instructions				Printed sets of documents for all Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority solicitations are available for purchase at the rates stated on the individual project pages. All fees are non-refundable and must be paid by either check or money order made payable to Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority or MWAA. Documents will only be shipped once payment has been received.

The Contractor shall furnish all necessary labor, materials, tools, equipment and supervision for airfield pavement rehabilitation and replacement on Taxiway Q at Washington Dulles International Airport. The work includes replacement of individual Portland Cement Concrete (PCC) panels, partial depth spall repairs, bituminous linear crack repairs, replacement of joint sealant material and sawcut and sealing of linear cracks. Temporary and permanent pavement markings are also included in this project. Night work will be required for specific work areas in the project.

The Contractor shall furnish all necessary labor, tools, equipment and supervision to remove and dispose of sludge, grease and grit from five sanitary waste lift stations at Washington Dulles International Airport on a quarterly basis. The scope involves removal, transportation and disposal of approximately 60 tons/14,000 gallons of non-hazardous waste per quarterly event and the work must be conducted at night and will include confined space operations.

The Contractor shall furnish all necessary labor, materials, tools, equipment, supervision and transportation required to perform HVAC Utility Services for the removal and replacement of Outside Air Fan #3 located in the Main Terminal at Washington Dulles International Airport. The Contractor shall remove and dispose of existing damaged outside air fan and install, test and balance newly installed outside air fan.

The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is seeking proposals from all interested and qualified Offerors desiring to operate, manage, and maintain the taxicab dispatch and commercial vehicle curb management concession at Washington Dulles International Airport.

The selected Offeror will be granted the right and obligation to operate and manage certain taxicab facilities and the dispatching of taxicabs to and from the Airport. The Authority is procuring an Automated Vehicle Identification (AVI) system to manage the dispatching of outbound taxicabs at the Airport, and to assist in revenue collection and activity reporting. At anytime during the term of the Contract, the Authority may, at its discretion, assign the selected Offeror additional curb management responsibilities not limited to the following: collection of curb Access Fees, management of ground transportation accounts, and coordination of other ground transportation operations on the commercial vehicle curb.

The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is seeking separate proposals from all interested and qualified Offerors desiring to operate and manage a shared ride van service concession at Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport and / or at Washington Dulles International Airport.

"We look forward to this annual opportunity for the Airports Authority to support an important program like Special Olympics Virginia and to open the airport to the community with displays and information about the world of aviation," says James E. Bennett, President and CEO of the Airports Authority and Chairman of the event.

As part of the festival, an exhibit area will include numerous aircraft, including military, commercial and civilian aircraft, on display to the public. Raffle tickets will be on sale at the Festival for chances to win round trip airline tickets to domestic and international destinations.

Visitors to the Dulles Day Family Festival will also find: fire and police equipment displays; airport snow removal and large equipment display; and a Kid's Corner, featuring a moon bounce, games, ball crawl and inflatable slides.

The original Plane Pull - the first of its kind in the nation, was created at Dulles Airport in 1992 to raise money for Special Olympics Virginia. Similar events are now held across the country at other airports.

Washington Dulles International Airport welcomes the community to the Dulles Day Family Festival, featuring the 13th annual Plane Pull where teams play "tug of war" with an airplane to raise money for Special Olympics Virginia.

Dulles Day Family Festival and 13th annual Plane Pull with aircraft on display, a car show, live music, food, games and activities for children, airline ticket raffles, and introducing the Kids' Bus Pull, a new event where teams of children pull a school bus 12 feet.

Mr. Bennett thanked the members of AAAE for the award and the organization for its support not only of the Washington airports but also those around the country. "AAAE has assisted airport professionals in training and technology as well as through representation in the federal government on behalf of airports. As airports take on ever growing roles in the aviation industry, it is important for airport operators to share our knowledge and have a role in shaping programs and policies that affect us. I am honored to be recognized by my peers and look forward to working with them and AAAE in the future."

Travelers and visitors to Reagan National Airport will be able to enjoy more than 300 works of art by students in District of Columbia Public Schools that are on exhibit at Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport through May 31st. The theme, "Icons of Understanding," is reflected in the works of students from 150 schools in the city - pre-kindergarten through 12th grade. The exhibition is located on the lower (baggage) level of Terminals B and C.

"We are very pleased to continue our relationship with the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority and to have this opportunity to show Washington, D.C. and travelers from all over the nation and the world, the artistic achievement of our students," said Paula Sanderlin, Art Director for D. C. Public Schools. The exhibit includes drawings, paintings, collages, prints, computer graphics, mixed media and three-dimension constructions.

Terminals B and C also incorporate the work of 30 professional artists and artisans as a permanent part of its design. "We are pleased to be able to showcase the work of young artists in the District of Columbia along with our own architectural enhancement program. This program has grown into a wonderful community event and this is the sixth consecutive year it's been held at the Airport," said James E. Bennett, President and CEO of the Airports Authority.

Travel during this holiday period is expected to result in the filling of the Airport's economy lot and parking garages. It is anticipated that parking at Reagan National will be very limited from March 21-April 2.

"We are extremely pleased to welcome South African Airways to Dulles" said James E. Bennett, President/CEO of the Airports Authority. "We have sought this important market for our metropolitan region for some time and are pleased that our efforts have been successful. This route further establishes Dulles as the international gateway to the mid-Atlantic region."

"Our North American routes have shown tremendous growth and the addition of a third service between North America and South Africa provides an ideal opportunity for expanding our global route network," said Phillip Bekker, Executive Vice President - North America for South African Airways.

"We see a continued increase in the demand for travel to South Africa and this new direct service provides business and government travelers in the Washington metro area with the fastest, most direct route to South Africa and convenient connections to destinations across the continent," said Bekker.

"Keith has overseen a very challenging period of change and improvement at Dulles Airport over the years," said James E. Bennett, President/CEO of the Airports Authority. "His dedication and commitment to ensuring that Dulles kept pace with the tremendous growth in air service demand in our metropolitan region is appreciated by the aviation community as well as the many government and business officials he worked with over the years."

In making his announcement, Mr. Meurlin said, "I have decided after a very rewarding career with the Airports Authority, to retire. My thanks to all my co-workers who have done so much to support me and this organization and to make Dulles one of the best Airports in the country. I'm proud of what we have accomplished and what I know will be accomplished in the future."

As Airport Manager, Mr. Meurlin directed operations, maintenance, and commercial activities at Dulles-which employs nearly 17,000 people and is one of the busiest in the country in terms of aircraft operations. During his tenure as Airport Manager, the Airports Authority has invested nearly $1.5 billion in expanding the Airport facilities in the late 1990's and is currently undertaking an additional $3 billion dollar construction program to keep pace with current and future growth.

Mr. Meurlin came to the Washington airports following his active duty in the United States Air Force in 1977. He began his service as an Airport Operations Officer and successively advanced through the organization in Engineering and Maintenance and Operations management positions before becoming the Airport Manager in 1989.

In addition to his service with the Airports Authority, Mr. Meurlin has continued his military service in the Air Force Reserve where he has attained the rank of Major General; the highest rank a traditional reservist can achieve.

Said James E. Bennett in making the announcement, "Chris has done a great job managing Reagan National, and I know he will bring these solid skills to his new job and will provide a smooth transition for Dulles Airport, our customers, employees and tenants."

In accepting his appointment, Mr. Browne said, "I've been very fortunate to spend the last seventeen years at Reagan National Airport where I've seen a great airport become even better. I want to thank the Airport staff and community and the Arlington and Alexandria leaders and organizations who have contributed so much to making Reagan National what it is today. I'm looking forward to having the same positive working relationships with the staff and community at Dulles."

The Washington area airports experienced robust growth in passenger traffic in 2004. Washington Dulles International and Ronald Reagan Washington National Airports together served nearly 39 million passengers last year.

The increase in passenger volume at Dulles is largely due to the flights introduced in 2004 by Independence Air and service increases by other airlines. Independence Air began operations at Dulles in June of last year as a regional low-fare airline. United Airlines continued its United Express operation using new regional partners. Independence Air alone added nearly 600 daily flights at the Airport.

To keep pace with this growth at Dulles, the Airports Authority continued its $3 billion construction program in 2004 by constructing a covered walkway from Garage 2 to the Terminal and opening a new Pedestrian Walkway; providing for the first time direct access via a moving underground sidewalk between the Terminal and Concourse B.

As 2005 begins, the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) is currently conducting an environmental review process which is expected to conclude by the end of the year with a recommendation to build the first of two new runways at Dulles. The Airports Authority is also building a new Air Traffic Control Tower at Dulles for the FAA which will provide needed technology and facilities to support the current and anticipated increases in air traffic at the Airport.

A major, nearly $1 billion, project at Dulles continues with the construction of underground stations and tunnels to accommodate the new Airport Train System which will operate beneath the airfield and replace the Mobile Lounges as the primary passenger conveyance system at the Airport.

The purpose of the DEIS is three-fold. First, the DEIS documents the need for additional airport infrastructure to satisfy the forecast aviation demand. Second, it analyzes multiple alternatives, including a No-Build scenario, and details the potential direct and indirect environmental effects of two reasonable build alternatives. Finally, the DEIS lists several measures to avoid, minimize and/or mitigate for the impacts associated with the proposed improvements at IAD.

The FAA encourages all interested parties to provide comments concerning the scope and content of the DEIS. Comments should be as specific as possible and address the analysis of potential environmental impacts and the adequacy of the proposed action or merits of alternatives and the mitigation being considered. Reviewers should organize their participation so that it is meaningful and makes the agency aware of the viewer's interests and concerns using quotations and other specific references to the text of the DEIS and related documents. Matters that could have been raised with specificity during the DEIS comment period may not be considered if they are raised later in the decision process. This commenting procedure is intended to ensure that substantive comments and concerns are made available to the FAA in a timely manner so that the FAA has an opportunity to address them.

"The Airports Authority greatly values its enduring relationship with the Carl Sandburg Middle School, and is extremely pleased that these exceptionally gifted students could help us promote heightened energy conservation awareness," said Christopher U. Browne, Reagan National Airport Manager. "This artwork competition truly represents the kind of "win-win" opportunity that serves to benefit our customers and everyone involved. We are grateful for the opportunity to showcase the impressive artwork of our Carl Sandburg student partners."

As part of the Metropolitan Washington's Airports Authority's ongoing program to reduce energy consumption at its facilities and its partnership program with the Fairfax County, 8th Grade art class students were asked to submit artwork that the Airport would utilize to create energy conservation awareness posters for display throughout the Airport.

More than 100 students participated in the contest under the supervision of Sandburg School art teachers Sandra Sorenson and Sheila Ambrogne. Thirty-three students were selected by the art teachers as the contest semi-finalists.

The artwork of the finalists has been made into three different posters, which will be distributed throughout the Airport. In addition, the artwork of all 33 semi-finalists is currently on exhibit in Terminal A.

Shuttle customers can still check in for their flights at the ticket counter at the end of the Metro bridge on the departure level. Self-Service Check-In Kiosks may be used at both ticket counter locations, but those adjacent to the North Pier security checkpoint will be temporarily unavailable. The expanded security facilities are expected to be completed in March 2005.

Customers are encouraged to use online check-in when available, arrive at Reagan National Airport on the Departure/Check-In level, or use the Metro bridge Self-Service Check-In Kiosk when arriving on the Metro or parking in Garage C. Signage will be posted around the airport to advise passengers of these changes.

"This walkway will give our customers a direct connection between the Terminal and Concourse B," said President/CEO James E. Bennett of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority. "We know from our customers that they want an alternative to taking the mobile lounges, and we're very pleased we were able to provide it in time for the busy holiday travel period."

The walkway is now the way to get to the Concourse while the Mobile Lounges will continue to be used for Concourses A, C and D and shuttles to Concourse G. The Mobile Lounge service to Concourse B will run less frequently. This will also make more lounges available for service to the more distant Concourses C and D.

Thanksgiving travel this year at Ronald Reagan Washington National and Washington Dulles International Airports may be busier and take more time than in the history of the Airports -- due in part to increased numbers of holiday travelers and to changes in security procedures.

"This year we have seen major increases in both the number of passengers and aircraft operations at our airports. In addition, the Transportation Security Administration has instituted new security screening procedures, which require passengers to remove all outer garments at the checkpoints. There will be long lines in our terminals and crowded parking facilities. We want our customers to be prepared for this busy period, which will probably start the Friday before Thanksgiving and continue until the Monday following the holiday. We advise travelers to come early," said Airports Authority President/CEO James E. Bennett.

Arrive early -- Travelers are urged to arrive at the airport at least 2 to 2 1/2 hours before domestic flights and 3 hours before international flights to allow enough time for ground transportation, parking, luggage check-in and security screening.

While the Airport offers 25,000 public parking spaces, your favorite spot may be taken. Based on experience over the Columbus Day holiday weekend, a significant increase in parking lot usage is expected. Allow extra time to find a parking space.

Take Metro -- Travelers using National Airport find Metro a good alternative to driving. The Airports Authority also encourages Dulles passengers to consider taking Metro to the West Falls Church Station and connecting to the Washington Flyer Bus to Dulles.

Avoid wearing clothing, jewelry, and accessories that contain metal and may set off the alarm at screening checkpoints. To speed the process, remove your shoes and use the complimentary bags provided by the Airports for loose items.

Call In Before Check-In: Call your airline's 800 number or visit the airline website to confirm your flight or to verify security regulations related to checked baggage. Weather can greatly affect flight schedules. You may also check the Airports Authority website at mwaa home for airport information.

The Authority's current regulation on weapons requires passengers checking firearms to deactivate the weapons to the extent possible. The proposed change would require the passenger to transport the firearm unloaded and in a locked, hard-sided container to which only the passenger retains the key or combination. The proposed regulation amendments would also clarify that agents of the Airports Authority may possess a weapon to be used under Authority direction for an Authority purpose. Other persons, such as armored car guards, would be permitted to possess a weapon on Airport property for a legitimate airport purpose with prior, written approval of the Airport Manager.

Additional proposed amendments pertain to taxicabs and other vehicles for hire at the Airports. The amendments would require taxicab drivers and operators of limousines, executive sedans and other vehicles for hire picking up a pre-arranged fare to record the dates of the request and of the pickup written legibly in ink.. Another amendment would clarify that the demerit points for traffic violations are calculated according to the Virginia system, for purposes of determining whether to deny or revoke the driver's Reagan National Airport Taxi Operator's Permit.

The Hyatt Dulles is located at 2300 Dulles Corner Boulevard in Herndon. Any person may appear and be heard for or against the proposed amendments. Speakers are requested to limit their remarks to 5 minutes.

The Seminar will provide information on upcoming contracting opportunities in the provision of construction as well as goods and services for the Airports. In addition to information about contracting directly with the Airports Authority, representatives from prime contractors will be available to provide information about their companies and how a contractor may qualify for business opportunities with their firms. Airports Authority Purchasing Representatives will also be available to discuss ongoing contract opportunities with the Airports Authority for suppliers, vendors and service-related companies. An Exhibit Hall will be featured at the Seminar.

The Authority proposes to revise its regulations to permit the carriage of weapons on the roadways and elsewhere on the public areas of the Airports. Consistent with the heightened security environment at the airports, the proposed regulation would continue to prohibit dangerous weapons from the terminals, the airfields, and buildings opening directly onto the airfields, provided that signs are posted giving the public notice of the regulation.

The law of the Commonwealth of Virginia permits a person to carry a gun in a way that is open and obvious or carry a gun that is concealed provided that the individual has a permit to carry a concealed weapon. That law has recently been amended to prohibit the carriage of guns into any air carrier (as distinguished from general aviation) airport terminal.

Said Mr. Bennett, "It is fortunate that we embarked on this expansion program at Dulles in recent years in light of the increase in passengers we see each day and the expected dramatic growth by the end of the summer. It is very important that we continue to invest in our airport facilities to keep our region well-served by the aviation industry."

Once in service, the automated Airport Train System will replace most of the current Mobile Lounges that transport passengers between the Terminal and Concourses. The train will operate on an underground dual track system. This first phase of the project will connect the Terminal to Concourses B and C. The stations will be located at convenient points along the concourses to minimize walking distances to the airline gates. The Main Terminal Station will be reached through two new spacious subsurface security screening areas. Once beyond security, passengers will be able to choose between a new passenger walkway to Concourses A or B (scheduled to open this November), or board the train system.

The project has been planned, in conjunction with the Transportation Security Administration, the agency responsible for staffing and operating security screening, to minimize the impact on passengers.

As part of this construction, passengers on arriving flights at Dulles will be directed to proceed directly to the Bag Claim Level once arriving at the Main Terminal via mobile lounges or through the Terminals' T-Gates. Those meeting incoming passengers at Dulles should wait on the lower level (Bag Claim) of the Airport near Bag Claim #7.

For the busy summer travel season, the Airports Authority plans to employ a number of customer service initiatives to help security screening procedures run more efficiently. At Dulles and Reagan National, there will be a number of Student Ambassadors who will inform passengers of the typical wait times at security, answer questions regarding security procedures and generally assist passengers with the screening process.

"This newly-enclosed walkway will give our customers a direct connection to the Terminal and protect them from the elements," said President/CEO James E. Bennett of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority. "Now both of our garages have convenient and enclosed walkways to the Terminal."

Daily Garage 1 has an underground connection with a moving walkway that brings patrons of the Garage under the roadway entrance and the Hourly Parking Lot directly into the lower level of the Terminal.

As passenger numbers continue to increase at the Airport, the parking lots and garages fill up regularly. The busiest days for the Daily Garages are Tuesday - Thursday and on Friday - Sunday the Economy Lot fills.

While extensive rehabilitation work has been performed on the pavement over time, total reconstruction is now required as a result of years of use since 1962 and the increase in aircraft traffic at the Airport.

Terminal B/C, also incorporates the work of 30 professional artists and artisans as a permanent part of its design. "We are happy to be able to showcase the work of young artists in the District of Columbia along with our own architectural enhancement program. This program has grown into a wonderful community event and this is the fifth consecutive year it's been held at the Airport," said James E. Bennett, president and CEO of the Airports Authority.

The Art Walk will offer a specialized tour of thirty commissioned pieces of art, which are found throughout the public concourse of Terminals B and C. A wide array of art is found in floor medallions, railing panels, murals, glass friezes, and sculptures. The works have been executed in stained glass, marble and glass mosaics, terrazzo, cast bronze, hammered aluminum and copper, painted steel, porcelain enamel and traditional paint on board and canvas.

James E. Bennett, President/CEO of the Airports Authority said, "Margaret McKeough is a talented and dynamic professional who has a proven track record managing key business programs at the Authority as well as leading us in improvements to our procurement programs, risk mitigation, and services we offer our customers. She has also led the Authority in very complex negotiations with our airline partners. I know she will bring energy and commitment to this new role."

Said Ms. McKeough on her appointment, "I thank the Board and Jim Bennett for their confidence in me, and I will work along with our excellent employees to continue to focus on ways that Reagan National and Dulles International Airports can be responsive to our customers and our community."

Ms. McKeough has served as Vice President for Business Administration since 1998. In that role she was responsible for managing several business functions including procurement, equal opportunity programs, concession and property development, risk management, administrative services and airline relations.

The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is expecting a busy summer season to start with spring travel in April. The Airports Authority is offering advice to area travelers coming to Ronald Reagan Washington National and Washington Dulles International Airports.

"We anticipate a strong spring travel season this year and ask our passengers to arrive early and be patient as we continue improvements at Dulles. At Reagan National, parking will be in high demand at certain times of the week. Planning ahead can make for an easier trip through our airports," says Airports Authority President/CEO James E. Bennett.

Passengers are encouraged to call ahead to check on the status of available parking at Reagan National Airport. Daily parking is most heavily used on Tuesdays and Wednesdays. Economy Parking is often full on the weekends. The spring break period during the week of April 4th may fill the parking facilities at Reagan National.

Place identification tags inside and outside of all of your baggage. Don't forget your laptop computer; be sure to put an i.d. label on the computer and the carrying case. Laptops must be removed from its case to pass through screening.

Travelers are urged to arrive at the airport at least 1  hours before domestic flights and 2  hours before international flights to allow enough time for ground transportation, parking, luggage check-in and security screening.

Travelers using National Airport often find Metro a good alternative to driving. The Airports Authority also encourages Dulles passengers to consider taking Metro to the West Falls Church Station and connecting to the Washington Flyer Bus to Dulles.

Travel wisely-- Carry medicine, cash, jewelry and other important valuables with you on the plane. If you leave your car at the airport, remove any valuables. Carry your purse and wallet securely, and keep your luggage and carry-on items in your sight at all times. Under security procedures unattended bags and other items will be confiscated and destroyed.

Reagan National Airport won first place in the category dealing with the most unique services. "We are honored to receive this award;" said James E. Bennett, CEO of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority, "we put a great deal of effort into designing food and retail programs for our airports that meet the needs of travelers."

"The ARN awards are a meaningful tribute to the enormous talent and passion of so many in the airport concessions industry," says Pauline Armbrust, publisher of ARN. "Airports and concessionaires have faced unprecedented challenges of late, yet so many of them excelled at elevating their programs and stores to ever higher quality standards."

The ARN Best Concessions awards are the airport concessions industry's most coveted because winning one affirms the highest standards of excellence. A panel of industry experts, a different group each year, votes on the stores, restaurants, and airport programs that have been nominated in an earlier process. The nominees were selected for their noticeably high standards of excellence in various airports.

During the month of December, the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority will sponsor a number of observances and events celebrating the world of aviation and specifically the history of aviation in our region. A highlight of the month of celebration will be "Customer Appreciation Day" on December 17th, the actual date of the first flight at Kitty Hawk, North Carolina, when Wilbur and Orville Wright launched their aircraft.

"But what is just as important as this great technological accomplishment is how interwoven aviation is into the very fabric of our world. Aviation is now an extremely important part of our individual lives, economy, society, and quality of life. That is also what we are celebrating this month."

The winning entries will be announced on December 11th in a special ceremony in the Terminal A Lobby. The first, second and third place winners will receive U.S. Savings Bonds in the amount of $500, $250 and $100 respectively and all will receive a replica of the Wright Flyer. Honorable mention winners will receive gift baskets from the airports' concessionaires.

On December 12th, airport concessions will provide a commemorative Centennial of Flight pin (while supplies last) for customers who purchase $7 or more at airport businesses.December 17th, the actual date of the first flight will be designated "Customer Appreciation Day" at Dulles and National Airports as part of a nation-wide airport recognition of their passengers. Wilbur and Orville Wright impersonators will hand out food and beverage coupons from 9 a.m.-noon at Reagan National and 2-5 p.m. at Dulles International Airports.

Travelers coming to Ronald Reagan Washington National and Washington Dulles International Airports this Thanksgiving should be prepared for security procedures and arrive early for their flight. The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is offering travel advice to area travelers.

"While frequent fliers may have become accustomed to federal security procedures, passengers who travel less often or who are accompanied by children should expect to spend extra time at the airport to check their bags and clear security checkpoints. In addition, we are seeing many more people using our airports. We advise travelers to come early and be prepared," says Airports Authority President/CEO James E. Bennett.

Make sure your suitcase can be examined by the security screenersConsider using the airline ticket kiosk if you have an e-ticket Be sure to have a boarding pass BEFORE you leave the ticketing area.because you must show it at the security screening checkpointPlace i.d. tags on the inside and outside of your checked baggage.A government-issued photo identification such as a driver's license or Passport is required of passengers over age 18.

Arrive early -- Travelers are urged to arrive at the airport at least 2 hours before domestic flights and 3 hours before international flights to allow enough time for ground transportation, parking, luggage check-in and security screening.

Call In Before Check-In: Call your airline's 800 number to confirm your flight or to verify security regulations related to checked baggage. Weather can greatly affect flight schedules. Snow and winter storms may cause delays or even cancellations so check the local weather forecasts and those for the destination to which you are traveling.

Take Metro -- Travelers using National Airport often find Metro a good alternative to driving. The Airports Authority also encourages Dulles passengers to consider taking Metro to the West Falls Church Station and connecting to the Washington Flyer Bus to Dulles.

Said James E. Bennett, President/CEO of the Airports Authority, "This is the thirteenth year we've held this event, and each year we are gratified by the number of local business people who we are able to meet and assist in finding out more about opportunities at Washington's airports."

The Seminar will provide information on upcoming contracting opportunities in construction as well as goods and services for the airports. In addition, representatives from prime contractors will be available to provide information about their companies and how a contractor may qualify for business opportunities with their firms. Airports Authority Purchasing Representatives will be available to discuss opportunities with the Authority for suppliers, vendors and service-related companies.

The program this year will include information sessions on the 12-18 month forecast of construction, goods and services and concession opportunities that are anticipated for the coming year at both Ronald Reagan Washington National and Washington Dulles International Airports with emphasis on the Dulles expansion program, called d2, over the next several years.

"These ratings demonstrate the confidence the financial industry has toward the operation of the Dulles and Reagan National airports," said James E. Bennett, President and CEO of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority. "Each agency pointed to our solid financial management and experienced senior management, as well as the strong air service market in the region to account for the positive ratings during this difficult time in aviation. We owe this reputation in large part to the leadership of our Board of Directors and the widespread support of our local community and businesses."

The ratings agencies generally base airport credit ratings on a broad range of criteria, including historic and projected air traffic demand, strength of the local economy, airline finances that serve the airport and the financial management of the airports. These ratings assigned to the Airports Authority bonds reflect the organization's capacity to meet the financial commitment on its debt obligations.

The Airports Authority is self-supporting, using aircraft landing fees and revenues from concessions to fund operating expenses. The Authority is not taxpayer-funded. Bonds issued by the Authority, Federal and State Airport Improvement Program funds, and Passenger Facility Charges fund the Capital Development Program.

A 13-member Board of Directors governs the Airports Authority with five members appointed by the Governor of Virginia, three by the Mayor of the District of Columbia, two by the Governor of Maryland and three by the President of the United States. The Authority operates the two-airport system under a lease with the federal government, which was originally a 50-year lease beginning in 1987 and was recently extended an additional 30 years to 2067.

In the spring of 2002, the FAA selected an EIS study team to assist the FAA in the evaluation of the potential environmental impacts of building and operating the new runways. As part of the ongoing EIS process, the team has completed its review of extensive data on the forecasts for passenger and cargo growth at IAD. The study team has also completed a preliminary evaluation of runway alternatives and developed information on the existing social, natural and physical environment in the EIS Study Area. The upcoming meetings will provide an opportunity for the FAA to share this information with the public and receive comments. Interested individuals, organizations and agencies are encouraged to participate in and provide feedback on this information. The presentations will be informal with the use of information stations.

Following the workshops, the study team will compile all comments and incorporate them into a Draft Environmental Impact Statement. Once the Draft EIS is released in Fall 2004, public hearings will be held to offer the public an opportunity to comment on the Draft EIS.

Beginning September 22nd, the passenger walkway bridge from Parking Garage 2 will be temporarily closed for improvements. The walkway bridge work will construct an overhead canopy enclosure to protect passengers from the outdoor elements. Please use the shuttle buses or the walkway detour on Level 1 of Garage 2 or consider using Parking Garage 1 and take advantage of the indoor moving sidewalk to the Terminal.Thank you for your patience as we improve our parking services.

Alexandria, VA- A recently-completed study conducted for the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority shows that Ronald Reagan Washington National and Washington Dulles International Airports generate over $9 billion for the local economy in combined direct airport spending and associated spending in the visitor industry and that the airports provide over 27,500 jobs at their facilities. Those airport employees earned neary $1.3 billion yearly.

Said James E. Bennett, President and CEO of the Airports Authority, " Washington's airports provide a very tangible economic benefit to our region in addition to the immeasurable value of connecting our area to the world and enabling us to travel conveniently for business and leisure.

"A significant message in these economic indicators is the strength of our region's market which has enabled the aviation industry to show some positive signs of recovery and which keeps our airports as important destinations for travelers."

The Airports generated business revenue of over $4.7 billion; employees and businesses at the airports paid $237 million in state and local taxes, and the federal government received $382 million in airport-specific taxes.

The Airports Authority's ongoing capital development construction program to expand Dulles continued through 2002 with an investment of $286 million. The additional importance of this construction to the local and regional economy is shown in the 2,317 jobs supported by the expansion and improvement projects.

In the current year of 2003, Dulles International Airport remains the fourth busiest U.S. gateway to Europe, a position it has held for the last three years. This continuing role as the region's international airport, along with new domestic service, requires the Airports Authority to continue to make improvements and build new facilities at Dulles.

This year a second parking garage was opened and preparatory work has begun for the construction of a station in the Terminal to serve the Airport Automated Train System that will one day replace the Mobile Lounges as the chief system of passenger transportation between the Terminal and the concourses.

This year alone, it is expected that $305 million will be spent on capital construction projects, and plans are underway for the Airports Authority to issue new bonds to fund the expansion program this fall.

Beginning on Tuesday, July 15th all passengers flying out of Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport will now be required by the Transportation Security Administration to show a boarding pass and photo identification at the security screening checkpoints.

This aircraft will be the first Concorde exhibited by a museum in the United States and is the oldest of five in the Air France fleet. The jet cruises at more than twice the speed of sound at around 1,350 mph, and at an altitude of up to 60,000 feet. A Concorde flight from Paris to Washington takes under four hours.

The Airports Authority has initiated a major update of the Noise Compatibility Study for the Airport. This study, conducted in accordance with the provisions of the Federal Aviation Administration's process, is designed to forecast future noise contours at Reagan National and to examine possible abatement and mitigation actions to reduce community noise impacts.

In the ancient Olympic tradition, the flame for the Special Olympics World Summer Games will be ignited by the rays of the sun, opposite the Acropolis in Athens, Greece. The Final Leg tradition is for law enforcement officers representing their state, province or nation, to act as "Guardians of the Flame" and carry the Special Olympics "Flame of Hope" to the Opening Ceremonies of the Special Olympics World Games. The Torch Run Final Leg is not only a salute to the athletes from around the world who will compete in the Special Olympics World Games, but also an honor for the participating law enforcement officers.

Taylor will be assigned to a team and share the running duties with other law enforcement representatives from the United States as well as other countries. Taylor's team's journey will take her from Athens, Greece to Gibraltar, Nice/Monaco, Milan, Lausanne, Paris, Brussels, London, Belfast, and many other locations throughout the Republic of Ireland until they reach Dublin, Ireland and turn over the "Flame of Hope" to a Special Olympic Athlete, signaling the start of the World Games.

It is the first time that the Special Olympics World Summer Games are being held outside the United States. The Games will be the largest sporting event in the world for 2003 with 7,000 Special Olympic athletes with learning disabilities participating from around the world.

All categories of airports - commercial, general aviation and military - throughout the United States and Canada compete for this award. Dulles was the winner of the Large Commercial Airport category with John F. Kennedy International Airport in New York and Boston Logan International Airport receiving honorable mention.

"This award demonstrates the dedication of our snow crews and outstanding efficiency of our operation," said James E. Bennett, President/CEO of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority. "During this very harsh winter season, our snow teams worked non-stop to battle the weather and continue safe and efficient operations at Dulles Airport. For the nomination of this award to come from the airport users and the aviation community is an added honor."

The airports submit applications for this prestigious award on behalf of their employees' efforts to keep the airport operationally safe throughout the season. Recommendations for the award come from users of airports, including: airlines, airline pilots, general aviation community, corporate pilots, the military and even non-airport staff such as hotel owners, parking lot and ground transportation operators, and chambers of commerce.

The judging takes into consideration: degree of preparation for snow removal; effectiveness of the program; timeliness and accuracy of communications during the storm and post-storm clean-up and critique.

Secretary of Transportation, Norman Y. Mineta has approved the extension of thirty years to the current 50-year lease the Airports Authority holds with the federal government to manage and improve Ronald Reagan Washington National and Washington Dulles International Airports.

The lease, which began in 1987, now will have a term of eighty years --with expiration in 2067. The Airports Authority and the U.S. Department of Transportation sought to extend the previous expiration date, 2037, because it would impact the Authority's ability to obtain traditional 30 year revenue bond financing. The new lease term will accommodate anticipated long term financing needs of the two airports as the Airports Authority proceeds with the d2 program for Dulles Airport and the completion of the renovation of the historic main terminal at Reagan National.

It will also facilitate the financing for other non-Airports Authority projects on Dulles Airport property such as the expansion of the privately owned Greenway and the continued funding for the construction of the National Air and Space Museum.

The federal law, which transferred the operation of the two Airports to the regional body, gives the Department of Transportation Secretary and the Airports Authority the legal authority to extend the lease through an amendment to the original law. This amendment will also require the signatures of the Governor of Virginia and the Mayor of the District of Columbia, which gives the approval of the entities that created the Authority by compact in 1987.

"We appreciate the support and expression of confidence by the federal government for the Airports Authority as we carry out the intent of the airports transfer and are looking forward to continuing to manage and improve these important aviation facilities, " said Jim Bennett, President/CEO of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority.

Traffic will reach the first level of Garage 1 from the main roadway entrance to the Airport. An additional entrance to the second level of the Garage can be reached from Aviation Drive which carries traffic past the Dulles Marriott Hotel. The Exit Plaza for Garage 1 is located on the second level.

The center tower elevator brings passengers to an enclosed moving pedestrian walkway which was constructed under the roadway entrance. A dedicated bus lane runs along the front of the garage, and bus stops are located adjacent to the ground level of each of the elevator towers. Smart Carte Rental racks are available in the garages.

The new daily garage will also allow passengers to take advantage of the Pay & Go express system. Drivers will be able to take their parking tickets with them and use the Pay & Go machines in the Terminal as they exit the building for a faster way to pay and exit the garage.

"Our goal is to show Washington, DC, and the nation, the magnitude of artistic achievement among our students," said Paula Sanderlin Dorosti, Art Content Specialist for DC Public Schools. The exhibit includes drawings, paintings, collages, prints, computer graphics, mixed media and three-dimensional constructions.

Terminal B/C, which opened in 1997, incorporates the work of 30 artists and artisans as a permanent part of its design. "We are very pleased to be able to showcase the work of young artists in the District of Columbia along with our own architectural enhancement program. This program has grown into a wonderful community event and this is the fourth consecutive year it's been held at the Airport," said James A. Wilding, president and CEO of the Airports Authority.

Also displayed in National's historic Terminal A are works of art by students at Carl Sandburg Middle School (Fairfax) with whom the Airports Authority has a School-Business Partnership and works by professional artists based at the Torpedo Factory in Alexandria.

"We have confidence that Jim Bennett will provide the leadership and management skills necessary to continue the strong legacy of aviation service the Airports Authority has provided to the Washington region and the travelers throughout the world who use our airports," said Norman M. Glasgow, Jr., the Chairman of the Board of Directors.

Said Mr. Bennett on his appointment, "I thank the Board for their confidence in me, and I want to assure them and the traveling public that the Airports Authority will keep focused on being an organization that provides a high level of service to the community. I know we will do this with the support of the excellent employees who work with me at Reagan National and Dulles International Airports."

Today, at the monthly meeting of the Board of Directors, James A. Wilding announced his retirement from the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority, which will take effect at the end of April of this year.

Said Airports Authority Chairman, Chip Glasgow, "Jim Wilding has personified excellence in both public service and business leadership, and his contributions to the state of aviation in the Metropolitan Washington Region benefit everyone who lives and visits our area. We are indebted to him for his many years of dedicated service and will be grateful for his legacy for years to come." Mr. Wilding's aviation career spans forty-three years - all of them at the Washington Airports.

During his tenure as President/CEO of the Airports Authority, he has overseen a massive capital development program at both airports totaling well over $3 billion dollars. Under his leadership, Reagan National Airport was modernized as a result of the new terminal building which opened in 1997 which also brought major improvements to traffic management on the airport as well as improved connections to the Metro system.

At Dulles, he directed the extensive growth during the l990's that required the expansion of the world famous Saarinen-designed Terminal, construction of new concourses and the building of the airport's first parking garages.

Mr. Wilding has served as the Chairman of the Airports Council International - North America, on the Board of Directors of the regional organization and on the Board of its worldwide parent based in Geneva, Switzerland. He has served as the President of the Aero Club of Washington and currently serves on the Policy Review Committee of the American Association of Airport Executives.

He has also been an active participant in regional affairs. Mr. Wilding has chaired the United Way Campaign of Arlington County Virginia. He is a member of the Economic Development Commission of Arlington County and has served on the Board of Directors as well as the Executive Committee of the Arlington County Chamber of Commerce. He has served on the Advisory Board of the Eno Transportation Foundation, and currently serves on the Board of the Washington, DC Convention and Tourism Corporation, on both the Board of Directors and Executive Committee of the Dulles Area Transportation Association, and has served on the Executive Committee of the Transportation Research Board.

Nearly 1.4 million passengers will be traveling through Ronald Reagan Washington National and Washington Dulles International Airports for the holiday season and knowing what to expect at the airport can help make for a smooth experience. The busiest days for travel will be December 20th-23rd for departure with the return trips spread out over several days with peak periods just before and just after the New Year.

At Dulles Airport, passengers will be required to have a boarding pass and photo ID to pass through security screening checkpoints. Tickets and ticket confirmation (such as an airline itinerary) will not be accepted at these checkpoints. Passengers must obtain a boarding pass at the airline ticket counter or a self-service ticket kiosk provided by some airlines.

Parking - At Dulles, there is ample Economy parking in lots located near the entrance to the Airport which provide the largest supply of spaces at the most economical rate. Free Airport shuttle buses operate between the economy lots to the terminals. For parking information at Dulles please call 703-572-4500.

Once the ticket is paid at the Pay & Go machine in the terminal, the customer will not have to stop at a cashier booth but can exit at the Pay & Go lanes with the paid ticket. Staff will be in the Terminal to assist drivers who wish to use the machines. Cashier lanes also remain available in all lots.

Check In Before Check-In: Call your airline's 800 number to re-confirm your flight or to answer questions about security regulations related to checked baggage. Weather can greatly affect flight schedules. Snow and winter storms may cause delays or even cancellations so check both the local weather forecasts and those for the destination to which you are traveling. A good source of air traffic delays around the country is the Federal Aviation Administration website, www.fly.faa.gov.

Being well aware of the financial difficulties the airline industry has been dealing with for some time, and of United's situation in particular, the Authority has taken several steps to reduce its costs and spending plans. These actions include scaling back by $1.5 billion our capital construction program at Dulles Airport with respect to facilities that would have increased United's financial obligations. For the second consecutive year, the Authority's Board of Directors has adopted an austere budget, which contains very limited increases to cover higher costs for security and insurance requirements, but just as importantly has not increased the airlines' costs to operate at our airports.

We will continue to work closely with United Airlines as they determine any restructuring or changes to service. The Authority remains confident in the strength of the Washington region's air travel market.

Speaking on behalf of United, Chris Bowers, the company's Senior Vice President of Marketing and Sales, said, "Regardless of the path we take to address our financial concerns, United will continue to fly and to deliver exceptional service to our customers worldwide. We remain committed to serving our passengers at Dulles and at the other airports serving the Washington Metropolitan region."

Thanksgiving travelers coming to Ronald Reagan Washington National and Washington Dulles International Airports will see some new security-related requirements. The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is offering travel advice to area travelers."This Thanksgiving travel season, the federal government will be in charge of passenger security screening at the nation's airports. It is always wise to allow extra time for traveling to the airport during this busy time, but in light of the new security procedures, we want travelers to come early and be prepared," says Airports Authority President/CEO James A. Wilding.

Airport users will have a convenient and comfortable train system that will handle more riders and move more efficiently than the current Mobile Lounges. The APM system will replace most of the current Mobile Lounges that transport passengers between the Main Terminal and midfield concourses and will reduce vehicular traffic on the airfield. The station locations in the concourses will also reduce walking distances. This first phase of the APM project will construct a connection from the Main Terminal to Concourses A, B and C and construct the eastern train alignment of what will eventually be a loop system at full build out. The stations will be located at convenient points along the concourses to minimize walking distances to the airline gates.

All public areas of the system will be fully accessible to the mobility impaired and disabled. The trains will be fully automated, without the need of drivers and will be operated from the APM Central Control Facility. The train will operate twenty-four hours a day, with the busiest time expected to be from 3:00 p.m. to 11:00 p.m.

It is expected that in this first phase, the system will provide capacity for six thousand five hundred fifty (6,550) passengers per hour per direction. The airport train system is schedule to begin service by late 2008.

The project team with SCOA as the prime contractor includes; Mitsubishi Heavy Industries, LTD. as the system integrator and vehicle manufacturer; Alcatel Transport Automation Solutions as the automatic train control supplier; and L.K. Comstock and Company Inc. as subsystem designers and site construction manager. Other subcontractors to Sumitomo include; Eastern Electrical, a Virginia based company which will provide electrical/communication installation; Prince Construction Co., Inc., a Washington DC based company, which will provide and install rebar and concrete; and VARCO/MAC, a Maryland based company, which will provide the power delivery for the system. Many other Local Disadvantaged and Minority-Owned Businesses in the region will also participate in the construction of the APM system.

Said James A. Wilding, President/CEO of the Airports Authority, "This is the twelfth year we've held this event. Each year we are gratified by the number of local business people who we are able to meet and assist to get more information about opportunities at our region's airports."

"This is a great opportunity for the Airports Authority to support an important program like Special Olympics Virginia and to open the airport to the community with displays and information about the world of aviation," says James A. Wilding, President and CEO of the Airports Authority and Chairman of the event.

For more information, log onto the event web site at www.planepull.com which is also linked through the Authority web site at www.mwaa.com. Individuals interested in volunteering for the event should call 1-877-874-7462.

The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority announces a new easy way to pay for parking at Washington Dulles International Airport. The new system, called Pay & Go will be available starting October 8th.

Said James A. Wilding, President/CEO of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority, "The new system will allow travelers to pay for parking inside the Terminal, using automated machines and exit the parking lots more quickly and easily. It's part of our continuing effort to make using our Washington airports as convenient as possible for our customers."

Starting on October 8th, drivers who park in the Daily Garage or the Hourly Lot will be able to take their parking ticket with them and use the Pay & Go payment machines in the Terminal as they exit the building.

Pay & Go Machines are located in the lower level of the Terminal near the east and west exit doors. There are also two machines on the pedestrian bridge, which connects the Terminal to the Daily Parking Garage.

Once the customer pays the ticket in the Pay & Go machine in the terminal, a new ticket will be provided. That ticket will be inserted in one of the machines at the special Pay & Go lanes at the exit plaza of the parking facilities, and the customer will not have to stop at a cashier booth.

Drivers will be introduced to the Pay & Go service by signs placed throughout the parking facilities and in the Terminal. Easy-to-find Pay & Go machines in the Terminal will be staffed the first few months that the service begins to assist drivers who wish to use the machines.

During this time, a helicopter will be moving a radar dome from atop the Air Traffic Control Tower at Reagan National Airport across the airfield to a new location for future installation. In addition, a cover for the tower roof will be moved in place via helicopter after the dome has been relocated. The two helicopter lifts are expected to take approximately 30 minutes.

All traffic will be detoured from the roadways in front of Terminals A, B and C to the roadway which passes in front of the parking garages. Both the upper and lower roadways in front of Terminal B and C and the roadway in front of Terminal A will be temporarily closed.

The pedestrian bridges from the Metro station and Parking Garages B and C will remain open, and passengers may walk to the terminals from those bridges. Likewise, the pedestrian tunnel connecting Garage A to Terminal A will remain open.

Motorists dropping passengers off for airlines located in Terminal B or C may either drop them off in front of the garages by the bus shelters or drive into the garages and exit for free within 20 minutes.

This year, the team from the Smithsonian Air and Space Museum took the crown as they pulled in a time of 7.43 seconds. Cisco Systems and Arlington County Police finished second and third respectively. Full results and raffle winners are listed on www.planepull.com.

The public is encouraged to join study engineers and planners from 5 p.m. to 8 p.m. to share thoughts about the upcoming Environmental Impact Statement (EIS) for the proposed new runway project at Washington Dulles International Airport. No formal presentation is planned.The purpose of the scoping workshop is to solicit public input on the preparation of an EIS for proposed new air-carrier runways and related improvements at Dulles. Scoping is an early and open process designed to determine the range of actions, alternatives, and potential impacts to be considered in an EIS, and to identify significant issues.

For those who may require special assistance with regard to access, sign interpretation or English translation to attend or participate in the meetings, please call Deborah Cordell at least 48 hours in advance of the meetings at 301-863-2474.

In addition to this EIS, there are several other environmental studies being undertaken by the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority. This notice is for the recently initiated EIS for new runways and associated improvements at Washington Dulles International Airport and is not associated with the ongoing Environmental Assessment (EA) for Tier 2 Improvements at the airport.

The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority invites the public to attend a Public Information Session on an environmental study for new projects at Washington Dulles International Airport. The purpose of the session is to provide the public an opportunity to review and comment on the Draft Environmental Assessment (EA) for a future new concourse, automated airport underground train system and other related projects at Dulles.

The new airport automated underground train system will connect the Concourses and the Terminal. The train system will be electric-powered and will substantially reduce the use of the existing Mobile Lounge service. The project will include six miles of tunnels, eight stations, and connections to the Terminal, to the concourses, and to a maintenance facility. Two separate train systems will eventually be constructed: one for domestic passengers and one for arriving international passengers.

All comments submitted to the Airports Authority during the Draft EA comment period will be considered by the Airports Authority in making decisions on the project and will be addressed in the Final EA.

Agencies, neighboring community groups and other members of the public are encouraged to attend the public information session and provide comments on alternatives described in the Draft EA. Copies of the Draft EA are available for review at several area libraries (see list on Authority website) as well as on the Airports Authority website at www.mwaa.com.

Said James A. Wilding, President/CEO of the Airports Authority, " Dulles is the international airport for the region, and we make it our priority to attract the international service that is important to our community. Air service to Latin America has been a special focus for the Airports Authority, and we are very pleased to announce these new flights.

"Dulles now offers service to 32 foreign destinations. Over the past ten years the number of international flights at the airport has more than doubled. This is extremely important to our region's economy, tourism, and our place in the world as the gateway to the Nation's Capital."

This year, Washington Dulles International Airport retained its status as the fourth busiest U.S. international gateway to Europe, just behind the two New York Airports and Chicago's O'Hare Airport. This significant accomplishment among all the airports in America takes on more importance in light of the impacts on the nation's airlines following September 11th. In the South American market, Dulles ranks 8th as an international gateway among U.S. airport. Both domestic and international carriers have returned service to Dulles Airport and added new routes both in the U.S. and internationally.

Lufthansa added a new destination, Dusseldorf, Germany to the Dulles roster in February. Both British Airlines and United Airlines have added more convenient daytime flights to London's Heathrow Airport.

The Airports Authority has worked with United Airlines to bring this additional Latin American service to the Washington region because of its importance to business and tourism but also because of the direct benefit it will provide to the significant Latin American population in the region. The 2000 Census shows that the Latin American population in the Washington-Baltimore combined standard metropolitan statistical area has increased 88%, to over a half a million residents, since 1990.

Dulles' geographic location in the mid-Atlantic region and easy connections to other U.S. and international cities has made the Airport an attractive market for airlines. This advantage contributes to the position of Dulles International Airport as global gateway.

The Airports Authority's ongoing construction program at Dulles is geared to continue to bring the needed facilities to the airport to maintain its reputation as an efficient hub and international gateway.

The Airports Authority was a key member of the Task Force that worked on this initiative to identify individuals who allegedly falsified information in order to obtain airport identification badges at Washington Dulles International or Ronald Reagan Washington National Airports or otherwise violated the law. It was through the efforts of the Airports Authority Police Department to review some 20,000 records for erroneous information that these individuals were identified.

Prior to this operation, the Airports Authority followed the requirements of the Federal Aviation Administration and conducted background checks that are authorized by federal law. Federal law does not allow airports to investigate or access information regarding social security and immigration and naturalization information provided by individuals seeking employment.

The critical element of this multi-jurisdictional effort over a five-month period was that the federal authorities enable the Airports Authority, for the first time, to match INS and Social Security information against the information on file at the Airports Authority.

Beginning in December of 2001, federal law required that all new employees be subject to fingerprinting and background checks. By December 6th of 2002, all airport employees are required to have a fingerprint-based criminal history check against FBI records.

This is one of the most intense, coordinated efforts to examine airport employee records to date, and one of several such enforcement actions taken by the federal government and participating airports around the country.

The Alexandria Chamber of Commerce recognized the Fire Department for its initial response and ongoing work at the site from September 11th - September 21st. A total of 112 Airports Authority emergency personnel worked at the Pentagon as part of the emergency response force.

In addition to fire suppression, search and rescue, and triage and transport operations, Authority personnel worked with other fire and rescue personnel from the region in planning, safety, logistics, and command functions.

As thousands of visitors fly Washington to attend the annual Cherry Blossom Festival, which will be celebrated from March 24th through April 8th, they will experience their first blossom experience at the Ronald Reagan Washington National and Washington Dulles International Airports.

The Airports Authority joins the annual festival with it's own landscaping program at Reagan National Airport. Five Yoshino cherry blossom trees, similar to the variety at the Tidal Basin, are planted near Terminal A.

Said Mr. Wilding, "This is a day we've all been looking forward to, when our customers can have convenient daily parking in a garage near the Terminal. And it's just the beginning for improved parking services. We will open a second garage later this summer."

The five-story $45 million garage was designed by URS Corporation and built by Turner Construction Company, and will provide airport customers with 3,700 daily parking spaces. A second five-story garage will provide an additional 4,700 spaces later this summer. Both garages were constructed of poured-in-place, post-tensioned concrete, and have a precast concrete exterior.

Customers can also walk to the Baggage Claim Level from the ground floor of the garage. smartecarte machines will be located on each level of the garage for customer convenience. The Airport will also provide free, dedicated shuttle bus service between the Terminal and the garage for those drivers who prefer to ride.

The garage is equipped with an automated space counting system, which indicates how many open spaces are available on each level of the garage. The signs, which provide this information, are located at the top of the ramps at each level of the garage.

The recent Thanksgiving holiday season proved to be a busy time at Washington Dulles International Airport this year and it is estimated that the Christmas travel season will attract passengers to the airport as well. At Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport, the limited operations during Thanksgiving greatly reduced the usual number of travelers.

"We are looking forward to serving the traveling public this season at our two airports," says Airports Authority President/CEO James A. Wilding, "and we want to make the trip through our facilities as smooth as possible."

Leave early. Airline and airport officials urge travelers to arrive at the airport 2 hours in advance of domestic flights and 3 hours in advance of international flights at Dulles to allow time for ground transportation, parking, luggage check-in and security screening.

Pack wisely. Limit carry on items that may be in question. Only 1 carry on bag and one personal item will be allowed through security. Do not pack sharp items. Expect to have any carry-on items scrutinized and do not gift-wrap presents that you plan to take. Electronic equipment will also be examined carefully and laptop computers must be removed from carrying cases.

Keep an eye on the weather. Weather can greatly affect flight schedules. Snow and winter storms may cause delays or even cancellations so check both the local weather forecasts and those for the destination to which you are traveling. The Airports Authority website, provides information on flights for a two hour time block. Another good source of air traffic delays around the country is the Federal Aviation Administration website, www.fly.faa.gov.

The lot in front of the Terminal offers only Hourly and Valet parking. Pedestrians will also see new walkways to the Terminal and new waiting areas for ground transportation. Daily parking is located east of the Terminal but that lot fills quickly. There is ample Economy parking in lots located near the entrance to the Airport which provide the largest supply of spaces at the most economical rate. Free airport shuttle buses operate between the economy lots to the terminals. For parking information at Dulles please call 703-572-4500.

Park for 20 minutes free when meeting passengers. Those dropping off or meeting incoming passengers can park for free for 20 minutes in the hourly parking lots at both airports. If you wish to drop off or pick up passengers along the curbside at the airport, be aware that unattended vehicles will be ticketed and towed and lingering at the curb will not be allowed.

Take Metro. Travelers using Reagan National Airport often find Metro a good alternative to driving. The Airports Authority also encourages Dulles passengers to consider taking Metro to the Metro West Falls Church Station and connecting to the Washington Flyer Bus to Dulles.

Be prepared for higher security measure. Airlines require seeing a government-issued photo I.D., such as a driver's license or passport for passengers over age 18 before going through airport security screening. Your ID may be checked at the ticket counter, security screening and airline boarding gate.

New requirements this season Only passengers with airline tickets will be permitted through the security screening area. People who accompany small children or passengers who need medical assistance may make arrangements with the airline.

Keep valuables with you. Carry medicine, cash, jewelry and other important valuables with you on the plane. Have identification tags on the outside and inside of your luggage; these tags are available at the airline ticket counters although it will save time to do this before you arrive. If you leave your car at the airport, remove any valuables. Carry your purse and wallet securely, and keep your luggage and carry-on items in your sight at all times. For security reasons unattended bags and other items will be confiscated and destroyed.

Ms. Lewis also serves on several Boards of Directors of national and local health care organizations including the Board of Trustees of the American Hospital Association. She also serves on the Board of Governors of the Philadelphia Stock Exchange. She retired in 1997 from the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission after serving for 12 years as Assistant Director , Division of Investment Management.

Norman M. Glasgow, Jr. was also elected Vice Chairman last year and has served on the Board of Directors since 1993. He is a Partner and member of the Executive Committee of the law firm of Wilkes, Artis, Hedrick & Lane, specializing in general real estate, particularly zoning, land use, building code and historic preservation law. He has served as Chairman of the Authority's Finance Committee. He was appointed by the Governor of Maryland.

Today the Secretary of Transportation, Norman Mineta, announced 18 additional destinations that will receive air service to and from Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport starting as soon as Friday, October 26th, pending the implementation of further enhanced security measures at all airports serving Reagan National Airport.

The Airports Authority looks forward to future announcements from the Federal Government to further return to service the remaining scheduled flights which the Airport accommodated prior to September 11th.

This is welcome news to the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority and the thousands of individuals who work at Reagan National Airport. We will work with the airlines and the businesses at the Airport to ensure that all the necessary security and operational actions are taken to enable us to return to business as outlined by the President.

The organization has provided services at both Dulles and Ronald Reagan Washington National Airports for over 35 years. Travelers Aid volunteers provide assistance with general information about the airport facilities, directions to ground transportation, and connect travelers with special assistance if necessary.

Currently there are over 250 volunteers who serve flexible four-hour shifts at the two airports. Dulles International Airport will be expanding the Travelers Aid services to accommodate the thousands of U.S. and international passengers who use the airport daily.

This recruitment campaign is geared toward attracting people who have a few hours a week to spend helping travelers at the airport. Volunteers who are bilingual are also in high demand at Dulles International.

The volunteer drive will continue through the month of September with training classes in October. Anyone interested in finding out more about becoming an airport volunteer is asked to call Travelers Aid at 703-572-7350.

The AEDs are placed in highly visible locations throughout the airports in clearly marked cabinets that have a picture of a heart and say Automatic External Defibrillator. Members of the general public who have already received training on the AED will now have access to the defibrillators should an emergency occur. Instructions are included with each AED along with pictures to guide users through the steps.

Each year, 350,000 people in the U.S. are victims of sudden cardiac arrest with only about 5% of them surviving, largely because defibrillators did not reach the victims in time. Most of these sudden cardiac arrest victims have ventricular fibrillation, which is an abnormal, chaotic heart rhythm, which prevents the heart from pumping blood to the body and the brain. The AED equipment allows the user to defibrillate the victim immediately and allow a normal heart rhythm to resume. In an emergency situation, such as cardiac arrest, seconds count; the ability to respond quickly can save lives. Every day, over 100,000 people pass through Dulles and National Airports. The availability of these machines at the airports is an added safety feature.

The installation of the AEDs is an additional way the Airports Authority is working to protect the safety and well-being of airport employees and the over 36million visitors and travelers who come to our airports each year.

This Outreach Seminar is one of several ongoing programs to ensure that local business operators and entrepreneurs have the information and access they need to participate in the opportunities that exist at Washington Dulles and Reagan National Airports.

Any person interested in owning and operating an airport retail or food & beverage concept is invited to participate in this event. Call 703/572-6080 for more information and reservations. Reservations may be placed online at airports@westfield.com.

This significant designation reinforces Dulles place among the top airports in the country providing international air service across the Atlantic Ocean and underscores its role as a major gateway to the U.S. from Europe. This is the first time that Dulles has reached the rank of fourth largest transatlantic gateway.

Dulles service to transatlantic destinations has increased over last summer resulting in eighteen additional departures a week with 3,176 more seats. Overall, Dulles offers 187 weekly transatlantic departures and more than 51,000 seats providing nonstop service across the Atlantic Ocean.

More than 300 works of art by students in District of Columbia public schools will be on exhibit in Terminal B/C at Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport during the month of April. The theme, Soaring in 2001, will be reflected in the work from 100 elementary, middle, junior, and senior high schools throughout the city. The exhibition will be on display in the ground level of Terminals B and C where the baggage carousels are located.

The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is expecting heavy travel during the upcoming holiday period and is urging passengers or those meeting them to call ahead to check on the status of available parking at Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport.

Travelers may also want to consider using Metro as an easy alternative to driving and parking at the Airport over this holiday period. Other alternatives include the Washington Flyer express bus service, or the SuperShuttle.

This is the seventh year that the Authority Police Department has been involved in this program and they have raised roughly $15,000 for Special Olympics. For this event, a number of police officers along with Special Olympics athletes will be assisting Red Lobster employees in serving meals to customers.

The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority will sponsor a Job Fair in conjunction with the District of Columbia Department of Employment Services on Tuesday, March 27th. This event will provide information to District residents about job opportunities at Washington Dulles International and Ronald Reagan Washington National Airports.

This special event is designed to highlight the range of employment options at Washingtons airports which include: food and retail sales; electrical and other skilled trade positions; grounds keeper; baggage handler; administrative and clerical; and security positions.

The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is pleased to announce the new "Art and Architecture in the Airport" tour program for Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport. This program will offer a specialized tour of 30 pieces of art which are incorporated into the architectural structure of the Airport.

The "Art and Architecture in the Airport" tour will be led by seasoned art docents from local Washington museums such as the Smithsonian National Museum of American Art, Corcoran and others. Tours will be conducted Monday through Friday between the hours of 10:00 a.m. and 2:00 p.m. They can be modified in length based on group needs.

The works of the 30 different artists are in a variety of forms and are found throughout National's terminal. They include floor medallions, railing panels, murals, window wall glass friezes, and sculptures. The individual works have been executed in a variety of materials such as stained glass, marble and glass mosaics, terrazzo, cast bronze, hammered aluminum and copper, painted steel, porcelain enamel, and traditional paint on board and canvas. The marriage of art and architect at National's terminal provides a colorful and memorable visual experience.

In the year 2000, Washington Dulles International Airport is expected to break an all-time record at the airport for international passengers. More than 4 million travelers used Dulles International in 2000. This represents a 13 per cent increase over 1999 and is the result of a focused effort to attract new international carriers and to encourage existing carriers to add more service for the Washington region.

"This continued growth in international passengers, and exciting developments in new international service for next year, clearly shows Dulles' role as the major mid-Atlantic gateway for international service," said James A. Wilding, President and CEO of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority. "We will continue to work to increase options for international travel. Our building program to improve the facilities at Dulles will make the airport even more attractive to airlines and passengers alike."

Currently, sixteen airlines at Dulles provide flights to 30 foreign cities with nearly 270 weekly international departures. This is in addition to the fourteen domestic airlines at Dulles, which provide service to 75 U.S. destinations.

International air service is a major element for successful airports, represents both employment and tourism opportunities and brings needed connections to the business community. The growth of the high tech businesses along the Dulles Corridor has been aided by the service at Dulles for both passengers and cargo on international aircraft.

For the first time, there will be capital-to-capital service beginning on March 25, 2001, when Lufthansa German Airlines starts service to Berlin with six flights per week from Dulles. According to Thomas Winkelmann, Lufthansa's Vice President, the Americas, Lufthansa is embarking on the long-awaited nonstop U.S. connection to Berlin partly because of the increasing demand as a result of the move to Berlin by the German government.

Winkelmann says interest in the route from the North American side has been high. "We're glad that economic circumstances have finally made it possible to offer this highly anticipated service", said Winkelmann.

Starting on April 30, 2001, there will be a new route to the United Kingdom from Dulles when British Midland inaugurates daily service to Manchester, England. According to British Midland Chairman, Sir Michael Bishop, "The introduction of these services to Washington DC represents a major step forward in opening up key American business destinations to genuine competition from Britain's regional airports. This is great news for our transatlantic air travelers from Manchester. We look forward to bringing similar benefits of competition to transatlantic customers from London Heathrow in the near future."

Scandinavian Airlines (SAS) will begin service to Copenhagen, Denmark, in May. The airline will offer five flights a week initially and is expected to expand to daily service in June. This opens a new European market to area travelers who can make connections on SAS to other European cities. This is the first airline service from Washington to Copenhagen, which boasts the third largest European pharmaceutical and biotechnology region, and gives the Washington metropolitan region more direct access to Scandinavia and Eastern Europe.

Thanksgiving week starts the holiday season, which is expected to bring more travelers to Ronald Reagan Washington National and Washington Dulles International Airports. The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is offering travel advice to area travelers.

"More people are flying than ever before and the holiday season brings more crowded conditions to airports. It is always wise to allow extra time for traveling to the airport and check-in with the airlines," says Airports Authority President/CEO James A. Wilding.

Leave early -- Airline and airport officials urge travelers to arrive at the airport at least 1  hours in advance of domestic flights and 3 hours in advance of international flights to allow time for ground transportation, parking, luggage check-in and security screening. Holiday traffic increases at National and Dulles Airports add congestion to the curb lanes in front of airport terminals. In addition, plan extra time to find parking spaces since the lots and garages will be crowded (see "Parking"). Be prepared before you arrive at the ticket counter. Airlines require photo identification of passengers over age 18. Many airlines request a government-issued photo I.D., such as a driver's license or passport. Airline and security screening procedures may also take extra time to accommodate the increased number of travelers. Expect to have any carry-on items scrutinized and avoid wrapping presents that you plan to take through airport security screening since you may be asked to unwrap the gifts. Electronic equipment will also be examined carefully.

Parking - There have been changes to the Terminal parking lot at Dulles Airport. The lot in front of the Terminal offers only Hourly and Valet parking. Daily parking is located east of the Terminal but that lot fills quickly. There is ample Economy parking in lots located near the entrance to the Airport which provide the largest supply of spaces at the most economical rate. Free airport shuttle buses operate between the economy lots to the terminals. For parking information at Dulles please call 703-572-4500.

Keep an eye on the weather: Weather can greatly affect flight schedules. Snow and winter storms may cause delays or even cancellations so check both the local weather forecasts and those for the destination to which you are traveling. The Airports Authority website, www.mwaa.com, provides information on flights for a two hour time block. Another good source of air traffic delays around the country is the Federal Aviation Administration website, www.fly.faa.gov.

Travel safely -- Carry medicine, cash, jewelry and other important valuables with you on the plane. Have identification tags on the outside and inside of your luggage; these tags are available at the airline ticket counters although it will save time to do this before you arrive. If you leave your car at the airport, remove any valuables. Carry your purse and wallet securely, and keep your luggage and carry-on items in your sight at all times. For security reasons unattended bags and other items will be confiscated and and destroyed.

Don't forget the Shopping: This is the season for gift-giving, and if you have extra time at the airport remember to visit the variety of stores or enjoy a meal before your flight. For dining and gift ideas, pick up the Holiday Gift Guide located in directories throughout the airports.

Dulles Airport was the fastest growing major airport in the world in 1999 with a 26% increase in the number of passengers. The number of passengers flying on international flights increased nearly 13% that year. The Airports Authority Board of Directors recently approved a $3.4 billion construction program to expand facilities at the airport.

Norman M. Glasgow, Jr. is currently Chairman of the Planning Committee and has served on the Board of Directors since 1993. He is a Partner and member of the Executive Committee of the law firm of Wilkes, Artis, Hedrick & Lane, specializing in general real estate, particularly zoning, land use, building code and historic preservation law. He has served as Chairman of the Authoritys Finance Committee. He was appointed by the Governor of Maryland.

One garage, which will be built directly north of the Terminal, will be connected via an underground passenger walkway with moving sidewalks. The construction of that walkway, along with other improvements in front of the Terminal, will require the closure of Daily parking in that lot.

Starting September 15th, the Terminal lot will be used for Hourly parking and Valet parking for those customers who are parking for a brief time to drop off or pick up passengers or who wish to drop off their vehicles at valet parking.

Beginning on September 8th, and continuing through September 22nd, motorists exiting the Terminal parking lot will be given information to enable them to receive one free day of parking in the Economy lots on the airport. This offer will be good throughout the year 2000. There is ample parking in the Economy lots, and the airport wants to encourage travelers to use those facilities. The airport also plans to increase the frequency of the airport parking shuttle buses that serve the Economy lots during this period of garage construction.

This garage construction project is designed for travelers who drive to the airport and want covered parking. The spaces will be used for Daily parking which is the most needed service at the airport.

In addition to the permanent art which is part of the architecture of Terminal B/C which displays the work of thirty local and national artists, there are three separate art displays and a permanent historical exhibit available to the public.

The archeological display includes artifacts discovered on the site of the former Colonial plantation (where the airport now stands) called Abingdon. Abingdon was the home of George Washington's granddaughter and other prominent families in the area.

There is also a display on this history of National Airport The lobby below the Exhibit Hall also features a display of aerial photographs dating from 1938 to 1998 which show the development of the airport over the years.

The Continental Airlines gate area, located between Terminal B and Terminal A features an unusual display called the Flight Centennial Collection which blends aviation technology with art to commemorate the 100th anniversary of powered flight that will be celebrated in 2003.

The hallway in Terminal A leading to the gates for Northwest, ATA, Midway and TWA Airlines contains a display of art sponsored by the Friends of the Torpedo Factory Art Center which is located in Alexandria, Virginia. The range of art includes paintings, pottery, jewelry and clothing and is for sale. The display changes quarterly.

Finally, a display of art by the students from Carl Sandburg Middle School in Fairfax County, Virginia, hangs on the walls of the space formerly occupied by American Airlines which moved to Terminal B/C.

Today the Board of Directors of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority gave approval for a major capital development program over the next several years to build new facilities at the airport including an underground rail system, additional public parking, a new concourse and a new runway.

Said Board Chairman, David T. Ralston, Jr., "We are taking a comprehensive approach in shaping the future of Dulles. Aviation is the most dynamic transportation system in the world and brings immense benefits to our community. We have to keep pace with the service demands of the region, and the sooner we begin this next phase of improvements the sooner the Greater Washington Region can have the use of these new facilities."

This event is open to persons interested in owning and operating an airport retail or food concept. Call 703/572-6080 for reservations. Reservations can also be placed on line at airports@westfield.com.

Bolstered by an 18 percent increase in weekly international departures this year over 1999, Washington Dulles International Airport ranks fifth in the nation for transatlantic service this summer, according to analysis prepared by Simat, Hellienson and Eichner (SH&E), an aviation consulting firm.

Dulles service to these transatlantic destinations has increased significantly since last summer -- 18% additional departures a week with 16.5% more seats. The average increase for all U.S. airports was 7%. Dulles offers 169 weekly transatlantic departures and more than 48,000 weekly seats providing nonstop service to various destinations across the Atlantic Ocean.

A car show featuring antiques, hot rods, motorcycles and other vintage vehicles will be sponsored by Rosenthal Automotive and Mobile Speedpass. There will also be a hair cut-a-thon sponsored by Hair Cuttery. Festival patrons can get $5 haircuts with 100% of the proceeds going to Special Olympics Virginia.

Said Airports Authority Executive Vice President James E. Bennett, "The new roadway configuration will greatly enhance safety for those using the Mount Vernon Trail through the airport grounds and improve the efficiency of vehicle movement on airport grounds. We are pleased to make these important pedestrian improvements and have worked in close cooperation with the National Park Service on this project which brings recreational and safety benefits to the community and the Mount Vernon Trail users." The construction cost of the two bridges and other pedestrian improvements was approximately $2 million.

Police and board member of Virginia Special Olympics. "Special Olympics has been a special charity for our police officers and we all are happy to get involved in events like the Torch Run, Plane Pull and this event."

Business Administration Committee selected the contractor to provide taxicab service at Washington Dulles International Airport. Dulles Taxi Systems, Inc. of Arlington, VA was selected. The company will begin operating taxi service this Spring.

The three-year contract has a single two-year renewal option. Approximately one out of five passengers at Washington Dulles International Airport uses a taxicab. This represents nearly 1.5 million passengers every year.

Provide a core fleet of cabs under the brand of "Washington Flyer", and a fleet of non-Flyer taxicabs that together will ensure that on-demand service will be provided 24 hours a day, seven days a week, at the airport to provide timely service to the public.

Respond to the changing patterns of travel caused by weather impacts or new air service to ensure that the appropriate number of cabs are available to meet passenger needs by meeting the on-demand service standard for both short and long-haul taxicab trips.

The contract was awarded based on the following criteria: operating plan; management plan; non-Washington Flyer fleet plan; industry experience and qualifications; disadvantaged business involvement; the financial offer, and capital improvements in the taxicab facilities.

In a related matter, the Airports Authority also announced its plan to create an Advisory Taxicab Panel which will review the handling of customer and taxicab driver complaints about the Dulles Airport taxicab system. The panel will have members representing the Airports Authority, the traveling public, taxicab drivers at Dulles, and the taxicab concession contractor.

Dulles posted a 25.8% growth rate throughout 1999 which has also made it the fastest growing airport among the 30 largest U.S. airports. This double-digit rate is dramatic in comparison with the North American annual airport growth rate of 4.0% and the worldwide growth rate of 5%.

We have invested almost one billion dollars in improving and adding capacity to our facilities, but that is only the beginning. The next six years at Dulles will bring significant changes and improved customer service."

Last year, the Airports Authority Board of Directors approved the concept for an underground rail system on the airport which will eventually replace the current "mobile lounge" people movers that travel above ground across the airfield from the terminal to the concourses. The increase in additional flights at the airport and the introduction of service by new airlines requires construction of additional concourses and aircraft gates and airfield improvements as well. In addition to the 8,000 new parking spaces the Airports Authority added in 1999, design is underway for the construction of the first parking garage at Dulles.

The Best Overall Program award was based on offering a broad variety of concessions with national and local flavor. The Best Design award was given for overall appearance, visibility and accessibility to passengers. The Most Innovative Services award was earned for the range of technology in types of services and the location of services, as well as staff availability and knowledge.

James A. Wilding, "We are extremely pleased with this recognition. The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority has incorporated improved customer services into our extensive construction program at Dulles and National, and our staff have worked hard with our partners Host Marriott Services and Westfield Corporation Inc., who operate our food and retail concessions, to offer a wide variety of services."

Memorial Parkway on Tuesday, February 1, 2000. At that time, the new ramp will take northbound traffic onto the airport and merge with southbound Parkway traffic which uses the main entrance to the airport. This will give drivers one, direct route to the terminals and parking garages.

The overall project also includes the construction of two bridges which will raise the Mount Vernon Trail above the new roadway and the existing roadway at the north exit from the airport. Bicyclists, joggers and pedestrians will no longer have to cross in front of airport traffic at these two busy airport roadways to continue on the popular Trail that runs along the Parkway between Rosslyn and Mount Vernon.

Said Airports Authority President/CEO James A. Wilding, "The new roadway configuration will greatly improve the efficiency of vehicle movement on airport grounds and enhance safety for those using the Mount Vernon Trail near the airport. We are pleased to make these important traffic and pedestrian improvements and have worked in close cooperation with the National Park Service on this project which brings recreational and safety benefits to the community and the Mount Vernon Trail users."

In addition to the new airport entrance and the two new bridges, the project also includes a new entrance ramp to the third level of Parking Garage A for rental car customers and improvements to the pedestrian entrance to Garage A.

The rate adjustment is designed to encourage drivers who plan to leave their vehicles at the airport for two days or more to take advantage of the Economy parking; thereby freeing up more spaces in the Daily parking for short-term stays.

Traveling Over the Holidays? Airport TipsThanksgiving week, and the holiday season which follows, are expected to bring more travelers to Ronald Reagan Washington National and Washington Dulles International Airports. The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is offering travel advice to area residents.

"The holiday season brings more crowded conditions to our airports so it may be wise to allow extra time for parking and check-in to ensure a smooth trip," says Airports Authority President/CEO James A. Wilding.

Travel Safely -- Carry medicine, cash, jewelry and other important valuables with you on the plane. Have identification tags on the outside and inside of your luggage; these tags are available at the airline ticket counters although it will save time to do this before you arrive. If you leave your car at the airport, remove any valuables. Carry your purse and wallet securely, and keep your luggage and carry on items in your sight at all times. Unattended bags and other items will be confiscated and and destroyed and may require the evacuation of the airport facilities.

Keep an eye on the Weather: Weather can greatly affect flight schedules. Snow and winter storms may cause delays or even cancellations so check both the local weather forecasts and those for the destination to which you are traveling.

Airport for the holidays. There is a wide range of pricing for parking at the airports. Economy or Remote parking is the most economical. Free airport shuttle buses operate between the economy and remote lots to the terminals.

"Sabena and BWIA are great additions to our blue chip roster of international carriers. The service these carriers bring to our region is important as we continue to meet the needs of the traveling public and shippers. Sabena brings its extensive network in Europe, Africa and the Middle East. BWIA offers three outstanding Caribbean destinations that travelers will enjoy."

The study, based on 1998 statistics, provides a quantitative analysis of the benefits associated with operation of the two airports, which served nearly 32 million passengers and moved 878.5 million pounds of air freight that year.

In the intervening years since the previous study was conducted, business revenue increased by $1 billion to an all time high of $6.5 billion; state and local taxes, paid by employees and businesses at the airports, increased by more than $30 million to $230 million and the federal government received $505 million in airport-specific taxes -- a $104 million increase.

Air cargo activity is also on the upswing, particularly at Dulles Airport which handles eighty-nine per cent of cargo for the Washington airports. The value of air freight handled at Dulles each year is estimated at $12.4 billion.

In addition to an Exhibit Hall and Business Card Exchange, panel discussions with Authority prime contractors and subcontractors will provide tips on how to compete for and manage construction and goods and services contracts at the Airports.

Washington Dulles International Airport, and Chateauroux-Deols Airport in France joined together today at the French Embassy for the official signing in the United States of an air cargo alliance agreement. This agreement is the first step in the creation of a worldwide organization of airports joining together to promote and develop their air cargo and logistics businesses.

Manager of Chateauroux Airport, represents an innovative approach to air cargo development. The agreement is intended to: raise awareness of air cargo users of the advantages of shipping via airport alliance partners; develop additional cargo-aviation business alliances; attract new cargo services, and set uniform service standards among alliance partners.

The alliance partners will participate in joint marketing/promotional events, shared business development, initiate an educational program with participating airports, and establish a web site on the Internet.

Ultimately, the goal for the Airport Air Cargo Alliance will be to involve a wide representation of international airports, said Mr. Wilding, "As we bridge the oceans with this agreement, we hope to initiate the creation of a global network of airports dedicated to air cargo development."

Virginia. It truly represents all the hard work and caring that has gone into this event as well as the contributions from the surrounding community," said Joseph Hurtuk, Deputy Chief, MWAA Police, also known as the "father of the Plane Pull."

A variety of planes are on display for visitors, including military, commercial and civilian aircraft. There is a police badge and patch collectors show and a special Kids Korner featuring a moon bounce, ball crawl, face painting, balloon sculpturing and games. Airport police and other public safety agencies provide demonstrations of equipment and K-9 dog team demonstrations.

Visitors also have a chance to win fabulous prizes, including free movie tickets from AMC Theatres, airline tickets, and a chance to win a three-year lease on a new automobile from Rosenthal Automotive.

A new traffic lane has been added to the circular entrance roadway in front of the terminal to increase roadway capacity. Drivers will now have the use of two lanes to reach the ticket counter level of the terminal. This new lane along with new overhead directional signs will help drivers find the correct lanes to drop off or pick up passengers as they approach the terminal. The project is designed to help relieve congestion in front of the terminal during peak travel hours.

"This is a great opportunity for Dulles Airport to support an important program like the Virginia Special Olympics and to open the airport to the community with displays and information about the world of aviation," says Keith Meurlin, Dulles Airport Manager.

Dulles Day not only features the annual Plane Pull, but offers activities for all ages. A car show featuring antiques, hot rods, motorcycles and other vintage vehicles will be sponsored by Rosenthal Automotive and Geico Direct.

A variety of planes will be on display for visitors, including military, commercial and civilian aircraft. There will be a police badge and patch collectors show and a special Kids Korner featuring a moon bounce, ball crawl, face painting, balloon sculpturing and games. Airport police and other public safety agencies will provide demonstrations of equipment and K-9 dog team demonstrations. Visitors will also have a chance to win fabulous prizes, including free movie tickets from AMC Theatres, airline tickets, and a chance to win a three-year lease on a new automobile from Rosenthal Automotive.

The facility, Concourse A, replaces the temporary gates on the lower level of the main terminal. The new 70,000 square foot regional concourse has 12 gates to accommodate 36 aircraftincluding regional jets. Concourse A is attached to Concourse B by an enclosed pedestrian bridge with moving sidewalks. Concourse B opened in early 1998 and houses several international and domestic airlines and offers a variety of shops and eateries. Concourse A will provide a food court with a bar, restaurant, newsstand and coffee bar. There will be an executive lounge for United Express customers.

Said James A. Wilding, President and CEO of the Airports Authority, "This is an important next step in our ongoing expansion of Dulles Airport. In this project, weve been able to provide more facilities for aircraft operations while also greatly improving the services and amenities for passengers who fly on regional aircraft."

Atlantic Coast Airlines serves as the regional airline for United Airlines providing service to over 2.5 million passengers a year connecting on United Airlines flights at Dulles. Passengers reach Concourse A via mobile lounges operating from the main terminal as well as from Concourse C and D where United Airlines operates.

Atlantic Coast, the second busiest carrier at Dulles following United Airlines, has recently added service to new destinations and continues to introduce regional jet service to new and existing markets.

Last year, Dulles served nearly 16 million passengers; two million additional passengers over the previous year. The first two months of 1999 has produced more than a 20% increase in passenger numbers compared to 1998 and projections estimate that 20 million passengers will use Dulles by the end of this year.

Authority has announced the start of construction to improve the bicycle and pedestrian paths in and around Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport and to build a new vehicular entrance to the airport.

The project includes the construction of a new entrance to the airport from the northbound George Washington Memorial Parkway coming towards the airport from Alexandria; separation of pedestrian and bicycle traffic from vehicular traffic with the building of two bridges on the Mount Vernon Trail, and a new entrance ramp to the third level of Parking Garage A for rental car returns.

Bicyclists, joggers and pedestrians will no longer have to wait for a break in airport traffic to continue on the pathway that runs along the G.W. Parkway near the Potomac River. Motorists returning rental cars will have a special entrance to avoid merging with motorists going to Parking Garage A, and the airport shuttle buses will drop passengers directly in front of Garage A.

Airport, and Chateauroux-Deols Airport in France joined together in an air cargo alliance agreement. This agreement is the first step in the creation of a worldwide organization of airports joining together to promote and develop their air cargo and logistics businesses.

Gerbaud, President of the Chateauroux-Deols Airport, represents an innovative approach to air cargo development. The agreement is intended to: raise awareness of air cargo users of the advantages of shipping via airport alliance partners; develop additional cargo-aviation business alliances; attract additional cargo services, and set service standards among alliance partners.

Authority, "Dulles is truly now beginning to fulfill its potential. We are entering an exciting and very challenging period in aviation growth and air service to the Washington region, and it will take all of our planning and management skills to prepare our facilities at Dulles to take full advantage of these opportunities."

In 1997, the growth line began its sharp ascent when Dulles served one million additional passengers over the previous year. Preliminary figures show that yearly growth number will reach the two million mark for 1998 with a total number of Dulles passengers at approximately 15.7 million.

A combination of a strong economy, airport expansion and new air service has translated into a record year for Dulles. In 1998, the Airports Authority opened Concourse B which now provides state of the art passenger boarding areas and new food and retail amenities, and broke ground for the construction of a new Regional Concourse which will provide upgraded passenger facilities for Atlantic Coast customers this spring.

MetroJet provides three daily non-stop flights to Orlando and adds a fourth to that city as well as two new daily non-stop flights to Tampa on December 22. On January 6 next year, MetroJet will expand service to Fort Lauderdale with two daily non-stop flights.

Customer service "Santa's Helpers" will be circulating throughout the terminals and concourses greeting passengers, providing information and distributing literature on holiday gift ideas from the airport shops and providing food discount coupons at participating eateries. The airport restaurants will also join in the spirit by offering food samples and sponsoring entertainment with the retail concessions.

The shops at the airports remind travelers that they offer the same prices as found in area malls. A toll free number to call is available if shoppers believe they are charged more for merchandise at the airport than at the same store in a mall.

Airport shopping can be a new and easier experience, especially during the holidays when many shopping center stores are crowded. The airports also offer a shopping feature that is hard to find elsewhere -- early morning hours. The shops in National Hall in Terminal B/C open daily at 7:00 a.m.; several hours earlier than retail stores and malls. Many stores will also ship purchases so travelers can avoid having to carry the items on the plane.

"We have much-improved facilities for area travelers and visitors this year, including a variety of shopping and dining choices. However, the holiday season brings more crowded conditions to our airports so it may be wise to allow extra time for parking and check-in to ensure a smooth trip," said Airports Authority President/CEO James A. Wilding.

Leave Early -- Airline and airport officials urge travelers to allow at least 1 2 hours in advance of domestic flights and 3 hours in advance of international flights to allow time for ground transportation, parking, luggage check-in and security screening. Holiday traffic increases at National and Dulles Airports, so vehicles can not wait in front of airport terminals. In addition, plan extra time to find parking spaces since the lots and garages will be crowded.

Airline and security screening procedures may also take extra time to accommodate the increased number of travelers. Expect to have any carry on items scrutinized and avoid wrapping presents that you plan to take through airport security screening. Electronic equipment will also be examined carefully.

Take Metro -- Metrorail is a good way to travel to National Airport where pedestrian bridges connect directly to the terminals. Metro also serves Dulles through a Washington Flyer bus connection from the West Falls Church Metro Station.

Terminal A, which is the original historic 1941 terminal, is also in the process of being restored while continuing to function for Northwest, TWA and Midway Airlines. As part of the restoration, the Airports Authority has also opened an Exhibit Hall in Terminal A with fascinating artifacts from an archeological dig on the Abingdon Plantation, displays about the early aviation history of the airport, and audio-visual presentations.

The Abingdon site is located between Garage A and Garage B/C and can be reached by walking from either garage. Visitors to Abingdon using Metrorail should take the exit for Terminal B, use the bridge to Garage B/C and walk through the garage on level 2 to the site. Passengers may reach the Abingdon site by taking the pedestrian bridges from Terminal B/C to Garage B. The Abingdon site will be open daily from dawn to dusk.

At the Abingdon Plantation site, visitors will be able to walk among the remains of the once prominent plantation and view informational placards detailing its history. Archaeological digs, necessary for the stabilization of the Abingdon site, have resulted in the recovery of a wealth of artifacts.

"It is important for us to preserve the historic past of the airport while we continue to serve the Washington region in the future," said James Wilding, President/CEO of the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority. "A component of our Capital Development Program was the restoration and preservation of this historic site at National."

The land on which Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport stands was originally granted to Robert Howson in 1669 who sold it to John Alexander for 6,000 pounds of tobacco. The first house was likely built in the 1740's by Gerard Alexander I, John's great grandson. Once home to some of the most prominent families in the region, Abingdon flourished on the banks of the Potomac River for generations. Through the years, ownership of the property changed hands among the Alexander, Custis, Stuart and Hunter families. George Washington's adopted stepson, John Parke Custis lived on the site for several years.

The Abingdon site was affected by Union occupation during the Civil War, and later, by the progress of industry which took its toll on the site and transformed the landscape. In 1892, a railroad was built west of Abingdon. In the l920's, the current George Washington Memorial Parkway also was constructed on the site.

Portions of the brick foundation of two structures are preserved at the site today -- the Plantation=s Main House and Kitchen. Under the auspices of the Airports Authority, extensive archaeological work was conducted to stabilize and preserve the site and to make it accessible to the public. The preservation of the Abingdon Plantation site and creation of the Exhibit Hall is part of the ongoing Capital Development Program at National Airport to renovate the original historic terminal, known as Terminal A which is listed on the National Register of Historic Places.

The Exhibit Hall is located in a portion of the restored former Dining Room of the original terminal. Along with the archeological display in the Hall is another display on the design and development of the airport itself -- covering events from 1941 to the present.

The Airports Authority's Capital Development Program also calls for the future rehabilitation of Terminal A to provide modern and convenient facilities and new shops and restaurants, while at the same time retaining the historic character of the building. The future construction will include: demolition of the non-historic extensions to the 1941 building; construction of a new concourse to provide improved airline gates; and the historic rehabilitation of the original building.

The exhibit is located in the center of the ticket counter level of the Dulles Terminal and includes several interactive exhibits as well as a large model of downtown Washington, including the federal land area. The exhibit presents a plan called "Extending the Legacy: Planning America's Capital for the 21st Century" which depicts a possible new configuration for the Mall area, generally associated with the national museums and federal buildings, 50 to 100 years from now.

Said James A. Wilding, President/CEO of the Airports Authority, "We agree with the NCPC that this exhibit will find an interested audience in both our local passengers and those who travel through Dulles from destinations around the country and the world," said James A. Wilding, President/CEO of the Airports Authority. "Dulles is the international gateway to the Nation's Capital, and the airport employees as well as our passengers are interested in seeing the plans displayed in the exhibit."

The Legacy Plan preserves open spaces while creating new museums, memorials and offices. The plan also addresses the issue of public transit and suggests the elimination of some current bridges, freeways and railroad tracks. Particular attention is paid the Washington waterfront and ways to open it up for public enjoyment.

The National Capital Planning Commission is the federal government's central planning agency in Washington D.C. and nearby Maryland and Virginia. The Commission developed the Legacy Plan in response to the projected demands on the Nation's Capital in the coming century with tourism expected to double over the next 50 years and automobile traffic increasing dramatically as well.

This year's Seminar, "Landing the Right Opportunity", is designed to provide first-hand information on upcoming contract opportunities in the Airports Authority's Capital Development Program, Repair and Rehabilitation, Operations and Maintenance and Goods and Services programs. Goods and services firms and staff from the Airports Authority's Equal Opportunity, Procurement, Materials Management and Engineering offices will be available to provide information.

In addition to an Exhibit Hall and workshops, a special session will provide an overview of airport concession contracting. The food and retail developers at Dulles and National Airports -- Host Marriott and Westfield Corporation, will present information on their procurement process and future concession opportunities at the airports.

Authority has set the dates for two public hearings on proposed improvements to taxicab service at Ronald Reagan Washington National Airport. The hearings will be held on Tuesday, September 15, in Virginia and Wednesday, September 16, in the District of Columbia.

In 1994, the Airports Authority adopted an airport taxicab permit for taxicab drivers from the seven local jurisdictions permitted to serve the Airport. This permit authorizes drivers to pick up passengers at National, using the dispatch system operated by the Airport. The permit is issued to drivers who successfully pass an examination testing their knowledge of the Washington metropolitan area.

Taxicab drivers may pick up passengers, on a prearranged basis, at National and Dulles Airports only if their licensing jurisdictions allow Washington Flyer Taxicabs to pick up passengers by prearrangement in that jurisdiction.

The complete text of the proposed amendments and the staff report are available for public inspection at the Airports Authority=s offices and copies are available by telephoning (703) 417-8615. Anyone wishing to attend these hearings may speak for or against the adoption of these amendments. Speakers must limit their remarks to five minutes.

The increase in cargo is a result of new airlines operating at Dulles and increases in service by existing airlines. In addition, the growth of high tech business in the Dulles corridor has fueled the cargo as well as passenger increases.

The 1998 Directory, published annually, contains information of interest to shippers, forwarders and other air freight users. The WEB format allows the user to go directly to the guide listing airlines and service companies handling freight in the Washington region, or to view individual sections such as a cargo locator map, tips for shippers, container chart, metric conversion table and international telephone codes.

Gateway, launched in May, 1998 is intended to keep readers current on cargo activity at Washington Dulles International Airport, such as marketing programs, facility developments and future projects. The next edition of Gateway will appear on the web site in September, 1998.

"The new format gives us the opportunity to provide information about Dulles outstanding cargo services and facilities as well as provide updates to cargo professionals worldwide," said Richard Norris, Air Cargo Development Manager for the Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority.

A. Wilding, "This is a singular honor that any airport operator in the world would greatly cherish. We are extremely pleased to accept this award because it recognizes the importance of airports and the aviation services they provide to the communities they serve. To have the Washington Business Journal confirm these contributions to the region through this award is significant."

The award was presented at a dinner held at the International Trade Center at the Ronald Reagan Building in Washington, D.C. on June 4. This is the first such awards ceremony sponsored by the Journal and was designed to recognize the best real estate deals in the region. The range of projects spanned government-related as well as private sector deals including such industry leaders as Oracle, Andersen Consulting and Safeway Stores.

Wrote Alex Orfinger, "I believe 1997 will go down as one of the most remarkable years for the real estate industry in the greater Washington region...What is the best? Certainly, dollar size was important. In the end, however, the judges looked at creativity, tenacity, complexity and overall impact on the region, among many other criteria."

The daily flights are the first to connect the Silicon Valley area with the growing high technology Dulles corridor, linking the two largest centers for data communications and internet technology companies in the nation.

Authority, "These flights provide a natural connection between the two main high technology regions in our nation. We believe many National Capital Area businesses will benefit from this connection with Silicon Valley."

Washington Dulles has an ongoing expansion program to improve and expand airport facilities to meet the continuing growth in both passenger and cargo service. In 1997, Dulles served nearly 14 million passenger, a one million passenger increase over the previous year.

National Airport with greatly improved accessibility to the Metro station. The results show an impressive 25 per cent increase in Metro ridership at the National Airport Metro Station over a year ago. The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority built direct connections via bridges with moving sidewalks to the Metro and, after planning with the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA), added a north mezzanine which leads passengers directly to the airport. Previously, customers took shuttle buses or walked long distances from the Metrorail station to the terminals.

Washington National is one of the few airports in the country where the train station is located in closer proximity to the passenger terminal area than to the parking facilities. The close relationship between the Airports Authority and WMATA will continue to improve the transportation options at National and Dulles Airports."

Authority adds, "We knew our new terminal would make Metro more accessible for both our customers, and employees. Now, at least fifteen per cent of travelers using the airport take Metro, and that makes us one of the most transit-accessible airports in the country served by an excellent public transit system."

Said James A. Wilding, President/CEO of the Airports Authority, "We are very pleased to embark on this expansion with Atlantic Coast Airlines which is headquartered here at Washington Dulles. Through the service they offer on regional aircraft, we are seeing continued growth and increased opportunities for access to new markets. This benefits travelers and the region alike."

Expanding operations of Atlantic Coast Airlines require that additional passenger and aircraft facilities be constructed. A new regional concourse will be built adjacent to the recently-opened Concourse B which houses a number of international and domestic airlines. Construction begins on June 10th with an opening scheduled for 1999.

The new 69,000 sq. ft. regional concourse will be served by mobile lounges and will also be connected to Concourse B via an enclosed pedestrian bridge. The regional concourse, designed by the architectural firm Hellmuth Obata Kassabaum will be constructed by Hensel Phelps at a cost of approximately $18 million. The building will accommodate 36 regional aircraft.

Last year, Dulles served nearly 14 million passengers; one million additional passengers over the previous year. Atlantic Coast Airlines, the second busiest carrier at Dulles (United Airlines is the busiest) with over 220 departures a day, has added service to new destinations and has recently introduced new regional jets on some routes.

At this conference, the Airport Minority Advisory Council (AMAC) will celebrate its tenth anniversary. Created to increase the participation of minorities and women in aviation industry business and employment, AMAC has been at the forefront of national policy initiatives related to the U.S. Department of Transportation airport Disadvantaged Business Enterprise (DBE) Program. Since its inception in 1988, AMAC has actively participated in the development of laws, regulations and policies to enhance DBE participation at U.S. airports. As a result of these collective efforts, minority and women-owned businesses are participating in procurement and concession contracts at nearly every major airport in the U.S.

At Washington's two airports alone, minority and women-owned concessions had total gross receipts of $51 million in fiscal year 1997 as a result of doing business at Washington Dulles International and Ronald Reagan Washington National Airports. In addition, the Airports Authority awarded over $38 million in goods and services and construction contracts to these firms.

The Plane Pull, sponsored by the Airports Authority Police Department, raises money for the Virginia Special Olympics as teams of twenty people display "Olympian strength" by pulling a 727 jet aircraft donated by Federal Express.

There were also informational exhibits about Dulles International Airport and the future site of the Dulles Center Air and Space Museum as well as a police badge and patch collectors show; fire and police equipment display; airport snow removal and large equipment display; and a Kids Korner with special activities for children.

There are now three Economy Parking lots-- Blue, Green, and the recently- opened Red -- all located at the north end of the airport. These lots provide long-term parking for travelers who park and fly.

Daily parking has been expanded. The Daily Parking 1 lot is located in front of the Main Terminal. The new Daily Parking 2 lot has just opened on the east side of the Terminal. Motorists can enter Daily Parking 2 by circling in front of the Main Terminal on the "Departures" or "Arrivals" traffic ramps and following signs to "Daily Parking 2".

A special new feature for Dulles Day will offer model aircraft flight demonstrations by the Virginia Airshow Squadron team. Model aircraft, of various scales, will be flown throughout the day and will feature: The Voyager, which flew around the world without refueling; Starship Enterprise, from the tv show "Star Trek--Next Generation"; and formation flight aircraft similar to the Air Force Flight Demonstration Team, the Thunderbirds.

Visitors to Dulles Day will also find: a police badge and patch collectors show; fire and police equipment display; airport snow removal and large equipment display; and a Kids Korner with special activities for children.

These seven new domestic and two international flights, represent a 13 percent increase in United's service at Dulles and are expected to result in an additional 800,000 passengers using the Airport each year. The economic impact of these two new international flights for the region could result in revenue generation of $600 million a year.

Authority, "This is exciting news for Dulles Airport. Our passengers will now have a wider choice of service to both European and U.S. destinations. The later evening hours will be a welcome advantage for the business traveler as well as those on leisure trips who prefer to take a flight at the end of the work day.

Air freight on United Airlines at Dulles has already grown 30.3% over the last year. These two new international United flights will enable cargo customers to take advantage of an extended production and consolidation cycle, and are estimated to add over 80 metric tons of cargo capacity per day.

Washington Dulles International Airport for this important ceremony. It also marks the advent of some very significant benefits for our metropolitan region and the enhancement of travel opportunities through the Dulles International Gateway."

This increase in service will provide more convenient access to Asia for business travelers. It is estimated that the economic impact of the two additional flights will translate into $108 million annually bringing the total impact of the six weekly flights to a yearly infusion of $488 million into the Washington region local economy.

At Dulles, United is a major service provider. The proposed ANA-United nonstop route between Dulles and Tokyo would allow leisure and business travelers, including U.S. Government travelers, the convenience of nonstop travel, as well as easy connections throughout Asia and the United States.

"This breakthrough agreement benefits both passengers and shippers throughout our region. We will see more frequent and more competitively priced air service between Washington and Japan and a stimulation of our local economy that could translate into hundreds of millions of dollars."

The new agreement also allows U.S. airlines to develop commercial alliances with Japanese airlines. Such alliances have proven to increase and improve air service between the U.S. and Europe and offer area travelers a much broader choice of flight options.

Washington Dulles International Airport has grown 25 per cent over the last five years with much of the focus on increased international air service. In 1997 alone, the airport served nearly one million additional passengers. This new agreement will enable the Airports Authority to seek additional airlines to provide service between Washington and Japan.

The ticket counters for the shuttles will be located on the Concourse level of the terminal unlike the other ticketing facilities on the upper level. This provides shuttle passengers a check-in area adjacent to the security check point and the entrance to the piers where the aircraft gates are located.

Today, elected officials, regional leaders and airport officials gathered with invited guests to officially dedicate the newest addition to Dulles Airport, a 424,000 square foot building that will provide 17 new gates for domestic and international airlines. The building, called Concourse B, will open for business on Sunday, February 1st.

Over the last five years, Dulles has seen steady growth with a 25 per cent increase in passengers. In 1997, Dulles served approximately 13.8 million passengers, nearly a million more people and a 6.7 per cent increase compared to the 12.8 million passengers in the previous year.

Airports are an important part of the future of air service, and just as importantly, of the economic health of the communities they serve. Arlington County, Virginia has ranked aviation at the head of the list of the top ten employers in the county.

At Washington Dulles International Airport, the expansion of the Main Terminal and roadways was completed. On February 1, a new midfield Concourse B will open to provide additional aircraft gates for domestic and international airlines.

Airports Authority, "This new concourse enables us to keep pace with the continuing growth at Dulles International. As we continue to attract new air service, especially on international routes, it is important to keep our facilities competitive and to add amenities that travelers expect in today's market."

Dulles serving 29 foreign markets. It is estimated that over the last five years the number of passengers using Washington Dulles International has grown 25 per cent. In the recently-ended year l997, Dulles served over 13.7 million passengers. Of those, almost 3 million were on international flights.

The section of Concourse B which opens in February is the first phase of the facility which will be occupied. The additional airlines and customer amenities will move in during the next few months. Concourse B is a 424,00 square foot building that stretches 1,440 feet long and 142 feet wide.

The building design is a combination of open space with extensive use of natural light. The waiting areas for the airlines gates are doubled in size to provide flexibility for the various sized aircraft that will use the facility.

Work will soon begin on a Pedestrian Tunnel, equipped with moving sidewalks, that will connect the new Concourse B with the Main Terminal. This will give passengers an alternative option to using the mobile lounges.

The next stage of construction at Dulles will include new parking facilities and the completion of a maintenance facility for Atlantic Coast Airlines which is the second largest airline at Dulles providing regional service and connections to United Airlines flights.

Mr. Thompson will bring over 20 years of experience in public accounting, governmental accounting, management, computer systems, asset securitization, financing, financial management, real estate and business consulting to this new position.

He is a graduate of the University of the District of Columbia, magna cum laude in accounting and finance and is a certified public accountant in the District of Columbia. His alma mater awarded him an honorary Doctor of Laws degree in May of 1997.

This is the structure which originally extended South from the Main Terminal, directly over the site of the Main Terminal AeroTrain station.  It was demolished so excavation of the train station could begin.  It would later be replaced by a structure of similar architecture, without the reflecting pool.

This temporary bridge was built next to the reflecting pool walkway, replacing that walkway when the structure was removed.  Glass panels allowed passengers to view the progress of train station excavation.  Photo from August 2001.

Aerial photograph shows excavation complete on West half (foreground) of Main Terminal AeroTrain station and eastern half (background) excavation in early stage.  Structural elements at the track level of the station are also beginning to take shape.  Photo from March 2006.

This new pedestrian bridge taking shape across the train station construction site.  It connects passengers directly to the Ticketing and Bag Claim levels of the Main Terminal, and it replaces the former "Reflecting Pool" structure.  Photo from March 2006.

The International Arrivals Building is connected to the Main Terminal.  It opened in 1991.  It is a dedicated facility for welcoming passengers to the Airport from International flights.  Passengers enter the building from the PlaneMates pictured at left.

Interior photo of the International Arrivals Building, circa 1991.  The growing number of passengers using this building prompted the Airports Authority to approve a building expansion.  More photos will be posted here after construction begins.

View from atop the Main Terminal roof as building expansion proceeds.  The columns are topped with these uniquely shaped forms in keeping with the original design by Architecht Eero Saarinen.  Photo from July 1995.

This is the Aviation Drive bridge over the Airport Access Highway.  The roadway markings on this widened bridge can be changed to create more lanes when other nearby road construction is completed.  Photo from March 2006.

Additional "Collector/Distributor" exit lanes will be added to the Airport Access highway west of Route 28.  The new lanes will help reduce the weaving and merging traffic in this area.  Photo from September 2006.

Airport patrons using daily parking used to park in the surface lot in front of the Airport.  However, the lot frequently filled up as passenger levels grew.  It became clear that thousands more spaces would be needed.  Photo taken in 1999.

Construction underway on a tunnel which will allow public access between Daily Garage #1 and the Main Terminal.  The "cut and cover" tunneling method was used to construct the tunnel.  Photo from June, 2001.

The pedestrian walkway connecting the Main Terminal to Concourse B is underground.  It was constructed by excavating access shafts, then tunneling to connect the shafts.  The outline of the future tunnel is visible on this shaft wall.  Photo from June 2001.

The "T" gates at Dulles once extended along this area near the Airport Traffic Control Tower.  They were temporary structures, which were removed before construction of the new, permanent Z-gates could begin on the same site.

Please provide the following information to register the documents that you downloaded. Registration places your name on the planholder list for the project and ensures that you receive notification of any amendments that may be issued in the future.

Note: Due to limited hotel parking, attendees are encouraged to utilize the Metrorail system. The hotel is approximately one block from the Woodley Park-Zoo/Adams Morgan station on the Metrorail Red line.

Traveling Over the Holidays? Airport Tips   Thanksgiving week, and the holiday season which follows, are expected to bring more travelers to Ronald Reagan Washington National and Washington Dulles International Airports. The Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is offering travel advice to area residents.

Tunnel boxes for the AeroTrain on approach to the Main Terminal station.  Cranes employed in station construction are visible on the right.  The site shown here will later be covered with earth.  Photo from September 2006.

With expanded ticket counters in the background, installation of Terrazzo floors proceeds.  A dustwall surrounds the project area, located near the center of the Main Terminal.  Photo from October 2001.

This is the view which will be seen from the cab by the Airport Traffic Controllers.  Equipment will be installed in the consoles below the windows.  All of the Airport buildings are visible in this view looking North.  Photo from September 2006.

The document (/robots.txt) you are looking for was not found on our site. This could be the result of a mistyped URL (Universal Resource Locator) or an old bookmark that is no longer pointing to the correct location.

Counseling Services assists students in resolving personal difficulties and in acquiring those skills, attitudes, and resources necessary to both succeed in the college environment and pursue productive and satisfying lives. Counseling Services strives to contribute to the overall educational mission of the University by facilitating the academic, emotional, social, and vocational development of students and by serving as mental health consultants to the entire campus community.  Respect for diversity and a commitment to students' personal growth are guiding principles in the work we do.

The Counseling Services office should be your first call for any issue related to your emotional state, dealing with stress, handling a crisis, or coping with the transition to college. Students often come for help with concerns both large and small, including depression, anxiety, eating disorders, chemical use, assault or abuse, sexual identity, relationship conflicts, grief, academic stress, and family issues.

UB counselors act as facilitators to help students better understand themselves and the world around them. Open and honest discussion of feelings, behaviors, relationships and life experiences with a trained counselor in a safe, confidential environment helps you make healthy choices and achieve more satisfying life goals.

Counselors work with students to help them understand and explore how their feelings and thoughts influence their choices, decisions, and actions. Our counselors help students develop more effective coping and problem-solving skills.

Counseling Services also offers workshops, consultation, and crisis intervention. We also maintain an award-winning website, which you are presently viewing. Here you can find information about our services as well as a wide selection of self-help documents, internet resources, referrals, and reading lists, all to help you with day-to-day stresses and difficult periods in your life.

The Counseling Services office also provides several training opportunities for graduate students in Clinical and Counseling Psychology and in Social Work. You can also find resources for Counseling Services professionals at this web site, such as the Counseling Center Village (see "Other Resources").

This website and the information it contains is not meant to replace a face-to-face consultation with a trained counselor, nor does this service provide "on-line" counseling (see the entry under Services for referral suggestions).

The staff of Counseling Services is keenly aware that people may struggle with stress, anxiety, and other emotional reactions during this time of international unrest and conflict.  The following information and services are available for you to use.  More...

University students typically encounter a great deal of stress  (i.e., academic, social, family, work, financial) during the course of their educational experience. While most students cope successfully with the demands of college life, for some the pressures can become overwhelming and unmanageable. Students in difficulty have a number of resources available to them. These include close friends, relatives, clergy, and coaches. In fact, anyone who is seen as caring and trustworthy may be a potential resource in time of trouble.  The Counseling Services office is staffed by trained mental-health professionals who can assist students in times of personal crisis.

Counseling Services provides same-day crisis appointments for students in crisis.  We also provide after-hours counselors-on-call.  Consultation services are also available via phone or in-person: students, faculty/staff, and parents can contact our office to consult about a student who might be in crisis.  Counseling staff can provide suggestions on how best to proceed and offer resources.  Counseling staff can also provide debriefing for traumatic events that may occur on campus, such as in the Residence Halls for students, or in a academic department for faculty and staff.

In addition to the services provided by Counseling Services, you can also find information for referrals to community resources at our Referral Page.  This includes resources in the Western New York area as well as how to find resources elsewhere in the country.

At one time or another, everyone feels depressed or upset.  But we can identify three general levels of student distress, which, when present over a period of time, suggest that the problems the person is dealing with are more than the "normal ones."

Level 3 problems are the easiest to identify and the easiest to handle in that assistance by a professional is clearly necessary.  A list of resources can be found below.  In dealing with a student who shows Level 1 or Level 2 behavior, you have several choices.  You can choose to not deal with it at all; deal directly with the request or disruptive behavior in a way that limits your interaction to the classroom issue; or you can deal with the situation on a more personal level.  A referral to the Counseling Services office may be an important part of how you deal with the student's concerns.

Talk to the student in private when both of you have time and are not rushed or preoccupied.  Give the student your undivided attention.  It is possible that just a few minutes of effective listening on your part may be enough to help the student feel confident about what to do next.

If you have initiated the contact, express your concern in behavioral, nonjudgmental terms (e.g., "I've noticed you've been absent from class lately and I'm concerned," rather than "Where have you been lately? Goofing off again?").

Listen to thoughts and feelings in a sensitive non-threatening way.  Communicate understanding by repeating back the gist of what the student has told you.  Try to include both the content and feelings ("It sounds like you're not accustomed to such a big campus and you're feeling left out of things.").  Let the student talk.

Avoid judging, evaluating, criticizing, unless the student asks your opinion.  Such behavior is apt to close the student off from you and from getting the help needed.  It is important to respect the student's value system, even if you don't agree with it.

The staff of Counseling Services welcomes your contact. We also value your privacy and time and therefore offer the following information to help you decide on the best method for reaching us. We hope that these guidelines are helpful to you as you decide how best to reach our staff. We take your time and confidentiality very seriously and therefore consider it imperative that you understand the limitations of our use of e-mail technology.

We cannot guarantee that your e-mail will remain confidential. We will do our best to keep your communications private. However, our university administration, like many other employers, reserves the right to monitor our e-mail usage and might therefore see the text of your message. If you are in any way concerned about the contents of your e-mail being read by someone other than the person you are contacting, you should consider alternate ways of contacting us.

When we respond to your e-mail, we will respond to the address from which it is sent. If you do not wish others who may have access to the e-mail account you are using to also have access to our response, please consider another means of communication.

Unfortunately, e-mail is not an appropriate medium for personal counseling. Therefore, we do not offer on-line counseling. If you are a UB student seeking counseling or assistance with a problem, please visit our office or call to make an appointment with one of our counselors. If you need immediate assistance, please stop by our offices or contact us by phone - we will be able to meet with you today if you are in crisis (our hours are Monday, Tuesday and Friday, 8:30 am - 5:00 pm and Wednesday and Thursday, 8:30 am - 7:00 pm).

First and foremost, since we are funded by UB student fees, we place the highest priority on responding to e-mail from UB students. While we welcome e-mail from others, at times of high demand we may not be able to respond to those not affiliated with UB.

While we try to check our e-mail regularly, you have no way of knowing if one of us is unavailable due to illness, vacation, or other reasons, or if there are problems with the network itself. This means that your message may not be received immediately.

Professional Interests: Identity development, sexual trauma, eating/body image issues, multicultural/diversity issues (particularly gay/lesbian issues), training/supervision, psychological assessment, outreach, group therapy, and couples therapy.

Professional Interests: Multicultural/diversity issues and outreach, family of origin issues, training/supervision, suicide prevention and education, group therapy, psycho educational groups, advocacy, and mental health.

Professional Interests: Training, rape education, men's issues, feminism, diversity and differences, the politics of mental health, philosophy of mind, outreach, and professional uses for the internet and the media.

Professional Interests: Men's health and sexuality issues, sexual trauma and recovery, male survivors of sexual abuse, poverty and class issues, incarcerated trauma survivors, grief and loss issues, mental health outreach and education to under-served populations, LGBT issues, feminism.

The University at Buffalo's Counseling Services office is responsible for various web sites (e.g., The UB Counseling Services home page, The Counseling Center Village, The Counseling Centers Directory).  These sites have been recognized as some of the best Counseling Center sites on the web.  Here is a brief listing of some of the recognition that we have received.

Group therapy is one of the primary modes of treatment offered by UB Counseling Services.  Each semester a variety of different types of groups are offered.  Most are heterogeneous process groups, while others are theme groups offered to specific groups of students.  Specific information about the types of groups currently being run can be obtained by calling Counseling Services at 645-2720 and asking to speak with a counselor.  All potential group participants must first complete an intake appointment.

In group therapy, ten to twelve people meet face-to-face with two or more trained group therapists and talk about what is troubling them. Members give feedback to each other by expressing their own feelings about what someone says or does. This interaction gives group members an opportunity to try out new ways of behaving and to learn more about the way they interact with others. What makes the situation unique is that it is a safe system. The content of the group sessions is confidential; what members talk about or disclose is not discussed outside the group. Members work to establish a level of trust that allows them to talk personally and honestly. Group trust is enhanced when all members make a commitment to the group.

When people come into a group and interact freely with other group members, they usually recreate those difficulties that brought them to group therapy in the first place. Under the skilled direction of the group therapists, the group is able to give support, offer alternatives, or gently confront the person. In this way the difficulty becomes resolved, alternative behaviors are learned, and the person develops new social techniques or ways of relating to people. During group therapy, people begin to see that they are not alone. Many people feel they are unique because of their problems, and it is encouraging to hear that other people have similar difficulties. In the climate of trust provided by the group, people feel free to care about and help each other.

Talk about what brought you to the Counseling Services in the first place. Tell the group members what is bothering you. If you need support, let the group know. If you think you need confrontation, let them know this also. It is important to tell people what you expect of them. Unexpressed feelings are a major reason why people experience difficulties. Revealing your feelings - self-disclosure - is an important part of group and affects how much you will be helped. The appropriate disclosures will be those that relate directly to your present difficulty. How much you talk about yourself depends upon what you are comfortable with. If you have any questions about what might or might not be helpful, you can always ask the group.

You control what, how much, and when you share with the group. Most people find that when they feel safe enough to share what is troubling them, a group can be very helpful and affirming. We encourage you not to share what you are not ready to disclose. However, you can also be helped by listening to others and thinking about how what they are saying might apply to you.

Actually, group therapy is often more efficient than individual therapy for two reasons. First, you can benefit from the group even during sessions when you say little but listen carefully to others. You will find that you have much in common with other group members, and as they work on a concern, you can learn more about yourself. Secondly, group members will often bring up issues that strike a chord with you, but that you might not have been aware of or brought up yourself.

It is very important that group members feel safe. Group leaders are there to help develop a safe environment. Feedback is often difficult to hear. As group members come to trust and accept one another, they generally experience feedback and even confrontation as a sign of caring. One of the benefits of group therapy is the opportunity to receive feedback from others in a supportive environment. It is rare to find friends who will gently point out how you might be behaving in ways that hurt yourself or others, but this is precisely what group can offer. This will be done in a respectful, gentle way, so that you can hear it and make use of it.

Group therapy is being recommended to you because your intake counselor believes that it is the best way to address your concerns. We do not put people into group therapy because we don't have space in individual therapy, or because we want to save time. We recommend group when it is the most effective method to help you. Your intake counselor can discuss with you why group is what we recommend for you.

Most people are anxious about being able to talk in group. Almost without exception, within a few sessions people find that they do begin to talk in the group. Group members remember what it is like to be new to the group, so you will most likely get a lot of support for beginning to talk in the group.

Having a feeling and acting on it are two different actions. Acting out your feelings is not acceptable whether you act them out upon yourself or another member of the group. The way we most respect ourselves and others is by experiencing feelings and then allowing ourselves to talk about them.

Counseling Services offers a variety of weekly therapy groups.  Groups are open to all registered students; there is no fee for participation in a group.  Interested students should call Counseling Services at 645-2720.  Below is a list of some of the groups Counseling Services typically offers.  Please call our office to learn what is available this semester.

A group for women dealing with a variety of traumatic or persistent stress in their lives, including relationships difficulties, sexual abuse/assault/harassment, eating and body image concerns, and other women's issues.

Counseling Services (645-2720)The staff of Counseling Services is keenly aware that people may struggle with stress, anxiety, and other emotional reactions during this time of international unrest and conflict. Please know that Counseling Services counselors are available on a walk-in basis at our offices for personal crises and other emotional emergencies, and that we are also available for consultation should you have contact with someone in distress and you need assistance on how best to proceed. Please feel free to call our office and speak to one of our counselors.

Services for UB employees: The UB Employee Assistance Program (EAP) is a free program offering confidential help for employees, retirees and their families who need assistance with personal problems or concerns.

This document will introduce you to the various services offered by the Counseling Services office, the Counseling Services staff, and how to access those services. But first, let's start with a general overview of what counseling is and how it can be helpful to you.

Counseling is a collaborative process which involves the development of a unique, confidential helping relationship. In this relationship, the counselor acts as a facilitator in helping the client to understand more accurately him/herself and the world around him/her. Individuals are helped to understand their feelings and behaviors, their relationships with others, their particular situation, choices, and decisions. Discussion of whatever is important and relevant enables individuals to grow towards greater freedom in making mature choices and taking responsible action with themselves, relationships, family, and studies.

The staff consists of qualified, trained mental health professionals and advanced graduate student interns with backgrounds in psychology and social work. Part time psychiatrists are also available to evaluate the need for and to prescribe medication, as appropriate.

Group Counseling. Counseling in groups offers a broad range of insight and support from peers and professional counselors. Groups allow for decreased isolation and enhanced learning about self and relationships in a trusting environment.

We have a wealth of self-help handouts, brochures, and flyers on topics related to student life and more. . Much of this material is on-line -where you can browse through information on a broad range of topics, and print or download what you want for your own use. Check out our Self-Help section.

Counseling Services also offers advanced clinical training for graduate students in Psychology and Social Work, and for Psychiatry Residents. Our Psychology Internship is accredited by the American Psychological Association.

As a member of the University community, part of Counseling Services' mission is the support and dissemination of research. Efforts are made to develop collaborations between staff and colleagues and students on empirical research and theoretical papers, both here at the University at Buffalo, and at other colleges and universities.  More information can be found here.

Some common concerns confronting students include puzzling distressing feelings, low self confidence, getting along with others, self-defeating behaviors, academic problems, sexual identity concerns, and decision- making dilemmas. The Counseling Services can provide assistance for these concerns through counseling.

Personal Counseling is a chance to talk over what is on your mind with an objective person who can help you learn new skills and ways of looking at situations so that you will be more capable of solving new problems on your own in the future.

If you feel uncertain about whether counseling is for you, we hope you will make an appointment for an introductory meeting and discuss your reservations with a counselor. There is no obligation to continue.

The purpose of Safe Zone is to reduce homophobia and heterosexism on the UB campus and thereby to make our campus a safer and freer environment for all members of our community regardless of sexual orientation. Safe Zone prepares staff, faculty, and students to provide support and resources on lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender (LGBT) issues.

The Eating Disorders Treatment Team provides help for students who are struggling with an eating disorder, weight issues, and body image concerns. The team consists of medical providers, counselors, and a registered dietician. The team offers coordinated outpatient treatment and assists students in accessing community resources for inpatient and intensive, long-term outpatient treatment.  This multidisciplinary team meets regularly to manage the care of students with eating concerns.  The team along with other members of the UB community provides psychoeducational programming to increase awareness of risk and preventative factors in the development of eating disorders.

Counseling Component:  Counselors provide short-term individual and long-term group therapy aimed at symptom reduction, increasing understanding of the communicative and psychological function the eating disordered symptoms serve, increasing the ability to express emotions and learning to define oneself in other ways than body size and food intake.

Medical Component:  Health care providers will evaluate the overall health of the student, manage the medical consequences of disordered eating, prescribe medication, and recommend mental health and nutritional interventions.

Nutrition Component:  The goal of nutrition counseling is to replace disordered eating patterns with more organized, healthy eating patterns.   The registered dietitian provides education and individualized intervention via a collaborative relationship.   Nutrition counseling is supportive of concurrent therapies and medical treatment.

If you are concerned that someone you know may have a problem with weight, nutrition, body image or other eating problems, please refer them to Counseling Services, Student Health Services, or the dietician.  After an initial assessment, the provider will determine what type and level of care is needed including the coordinated care afforded by the Eating Disorders Treatment team.

This section contains a listing of the workshops offered by the Counseling Services at the University at Buffalo (see the listing below). These workshops are offered weekly and are free of charge to all UB students.

This section also contains (or will contain) outlines, handouts, and other materials for workshops on a wide variety of topics. You are welcome to use these materials for workshops you may be preparing, or for other uses, as long as the Counseling Services at the University at Buffalo is given appropriate credit.

This material is not, however, meant to replace face-to-face consultation with a trained professional. Therefore we offer resources in this section to help you find direct support with a professional for your personal concerns. The resources listed here should provide a good starting place for both UB students as well as people from other areas in North America.

For many first-year students, the University may be their first experience living away from home for an extended period of time. It is a definite break from home. The individual's usual sources of support are no longer present to facilitate adjustment to the unfamiliar environment. Here are tips for students which may provide realistic expectations concerning living arrangements and social life on campus. In addition, students may benefit from information concerning resources available to them at the Counseling Services office.

The first few weeks on campus can be a lonely period. There may be concerns about forming friendships. When new students look around, it may seem that everyone else is self-confident and socially successful. The reality is that everyone is having the same concerns.

If they allow sufficient time, students usually find peers in the university to provide structure and a valuable support system in the new environment. The important thing for the student to remember in meeting new people is to be oneself. Click here for ideas about where you can meet new people.

Meaningful, new relationships should not be expected to develop overnight. It took a great deal of time to develop intimacy in high school friendships; the same will be true of intimacy in university friendships.

Increased personal freedom can feel both wonderful and frightening. Students can come and go as they choose with no one to "hassle" them. At the same time, things are no longer predictable. The strange environment with new kinds of procedures and new people can create the sense of being on an emotional roller-coaster. This is normal and to be expected.

Living with roommates can present special, sometimes intense, problems. Negotiating respect of personal property, personal space, sleep, and relaxation needs can be a complex task. The complexity increases when roommates are of different ethnic/cultural backgrounds with very different values. Communicating one's legitimate needs calmly, listening with respect to a roommate's concerns, and being willing to compromise to meet each other's most important needs can promote resolution of issues.

It is unrealistic to expect that roommates will be best friends. Roommates may work out mutually satisfying living arrangements, but the reality is that each may tend to have his or her own circle of friends.

Counseling Services provides individual and group counseling to students experiencing difficulty in adjusting to university life. Among the most common concerns students bring to our office are: low self-confidence; finding, enhancing, or ending a relationship; getting along with others; puzzling or distressing emotional states; family problems; self-defeating behaviors; controlling use of alcohol and drugs; life purpose and direction; and career decision-making.

Counseling Services consists of qualified, trained mental health professionals and advanced graduate-student interns with backgrounds in psychology, social work, and psychiatry. Any full or part-time student currently enrolled at the University at Buffalo may use the services at the Counseling Services. There is no fee.

In addition to Counseling, Counseling Services offers skill-building workshops on topics such as procrastination, assertiveness, and stress management. Such workshops, scheduled throughout the entire academic year, provide a structured presentation of information and skills practice appropriate to the student's personal development and academic success.

Case consultation within a multi-disciplinary team, consisting of social workers, psychologists, psychiatrists, masters level trainees from psychology and mental health programs, as well as consultations with Health Center and Wellness team members.

Located on two spacious, attractive campuses, the University at Buffalo is the largest, most comprehensive member of the State University of New York system. It boasts an ethnically and culturally rich and diverse student body of approximately 27,000 students, 20 percent of whom are minority students and 14 percent of whom are international students. The distinguished faculty includes nationally and internationally recognized figures in all major disciplines. In addition, the presence of three major coordinating divisions, Undergraduate Education, Graduate and Professional Education, and the Division of Continuing Education, allows for a variety and scope of academic programs that is unsurpassed. The quality and extensiveness of the facilities at both on- and off-campus sites greatly enhance the reputation of the University. As the second largest city in New York State, Buffalo is proud to be the home of this prestigious institution. Indeed, the University represents a major cultural center for all of Western New York. Films, concerts, art exhibits, and lectures by a wide variety of prominent people are available on campus throughout the year.

Counseling Services is a department in the Division of Student Affairs. Our office provides a full range of services and programs which promote the personal development and psychological well being of students and the attainment of personal and educational goals. The staff is strongly committed to programming related to student diversity and to an overall university environment which celebrates individual and cultural differences. Among the services offered are individual and group therapy, couples counseling, crisis intervention, consultation, career counseling, psychological evaluation, and referral. Skill-building workshops are offered to augment the personal growth and development of students and staff members of the university. As a mental health agency for a student body of over 27,000, Counseling Services works with students comprising the full range of concerns, from developmental issues to severe psychopathology. Counseling Services also offers APA-accredited Pre-doctoral Psychology Internship, as well as practicum, internship, and externship training for doctorate and master's level students.

Counseling Services has a staff of full-time psychologists and social workers, part-time counselors, consulting psychiatrists and psychiatry residents, full-time pre-doctoral psychology interns, social work interns, practicum trainees, and externs. Several staff members hold adjunct appointments with the Department of Counseling and Educational Psychology and the School of Social Work. Staff members are actively involved in professional organizations.

The Counseling Services offices are located on the North (Buffalo) Campus of the State University of New York at Buffalo in a residence hall complex. The facilities include office space, a group room, audio/video recording equipment, and computer resources. There is also a satellite office on the South Campus.

Counseling Services has a strong commitment to maintaining close working relationships with other departments of the Division of Student Affairs, including Student Health, Wellness Education, Career Services, Residence Life, and throughout the University, such as the Educational Opportunity Program.

Since each trainee possesses a variety of skills, we believe that it is important that training is tailored to the experience and needs of each existing trainee. Staff members of Counseling Services utilize interventions from a wide variety of theoretical orientations, including cognitive-behavioral, psychodynamic, interpersonal, developmental, systems, feminist, multicultural, gestalt, humanistic, existential, eclectic, and integrative. Thus, a trainee has the opportunity to develop his or her own individual therapeutic style.

The Counseling Services staff is dedicated to the concept of excellence in a training experience within a multifaceted, service-oriented agency. While broad exposure to a variety of professional activities is advocated, a genuine commitment to intensive supervision and to the furthering of the trainee's personal and professional growth exists as the foundation of our philosophy. Overall, we seek to create an atmosphere of respect and trust where trainees and professional staff support their own and others' growth both personally and professionally.

The staff of Counseling Services is committed and dedicated to the affirmation of diversity. The students at the University at Buffalo are quite diverse not only among traditionally under-represented American groups, but also among international students. Issues of diversity are included in the didactic training experiences, as well as in clinical practice. Several seminars are presented throughout the year addressing various topics related to diversity. Trainees are provided with exposure to clients of differing ethnicities, cultures, sexual orientations, socioeconomic backgrounds, religious backgrounds, ages, genders, abilities, and other diversity factors. This is also reflected in the Counseling Services staff, as there has been a diversity among staff. Workshops are also provided to the university community in an effort to assist in the celebration of diversity throughout the campus.

You will be expected to be here approximately 16-20 hours/week, with an expectation that your placement at UBCS will be for both the fall and spring semesters of the academic year for which you are accepted.  (Negotiations can be made to extend the training placement through the summer  if required by your academic program as well.)  Your time will be devoted to a variety of activities, some recurring, some occurring only once, as the needs of our office and the training dictate.

You will be required to be here only when classes are in session. This placement ends at the end of Finals Week, but you are expected to terminate with all clients before then, to leave time for paperwork and final supervision issues.

Initial Assessments: Following training in our initial assessment procedures during the beginning of the Fall semester, you will be scheduled for one to three initial assessment appointments per week.

Workshops: You will co-lead (with other trainees and/or staff) 2-3 workshops per semester of your placement at Counseling Services. Workshops are offered during the day, as well as on weekends and evenings.

The Journal of American College Health is the only professional journal written by college health professionals for college health professionals. This journal covers developments and research in this broad field, including clinical and preventive medicine, environmental health and safety, nursing assessment, interventions, and management, pharmacy, and sports medicine. The journal regularly publishes major articles on student behaviors, mental health and healthcare policies, and includes a section for discussion of controversial issues.

The Journal of College Student Development provides pivotal theory and practical application articles, reports and book reviews, written by the leaders in the field. It is the leading student affairs journal, having been published for 45 years.

The Career Development Quarterly is the journal of the National Career Development Association (NCDA).  The Quarterly includes articles on research, theory, and practice in career development, career counseling, occupational resources, labor market dynamics, and career education.

Counselor Education and Supervision is dedicated to publishing manuscripts concerned with research, theory development, or program applications related to counselor education and supervision. It is concerned with the preparation and supervision of counselors in agencies or school settings, in colleges and universities, or at local, state, or federal levels. This journal is the official publication of the Association for Counselor Education and Supervision (ACES).

The Journal of College Counseling is the official journal of the American College Counseling Association (ACCA) and publishes articles that inform the practice of counselors working in higher education settings. Categories of manuscripts include Research Studies, Professional Issues, and Innovative Practice. All manuscripts should be grounded in current literature and address implications for practice.

The Journal of Counseling & Development is the official journal of the American Counseling Association (ACA). The Journal publishes articles that have broad interest for counselors, counseling psychologists, and student personnel specialists who work in schools, colleges, community agencies, and government.

The Family Journal: Counseling and Therapy for Couples and Families is the official journal of the International Association of Marriage and Family Counselors (IAMFC). The purpose of The Family Journal is to advance the theory, research, and practice of counseling with couples and families from a family systems perspective.

The Journal for Specialists in Group Work is directed toward the interests of educators and counselors concerned with productive implementation of group counseling in both educational and community settings.

The Journal of Multicultural Counseling and Development is concerned with research, theory, or program applications pertinent to multicultural and ethnic minority interests in all areas of counseling and human development.

Cultural Diversity and Ethnic Minority Psychology seeks to publish theoretical, conceptual, research and case study articles that promote the development of knowledge and understanding, application of psychological principles, and scholarly analysis of social-political forces affecting racial/ethnic minorities.

Group Dynamics: Theory, Research, and Practice publishes original empirical articles, theoretical analyses, literature reviews, and brief reports dealing with basic and applied topics in the field of group research and application.

The Journal of Consulting and Clinical Psychology publishes original contributions on the following topics: (a) the development, validity, and use of techniques of diagnosis and treatment of disordered behavior; (b) studies of populations of clinical interest, such as hospitals, prison, rehabilitation, geriatric, and similar samples; (c) cross-cultural and demographic studies of interest for behavior disorders; (d) studies of personality and of its assessment and development where these have a clear bearing on problems of clinical dysfunction; (e) studies of gender, ethnicity, or sexual orientation that have a clear bearing on diagnosis, assessment, and treatment; or (f) methodologically sound case studies pertinent to the preceding topics.

The Journal of Counseling Psychology publishes empirical research in the areas of (a) counseling activities (including assessment, interventions, consultation, supervision, training, prevention, and psychological education), (b) career development and vocational psychology, (c) diversity and underrepresented populations in relation to counseling activities, (d) the development of new measures to be used in counseling activities, and (e) professional issues in counseling psychology.

The Journal of Family Psychology is devoted to the study of the family system from multiple perspectives and to the application of psychological methods to advance knowledge related to family research, intervention, and policy.

Professional Psychology: Research and Practice publishes articles on the application of psychology, including the scientific underpinnings of the profession of psychology. Articles that present assessment, treatment, and practice implications are encouraged. Both data-based and theoretical articles on techniques and practices used in the application of psychology are acceptable.

Psychology of Women Quarterly is a feminist journal that publishes primarily qualitative and quantitative research with substantive and theoretical merit, along with critical reviews, theoretical articles, and invited book reviews related to the psychology of women and gender.

Psychotherapy: Theory, Research, Practice, Training publishes a wide variety of articles relevant to the field of psychotherapy. We strive to foster interactions among training, practice, theory, and research because all are essential to psychotherapy.

Social Work is the official journal of NASW.  Social Work is dedicated to improving practice and advancing knowledge in social work and social welfare. Its article yield new insights into established practices, evaluate new techniques and research, examine current social problems, and bring serious critical analysis to bear on problems in the profession.

Social Work Research publishes exemplary research to advance the development of knowledge and inform social work practice. It includes analytic reviews of research, theoretical articles pertaining to social work research, evaluation studies, and diverse research studies that contribute to knowledge about social work issues and problems.

The NASPA Journal is the publication outlet for contemporary scholarship in student affairs administration, research, and practice. Manuscripts should be written for the student affairs generalist who has broad responsibility for educational leadership, policy, staff development, and management.

College Student Journal publishes original investigations and theoretical papers dealing with college student values, attitudes, opinions, and learning. This includes the areas of undergraduate, graduate, and professional schools, and may include selected contributions dealing with college preparation.

The Journal of College Student Psychotherapy is dedicated to enhancing the lives of college and university students by featuring high-quality articles about practice, theory, and research in mental health and personal development. Contributions to the journal come from professionals in the field of mental health and counseling and from college staff, faculty, and students.

The Journal of Gay & Lesbian Psychotherapy is a clinical, multidisciplinary professional forum for the exposition, discussion, and exchange of practical information about lesbian and gay psychotherapy.

The staff at Counseling Services is aware that emergencies requiring immediate attention can exist for students seeking our services.  Because of the demand on our services, however, we are not able to see most students the same day they contact us.  This handout has been prepared to help you decide whether our same-day crisis services are right for you.  If in doubt, please call our office at 645-2720 to consult with a counselor.

If you believe your situation is a crisis that cannot wait for a regularly scheduled appointment, please contact our office.  A counselor will meet with you today to do a brief assessment and make recommendations as to how to proceed.

Counseling Services does not provide on-line counseling, either through this website or via email. If you want to talk to someone directly, we encourage you to contact our office or any of the other resources listed in the "Resources" section below. If you are in crisis, call the Crisis Services 24-hour hotline at 834-3131.

You may be feeling anxiety, fear, hope, shame, pride, anger, loss of control, outrage, disillusionment, grief, lack of safety, concern for others, and powerlessness.  Some of these emotions may be particularly strong because of feelings leftover from past experiences. For example, recent losses may sensitize you to the potential losses that will be incurred by the war.  In addition, if you were currently coping with life stresses, the war may have added a stress beyond your coping capacity. The current conflict may also pose troubling moral dilemmas.  Many people feel responsible for the actions of our country while not having much power individually to impact national decisions.

It is normal to be experiencing a wide range of emotions at this stressful time.  Be aware that such intense feelings will cause physical and mental strain.  You may feel generally fatigued and be having difficulty concentrating, sleeping, and eating normally.  Many people may find themselves crying or getting angry more easily.  In fact, you may direct irritation or aggression at people or things that usually would not bother you.  Stressful times require us to be easier on ourselves when we may behave differently than we prefer.  In fact, it is important to be extra caring of ourselves at this time.

Depending on your political stance, you may choose to participate in rallies, letter writing, and organizing idea exchanges on campus.  You may choose to help others through taping music for military personnel or providing support to persons coping here in the U.S.  One form of activism may be communicating to the media about the effectiveness of their coverage (or over coverage).

Terrorist threats and the possibility of war instill feelings of helplessness and fear. Different people react and cope in vastly different ways.  A person's natural temperament, social support, prior life experiences, and coping skills combine to trigger that individual's specific reaction. It is important, however, to be aware that even when students do not express verbal concern, they may still be having strong internal reactions.

Dealing with students on a day-to-day basis, faculty and staff are likely to see students in need of assistance.  Understanding the potential reactions, the possible interventions, and the resources available to students, faculty and staff, is critical to being able to work effectively with these students.

When you are discussing class topics that might remind students of the current political climate and threats of violence, be aware that some students might react strongly (even if they do not express this aloud). Try to be sensitive in how you introduce such topics, and be tolerant if some students need to take a break during class.

Students whose families live far from Buffalo may be especially likely to react strongly to these situations. Far from their support systems, they may rely more extensively on supportive faculty and close friends.

It is usually beneficial for the person to continue with their usual routine as much as possible. Encourage students to keep up with assignments, classes, and other activities as much as possible. Even so, be aware that some students might need some brief time away.

If students express hostility toward individuals from specific countries (e.g., Arabic countries), help them appreciate the distinction between the country's leaders and the innocent population. Increased ethnic conflicts in our own country will not ultimately help students feel safer.

Be aware that strong reactions may come from many sources, including previous experiences of trauma. What seems like an unreasonable response on the outside may be perfectly understandable in the context of that person's life.

If some students' reactions seem particularly strong, or if the reactions continue over time, make a referral to a professional.  Counseling services are available on either an appointment or an emergency walk-in basis. We are located at 120 Richmond Quad in the Ellicott Complex, 645-2720.

Consistent efforts to communicate with your friends and family who have been deployed can do wonders to raise their morale and strengthen them for the challenges that they face.  In fact, some incredibly moving and courageous compositions have been written between soldiers and their friends and loved ones (if you are interested, do a Google search for the 1861 letter written by Sullivan Ballou to his wife Sarah during the American Civil War).

While all service members will have email accounts, it is unlikely that electronic communications will be "instant."  Due to variables such as mission activity and the availability of computers, a soldier's response may be delayed for a week or more.  Technological advancements have led some to speculate that, similar to the old practice of waiting in long lines at a phone booth to call home, soldiers will now be standing in long lines waiting to use computers for e-mail.

Snail-mail letters and cards are still one of the least expensive and most satisfactory ways to stay in touch with military personnel.  Their advantage is that they can be reread during lonely moments or at times when other forms of communication are not available.  Military postal systems will be set up near units, and estimates are that delivery times will average about ten days.  Letters composed on a computer can be saved and collected in a book to be presented upon your friend's return.

If you are sending a package, check out the United States Postal Service website for information about what can and cannot be shipped to various locations.  Be creative with your packages.  Send photos, silly toys, newly released CDs, and interesting home newspaper articles.  Make sure any food items are not perishable.  Because of the high cost of calling home, phone cards are an especially welcomed and valued gift to include in letters and packages.  Be sure to research the rules and restrictions of phone cards before your purchase.

Your friends and family may not be able to share much information about their location or mission.  At the same time, they may talk passionately about their unit and their desire to serve their country.  This enthusiasm is essential to their success and safety in combat, and it is important for you to recognize and honor this part of their experience.

Even if you have feelings to the contrary (e.g., "The French are right; you shouldn't be there anyway"), it is important to keep your communications positive, upbeat, and supportive.  Humorous stories about family and/or shared friends can transcend geographical distances and help service members feel close and connected to the important people in their lives.

If you decide you would like to extend your good will efforts beyond your friend or family member, you can inquire if there is anyone in his or her unit who is not getting mail and request contact information for that person.  The National Military Family Association can provide additional information about more general efforts to support our service men and women.

In closing, while it may seem premature at this point, you should begin to contemplate and prepare for your loved one's return to the States.  Friends and family of military service members frequently have fantasies of what the reunion will be like, often harboring a strong desire to return to "the way we were."  However, the passage time and the experience of being deployed, not to mention the potentially life-altering impact of armed combat, can result in dramatic changes both within and between people.  It is important to be willing to spend the time necessary to slowly reacquaint with one another and to reestablish the relationship on both old and new terms.

You have experienced a traumatic event or a critical incident (any incident that causes people to experience unusually strong emotional reactions which have the potential to affect their ability to function at their workplace, within their families, and/or in other areas of their lives). This event or events may be time-limited or may be on-going or chronic.

Even though the event may be over, you may now be experiencing or may experience later, some strong emotional or physical reactions. It is very common, in fact quite normal, for people to experience emotional aftershocks when they have passed through a horrible event or be subject to ongoing stressors.

Sometimes the emotional after-shocks (or stress reactions) appear immediately after the traumatic event. Sometimes they may appear a few hours or a few days later. And, in some cases, weeks or months may pass before the stress reactions appear.

BEHAVIORAL: change in activity, change in speech patterns, withdrawal, emotional outbursts, suspiciousness, change in usual communications, loss or increase of appetite, alcohol consumption, inability to rest, antisocial acts, nonspecific bodily complaints, hyper-alertness to environment, intensification of startle reflex, pacing, erratic movements, change in sexual functioning, etc.

The UB Safe Zone symbol is a rainbow triangle. In World War II, the Nazis used the pink triangle to label gay men and the black triangle to label lesbians who were sent to concentration camps. In the 1970s, the LGBT community reclaimed both triangles as a symbol of pride, solidarity, and a promise to never allow another Holocaust to happen again. The rainbow has become the easily-recognized colors of pride for the gay community. The rainbow is a symbol of multiculturalism and it also plays a part in myths and stories related to gender and sexuality issues in Greek, Native American, African, and other cultures.

Sexual Orientation is an enduring emotional, romantic, sexual or affectional attraction to another person. It is easily distinguished from other components of sexuality including biological sex, gender identity, and the social gender role (adherence to cultural norms for feminine and masculine behavior).

Usually refers to a male who is emotionally, physically, and/or sexually attracted to other males. May also refer to females who are attracted to other females, as well as the gay community in general.

Someone who derives sexual pleasure from dressing in clothing generally identified with the opposite sex. While the terms gay and transvestite have been used synonymously, they are in fact two different terms. The majority of transvestites are heterosexuals. Crossdressing that does not include any sexual charge is usually referred to as DRAG.

Originally a derogatory label used to refer to lesbian and gay people or to intimidate and offend heterosexuals. More recently this term has been reclaimed by some lesbians, gay men, bisexual people, and transgendered people as an inclusive and positive way to identify all people targeted by heterosexism and homophobia. Some lesbians and gay men have similarly reclaimed previously negative words such as "dyke" and "faggot" for positive self-reference.

Someone who confronts heterosexism, homophobia, and heterosexual privilege in themselves and others out of self-interest, a concern for the well-being of lesbian, gay, and bisexual people and a belief that heterosexism is a social justice issue.

Those benefits derived automatically by being heterosexual that are denied to LGBT people. Also, the benefits LGBT people receive as a result of claiming heterosexual identity or denying LGBT identity.

Sexual orientation prejudice, combined with the majority power to impose such prejudice. Usually used to the advantage of the group in power. Any attitude, action, or practice - backed by an institutional power - which subordinates people because of their sexual orientation. The assumption that everyone is heterosexual, and that heterosexuality is superior to homosexuality or bisexuality.

Assault, rape, arson and murder are crimes under any circumstance, but when the victim of a crime is chosen simply because of her or his affiliation with a minority group, the FBI considers the crime a "hate crime." In some states, hate crimes carry an additional penalty beyond the standard penalty for assault, murder, etc.

May refer to an LGBT person who has not yet accepted their own sexuality (to be "in the closet" to one's self). Also may refer to one who chooses not to share their sexuality with friends, co-workers, or society (to be "in the closet" with respect to others). Because of repressive laws, discrimination in employment and housing, violence and harassment, and other kinds of oppression and abuse, many LGBT people elect to closet themselves at some point in their lives or with some groups of people all their lives.

Referring to the process by which one accepts one's own sexual orientation (to "come out" to one's self). Also referring to the process by which one shares one's sexuality with others (to "come out" to friends, etc.). This process is a continual, life long process for LGBT individuals.

This is a common name for celebrations commemorating the Stonewall riots. In most cities Gay Pride is held in June. Activities usually include a parade, booths, speakers, workshops, picnics, and musical entertainment.

It is the policy of the University at Buffalo to prohibit discrimination based on race, sex, sexual orientation, age, national origin, religion, veteran or marital status or disability in all matters affecting employment or educational opportunities within the University.  Complaints regarding any violations of nondiscrimination laws or policies, sexual harassment, or failure to provide reasonable accommodation should be made to the Office of Equity, Diversity, and Affirmative Action Administration, 645-2266.

There are numerous theories about the origins of a person's sexual orientation; most scientists today agree that sexual orientation is most likely the result of a complex interaction of environmental, cognitive and biological factors. In most people, sexual orientation is shaped at an early age. There is also considerable recent evidence to suggest that biology, including genetic or inborn hormonal factors, play a significant role in a person's sexuality.

No, human beings cannot choose their sexual orientation. Sexual orientation emerges for most people in early adolescence without any prior sexual experience. Although we can choose whether to act on our feelings, psychologists do not consider sexual orientation to be a conscious choice that can be voluntarily changed.

No. Even though most LGBT people live successful, happy lives, some lesbian, gay, and bisexual people may seek to change their sexual orientation through therapy, sometimes pressured by the influence of family members or religious groups to try and do so. The reality is that homosexuality is not an illness. It does not require treatment and is not changeable. However, not all lesbian, gay, and bisexual people who seek assistance from a mental health professional want to change their sexual orientation. LGBT people may seek psychological help with the coming out process or for strategies to deal with prejudice, but most go into therapy for the same reasons and life issues that bring heterosexuals to mental health professionals.

Some therapists who undertake so-called conversion therapy report that they have been able to change their clients' sexual orientation from homosexual to heterosexual. Close scrutiny of these reports, however, show several factors that cast doubt on their claims. For example, many of the claims come from organizations with an ideological perspective which condemns homosexuality. Furthermore, their claims are poorly documented. For example, treatment outcome is not followed and reported over time as would be the standard to test the validity of any mental health intervention.

The American Psychological Association is concerned about such therapies and their potential harm to patients. In 1997, the Association's Council of Representatives passed a resolution reaffirming psychology's opposition to homophobia in treatment and spelling out a client's right to unbiased treatment and self-determination. Any person who enters into therapy to deal with issues of sexual orientation has a right to expect that such therapy will take place in a professionally neutral environment absent of any social bias.

No. Psychologists, psychiatrists and other mental health professionals agree that homosexuality is not an illness, mental disorder or an emotional problem. Over 35 years of objective, well-designed scientific research has shown that homosexuality, in and itself, is not associated with mental disorders or emotional or social problems. Homosexuality was once thought to be a mental illness because mental health professionals and society had biased information.

In the past, the studies of lesbian, gay, and bisexual people involved only those in therapy, thus biasing the resulting conclusions. When researchers examined data about these people who were not in therapy, the idea that homosexuality was a mental illness was quickly found to be untrue.

In 1973 the American Psychiatric Association confirmed the importance of the new, better designed research and removed homosexuality from the official manual that lists mental and emotional disorders. Two years later, the American Psychological Association passed a resolution supporting the removal. For more than 25 years, both associations have urged all mental health professionals to help dispel the stigma of mental illness that some people still associate with homosexual orientation.

Yes. Studies comparing groups of children raised by lesbian, gay, and bisexual parents and by heterosexual parents find no developmental differences between the groups of children in four critical areas: their intelligence, psychological adjustment, social adjustment, and popularity with friends. It is also important to realize that a parent's sexual orientation does not indicate their children's.

Another myth about homosexuality is the mistaken belief that gay men have more of a tendency than heterosexual men to sexually molest children. There is no evidence to suggest that homosexuals molest children.

Because sharing that aspect of themselves with others is important to their mental health. In fact, the process of identity development for lesbians, gay men and bisexuals called "coming out", has been found to be strongly related to psychological adjustment-the more positive the gay, lesbian, or bisexual identity, the better one's mental health and the higher one's self-esteem.

For some lesbian, gay, and bisexual people the coming out process is difficult, for others it is not. Often lesbian, gay, and bisexual people feel afraid, different, and alone when they first realize that their sexual orientation is different from the community norm. This is particularly true for people becoming aware of their lesbian, gay, or bisexual orientation as a child or adolescent, which is not uncommon. And, depending on their families and where they live, they may have to struggle against prejudice and misinformation about homosexuality.

Children and adolescents may be particularly vulnerable to the deleterious effects of bias and stereotypes. They may also fear being rejected by family, friends, co-workers, and religious institutions. Some lesbian, gay, and bisexual people have to worry about losing their jobs or being harassed at school if their sexual orientation became well known.

Unfortunately, lesbian, gay and bisexual people are at a higher risk for physical assault and violence than are heterosexuals. Studies done in California in the mid 1990s showed that nearly one-fifth of all lesbians who took part in the study and more than one-fourth of all gay men who participated had been the victim of a hate crime based on their sexual orientation. In another California study of approximately 500 young adults, half of all the young men participating in the study admitted to some form of anti-gay aggression from name-calling to physical violence.

Research has found that the people who have the most positive attitudes toward LGBT people are those who say they know one or more LGBT person well-often as a friend or co-worker. For this reason, psychologists believe negative attitudes toward LGBT people as a group are prejudices that are not grounded in actual experiences but are based on stereotypes and prejudice. Furthermore, protection against violence and discrimination are very important, just as they are for any other minority groups. Some states include violence against an individual on the basis of his or her sexual orientation as a "hate crime" and ten U.S. states have laws against discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation.

Educating all people about sexual orientation and homosexuality is likely to diminish anti-gay prejudice. Accurate information about homosexuality is especially important to young people who are first discovering and seeking to understand their sexuality-whether homosexual, bisexual, or heterosexual. Fears that access to such information will make more people gay have no validity-information about homosexuality does not make someone lesbian, gay, bisexual, or straight.

No. This is a commonly held myth. In reality, the risk of exposure to HIV is related to a person's behavior, not their sexual orientation. What's important to remember about HIV/AIDS is it is a preventable disease through the use of safe sex practices and by not using drugs.

Combined with sex-phobia, results in the invisibility or erasure of LGBT lives in school-based sex education discussions, keeping vital information from students. Such erasures can have dire health consequences.

Is one cause of premature sexual involvement, which increases the chances of teen pregnancy and the spread of sexually transmitted diseases. Young people, of all sexual orientations, are often pressured to become heterosexually active to prove to themselves and others that they are "normal."

Inhibits appreciation of other types of diversity, making it unsafe for everyone because each person has unique traits not considered mainstream or dominant. We are all diminished when any one of us is demeaned.

The University years are years of extreme change where students are confronted with a variety of developmental issues. The student who may be struggling with her or his sexual orientation may have a more difficult task as these issues appear.

During the college years students also begin to make decisions about what role religion will play in their lives. For LGBT students, coming to terms with their religious beliefs can be a difficult task in light of the fact that same-sex and transgendered behavior is not accepted by many religions.

Coming out is a process that is not limited to one time or place and it does not follow a linear course. It occurs when one acknowledges to oneself (often the most important and difficult aspect of coming out) and to others that one is lesbian, gay, bisexual, and/or transgendered. Coming out to one's self involves much introspection and self-appreciation. Coming out to others involves other potential risks and difficulties depending on who that person is coming out to, how engaged they are with them, how much power they have in the relationship, and how accepting they are.

It is a necessary part of developing a healthy and positive identity as an LGBT individual. It is more honest and real, and ends the stress of hiding or keeping a secret and living a double life. It reduces isolation and alienation and allows for increased support from other LGBT people. It allows LGBT people to live fuller lives.

DO: Assume that everyone might be attracted to and/or sexually or romantically involved with a partner of the same or opposite sex. Attraction and/or involvement fall along a continuum, which can vary over time.

DO: Assume any child might live in any number of family composition options consisting of the child and a single parent, the child and an opposite-sex couple, the child and a same-sex couple, or the child and multiple same-sex and/or other-sex adults.

Most of the LGBT people on campus you will encounter will be seeking support, advice, or information. Occasionally, you may advise an LGBT person who is experiencing a good deal of psychological distress. This may be evident in the following ways.

An LGBT person expresses depressive symptoms such as: sleep disturbance, sudden weight loss or weight gain, crying spells, fatigue, loss of interest or pleasure in previous enjoyable activities, and/or inability to concentrate or complete tasks.

Do not force LGBT people out of the closet nor come out for them to others. The process of coming out is one of enlarging a series of concentric circles of those who know. The process should be in the control of the individual until (and if) they consider it public knowledge.

Do not include sexual orientation information in letters of reference or answer specific or implied questions without first clarifying how "out" the person chooses to be in the specific process in question. Because your environment may be safe does not mean that all environments are safe.

Recruit and hire "out" LGBT staff and faculty. View sexual orientation as a positive form of diversity that is desired in a multicultural setting. Always question job applicants about their ability to work with LGBT students, staff, and faculty.

View the creation of this environment as your responsibility, not the responsibility of individual persons who happen to be LGBT people. Always waiting for them to speak, challenge, or act, adds an extra level of responsibility to someone who is already dealing with oppression on many levels.

The UB Safe Zone Committee welcomes your contact. We also value your privacy and time and therefore offer the following information to help you decide on the best method for reaching us. We hope that these guidelines are helpful to you as you decide how best to reach our staff. We take your time and confidentiality very seriously and therefore consider it imperative that you understand the limitations of our use of e-mail technology.

Talking about Suicide: If a student talks or writes about suicide, this should be taken seriously. Suicidal thoughts are in themselves not necessarily dangerous but, if they include actual plans for suicidal behaviors, the severity of the danger to the student increases dramatically. Suicide is often considered as an option when the person feels hopeless, trapped, out-of-control, and/or depressed. To make the assumption that talk of suicide is aimed solely toward getting attention can be a potentially fatal mistake. If you become aware of a student who is thinking about suicide, please make an immediate referral to Counseling Services. You can also call us for a consultation if you are unsure of an appropriate intervention or if the student is reluctant to take your referral. If a student clearly states the intent to commit suicide, call University Police (645-2222) or Crisis Services of Erie County (834-3131).

Stating a Need for Help: Students will often come to faculty or staff members with direct requests for assistance. Through talking with the student, you may feel the problems are beyond your scope of knowledge or power to change. Listening carefully to students and their concerns can provide ample evidence to support your decision to refer. If a student comes to you, he/she obviously feels that the relationship with you is important enough to value your opinion and response.

Observable Changes: Some students do not directly tell you that there is a problem but their behaviors can be telling indicators. Distinct changes in academic performance, withdrawal from others, changes in class participation, crying, outbursts of anger, increased or decreased activity, and poor attendance are examples of behavioral changes that you may observe. Severe depression, extreme activity level, conversations that do not make sense, and a marked decline in personal hygiene are examples of possibly serious psychological problems. Any of these observable changes may merit a referral to Counseling Services.

Psychosomatic Complaints: Students who report physical illness or symptoms that cannot be supported by medical evidence may be experiencing psychological problems. Psychosomatic symptoms are very real for the student and should not be treated lightly. Tension headaches, changes in eating patterns, sleep disturbances, fatigue, stomach aches, and other physical pain symptoms are some examples of psychosomatic complaints.

Alcohol and Drug Abuse: Coming to class or a meeting when intoxicated or high is a sign that drug and/or alcohol abuse is a serious problem. Often people drink or take drugs as a way to cope with and alleviate other problems in their life. Unfortunately, the substance abuse itself becomes a problem, one that interferes with social, academic, and work functioning.

Academic Problems: Students who have noticeable negative changes in their academic performance also may be feeling overwhelmed with other areas of their lives. Some students come to classes with difficulty concentrating, performing well on exams, and achieving academically. If the possibility of a learning disability exists, a counselor can meet with a student for a consultation appointment to discuss evaluation and treatment options.

Do not attempt to make a referral when the student is so upset and confused that he/she cannot understand or listen to you. Wait until the student has calmed down enough to be able to converse and respond to your suggestions.

Counseling at Counseling Services is confidential. This means that information about the student cannot be released to other UB offices, family, professors, etc. without the student's written permission (the exception being if the student is in danger of harming him/herself or others).

Give the student Counseling Services phone number (645-2720). The student can call from your office or from home. No appointments can be made for a student by a third party without the student directly speaking to the secretary and asking for an appointment.

If you feel that the student is in crisis, you can call Counseling Services or have the student call from your office. Tell the Counseling Services secretary that this is an "emergency" and she will connect you with a counselor immediately. If needed, the student can be seen for a crisis appointment that day.

Students are asked to come in for 90 minutes for their initial Initial Assessment appointment to fill out basic informational forms and then meet with a counselor. The counselor and the student discuss counseling options in this first Initial Assessment appointment and decisions are made regarding the next steps for the student to pursue. These steps may include: counseling at Counseling Services, a medical evaluation referral, a referral to a community mental health center or practitioner or, in emergency cases, a determination that the student should be sent to the psychiatric emergency room at a local hospital for further evaluation.

If a student tells us that you referred him/her, gives written permission, and requests it, a counselor will contact you to notify you that the student did attend the initial Initial Assessment appointment. If you would like more information about a student's contact with Counseling Services, you can directly ask the student.

Counseling Services provides consultation services to the entire University at Buffalo community. We are glad to answer any questions that you may have about our services, your concerns about a student, and referral options. Your call will be routed to an available counselor. We can assist you in making an effective Counseling Services referral.

Management" for example, which can be requested for classes. We can also design specific workshops for your group based on its needs and interests. If you are interested in these workshop services, please call 645-2720 for more details. We do request advance notice of at least 3 weeks prior to the date that you would like us to present. While we cannot guarantee that all workshop requests will be met, we will make every effort to do so.

Counseling Services also offers weekly workshops as part of our "Food for Thought" Workshop series each semester. Topics are based around a semester theme but often include: "Procrastination"; "Communication"; Conflict Resolution"; "Relationship Issues"; "Diversity"; and many others. We would be pleased to send you a flyer describing our semester workshops. We would appreciate it if you would keep these workshops in mind throughout the semester and refer students to them when appropriate.

University Police can provide assistance if a student is acting strangely or violently. Their officers have experience working with students in crisis and can provide options for further assistance if needed.

Crisis Services is a 24-hour hot-line service for anyone in Erie County. People can call and talk to a trained counselor to determine whether or not there is a serious psychological emergency. The Crisis Services staff will come to the location of the student if suicidality, violence, or psychosis is evident and, if appropriate, will arrange for the student to be taken to a hospital psychiatric emergency room.

Stress is a part of day to day living.  As college students you may experience stress meeting academic demands, adjusting to a new living environment, or developing friendships.  The stress you experience is not necessarily harmful.  Mild forms of stress can act as a motivator and energizer.  However, if your stress level is too high, medical and social problems can result.

Although we tend to think of stress as caused by external events, events in themselves are not stressful.  Rather, it is the way in which we interpret and react to  events that makes them stressful.  People differ dramatically in the type of events they interpret as stressful and the way in which they respond to such stress.  For example, speaking in public can be stressful for some people and relaxing for others.

Both positive and negative events in one's life can be stressful. However, major life changes are the greatest contributors of stress for most people.  They place the greatest demand on resources for coping.

There's no such thing as time management!  So why should you read the rest of this handout?  Because there is such a thing as self management and that's the key to making time your ally rather than your enemy.

There are only 24 hours in your day, just the same as everybody else's.  So how do you end up frustrated, angry, behind in your work, and dead on your feet?  Maybe because you don't know how to use those 24 hours to your advantage.

If using your time wisely is a problem for you, you probably don't have a very good idea of where it all goes.  It just seems to go!  A good place to start, then, is to keep track of how you use your time.  Get a Weekly schedule and faithfully keep track of how you use your waking hours for one week.  The results will probably surprise you.

Learn to say NO once your priorities are set.  Turning down an invitation doesn't mean you'll never be asked to do something again.  Weigh the consequences.  Making a decision based on what you know is best for you at the time, leads to greater respect from your friends, not to a reputation as a party-pooper.

Use a monthly calendar to help you allocate your study time on the Weekly Schedule.  At the beginning of each quarter, spend an hour with your calendar to enter all important dates.  As you receive course syllabi, enter the dates for quizzes, papers, etc., on your calendar.  Then estimate the time needed to prepare for each of these.  If your history paper is due the eighth week of the quarter and it usually takes you four weeks to do a paper, start work on the paper the second week of the quarter, allowing yourself an extra week for typing and an extra week for disaster.  If you stick to this schedule, you'll amaze yourself by having the paper finished in the seventh week.  The rule-of-thumb is "Plan ahead by working backwards."

By counting backwards like this, you'll be surprised how well you're using your time and how much better your grade will be when you're not under pressure.  And, by being really honest with yourself and taking account of all your priorities, you'll be able to go to the football game and not feel guilty.

The list below contains some common thoughts and worries which many test anxious people have.  Check those which you can identify with most.  Feel free to add statements which more accurately reflect what usually goes on in your head.

Make your goals challenging but attainable.  Good goals are neither too easy nor impossible.  They should cause you to stretch and grow.  A challenging, attainable goal will hold your interest and keep you motivated.

Frequently revise and update your goals.  As a growing person your needs will change over time, and this means goals will have to be modified, discarded and added from time to time.  Plan flexibly.  Don't think of your goals as carved in stone.

William Knaus, a psychologist, estimated that 90% of college students procrastinate.  Of these students, 25% are chronic procrastinators and they are usually the ones who end up dropping out of college.

Procrastination is the avoidance of doing a task which needs to be accomplished.  This can lead to feelings of guilt, inadequacy, depression and self-doubt among students.  Procrastination has a high potential for painful consequences.  It interferes with the academic and personal success of students.

Poor Time Management.  Procrastination means not managing time wisely. You may be uncertain of your priorities, goals and objectives.  You may also be overwhelmed with the task. As a result, you keep putting off your academic assignments for a later date, or spending a great deal of time with your friends and social activities, or worrying about your upcoming examination, class project and papers rather than completing them.

Difficulty Concentrating.  When you sit at your desk you find yourself daydreaming, staring into space, looking at   pictures of your boyfriend/girlfriend, etc., instead of doing the task.  Your environment is distracting and noisy. You keep running back and forth for equipment such as pencils, erasers, dictionary, etc.  Your desk is cluttered and unorganized and sometimes you sit/lay on your bed to study or do your assignments.  You probably notice that all of the examples that you have just read promote time wasting and frustration.

Fear and Anxiety. You may be overwhelmed with the task and afraid of getting a failing grade.  As a result, you spend a great deal of time worrying about your upcoming exams, papers and projects, rather than completing them.

Unrealistic Expectations and Perfectionism.  You may believe that you MUST read everything ever written on a subject before you can begin to write your paper.  You may think that you haven't done the best you possibly could do, so it's not good enough to hand in.

Fear of Failure.  You may think that if you don't get an 'A', you are failure.  Or that if you fail an exam, you, as a person, are a failure, rather than that you are a perfectly ok person who has failed an exam.

Study in small blocks instead of long time periods.  For example, you will accomplish more if you study/work in 60 minute blocks and take frequent 10 minute breaks in between, than if you study/work for 2-3 hours straight, with no breaks.  Reward yourself after you complete a task.

Modify your environment: Eliminate or minimize noise/ distraction. Ensure adequate lighting.  Have necessary equipment at hand.  Don't waste time going back and forth to get things.  Don't get too comfortable when studying.  A desk and straight-backed chair is usually best (a bed is no place to study).  Be neat! Take a few minutes to straighten your desk.  This can help to reduce day-dreaming.

Going through life as a perfectionist will always damage your self-esteem and strip you of any warm feelings of self- acceptance you may have for yourself. That's because the impossibly high demands you make of yourself--and the unrealistic expectations you place on others--will invite only disappointment, self-repudiation, and widespread unhappiness.

Living your life as a perfectionist will also set you up for continuous rejection and self-putdowns--and deny you peace of mind--because demanding perfection usually results in failure. And even if you achieve an exceptional result, chances are that you'll still be unhappy, as you'll find additional reasons for not being good enough. That's the destructive nature of perfectionism and that's why it destroys self-esteem. Nothing is ever good enough.

Remember, being a perfectionist may paralyze your future chances of success--in either your personal or your professional life--because you'll eventually fear taking any new actions that might produce an imperfect result. Preventing perfectionism begins by saying no to unreasonably high demands that produce only failure and self-contempt. The new way of thinking requires you to choose goals that are easier to achieve and are within the realm of your possibilities. Moderate your expectations--and stop focusing on faults and flaws--and then watch your performance and self-esteem soar.

Briefly describe one situation or part of your life in which you would like to be less perfectionistic. What are some specific ways that you could moderate your goals in that particular situation/area? What consequences might follow from such changes?

Failure is a teacher and can be the source of much personal growth. Experiencing failure--and learning to judge your own capabilities--demonstrates that you have the strength to accept life's challenges. Never condemn yourself for not succeeding. That's being unfair to yourself. See failure for what it really is: an opportunity to discover that future success lies in another strategy or direction. You will achieve your next goal if you learn from your past mistakes. In this section, describe how and what you have learned from some past "failures".

Self-confidence is characterized by: assertiveness, optimism, eagerness, affection, pride, independence, trust, the ability to handle criticism, emotional maturity, and the ability to accurately assess our capabilities.

Self-confidence primarily refers to us having a positive and realistic perception of ourselves and our abilities. A lack of self-confidence, on the other hand, is characterized by: self- doubt, passivity, submissiveness, over-conformity, isolation, sensitivity to criticism, distrust, depression, and feelings of inferiority and being unloved.

Experience: We often develop feelings of inferiority and hopelessness through various negative life experiences at home, school, on the job, etc. For example, when you were growing up your parents might have been unable to provide a healthy and supportive environment. They were critical, demanding and/or overprotective of you. As a result, you develop negative perceptions of yourself.

Loss of a family member or close friend. For example: your parent's divorce, moving away from home for the first time (you are away from your friends and family), and breaking up with your boyfriend/girlfriend.

Experiencing too much pressure from your parents and/or peers to meet the demands and expectations that they set out for you deprives you of the opportunity to develop your own identity, independence and autonomy.

Set goals that are realistic and will meet your expectations. For instance, set your goals at reasonable level so that what you accomplish is equal/almost equal to what you set out to accomplish. This can boost your self- confidence and self-satisfaction.

Learn to be assertive. That is, learn to express your feelings, opinions, beliefs and needs directly, openly and honestly, while not violating the rights of others. For example, learn to stand up for your rights and say "no" to unreasonable requests.

Make a list of what you feel are the major problems in your life. Then list ways to improve or change them. Chances are that not all of your problems can be dealt with easily or quickly. However, there are some areas where you can take immediate action.

Thomas J. Edwards Learning Center - Designed to help students "develop their learning methods through credit-bearing courses in the areas of writing, and mathematics." Free tutoring available in math, writing, and some content areas.

One of the greatest joys of college life are the friendships and romances made -- and one of the greatest tragedies is to see these ties broken.  Learning to relate to people outside the family circle is never easy at first, but don't worry -- at a university of this size, you'll get plenty of practice.

Making friends is a vital part of life at UB, and your friends can help to keep you sane in the worst of times.  The best place for most first-year students to start is with roommates.  It's a good idea to be on good terms with your roommates from the very start, as dorms are very small places. For commuter students, it's important to go beyond the circle of friends from home -- try meeting people in your classes, at the cafeteria, standing in line, or other spaces.

All relationships -- friend, roommate, or lover -- take time and energy to make them work.  Many times, stresses and disagreements can turn friendships and/or living arrangements into battlefields, but with some effort on the part of each person involved, understandings can be reached.  What follows are a few suggestions on making relationships work.

It is very difficult to know when to say something is bothering us and when not to say anything, to "just let it slide."  Nobody wants to feel like the "bad guy," -- as if we are infringing upon other people's rights by asking them not to take advantage of us.

Instead be proactive.  Tell the person involved what it is that is bothering you, and explain why.  Make sure you communicate the reason for your discontent; otherwise the other person won't know what's bugging you.

Always attack the problem and not the person.  We all too often have a tendency to say, "you are upsetting me",  which attributes the fault directly to the person.  Instead we should be saying, "the dirty dishes are upsetting me, could you please clean them?"  This may be personification, but it tends to eliminate the attack on the individual, and the defensive reaction which follows.

If you find yourself being reactive about a problem, the next time you encounter it, confront it.  But confront that one specific instance.  Do not dredge up the past by bringing up every example of "leaving the cap off the toothpaste," at once.  It is not fair for the other individual to have to deal with weeks or months of pent-up frustration; it is also equally your fault for not confronting the issue sooner and preventing it from occurring over and over.

There are times, however, when the problem is with the person. For some reason people just may not get along with each other, because they were raised in different environments and have nothing in common, or because they just can't seem to see eye to eye on anything. At times such as these it is often difficult to be impartial or open-minded enough to resolve differences to the point of being able to live with the other person. This is where Resident Advisers or others can be an invaluable asset.

Another one of the big "firsts" most of us encounter in college is unrestricted physical access to our boyfriend(s) or girlfriend(s).  With no parents, no curfew, and our own rooms, there is a great deal of temptation and pressure to rush into things for which we are not ready.  It is in these situations, when we must be simultaneously self-centered in deciding what is right for us and altruistic in caring for the other person's worries, needs, and desires, that problems most often arise. Finding the person who fills you with joy and who seems at the moment to make your life more complete is a wonderful thing.

When dealing with relationships of all sorts it is often difficult to know what is right and wrong.  But by being proactive and honest with others it's possible to learn about yourself while making your interactions with others easier and happier.

Once you're with people, initiate a conversation by: asking a question, commenting on the situation, asking for or offering an opinion, expressing some interest, showing some concern, or offering or requesting help.

Once you've engaged someone in conversation, let him or her know you're listening and interested.  Make eye contact, adopt an open posture, reflect the feelings you hear, paraphrase what he or she is saying, and ask for clarification if you don't understand.

One thing that's difficult for me in relationships is "hanging on to myself."  It seems that once I get close to someone -- roommate, friend, or lover -- I give in and accommodate so much that there's nothing left of me.

It's normal for relationship partners to have different needs in at least few areas, such as:  spending time with others vs. spending time with each other, wanting "quality time" together vs. needing time to be alone, going out dancing vs. going to a ballgame, etc.  Differing needs don't mean your relationship is coming apart, but it is important to communicate about them to avoid misunderstandings.

Tell your partner directly what you want or need ("I would really like to spend time alone with you tonight"), rather than expecting them to know already ("If you really cared for me, you would know what I want").

First of all, it is important to be aware of your own feelings: how you feel about your partner, how comfortable you feel in his or her presence, what does and doesn't feel comfortable or desirable in terms of physical closeness or sexual contact.

Communicate clearly to your partner/date what your limits are. Be prepared to defend your limits. If you mean No, then say "No," and don't give mixed messages. You have the right to be respected and you are NOT responsible for your partner/date's feelings or reactions.

Both partners have a responsibility in preventing unwanted sexual contact.  Men must recognize that no means no, regardless  when she says it, and regardless whether you think she is saying "yes" nonverbally. If a person says "no" and is still coerced or forced into having sex, then a rape has occurred.

Partners in same-sex relationships must deal with the stress of homophobia, society's widespread fear and condemnation of their sexual orientation.  Feeling unable to be open about one's relationship with friends, colleagues, and family can leave the same-sex couple isolated and deprived of a support network.

Finally, homophobia can affect non-romantic same-sex relationships.  For instance, two female friends, two brothers, or even fathers and sons, may feel reluctant to express their affection and caring for each other for fear of being thought gay.

Many gays and lesbians do stay hidden for much or all of their lives, and given the prevalence of homophobia, it's easy to see why.  But other same-sex oriented people, on this campus and all over the world, have made the decision to be themselves boldly and openly, in the belief that that is the best way to counteract stereotypes and discrimination.

Your friend may not have felt certain of his sexual orientation when he first met you, or he may have just decided to do you the honor of trusting you to be a part of his "coming out," or his process of acknowledging, accepting, and disclosing his gayness. Ask him about it. He'll probably appreciate your sincere interest.

For a long time, bisexuals were thought to be confused, "half-and-half" people.  But there is growing recognition that while some people who think of themselves as bisexual may be in transition towards one orientation or the other, many genuinely feel strong attraction towards people of both genders.  They're not so much "half" as "both"

Recognize that guilt, self-blame, and bargaining are our defenses against feeling out of control, feeling unable to stop the other person from leaving us.  But there are some endings we can't control because we can't control another person's behavior.

I seem to get into the same pattern in all my relationships.  I get afraid of losing my partner; then we get into a big argument and break up in anger.  Sometimes I even think I may have picked a fight just because I'm scared to keep the relationship going. Does this make any sense?

Yes, it makes a lot of sense, and congratulations on recognizing a pattern.  That's the first step towards change.  People get into a variety of painful or "dysfunctional" patterns in relationships.  Often, those patterns are based on old fears and "unfinished business" from childhood.

If you feel "stuck" in a pattern and unable to change it, talking to a professional counselor may help.    Counseling Services offers a variety of individual and group services for all currently enrolled students.  All services are free, voluntary, and confidential.  Call 645-2720 or drop by 120 Richmond Quad to schedule an initial appointment.

Does being "different" sound like a positive or a negative experience to you?  For gays and lesbians, daily living can be a frustrating and painful experience in our society. Because they are different in their sexual orientation, gays and lesbians have been oppressed. They suffer social, religious, economic, political and legal discrimination. Much of this discrimination is based on the myths people believe about gays and lesbians. For gays and lesbians to be treated equally in our society, we need to dispel these myths. What is most needed is the elimination of the irrational fear and hatred some people have for intimate, same-sex relationships. This irrational fear and hatred is called homophobia.

Fact: A gay man or lesbian is someone whose primary sexual and affectional preference is for a member of his or her own sex. This is different from the statistical norm, but difference does not equal deviance. If it did, blue-eyed people and left-handed people _ who are also in the statistical minority would be considered deviant. Male homosexuals generally prefer to be called "gays," while female homosexuals generally prefer to be called "lesbians," although the term "gay" is often acceptable for both sexes. To be called "queer," faggot" or "dyke" is derogatory and insulting.

Fact: Homosexuality is considered normal in most of the world's cultures. In 1973, the American Psychiatric Association removed homosexuality from its list of mental disorders and declared that homosexuality is as healthy as heterosexuality. Like anyone else, however, gays and lesbians can become maladjusted when they are treated with hostility.

Fact: Sexual behavior and orientation exist along a continuum that ranges from people who are exclusively attracted to members of the same sex, to people who are equally attracted to members of both sexes, to people who are exclusively attracted to members of the opposite sex. All are normal.

Fact: A generally accepted statistic is that approximately one in 10 persons is gay or lesbian. Gays and lesbians are found in all walks of life and in all professions. For example, consider the following professional associations:  the National Lawyers Guild Gay Caucus, the Association of Gay Psychologists, the Gay Nurses Association, the Association of Gay  Seminarians and Clergy, the Gay Airline Pilots Association, and the Gay Prize Fighters of America Association, to name but a few.

Fact: Homosexuals are neither more nor less sexually promiscuous than heterosexuals. Like heterosexuals, many gays and lesbians are involved in monogamous relationships, considering themselves partners and committed to each other for life. Some gays and lesbians may also choose to remain celibate, and others may have multiple partners, just as some heterosexuals do.

Fact: Reasons that a particular sexual orientation develops are unknown. Current research indicates that it is a very complex matter that involves both biological and environmental influences. Just as we cannot explain what makes some people heterosexual, we do not understand what makes other people gay or lesbian.

Fact: Many gays and lesbians have dated members of the opposite sex but find it more fulfilling to date members of their own sex.  Most gays and lesbians have no desire to change their sexual orientation. Those who do are usually reacting to negative societal attitudes toward homosexuality.

Fact: Being gay involves more than a person's sexual activity. When friends "come out" (reveal their homosexuality) to you, they are essentially inviting you to know them as whole people. If a gay person chooses to come out to you, then that person has decided to share part of his or her identity with you. Such a disclosure means only that this friend trusts you, not that he or she would like to become sexually involved with you.

UBQueer is a discussion forum and networking resource for members of the State University of New York at Buffalo queer community which encompasses gay, lesbian, bisexual, transsexual/transgender, and questioning students, faculty, and staff.

Many adolescents believe that they are escaping from the emotional and social problems of their alcoholic parent by leaving home and going to college. However, they eventually realize that these problems continue to affect them, even as an adult.

These feelings commonly follow loss or disappointment and they usually pass in a few hours or days. When depressive feelings, however, persist and interfere with one's health and social well-being, then some sort of intervention or professional help is needed.

Depression is a prolonged and persistent negative mood which can color and interfere with many aspects of one's life. It is characterized by feelings of worthlessness, excessive guilt, loneliness, sadness, hopelessness, and self-doubt. Suicidal thoughts may also be present. Normal everyday depression can last for a few minutes to a few days. We've all felt these periods of being "down" or "sad." These feelings are a normal part of being human. On the other hand, depression that becomes intense and lasts for extended periods of time may be a dysfunctional form of depression, something beyond the "everyday sort."  This more serious type of depression can often be helped by seeing a mental health specialist.

After accidents and homicides, suicide is the third leading cause of death among young adults ages 15-24.  It can be prevented. Men are more likely to commit suicide than women. They usually use violent means to end their own lives.  Females, on the other hand, are more likely to attempt suicide.  They usually use drugs or poison to try and end their lives.  You should  note that a suicide attempt is a "cry for help" and a request for social support.  The suicidal person is letting his/her feelings be known.  His/her problems seem overwhelming and too difficult to handle.

Major life transition, such as loss of a loved one, breaking up with a boyfriend/girlfriend, moving to a new town or school, failing an exam or course, not getting into one's choice of major, etc.  These major life changes can cause a college student to feel unloved, depressed, isolated and lonely.

Negative feelings about oneself.  A student who is suicidal experiences feelings of worthlessness and of being a failure. He/she may not be doing well in school or may not be excelling in academic or social areas that are of interest.

Note that depression is a major contributing factor to suicidal thinking. Depression may result from several factors, including the recent loss of a family member or friend, disappointments in romantic relationships, or failure to live up to one's own or others expectations.

Date rape and acquaintance rape are forms of sexual assault involving coercive sexual activities perpetrated by an acquaintance of the rape survivor.  The perpetrator is almost always a man, and though both men and women can be raped, women are most often the targets of this violence.  It is difficult, because of a lack of research on the subject and the tendency for rape survivors not to report attacks, to come up with precise statistics on male survivors.  However, men are raped by other men and are also victims of sexual violence.  Date and acquaintance rape can happen to or be perpetrated by anyone.  Incidences are very high: they comprise from fifty to seventy-five percent of all reported rapes.  However, even these figures are not  reliable.  According to conservative FBI statistics, only three and a  half to ten percent of all forms of rape are even reported.

Date and acquaintance rape is quite prevalent on campuses.  One in  four college women has been raped; that is, has been forced, physically or verbally, actively or implicitly, to engage in sexual activity.  A 1985 study revealed that ninety percent of college rape survivors knew their attacker before the incident.  Another survey found that one in fifteen college men admitted to having forced a woman into sex.

Some experts believe that one explanation for such high statistics is that young people, constrained for most of their lives by their parents and laws, are unprepared to act responsibly in a "free" environment.  This "freedom" can lead to unrestrained drug and alcohol use, which then leads to sexually irresponsible acts, and then to rape.

Another theory portrays America, especially young America, as a rape culture.  The values adopted by the dominant society dictate inherent differences between men and women.  Women are expected to be passive, unassertive, and dependent.  Similarly, men are constrained in their behavior.  They are taught to be aggressive, even intimidating, strong, and relentless.  They are taught not to take no for an answer.  Men who accept or unwittingly exhibit this kind of behavior are likely to misinterpret a woman's communications.  Typically, the man will decide that the woman is acting coy or hard to get in a sexual situation.  He may believe that she really means yes, although she has been saying no.

Communication is the most important avenue to understanding another person's desires and needs -- often the rapist will ignore the woman's attempts at communication, will misinterpret them and continue his actions, or will realize what the woman is trying to say but will decide that she "really needs to get laid" and doesn't care.  The bottom line is that yes means yes and no means no; if you want to play sado-masochistic games, make up a safe word like "cow" to use as a preordained signal to stop.

Many times women or men who have been date- or acquaintance-raped do not view the assault as a rape.  They may experience some or all of the symptoms of rape trauma stemming from the violation of the body and the betrayal of a friend, but still may not consider the incident rape.  Some symptoms of rape trauma include sleep disturbances, eating pattern disturbances, mood swings, feelings of humiliation and self-blame, nightmares, anger, fear of sex, and difficulty in trusting others.  Often, especially in a college situation, the rape survivor and the attacker live near each other or may see each other every day.  This can be particularly stressful to the survivor because the man may see the rape as a conquest or "just a mistake." Bystanders and friends of both people may not view the incident as  the rape it is and consequently will not lend the survivor the  support needed.  Friends of the survivor may misinterpret the incident and feel that somehow the rape was deserved or that the survivor "asked for it" by wearing a miniskirt or getting drunk.  Some people may belittle the survivor's traumatic experience, saying things such as, "She liked the guy anyway, so what's the big deal?"  These attitudes that blame the survivor, some say, are embedded in our culture and help to perpetuate violence against women and sexual violence such as date and acquaintance rape.  Survivors, living and learning in this culture, may also accept "explanations" of "why it isn't rape," although they have been inwardly traumatized.  The important thing to remember is that if there are feelings of violation, if a person's lifestyle and self-esteem are negatively affected by the incident, or survivors believe they have been raped, then it is rape.

Date and acquaintance rape is not only a woman's issue.  Men must be actively aware of this issue, as they can help minimize rape by educating themselves and others.  Lovers, neighbors, friends, co-workers, dates, and classmates -- these can all be perpetrators of date and acquaintance rape.  Escort services, blue light phones, and van services are useless if the rapist lives in your home or dorm, is your date, drives you home from work, or is someone you have had reason to trust.  In order for date and acquaintance rape to be minimized, men must stop "blaming the victim" and start taking responsibility for their own actions.  We all must not allow rapists to use the "rape culture" as a means of silencing rape survivors, nor can we permit their friends to lie for them.  And although it is always difficult, and admittedly, sometimes impossible to do, rape survivors and others must speak out and continue to speak out against rape.

Giving in is not something to be ashamed of.  He may threaten you.  He may be physically violent.  He may terrify you so that you cannot respond effectively.  Going along with him may be the only smart thing to do.  Giving in may be a survival strategy.

Do not berate yourself that you "let" him rape you.  A rape-threatening situation is also a life-threatening situation.  Your only responsibility as a victim is to yourself.  You do not need to sustain injury or death to "prove" you were raped.  Stay alive.

Define your limits, i.e., how much touch you want with different male friends (handshake, kiss on cheek, kiss on mouth, hug with both arms, intercourse, no touch).  Think about this in advance, even though you can change your mind later.

Defend your limits: "I don't like it when you do that"; "I like you and I don't want to go to bed with you"; "Let's go to the coffeehouse (instead of around the lagoon)."  You have the right to be respected, to change your mind, to say "no" or just say, "Because I don't want to."  Practice saying "no" clearly --don't hint, don't expect anyone to read your mind.

Be prepared for his reaction to your defending your limits. Possible reactions include hostility, embarrassment, blaming you for leading him on. You are not responsible for his behavior or his reaction; if he is someone you care about, you may wish to help him through the embarrassment, but you do not need to feel responsible. You have every right to your own decisions.

Most date rapes involve men and women who conform to traditional, rigid sex roles so it is important to examine sexism in order to prevent rape.  Avoid stereotypes such as "anger is unfeminine" that prevent you from expressing yourself.

Rape is the perpetuation of an act of sexual intercourse with a person against her will and consent, whether her will is overcome by force or fear resulting from the threat of force, or by drugs administered without consent or when, because of mental deficiency she is incapable of giving consent or when she is below the arbitrary age of consent.

In other words, the term "rape" is used when penetration is involved, even slight penetration, and even if no ejaculation occurs.  Also note that the threat of force is sufficient - many women report fearing for their lives even when their attacker is not carrying a weapon.

Sexual Abuse is also defined in three degrees, according to the same system as rape.  However, the difference is that penetration is not required.  Rather, all that is required is "sexual contact" - touching of intimate or sexual parts, either directly or through clothing.

Therefore, sexual abuse in the first degree is roughly defined as sexual contact by force or threat of force, or when the individual is incapable of consenting due to mental deficiency, or when the individual is below age 11.

Remember that some men think that drinking heavily, dressing provocatively, or going to a man's room indicates a willingness to have sex.  Be especially careful to communicate your limits and intentions clearly in such situations.

Don't be afraid to "make waves" if you feel threatened.  If you feel you are being pressured or coerced into sexual activity against your will, don't hesitate to state your feelings and get out of the situation.  Better a few minutes of social awkwardness or embarrassment than the trauma of sexual assault.

When we think about alternatives to vulnerability, we must be careful not to assume that there is always something a woman "could have done" to prevent an assault.  This is blaming the victim.  When a person is sexually assaulted, it is the assaulter who is to blame.

In addition, sexual assaults, including those committed by acquaintances, may be violent and unexpected.  This means that even when a woman is able to assert what she wants, there is no guarantee that her feelings will be respected.

There are no formulas that can guarantee our safety from sexual assault.  In a situation that is becoming coercive or violent, the moment is often too confusing to plan an escape, and women react in various ways.  Some will fight back.  Others will not fight back for any number of reasons such as fear, self-blame, or not wanting to hurt someone who may be a close friend.  While fighting and giving up are both extreme reactions, it is important to realize that any reaction is legitimate.  Again, the burden of responsibility must be on the attacker, not the victim.

Nevertheless, sexual violence is committed overwhelmingly by men, whether it is sexual violence against women or sexual violence against other men.  To read more about this aspect of relationship violence, and what you, as a man, can do about it, go to the sub-menu heading "For and About Men" under the heading "Relationships."

When a loved one/classmate is dying or dies, there is a grieving process. Recovery is a slow and emotionally painful one. The grieving process can be less painful if you try to understand that loss and grief is a natural part of life. Learn to accept your loss and believe in yourself. Believe that you can cope with tragic happenings. Let your experience be a psychological growth process that will help you to deal with future stressful events.

At first, it may be difficult for you to accept your own dying or the death of a loved one/classmate. As a result you will deny the reality of death. However, this denial will gradually diminish as you begins to express and share your feelings about death and dying with other students or friends.

During this stage the most common question asked is "why me?". You are angry at what you perceive to be the unfairness of death and you may project and displace your anger unto others. When given some social support and respect, you will eventually become less angry and able to move into the next stage of grieving.

You may at first experience a sense of great loss. Mood fluctuations and feelings of isolation and withdrawal may follow. It takes time for you, the grieving student, to gradually return to your old self and become socially involved in what's going on around you.

Show that you care. Listen attentively and show interest in what the grieving student has to say about his/her feelings and beliefs. Share your feelings and talk about any similar experience you may have had. Avoid using the phrase "I know just how you feel."

Due to cultural ideals of feminine beauty, young women feel a strong desire to be thinner than their bodies naturally tend to be. As a result, they change their eating patterns and they may develop eating disorders. The most common eating disorders are Anorexia Nervosa and Bulimia. Both eating disorders are more common among young adults than at any other age.

Many American men and women believe that they are fat. They then diet, lose, and regain weight. Dieting can become frustrating when it does not work. Also, extreme dieting can lead to physical and psychological problems.

Introductions of Leaders and Participants.  What brings you to this workshop; what do you hope to get out of it?  Leaders emphasize that in this workshop we will be suggesting a framework to help people think about this important topic but that we realize that in a brief workshop we can only make a beginning, not provide all the answers for people.

What are some of the ways that you feel you have difficulty maintaining your sense of self in a relationship? (Have participants write 2 or 3 ways down on index cards or paper and then share them with the whole group.) The workshop leader will write down the group list on blackboard.

Conclusion:  exercising one's basic rights is the key to maintaining one's self in a relationship.  Emphasize again the basic rights and the need to remember them and exercise them in order to maintain a whole self which one can bring to a relationship.  Conclude with a recognition that it is an ongoing challenge to maintain one's sense of self in a relationship but that that is the key to having a healthy and satisfying relationship.

Counseling Services is a department of Student Affairs.  Our office provides a full range of services and programs which promotes the personal development and psychological well-being of students and the attainment of personal and educational goals.  The staff is strongly committed to programming related to student diversity and to an overall university environment where individual and cultural differences are celebrated. Among the services offered are group therapy, individual psychotherapy, couples counseling, crisis intervention, consultation, outreach programming, career counseling, substance abuse assessment, psychological evaluation, and referral. Counseling Services works with students presenting with a full spectrum of concerns, from developmental issues to severe psychopathology.

Counseling Services offices are located on the North (Amherst) Campus of the State University of New York at Buffalo in a residence hall complex.  The facilities include individual offices for interns, a group room for counseling and seminars, and video/audio recording and networked computer equipment in each intern's office.  Additional space is located at the Student Health Center, where staff also see clients throughout the week.

The internship offered by the University at Buffalo Counseling Services (UBCS) is designed to provide a broad-based professional training experience in the range of activities carried out by psychologists in a service-oriented university counseling center.   Our philosophy of training incorporates a generalist, practitioner-scholar perspective, highlighting mentorship and experiential learning, all with an eye toward providing developmentally appropriate and individualized experiences for our interns.  We also recognize the profound impact of individual and cultural difference in all that we do as psychologists and as human beings.  Hence, we have a commitment to diversity and multicultural awareness in all aspects of our training program.

Our mission is to train interns as skilled generalists equipped to work in a variety of post-internship employment settings.  To this end, we provide a range of didactic and experiential training activities that psychologists in a large university counseling center setting or other mental health settings are likely to encounter.  The areas of functioning within the substantive areas of counseling psychology emphasized at our center include:  individual and group psychotherapy, clinical assessment, crisis intervention, outreach, and consultation.

Our staff recognizes the importance of clinical practice that is informed by scholarly inquiry, and espouses a practitioner-scholar model in our professional work, including training and service delivery.  Theoretical and research literature is integrated with experiential components of training through provision and discussion of professional literature in seminars and supervision.  There is recognition of the applicability of scientific method in clinical thinking, including critical evaluation, awareness of biases, integration of available information toward hypothesis formation (i.e. case conceptualization), and the process of hypothesis testing (e.g. implementing interventions, assessing their impact, revising hypotheses).  UBCS staff serves as practitioner-scholar role models for our trainees, and center activities illustrate the integration of science and practice.  Administrative and policy decisions at our center are informed by scholarly review of both empirical and theoretical literature, as well as our center's ongoing examination of service utilization, client demographics, and client satisfaction.  Results of ongoing satisfaction surveys may also inform areas in need of attention for clinical staff and trainees.

There is attention to developmentally appropriate training experiences for optimal growth.  Interns' experiences are sequential, cumulative, and graded, with increasing levels of responsibility and expectations for independent functioning throughout the internship year, to facilitate continued growth from a "trainee" identity toward a "professional" identity.  Toward this end, the internship year begins with a period of orientation during which interns receive several seminars providing didactic information on the core tasks that interns will engage in throughout the year (e.g. short-term therapy, clinical interview, outreach/consultation, group therapy, crisis intervention, supervision).  Interns also shadow training staff as they conduct initial clinical assessment interviews and crisis intervention sessions before interns are expected to engage in these activities themselves.  Previous training and experience is assessed, initial goals for training are agreed upon, and these training goals are revised throughout the year based on periodic intern evaluations.  Throughout the internship year, support, training, and supervision activities are geared toward assisting interns to increase their clinical sophistication, knowledge, and skill, be able to take on more responsibility, and develop greater confidence and capacity for autonomous functioning.

We recognize that each intern brings a variety of skills, experiences, and training needs to the internship, and that some flexibility to tailor the training program according to the strengths, needs, and interests of each intern is necessary for optimal growth.  This is accomplished in numerous ways, including customizing training contracts for each intern based on their particular interests and needs, and providing opportunities for intern input into the planning of various center and training activities.

Our internship program attends to diversity/multicultural issues throughout various training activities, including didactic training, supervision, and actual clinical experiences with a diverse client population.  The staff of Counseling Services is committed to the awareness and affirmation of diversity in all our clinical and non-clinical endeavors. Multicultural awareness and sensitivity pervade all training and service at our center.  The student population here at UB is quite diverse not only among traditionally under-represented American groups, but also among international students.  Interns are provided with exposure to clients of differing ethnicities, cultures, sexual orientations, socioeconomic backgrounds, religious backgrounds, ages, genders, and abilities.  Several seminars are presented throughout the year addressing various topics related to diversity and multicultural issues.  Workshops are provided to the university community in an effort to assist in the celebration of diversity throughout the campus.  We strive to recruit interns who share our commitment to embracing the challenges and rewards of gearing services to such a broad-ranging population.

We see the internship year as a transition period when interns will be shifting from a trainee identity and developing their clinical and professional identities.  We seek to assist in this developmental process by providing interns opportunities to stretch, take risks, try out different forms of interventions and therapy approaches, and begin to discover their own individual styles and approaches that are consistent with their sense of self, values, strengths, and interests, with greater sensitivity and respect for the multicultural world in which we exist.

The program's goals, objectives, and expected competencies in summary are to assist interns toward developing intermediate to advanced level of skill in the provision of clinical and professional services at a university counseling center or comparable setting, including acquiring and/or refining knowledge and skill in individual and group psychotherapy, clinical and diagnostic interviewing, utilizing psychological testing as it informs clinical practice, crisis assessment and intervention, outreach, consultation, and providing clinical supervision to counselors in training, as well as competency in integrating science and scholarly activity with clinical practice.  Additionally, we work to assist interns in beginning to develop a sense of professional identity that is consistent with professional ethical standards, incorporates diversity/multicultural awareness and appreciation, and is congruent with their personal sense of self, values, strengths, and interests.

Direct treatment of clients is the cornerstone of our training program.  All staff members provide individual, couples and group counseling.  Accordingly, the intern is provided with experience in a number of treatment modalities, including crisis intervention and individual short- and long-term treatment.  The intern may expect that about 50% of their time will be spent in direct clinical service provision.  A typical weekly schedule in the fall semester involves 12 - 14 individual clinical hours and 1 - 2 therapy groups.

Clinical assessment is primarily done through the interviewing of incoming clients during the initial clinical assessment.  During the clinical interview, the intern is responsible for delineating the presenting problem, assessing the severity and need for immediate or crisis intervention, providing appropriate diagnoses and initial clinical impressions, and recommendations for treatment.  Training in diagnostic interviewing takes place during the August orientation though didactic presentations and observation.  Interns typically provide 3 - 4 hours of intake interviews per week.

Objective and projective psychological tests may also be used to aid clinical and/or career assessment and the therapy process. Psychological testing is addressed in intern seminars. Additional training may occur throughout the year for interns who wish to receive additional testing experience.  Testing may be supervised by one of the intern's supervisors or by another staff or consulting psychologist chosen by the intern.

Each staff and intern provides 1-3 hours per week of walk-in crisis intervention during regular Counseling Services hours to students who require immediate attention due to significant lethality risk or deterioration of functioning.  Each staff and intern also participate in a rotating after-hours on-call system several weeks throughout the year.  Training in risk assessment and crisis intervention takes place during the August orientation, intern seminars,  through didactic presentations and observing/shadowing staff.

The Counseling Services has an active and extensive outreach program, providing a wide variety of workshops and other presentations to the campus community.  Interns are regular participants in this programming providing a minimum of 3-4 workshops each semester.  Topics are numerous, and open to intern interests and expertise.

Interns have opportunities to provide mental health consultation to university students, faculty, staff, and parents, or develop consultative relationships with various university organizations (academic departments, student service offices, student groups).  This may involve such activities as working with university faculty, staff, or students on crisis management and intervention (e.g. dealing with a disturbed student in a class, responding to a suicidal student, processing the death of a student), providing training workshops on a variety of topics (e.g. lethality assessment, conflict management), or aiding better understanding and communication among staff personnel.  Interns also have the opportunity to participate as a Counseling Services liaison/consultant on university committees, where they will have regular contact with non-Counseling Services university staff.  Additionally, interns respond to phone consultation requests and emergency crisis consultation meetings with university students and staff.  Training in outreach and consultation takes place during August orientation, intern seminars, and working as co-presenters or co-consultants with staff.

In addition to the APA accredited professional psychology internship, Counseling Services also provides training to social work interns, practicum students from UB's Counseling, School, and Educational Psychology doctoral program, and externs in masters  programs in Mental Health Counseling from area universities. Psychology interns participate in the provision of supervision to counseling practicum and extern trainees throughout the year. Training in the provision of clinical supervision takes place during August orientation seminars, directed readings, and weekly meta-supervision with the Training Director throughout the year.

Each intern office is equipped with a networked computer running Windows, through which interns have access to the internet, electronic mail, client scheduling, and other computer processing needs.  In addition, interns may utilize university consultants for research design and statistical analyses.

All applicants will be informed by December 15 (as per APPIC recommendations) whether or not they will be offered a phone interview.  They will be notified by email and/or letter.  Following the December 15 notification, you will be contacted by our secretarial staff to schedule a phone interview.  Phone interviews typically take place during the first two weeks of January.

There will be NO notification to applicants of their ranking status (i.e. whether or not they will be ranked by our program), as there is no benefit for applicants in having this information and no cost for applicants of not having this information, given that APPIC match procedures will not be impacted by this knowledge.

Following applicants' phone interviews, there will be NO further recruitment efforts, as we do not wish to be perceived as courting an applicant (per APPIC guidelines).  Applicants, however, may contact us following their phone interviews if needing further clarification about any information relevant to their ranking decisions.  They are also welcome to speak further with other staff members or current interns, as relevant to their ranking decisions.

We do NOT offer on-site interviews (to be fair to applicants who cannot afford on-site interviews).  However, applicants are welcome to informally visit our center, if that will aid in their decisions about ranking internship sites.  Interested applicants should contact the Training Director to schedule the informal visit.

The University at Buffalo is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer.  We're particularly interested in identifying prospective women, minority, and differently abled intern applicants.  In accordance with federal and state laws, no person in whatever relationship with the State University of New York at Buffalo shall be subject to discrimination on the basis of age, religion or creed, color, disability, national origin, race, ethnicity, sex, marital or veteran status.  Additionally, New York's Executive Order 28 and the University Board of Trustees Policy prohibit discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation.

Despite the fact that humans have never limited their sexual pleasure to what we now call heterosexual intercourse, the history of LGBT people is relatively short. The genital anatomy of one's partners-or what Freud calls one's "object choice"-didn't become the definitive criterion for distinguishing LGB and heterosexual selves until the last third of the nineteenth century. During the 1860's and 70's European public administrators began noticing that some people were organizing their lives not around family, household, and reproduction but around various forms of sexual pleasure. This was probably a recent phenomenon made possible by the forces of capitalism, which tended to draw people off the land into cities away from their parishes and families and to reduce the importance of arranged marriage. Alarmed, officials began studying these populations, whom they characterized as sexual deviants and grouped according to the particular practices they engaged in. One such class of deviant came to be called "homosexuals."

LGBT people quickly became the target of medical, psychiatric, and legal intervention, and as early as the 1870's they came together in such places as Bavaria to fight criminalization of sodomy. Until the Nazis destroyed Magnus Hirschfeld's homosexual archives in Berlin and hundreds of thousands of homosexual people were sent to die in concentration camps, the LGBT movement in Germany was widespread and influential.

In the US the history of LGBT culture and politics is even shorter than it is in Europe. The largest and best known communities are in New York, Los Angeles, and San Francisco, and there are reasons for that. First, because of economic dislocations and farm crises in the first half of the 20th century, people migrated to large cities to find work. Once there, they were often forced to live outside traditional family structures, many in same sex settings such as military and industrial barracks, for prolonged periods. Those with LGBT inclinations found one another at the same time that they found the freedom to express themselves without ever-present familial and religious disapproval. For women in particular this was a new experience.

But in addition to economics changes, another extremely significant factor in the development of coastal LGBT enclaves was the ban on lesbians and gay men in the military. After World War II thousands of lesbians and gay men were dishonorably discharged from the armed services, and many were simply dumped in port cities. At times several hundred ex-service people were deposited in San Francisco per day. They couldn't go home in disgrace, so they stayed.

The first known LGBT political organization in the U.S. was the Mattachine Society, founded in November of 1950 in Los Angeles. This underground emancipation movement was the brainchild of Harry Hay, a young musicologist who had honed his organizing skills in the ranks of one of the most underground political movements in America in this century, the Communist Party. As Hay well knew, persecution of homosexuals was rampant. Police constantly entrapped and brutalized LGBT people. Public disclosure of an LGBT identity was enough to get most people fired from their jobs and ostracized from families and communities. By early 1953 under President Eisenhower lesbian or gay identity became by executive order a necessary and sufficient reason in itself to fire any federal employee from his or her job. Most defense industries and others with government contracts followed suit, and the U.S. Postal Service aided these industries by putting tracers on suspected lesbians' and gay mens' mail in order to gather enough evidence for dismissal and possibly arrest.

The Mattachine Society drew tremendous support after one of its founders, Dale Jennings, was arrested for "lewd and dissolute behavior" in February 1952. Jennings took the unheard course of acknowledging his gay identity in court while pleading innocent to the charges against him, thus forcing authorities to draw a distinction between being gay and being guilty of illegal activity. The jury was deadlocked and a retrial ordered, but the DA's office dropped all charges. Publicizing this victory wasn't easy, however. There was a news blackout; no press releases were accepted by any newspapers, magazines, or radio stations. The Mattachine Society was forced to circulate information solely through postings and flyers distributed in areas where LGBT people were believed to congregate. Nevertheless, the event drew tremendous, if quiet, support, and membership in the Mattachine Society grew by several thousand in succeeding weeks.

Fears generated by Joseph McCarthy's campaign to rid America of Communists eventually led to the neutralization of the Mattachine Society. By late 1954 it was the weak, fully public, assimilationist organization whose main purpose was to convince heterosexuals that lesbians and gay men presented no threat whatsoever to any of their values and were in fact exactly like them but for sexual preference. The lesbian organization Daughters of Bilitis, founded in San Francisco in 1955, didn't fare much better, although both groups managed to sustain publications with national circulation through the 1950's and 60's. By 1969 there were about fifty "homophile" organizations in the US, all fairly small.

The main reason for the lack of visibility in post-war America was persecution-religious persecution, discrimination in employment, violence, and police brutality. Non celibate LGBT people were condemned by and unwelcome in most mainstream religious organizations not only as leaders but even simply as members. This led the Reverend Troy Perry, a Baptist, to found the Metropolitan Community Church in 1968. Today the MCC is the largest LGBT religious organization in this country and by far the largest in the South.

Discrimination in employment probably ranked as the most threatening type of persecution LGBT people faced and still face-second only to physical assault in its violence but affecting far more people. Eisenhower's executive order stood from 1953 until 1993. There has never been any employment protection for LGBT people as there is now for heterosexual white women and heterosexual men and women who belong to racial and ethnic minorities. Employers routinely refuse to hire LGBT people regardless of their qualifications and fire any who manage to get hired while closeted.

Still, the ugliest of all forms of discrimination was and is undoubtedly gay bashing, especially when carried out by public officials. Police harassment and brutality have been constant features of LGBT life for decades. Indefinite detainment's, beatings, and public humiliations are only the tip of the iceberg. Transgendered people through the 1950s and 1960s suffered frequent rapes and sexual assaults committed by police officers, sometimes inside police precincts. And police were certainly no help when beatings, rapes, and lesser indignities were visited upon LGBT people by civilians.

It was in this atmosphere of terror and brutality that patrons of the Stonewall Inn in New York's Greenwich Village resisted a police raid in 1969. The Stonewall Inn was a working class lesbian and gay bar frequented by transgendered people. Police raids were common then and ugly. On the night of June 29, 1969, police attempted to raid the bar as usual, but the regulars were fed up. As the officers entered the building, patrons barricaded them inside and held them there. Thus began three days of rioting. At one point it was estimated that the LGBT people held eight square blocks of the city. Word of the riots spread quickly through homophile organizations around the country. It was at that point that what had been since 1954 a rather quiet assimilationist movement became militant.

In December, 1973, this movement achieved a major victory when pressure groups succeeded in forcing the American Psychiatric Association to remove homosexuality from its list of mental illnesses. This change eliminated one of the reasons employers so often fire LGBT people and one of the reason judges so often awarded custody to heterosexual over LGBT parents-but only one.

In 1978 California state senator John Briggs introduced a move to prohibit lesbians and gay men from teaching in California public schools. The initiative was defeated in November after a series of statewide debates between Briggs and Harvey Milk. It looked like gay rights would hold firm in California, but less than three weeks later Harvey Milk and pro-gay San Francisco mayor George Mascone lay dead, assassinated by former city supervisor Dan White. A jury subsequently gave White the lightest possible sentence on a charge of manslaughter. San Francisco's LGBT population rioted; but the heyday of pro-gay politics was over in that city, and anti-gay violence sky-rocketed.

Not long after, scientists at the Centers for Disease Control began to notice a number of immune-deficiency-related illnesses in the gay male populations of major cities. Public officials (who didn't know what caused the illnesses or exactly how they were spread) began closing down establishments where LGBT people gathered. Not surprisingly, LGBT people resisted these moves, seeing them as just another ploy on the part of politicians and police to destroy LGBT communities and to oppress individuals. Tensions between LGBT communities and various branches of government increased.

In 1986 in Bowers v. Hardwick the U.S. Supreme Court held that states have a right to criminalize even private and consensual sexual behavior. Specifically the court said Georgia had a right to punish Michael Hardwick for sodomy even though his act occurred in private. The police officer who over-heard and then witnessed Hardwick's act had entered the house in order to speak to one of Hardwick's housemates about a traffic violation. Officer Bowers placed Hardwick under arrest in his own bedroom.

Things have changed. The number of employers offering domestic partner health insurance benefits has increased 25 percent since 1999, and now includes more than 100 of the Fortune 500. Nevada became the eleventh state in the nation to prohibit job discrimination based on sexual orientation. Nevada joined California, Connecticut, Hawaii, Massachusetts, Minnesota, New Hampshire, New Jersey, Rhode Island, Vermont and Wisconsin in protecting sexual orientation in the workplace. Two states - Minnesota and Iowa - the District of Columbia and 28 cities or counties protect transgendered or gender-different employees by law or executive order. Reform Judaism became the first major religious denomination to sanction same-sex unions and, on April 26, 2000, Vermont governor Howard Dean (D) signed a historic "civil union" bill that gives gay and lesbian couples the same rights and benefits afforded married couples under state law.

Other positive steps in the nineties included the American Psychiatric Association and the American Psychological Association's condemnation of "reparative" or "conversion" therapies as having deleterious effects, given that  practitioners often mislead patients and are motivated by personal prejudices. Also, the Supreme Court ensured that Americans living with HIV will remain protected from discrimination under the Americans with Disabilities Act, regardless of their stage of infection. Sydney Abbott, the plaintiff in this case, sued Dr. Randon Bragdon for violating the ADA by refusing to administer routine dental care to Ms. Abbott in his office. The ADA prohibits discrimination against disabled people in places of public accommodation, including dental and medical offices, as well as in employment and public services.

On the negative side, the witch-hunt against gay and lesbian service members reached an unprecedented level as the number of service members discharged increased 14% to 1,145 in 1998, according to Pentagon figures. The U.S. Supreme Court decided to allow the Boy Scouts of America to continue its ban on gay scouts while the Teletubbies T.V. character, Tinky Winky, was outed by former Moral Majority founder Jerry Falwell. Falwell justified his outing by claiming that Tinky Winky has the voice of a boy but carries a purse. "He is purple -- the gay-pride color; and his antenna is shaped like a triangle -- the gay-pride symbol." Falwell argued that the "subtle depictions" are intentional and issued a statement that said, "As a Christian I feel that role modeling the gay lifestyle is damaging to the moral lives of children." The Human Rights Campaign assured parents that their children would not become gay due to the subversive effects of the color purple, triangles, and magic bags.

A study released in August by Dr. Karen Franklin, a forensic psychologist at the Washington Institute for Mental Illness Research and Training, suggests that harassment and hate crimes against gay students by their peers is commonplace. According to the study, nearly one-quarter of community college students who took part in this survey admitted to harassing people they thought were gay. Among men, 18 percent said they had physically assaulted or threatened someone they thought was gay or lesbian. And 32 percent admitted they were guilty of verbal harassment. Hate crimes based on sexual orientation have more than tripled since the FBI began collecting statistics in 1991. We have crimes such as the one committed by Ronald Edward Gay, who shot seven people in a gay bar because he was angry about jokes people made about his last name. Or the one committed by two men who took Billy Jack Gaither,39, to a remote location in Alabama, bludgeoned him to death, put his body on a stack of tires and set him on fire because he was gay. Or the murder of Matthew Shepard, 21, the gay University of Wyoming student who was savagely attacked, burned, and left to die for up to 18 hours tied to a wooden fence.

We have three major assumptions.  Disagreement and conflict are inevitable in intimate relationships.  Styles of expressing anger are learned and therefore can be changed.  Angry feelings depend on one's perception of the situation. So developing self knowledge, listening, and communicating skills are the keys to fair-fighting.

Generally we think of fights as angry confrontations between two or more people where tempers flare, voices are raised, and insults are exchanged.  This way of resolving conflict, while unfortunately common, usually results in bitterness, distrust, and desire for revenge.  The issues may be temporarily settled, but one or both partners feel resentful, angry or hurt.  Both partners can experience a loss of intimacy.

Clean, fair fights, on the other hand, are confrontations in which disagreements and grievances are dealt with according to a specific set of guidelines.  Applying these principles, along with the skills of active listening and a collaborative attitude allows differences to be negotiated.

Both partners will be more likely to feel refreshed, resolved, and relieved that important issues have been dealt with. Successful fights tend to clear up problems and increase intimacy by helping each partner understand the other better.

The following guidelines highlight some of the major fair and unfair fighting techniques couples use with each other.  Remember, what you need to decide is not "Should I express my anger?"  or even "How should I express my anger?", but "How can I communicate to my partner about this issue so that s/he will do something about it?".

Friendships don't just happen.  Although one person may start a friendship, both partners will need to contribute to the building process.  You can initiate a friendship by moving toward a prospective friend and starting a conversation.  You will probably have very few friends if you wait for them to come to you.

Remember that initial relationships with others are generally a little awkward.  Allow yourself some time to feel comfortable with the beginning of a friendship--the initial awkwardness is natural and will lessen as you get to know each other.

As college students, we are all familiar with the experience of loneliness.  Because each individual is unique, we all tend to feel lonely under different conditions.  For example, some of us will feel lonely when we are excluded from group activities, others, when we are deprived of building close one-to-one relationships.

Loneliness does not necessarily mean being alone.  For example, you can feel lonely when you are in a class with three hundred other students, in the middle of a party, or at a football game with hundreds of screaming spectators.

You do not make any attempt to get involved in social activities.  You expect everyone that you admire to like and include you in their activities and conversations.  If they do not include you in their social activities you may become more withdrawn, angry and isolated from other activities.

Learn to enjoy life by developing your social skills.  If you see someone that you like, don't just sit there and hope that the person will come to you.  Make the first move.  Use verbal or nonverbal cues to let the person know that you are interested in getting to know him/her.  For example, make eye contact and smile.  You can also go over, say "hi" and introduce yourself.

Don't judge people on the basis of your past experiences. Give your instructors, classmates and peers a chance, and try to get to know them.  Remember!  There are individual differences in people.  Learn to admire and accept these differences.

Many college students find it difficult to express their feelings honestly and openly because they lack assertiveness. This can become a problem when building a relationship, going out in the career world or communicating with friends, family members, and co-workers.

Assertiveness is the ability to express your feelings, opinions, beliefs, and needs directly, openly and honestly, while not violating the personal rights of others. Assertiveness does not in any way means being aggressive. Aggressive behavior is self enhancing at the expense of others. It does not take other individual's rights into consideration.

Be direct, honest, and open about your feelings, opinions and needs. State reasonable requests directly and firmly. State your goals or intentions in a direct and honest manner. State your point of view without being hesitant or apologetic. Being responsible for your own behavior will let you feel good about yourself.

Learn to say no to unreasonable requests. Use the word "no" and offer an explanation if you choose to. Do not apologize and do not make up excuses. Paraphrase the other person's point of view. This will let he/she know that you hear and understand the request.

Recognize and respect the rights of your friends, classmates, roommates etc. For example if you are upset with them use "I" and "we" statements to express your feelings, instead of blaming and finger pointing "you" statements.

When communicating with others use an appropriate tone of voice and body posture. Maintain eye contact. Tone of voice should be appropriate to the situation. Stand or sit at a comfortable distance from the other person. Gestures can be  used to emphasize what is being said and the word "I" and "we" should be used in statements to convey your feelings. For example, it is more appropriate to say "I am very disappointed that you didn't show up as plan", instead of saying, "Man, you are a jerk".

It is very important to communicate what you really want. You have the right to set sexual limits and to communicate them.  It's not unfeminine to express an interest in having sex, and it's not "uncool" to make your lack of interest clear.

It's very hard to always be the one to offer yourself. Some men are afraid that women say yes, but mean no. Men don't like to pretend that they always want sex. Men are afraid of being rejected and turned down.

Women are socialized to believe they should always go along with what men want, in spite of what they want. Many women are afraid of hurting men's feelings. Some women don't like pretending that they don't want to have sex. They may enjoy sexual contact - hugging, foreplay - but do not want to have intercourse.

If you are getting a double message from a woman, speak up and clarify what she wants.  If you find yourself in a situation with a woman who is unsure about having sex or is saying "no," back off. Suggest talking about it.

Do not assume you both want the same degree of intimacy.  She might be interested in some sexual contact other than intercourse.  There may be several kinds of sexual activity you might mutually agree to share.

Be aware that a man's size and physical presence can be intimidating to a woman. Many victims report that the fear they felt based on the man's size and presence was the reason why they did not fight back or struggle.

Remember, the attitude with which you approach problem-solving is very important.  Problem-solving requires collaboration and problem-solving requires that each problem being discussed is seen as a mutual problem.

Don't make assumptions about a woman's behavior.  Don't automatically assume that a woman wants to have sex just because she drinks heavily, dresses provocatively, or agrees to go to your room.  Don't assume that just because a woman has had sex with you previously she is willing to have sex with you again.  Also don't assume that just because a woman consents to kissing or other sexual intimacies she is willing to have sexual intercourse.

Be aware that having sex with someone who is mentally or physically incapable of giving consent is rape.   If you have sex with a woman who is drugged, intoxicated, passed out, incapable of saying "No", or unaware of what is happening around her, you may be guilty of rape.

"Get involved" if you believe someone is at risk.  If you see a woman in trouble at a party or a male friend using force or pressuring a woman, don't be afraid to intervene. You may save the woman from the trauma of sexual assault and your friend from the ordeal of criminal prosecution.

Finally, realize how other men's uncaring or wrong behavior might affect your own life.  Some woman that you know may have been raped.  Understand that this person might need your support but might not be able to enter into a relationship at the present time. Also realize that some women who have been raped might feel distrustful of men in general.  This is not an abnormal reaction to such a traumatizing experience.

In dormitories or other residences, men can also help by paying attention to strangers who appear to be wandering around the building.  Ask them who they are looking for, and report suspicious behavior to University Police.

The White Ribbon Campaign was organized to acknowledge the "Montreal Massacre" of 1990 when 14 women were murdered by Mark Lepine at the University of Montreal.  The purpose of the campaign: to have men show their support for ending violence against women.  "It was the first large scale initiative ever developed by men to speak out on a subject usually considered to be a women's issue."  Ribbons were distributed throughout Canada.  As the campaign gained momentum, publicity, discussion and debate followed.  Men were finally talking seriously about a serious problem; most for the first time.

Realize how other men's uncaring or wrong behavior might affect your own life.  Some woman or man that you care about may have been raped.  Understand that this person might need your support but might be unable to enter into a relationship at the present time.  Also realize that some women who have been raped might feel distrustful of men in general.

Confront potential rape scenes.  When you see a man verbally harassing a woman, stand by to see if she needs help.  If a man is hitting or holding a woman against her will, do something immediately to help her.

If someone you know has expressed violent feelings or demonstrated violent behavior in a particular relationship with someone, try to help him find an appropriate person with which to talk (mental health, RA, etc).

Hope.  Initially we may fantasize that there will be a reconciliation, that the parting is only temporary, that our partner will come back to us.  As we heal and accept the reality of the ending, we may dare to hope for a newer and better world for ourselves.

While some of these feelings may seem overwhelming, they are all "normal" reactions and are necessary to the process of healing so that we can eventually move on and engage in other relationships. Be patient with yourself.  And if you would like to talk your feelings over with someone, contact the Counseling Services at 645-2720.  Speaking with someone can often give us perspective.

We believe the quality of supervision contributes strongly to a positive internship experience; therefore supervision is a primary aspect of our program.  Intern supervision is designed so that each intern has exposure to most of the senior staff.  Interns receive supervision from a number of different supervisors and have input into the selection of therapy supervisors.  Supervision emphasizes both the development of skills, personal awareness, and the integration of various theoretical positions into one's own individual therapeutic style.

Individual Supervision:  Interns are assigned two supervisors who together oversee the intern's individual psychotherapy training.  Interns receive a total of 2 hours individual psychotherapy supervision per week.

Supervision of Group Therapy:  Interns receive 1 hour weekly of supervision of their group therapy experiences from the senior staff members with whom they are co-leading their groups.  Interns also participate in a group consultation meetings for 1.5 hours weekly with the group coordinator to view tapes of their group sessions and give and receive feedback.

Case Conferences and Clinical Meetings:  Interns participate in clinical meetings and case conferences, which include the staff and the consulting psychiatrist.  Clinical meetings are used to discuss assessment issues arising from specific clinical assessment interviews and to assign clients.  Case conferences provide the opportunity for interns and senior staff to present cases informally and to discuss treatment issues.  There will be a few occasions during the year in which the intern will be asked to do a formal case presentation.

Another component of our training program occurs in the intern seminar, which meets for two hours per week. They are presented by Counseling Services staff members, adjunct training faculty, and professionals from the University and greater community. The seminars focus on topics deemed pertinent to the development of a competent, well-grounded psychologist, and include such topics as: short-term therapy, empirically supported therapy, legal and ethical issues, risk management, psycho-diagnostic issues, group therapy, treatment of special populations such as those with eating disorders and adult survivors of sexual abuse, diversity issues in counseling, assessment, and consultation. Input from interns in selecting topics for these seminars is welcomed.

We believe that a firm and thorough grounding in developmental theory, clinical understanding of psychopathology, and the interaction of individual functioning with one's culture are essential for an understanding of human behavior and psychotherapeutic intervention. Through clinical meetings, supervision, seminars, case conferences, and presentations, the intern is expected to demonstrate a growing ability to develop sound theoretical conceptualization and intervention strategies.   Additionally, though our staff espouse a variety of clinical orientations and approaches, there is a shared understanding and appreciation for the impact of interpersonal/relational dynamics in the lives of our clients and within the therapy process.  Regardless of therapeutic orientations, there is strong emphasis on using the therapeutic relationship as a primary therapeutic tool.

Knowledge of ethical and professional behavior is essential to anyone who plans to continue in the field of psychology. Interns and staff need to remain up-to-date with changes occurring in the interpretation of such issues as managed care, confidentiality, legal rights, insurance, and dual/multiple role conflict. These topics and others are addressed throughout the year in supervision, training seminars, clinical meetings, staff meetings, and case conferences.

Interns are afforded the opportunity to gain experience as supervisors. Interns supervise practicum students from the APA-accredited Counseling, School, and Educational Psychology Program at the university, as well as externs from other masters level counseling graduate programs in the area. Training and supervision of interns on their supervisory skills is done on a weekly basis, in a group format, seminars, and directed reading. In addition, interns can gain supervisory experience in planning outreach programs and conducting groups with practicum students.

Counseling Services has  board-certified consulting psychiatrists and psychiatric residents who are present for our Clinical Meetings and Case Conferences and available for individual consultations about specific clients. Interns also have the opportunity to attend Psychiatric Grand Rounds, sponsored by the University at Buffalo Medical School.  Interns typically will have the opportunity to visit the Comprehensive Psychiatric Emergency Program (psychiatric emergency room) at Erie County Medical Center, where students who need psychiatric evaluation for possible hospital admission are referred. The psychiatric staff may also provide training through intern seminars.

The initial part of our internship program is the August orientation. Interns are oriented to the campus and to Center policies and procedures through a variety of presentations, workshops, and training modules designed to help prepare them for the various professional activities in which they will be involved during the succeeding year.

Supervisors of each activity provide ongoing evaluation of interns. All senior staff members who work with interns meet regularly to discuss and monitor intern training experiences. Formal evaluation occurs at various points during the internship year (end of fall semester, end of spring/summer semesters). Feedback to interns is written and verbal, highlighting both strengths and areas needing improvement.

The internship program is evaluated on a continuous basis by means of meetings between the Training Director and interns and regular meetings of the training staff. Interns and staff provide written mid-year and final evaluations of the internship. Mid-year and final evaluation meetings of the staff and interns focus on the effectiveness of the training program and on the development of more effective policies and procedures.  Interns also provide ongoing informal and semester-end formal written and verbal evaluations of all of their supervisors and the Training Director.

Attendance and presentations at national and regional conventions and training workshops are encouraged, and professional development time is provided.  The Counseling Services staff is active both regionally and nationally and supports intern participation in professional organizations and research endeavors. Currently, interns are allotted 2 hours per week for professional development activities (e.g. research, dissertation work, independent readings on topics of professional interest, etc.) during the Fall and Spring semesters, and 4 hours per week during winter intercession and Summer semester.

Interns are involved as fully participating members in staff meetings. Additionally, they are given the opportunity to participate in Counseling Services committees, such as the Quality Assurance Committee, Training Committee,  Professional Development  Committee, Suicide Prevention Committee, and Research Committee.

A primary goal of the internship training is to enhance personal and professional growth and development.  An emphasis in the formal supervisory process is in helping the intern to develop a greater understanding of herself/himself insofar as they affect the clinical and professional roles.  Interns are also encouraged to work cooperatively together, sharing information and experiences toward greater mutual learning and growth.  It is the philosophy of the internship training program that interns be supported in the pursuit of a greater sense of independence and personal and professional identity.  As part of achieving this goal, the Training Director meets with the intern group weekly to help them process experiences, address and deal with personal and professional issues, and generally monitor their progress, concerns, and needs.

The agency is engaged in a continual evaluation of its program and procedures to enhance the quality and effectiveness of the services we provide. Policies and procedures are regularly reviewed, and therapy outcome and client satisfaction data are routinely collected.  In addition, each staff member and trainee is expected to monitor his or her own performance on a regular basis.

The professional staff encourages interns to be involved in research activities. Efforts are made to develop collaborations between senior staff and interns on empirical research,  theoretical papers, and professional presentations.

How often do we recreate the wheel? Every Center has arrived at it's own solutions to policy and procedure issues, and what better way to avoid the wheel recreation scenario than putting all of our expertise at each other's finger tips. You are encouraged to submit your resources and feedback below.

Feminist-Friendly Graduate Programs and Internships (source: Note, this site is no longer active - this is a link to an archive of the original webpage downloaded from http://web.archive.org.  You may still find some useful information here, however).

The Village web site was created to bring together in a single organized web site the expertise and resources of counseling center professionals from around the country. Too often we work in relative isolation from each other, unaware of the work our colleagues are doing at other schools. As a result we run the risk of duplicating our efforts and recreating the wheel, rather than building on the accomplishments of each other and collaborating on new projects and initiatives. The Counseling Center Village web site offers us an efficient and convenient way of overcoming this isolation.

Most of the content of the Village web pages has been and will continue to be created by counseling center professionals. Although links to non-counseling center sites sometimes will be included, the emphasis is on gathering together resources, information, and services created by counseling center professionals, so that we can all benefit from each others' efforts.

For the past year and a half the Counseling Center Village has already gathered links and materials on a wide variety of topics and issues of concern to counseling center professionals. To keep the Village up to date and viable, we need to continue to add new resources.

Please consider making submissions, and encourage your colleagues to do the same. Pass the word! We'd appreciate it if you would consider announcing our project at your next staff meeting, posting the enclosed flyer, or copying the enclosed flyer for your staff.

Below is a typical weekly contract for the beginning fall semester of the internship year.  Time allocations are approximate and subject to change based on each intern's particular training needs and interests.

We are looking for a counseling center professional to coordinate this section of the Village web project.  Vision, ideas, and enthusiasm are more important than any particular expertise in web page design.

A discussion list for directors (& assistant directors and directors emeritus) of university and college counseling centers. Topics include counseling & clinical issues, policies & procedures, confidentiality, current political/economic issues.

Description: This list is focused on the topic of university student counseling center web resources on the web. The envisioned topics of this list include: announcements of new counseling center web sites and web resources, discussion of hardware, software, clinical, legal, and ethical issues related to the provision of counseling center web resources.

This list of Feminist-friendly Graduate Programs and Internships is constantly being updated. At present, the list concentrates on Psychology programs and internships. Most of the information below was compiled in October 1999. More recent information will include the date of the update. If you would like to add to or comment on this list, please contact Juliette Cutler Page at editor@feminista.com.

Feminists, our students are encouraged to study a wide variety of issues and topics, and research is broad and exciting. The male faculty have always supported me in all my Feminist-oriented courses, book choices, research, etc"

In the past two decades, models of psychotherapy supervision - particularly developmental models - have increasingly been proposed; those efforts have provided us with a useful meta-perspective on the supervisory process, have stimulated some valuable thought about intervention, have stimulated much research about therapist development and supervision, and seemingly have substantially advanced supervision theory far beyond anything that therapy-based supervision models have contributed in the last few decades.

As illustrated in Figure 1, these styles are differentiated by the degree of support and direction given by the supervisor to the supervisee, based upon supervisee readiness. The four styles are labeled Technical Director, Teaching Mentor, Supportive Mentor, and Delegating Colleague as a means of providing a descriptive titles and stylistic characterization for each quadrant.

This document will take you through various issues that should be considered as you set about designing your own web page.  You can use the table of contents at the right to go directly to the topic of interest to you, or read the entire document from beginning to end.

One of the first things you need to consider is who your intended audience is.  If this is not clear to you as you begin to design your web page, you will probably find yourself eventually confronting a number of different problems: your page will lack a coherent structure, you will be unable to make clear decisions about what to include and what not to include, and it will become difficult to effectively publicize your site.

Do you have a "mission statement" for what you plan to do?  Is your web site going to be primarily informational; will you be providing self-help materials; is the emphasis on prevention, training, consultation, publicity, or a combination of these or other issues?

This will have direct implications for the kind of information you have at your site, how you will keep it up to date, and the way the material is organized.  If your site is just a static listing of your services, then people probably won't be returning on a regular basis.  If, on the other hand, you provide on-line self-help material, you are probably wanting users to return when they are looking for information about a personal concern.

The world wide web is made up of hypertext documents, or at least that is what it is designed for.  Hypertext is a type of reading material (the "text" part) that contains words and other symbols or pictures embedded in the text that will link you (the "hyper" part) to other sections of that text or to entirely different documents.  Many people put documents (e.g., a self-help brochure) on-line, simply transferring a printed version to the web as is, with no embedded links. For many purposes, this works fine, especially for smaller documents. Unfortunately, this ignores the fact that most people do not use the web the same way they use a book or other printed source. Very few readers of a web page stick around and read screen after screen of information. Instead, they read a piece here, click on a link to another portion of the document, then click on a link to another web site... clicking their way along from page to page, in a fairly nonlinear manner.  Of course, creating a link-filled web page takes a lot more time to set up than simply putting a plain document on-line.

Whether we like it or not, no matter how good the content of your web page might be, it is not going to be as effective if the packaging is unattractive. There are numerous ways to make your web site attractive (e.g., graphics, different fonts, colors, eye-catching layout, intuitive organization).

The World Wide Web allows you to add wonderful pictures, logos, and other graphic images to your web page.  Your page can end up looking really quite spectacular.  The problem is, graphics can slow down the time your web page takes to load at the user's machine.

If the user at the other end has a slow connection, or if internet traffic is busy at that particular time (or a host of other conditions), it may take a very long time for your web page to appear on the user's computer screen, even if you have just a few pictures on your web page.

There are lots of different ways to include color in your web page, most notably the background of your page, and the color of your text (different colors for different fonts). This is a simple way to spruce up the look of your page with very little effort.

Not all users have a graphics browser.  Instead, they use a browser program that displays only text -- no graphics at all.  Have you taken this into account in the design of your page?  Does your page make sense visually to a text-only browser?

"What about people with blindness who use alternate Web browsers or who use speech output screen reading devices? What about persons who use alternative keyboard systems which have limited mouse use. In that case, accessibility depends on the Web page design itself. Some pages are accessible because they observe a few simple design principles.

Borrow other people's ideas.  You can view the "source" of any web page you are looking at (usually by pulling down the "View" menu in you browser, and selecting "Document Source.")  This way, when you see something on a web page you would like to use for your page, you can see how that author did it.

There are many students looking to make some extra money, and pad their resumes, who can often do very creative work for you.  Or, there are more and more private businesses that specialize in web page designing.

There are many software programs on the market these days, or available as shareware right on the internet, that will help automate the creation of a web page for you.  You still control the design of your page, but do not have to get bogged down in the arcane html programming language.

The good news is, you do not need to know everything there is to know about web design.  You just need to know someone who does.  You will want to locate someone at your school who will be able to answer your questions.  A good place to begin is at your school's computing center or other office that supports the school's technology efforts.  Begin developing a relationship with this person early-on in the development of your web site; indeed, it is a good idea to begin this relationship even before you begin designing your page.  You will have questions, if not now, then in the future. Trust me.

Lynx - this is a text-based browser... don't forget to test your page via a text-only browser!  If you don't have access to Lynx, you can still check your page by going to Lynx Viewer which will let you see what your pages will look like.

Another concern is whether people are using your site at all!  Most schools will keep statistics on web page access -- how often a page is accessed, from where, with what type of browser, etc.  You can check with your Computing Center (or equivalent office) to find out if they keep such statistics and how you can access them.

Alternatively, you could install a counter directly on to your web page.  If you have been surfing the web at all, you have probably already seen these counters, with some statement such as "This web site has been accessed XXXX times."  Again, check with your Computing Center for how to set up an individual counter for your page(s).

CAVEAT: It is, in fact, unclear whether such stats tell you anything meaningful at all, however they might be generated.  There are various reasons for this, rather technical, but you should learn about these limitations if you intend to look at such statistics.  I recommend an interesting web site at Cranfield University in the United Kingdom that presents an argument that web page access stats are, in fact, entirely meaningless and should not be used at all.

You might want to be explicit about what you will and won't do via e-mail. Like any issue of informed consent, students need to know what the risks are of communicating with you through e-mail. The APA's Ethics Committee has posted this statement about services by telephone, teleconferencing, and the Internet. It doesn't actually answer any questions, but at least it helps point us in the direction of the right questions to consider.

If you've decided to link your pages to external sources of information, that's great. It also raises an issue about how much responsibility are you willing to take for the content of the external source.

Suggestion #3: Put some kind of disclaimer before links that lead out of your site that lets people know that while you think the link is useful, you don't own it and can't be held responsible if it changes for the worse.

Of course, if you know a lot about setting complex passwords and server permissions, feel free to post anything you like (as long as it's not confidential, since that opens a whole new can of worms). Then your only concern is hackers, and most wouldn't be interested in your policies. This list is a work in progress and as Counselors encounter new problems, I hope to use this page as a way we can all learn from their misfortunes.

Exciting it's not, but it does the basic function of a web site. It communicates information about how to hook into your services. As several authors have described it, this is a "billboard" style web site.

Perhaps you would like to include pages that are actually useful by themselves, much like your psychoeducational handouts. The Virtual Pamphlet Collection offers some excellent examples of how these might look.

The other major changes would involve doing things like changing the look of your pages by changing the background color, text color, or layout. You can also add pictures if you like. Perhaps your university has a logo that you could add to your page.

Additionally, let the web be your teacher. Learn to use the view source option on your browser, which will let you see how anything on the web is done. A tremendous number of amazingly complicated tricks can be added to your site without you having any depth to your understanding. Just cut and paste from the pages you find on the web. You can also save any page that you find on the web using the "File" part of your menu bar and then clicking on the "Save as..." option. Finally, your right mouse button (on a PC) or holding down your button (on a Mac) can do quite a bit for you as well. And remember to keep your entire site or page on your computer locally first until you are sure it looks good and works well.

As more and more pages have been put up on the web, and as it becomes easier and easier to do so, some consistent problems have started showing up. It turns out that good design--making information easy to use and aesthetically pleasing--is not guaranteed by most WYSIWYG editors. These resources may be able to help.

Counseling Center Village has become a very useful resource for counseling center professionals around the world.   Colleagues separated by many miles are easily able to share their resources and expertise.  Brochures, Policy and Procedure manuals, intake forms, workshop outlines, and more, no longer gather dust in our offices or need to be recreated again somewhere else.

Note: Hit statistics for the Village website are significant under-estimates, given the nature of web browser technology, the manner in which hit statistics are calculated, and the "framing" of other sites' webpages used in the Village. It is much more accurate to simply state that the Village received at least this many hits, and most certainly much much more.

The Counseling Center Village is overseen by a group of counseling center professionals who have expressed a particular interest in guiding its development. Although not required for membership on the Board, Board members typically coordinate a particular section of the Village as well. If you think you might be interested in joining the Board, contact David L. Gilles-Thomas for more information.

One of the best places to find out more about creating web pages is the web itself.  Below we have listed several web sites that will, in all likelihood, provide everything you could possibly want to know about web page design.

Special variables have been created on the basis of explicit assumptions, to make the data easier to use. For 1850-1870, each household member's relationship to the head was not ascertained by the census, but an IPUMS-constructed variable offers a reasonable guess based on age, sex, and order of enumeration.

So how do we get these magnificent datasets? The IPUMS Web site provides two ways. The experienced user of quantitative data will probably want to click his or her way to complete datasets (data/data options/download entire raw datasets; the Web site discusses transmission time and space considerations). IPUMS also offers an option for selecting random subsamples: a mini version with 21,000 households, and a tiny version with 2,100 households.

An impressive feature of the Web site is documentation. Census instructions to enumerators, as well as discussions of sampling, coding, and construction of variables, can all be read online or printed. The crucial documentation that will be used over and over-variable location and codes for each response-are found in hyperlinked form that is easy to use online and easy to download to one's PC (personal computer) for use with a Web browser.

Also, the extract option described earlier automatically provides programming statements to address the selected data files in SAS (System Application Software), SPSS (Statistical Package for the Social Sciences), or Stata, including all the value labels and other features that are time-consuming to enter oneself but nice to have. Select all variables in the extract option, and you get the fullest programming statements.

Once a dataset has been accessed, it must be analyzed. IPUMS does not provide its own shortcuts here. One option: a standard statistics package such as SAS. A second: IPUMS does provide links to two free software products for "easy" generation of crosstabs and descriptive statistics from IPUMS datasets. At least one of these (by Querylogic) can be downloaded on the spot to a PC for immediate use; still, it will require a little time before the inexperienced student can use even this package.

More? The "international" option at the home page reveals that IPUMS will soon provide access to machine-readable samples from the censuses of many other countries, as well as to some additional U.S. data.

Before you are subscribed to the list, you will receive an email (see example 3) from majordomo asking you to confirm your subscription.  You'll also receive an email telling you to expect the first (see example 4) which is silly, I know, but it's automated.

Several Internet information services are available on GSULaw OnLine for the use of faculty, staff, and student organizations. In order to take advantage of most of these services, you or your organization must have a NetWare user account.

This page illustrates the use of searchable legal indexes on the World Wide Web. Only specifically legal indexes in the U.S. are included. Please note that many of the search tools here have additional search options available and that to derive full benefit from them you should visit the original sites directly.

If you are aware of searchable legal indexes which have not been included, or have other comments, and especially if you discover that one of the links is broken, please send email to Patrick Wiseman (pwiseman@gsu.edu).

Use of this index: Each search tool starts with a "default" entry as an example. If you want to see the kind of information returned by each tool, simply select the Search button. If you have a specific search in mind, enter it in the space provided, and then select the Search button.  Selecting the Default button will return the search entry to its default. For more information about each search tool, select its link. All default searches in the "Judicial Opinions" section were successfully completed on 03/16/2002, unless otherwise noted. A few, apparently broken, search tools have been temporarily removed.

This resource will find links to primary legal sources, government resources, World Wide Web sites, publications, law school course outlines, software, mailing lists, Usenet discussion groups, and related FindLaw pages.  The example search is of "Legal Websites."  Visit the site directly for many more options.

If you would like to receive email notification when the Meta-Index for U.S. Legal Research is modified, please send an email to metaindex@gsulaw.gsu.edu  If you add your address to our list, you will only be notified when major revisions of the Meta-Index are released.

Prospective employers may fill out our online job listing form to announce the availability of a position. The information will be sent to CSO staff for review, and will subsequently be posted to the appropriate page.

Patrick Wiseman, in collaboration with the Career Services Office (CSO), expressly for the use of Georgia State University College of Law graduates and students. This service provides convenient on-line access to CSO job listings. Utilization of this service is limited to authorized subscribers.

Fill out the subscription request form to subscribe to Employment Opportunities On-Line (EOOL). The subscriber form requires specific identification information to be completed that will be reviewed by the Career Services Office. Authorized subscribers will receive an "approval message" along with important information about the use and function of EOOL.

There's a link at the top of each bulletin board allowing you to subscribe to it.  There's also a link from the top of the Index page allowing you to subscribe to or unsubscribe from all or any of the pages at once.

This server could not verify that you are authorized to access the document requested.  Either you supplied the wrong credentials (e.g., bad password), or your browser doesn't understand how to supply the credentials required.

My son is dead because the justice system was smug and became a business. My son did not warrent a public defender, a public defender who would not help a parent save his son.  The Park Rangers set my son up for arrest.

They were gung ho. ... and set the stage for my son's ulitmate death.  There are many questions which have not been answered. There are many questions which were answered to be self serving.  Ventura California should be ashamed of themselves.  Despite my pleas for help no one did anything to help.

I am interested in starting law school, probably in the fall of 2003. Starting earlier would be better if entrance requirements could be completed. I am Sheriff of Lamar County and am 56 years old, have a Masters Degree in Public Administration and have taught the CRJU curriculum at Gordon College for seven years.

If someone could give me some leads pertaining to prep courses for LSAT, the application process, and just what to expect, it would be greatly appreciated. I have surfed the internet and there is lots of info, but none for 2003 yet.

I currently work in the Office of the Attorney General for the state of Florida and have decided to go to law school, and possibly work on a joint degree in English.  I am looking for a school in the FL/GA area that can accomodate this goal.

I am a Registered Nurse and have been to several seminars given by a nurse-attorney. It ceratainly has sparked more than a passing interest. I thought I would investigate as I never thought about nursing AND law. I understand that this is a very "up and coming" specialty and I would like to know more.

I work in the legal field now and many of the attorneys I work with have either attended this University or have children who went here.  They highly recommended it to me, so I figured I would visit and get as much information as I possibly could about the school and the curriculum it provides.  Thanks, and I hope to see you soon.

I am currently attending the University of Tennessee and am planning on going to law school in the Fall of 2002.  My family lives in Atlanta and I would enjoy attending school there.  I am shopping around and looking at my options.

Tifton offers any paralegal courses at night, nor "on line".I am trying to find a school to take a paralegal course online which the Hope, Pell or any other grant will pay for or at least pay part of. East GA. College in Swainsboro has online paralegal, but the grants won't pay; they told me I need a "State" school for that.Can you give me any information concerning this?

I am intersting in law school. I hope to gratuate next year fall 2002 and my major is plitical sciece with a legal track emphasis and I would like to know if this major would prepare me for law school.I would like to attend law school in the fall of 2003 if at all possible.

I am interested in law and would like to know if you could please send me some information about your program. I am now enrolled at Georgia Perimeter College on te South Campus.  My major is political science.  I would like to know if the classes that I am now taking will follow me to Georgia State University.

Also my sister is also interested in becoming a tranfer student from Georgia Southern University.  She would like to recieve information on what classes will follow her to Georgia State University.  Her major is criminal justice.

Do you have a program tailored to religious law?  I am interested in working for such organizations as Americans United for Separation of Church and State, ACLU, etc., and have been working on an MDiv toward Unitarian Universalist ministry but am looking to diversify employability.  Thanks.

I am a professional engineer working for may years as VP of engineering and dealing on many legal issues.    I am seriouslly considering getting a law degree with intelectual property as the major.     Part time classes are considered while I work my present job.

Hello.  I've just tried to locate a law dictionary at this site and was not successful.  If you provide/allow this will you tell me how its done?  Also, I think you've done some very good updating since my last visit.  Thanks.

This information was very informative. However, I am also interested in obtaining a M.B.A. as well as a J.D. Please send me more information via the internet about a dual major program in business and law.

I'm looking for the basics.  Fairness, equality, truth, justice and the American Way.  I was dismissed from a state position because I was no longer politically correct.  In other words my boss, in order to save his job, sold me out.  The system was set up against me, due-process and appeals are management backing management, state backing state.  There is no one on my side.  The University allows for a Risk Management Lawyer at no cost to my supervisor, but I have no such equality available to me. So in essence I,m defending myself! I can't afford the thousands of dollars in legal services, so my "pro se status does not excuse me from adhering to procedural rules and other time requirements".  I was one holiday weekend short of timely meeting a petition for review date. Of course the Risk Management Lawyer issued a motion to dismiss Petition.  I' being cut off at the pass.

So, Im searching data bases for cases relevent to my situation so I can continue to stand up for myself against the unfairness, the inequity and the injustice that has taken my job from me and destroyed my mandatory persi retirement. The information that has been referenced is Sammis v. Magnetik-in the Idaho Reporter and Martin v.

My first question is when is the deadline for fall applications for law school.  My second question is if I have already taken the LSAT, can I send in previous scores and retake the test to gain a better score?  If possible, please reply as soon as possible.

I am a Human Resources professional.  I currently have an undergraduate degree in Mkting and a General studies MBA.  I am looking at pursuing employment law studies.  What options do you have available?

If you anticipate needing to edit the page, you may want to create the text and popups in a text file on your local PC for copying and pasting into the form.  That will prove to be a lot easier than editing the page after you've saved it.

The program was invoked from a host other than gsulaw.gsu.edu; you have "bookmarked" the URL of the program and attempted to invoke it from there; you entered the program's URL directly into your browser's Location window; or your web client (WebVac (webmaster@pita.stanford.edu WebVac.org )) did not supply the necessary referring information.

Familiar issues (privacy, copyright, libel, harrassment, and others) are being presented in unfamiliar ways, challenging our assumptions about how the law operates.  There is also an increasing number of lawyers advertising on the Internet, raising issues about the virtual practice of law.

A paper is required: the paper must be written in HTML, and should include substantive information as well as links to other sources.  Final papers will be posted to the course website and will thus be available to other legal researchers around the world.

A Survey of Legal Issues on the Internet -- what are the hot topics?  We will use this survey to determine which of the issues is worthy of additional attention for the rest of the course, and will divide them up accordingly.  You (individually or in groups) will choose the topics for which you will take the lead in later weeks.  We'll establish an order of discussion.

Discussion of the Topic(s) of the Week.  Each week the discussion will be led by the designated student or group of students, who will be responsible for providing me with discussion material to introduce the topic and raise questions about it.

These discussions will take place virtually, in a web forum specifically designated for each, and in virtual class.  I reserve the right, however, to call a physical class meeting at our assigned time if it seems that virtual discussions are not working, so do not commit to doing something else during our class time until notified that we shall meet neither virtually nor physically.

This is a fairly haphazard and incomplete list of potential topics for discussion.  The topics actually to be addressed will be determined by the class at our first virtual meeting.  Propose and discuss potential topics in the class forum during the time leading up to that first virtual meeting.

This is just a few of the sources on the World Wide Web which you might find helpful as you do your research.  As you find others, please send email to the discussion forum, and I'll add some of them here.

GigaLaw, a site created and maintained by GSU (and Law and the Internet) graduate Doug Isenberg, is an excellent resource; and you may subscribe to a daily newsletter which will keep you up to date on internet-related legal issues.

Analysts predict that commerce on the Internet may be worth $300 billion a year by the year 2000. But today many consumers, banks, and businesses worry that there isn't a safe way to verify the identities of the buyers and sellers in online financial transactions.

Senator Bob Bennett, R-Utah, said Tuesday that he intends to introduce legislation to provide a federal standard to safeguard transactions on open networks early in next year's session.  "Over the past few months, my staff has worked on a bill to govern the use of electronic authentication in the financial institutions sector," he said. "We have sought to develop minimalist legislation that would be technologically neutral to avoid limiting the development of new and improved technologies and breakthroughs."

Electronic authentication--the use of technology to validate the identity of a person as well as a transaction--may come in the form of Personal Identification Numbers like those used by banks, passwords, thumbprints, or more sophisticated digital signatures that involve mathematical formulas.

Signature Trust Co., 36 states currently have some form of electronic commerce legislation or are planning to introduce it. Utah was the first state to pass a comprehensive law enabling electronic commerce and digital signatures.  However, bank and business representatives argued that a federal standard is needed because state standards may conflict, thus interfering with the safe flow of online transactions.

"The efficiencies of electronic commerce can only be realized in a regulatory environment that encourages rather than stifles the geographic breadth and architectural openness of the Internet," said Robert D. Kramer, vice president for policy analysis and development of Bank of America.  The Bankers Roundtable, an organization that represents the nation's major banking organizations, supports an encompassing federal legislation aimed at validating electronic contracts.

Roundtable, said that state authentication laws were a first step in the right direction, but "no one wants to have 50 different rules."  Pollard noted that countries such as Japan, Germany, Denmark, and Italy are working to provide legal recognition for electronic authentication agreements. The European Union recently released a paper that highlights the importance of establishing a communitywide approach to electronic authentication in Europe to boost electronic commerce.

"It is too early -- and we do not know nearly enough -- for the federal government to endorse a particular legislative approach," Commerce Department general counsel Andrew Pincus told the House Science Committee's technology subcommittee.   But industry officials said some limited federal legislation might be appropriate to harmonize conflicting state laws.

Digital signatures, unique identifying marks generated by computers and attached to electronic documents, are increasingly being used to authenticate e-mail and contractual arrangements made over the Internet.   Without a digital signature or similar technology, a bank could not be sure a message it received from a customer was authentic, for example.

Seeking to encourage the use of electronic signatures and thereby encourage electronic commerce, some states may act hastily and enact undesirable laws, Stewart Baker, attorney at Steptoe & Johnson, warned.

A few nations, including Germany and Italy, have passed laws mandating excessive regulation, Baker added. He urged the U.S. government to oppose such laws. "That is coming to be a crisis and it's a crisis the federal government needs to face," Baker said.

Ken Lieberman, senior vice president at Visa USA, suggested new laws might be useful to provide a "safe harbor" assuring the validity of digital authentication means used in private networks like his company's payment system.

The Clinton Administration plans to stick with its long-standing policy to let the private sector develop regulations for digital signatures even  as some industry leaders and members of Congress prod the  government to play a stronger role.

Andrew Pincus, general counsel of the U.S. Department of Commerce, reiterated President Clinton's position -- that government should keep electronic commerce regulation to a minimum -- during testimony   earlier this week before the House Subcommittee on Technology.

The Internet's "decentralized nature and its rapid technological  evolution" necessitate that the private sector take charge, Pincus said,  according to a written transcript from the hearings. "We must avoid  the regulatory paradigm that government has often utilized in the past  because that would lock in certain technological approaches and   inevitably deter the growth of this new marketplace."

The subcommittee is considering issues related to digital signatures,   which code data using electronic bits unique to the individual to whom   the code is assigned. Digital signatures are used in Internet transactions   to verify someone's identification when they can't be seen and to make   sure that unauthorized changes can't be made to agreements.

The subcommittee called for testimony because no uniform standard   for digital signatures currently exists. While the federal government has   been loathe to adopt such a standard, individual states, as well as other nations, have moved on such matters. As a result, 11 states have   widely varying laws, and most other states are considering digital  signature legislation. Several other nations have also adopted policies  regulating digital signatures.

Sen. Bob Bennett, R-Utah, told the subcommittee that he plans to  introduce legislation early next year that would set a uniform standard.   "Sending a credit card number or bank account information over an open network is, at best, unsettling and, at worst, extremely dangerous, especially if it is impossible to verify the person to whom the message is going," said Bennett, who is chairman of the Senate Banking Subcommittee on Financial Services and Technology.

Utah enacted digital signature legislation several years ago that calls for government licensing. The Utah law is based on a legal model developed by the American Bar Association, which stopped short of  calling for government licensing. The use of digital signatures also raises liability questions when it comes to certifying signatures used in   electronic business transactions.

"The U.S. needs to show leadership by engaging these issues and   actively seeking ways to turn these developments away from   conflicting rules," said Stewart Baker, a partner at Steptoe & Johnson, a law firm in Washington.

"Almost everyone agrees that a top-down regulatory approach would fail to work, given the changing dynamics of the industry and the   myriad jurisdictions which would have to be covered," says the written hearing charter for the subcommittee, which is part of the House   Committee on Science.

From time to time, I will post relevant articles and issue to this discussion list.  If you would like to comment, question, or post your own articles or issues, please feel free to do so.  If a lively debate begins, then that might be nice as well.

What you will find below is a series of webpage links. If you are still living in a paper world, the links will not be as helpful as they will be in the electronic world. In the paper world, you will make a photocopy of this article, if you think it will be useful in the future. Then you will file the photocopy in one or more files and hope you or your secretary will be able to find it one day in the future. How many times have you said to your assistant "Remember that article on webpage links -- where did we file it?"

This year's conference will focus on discussions surrounding Georgia's opportunity for economic growth in the dawning global economy.  Conference highlights include intergovernmental cooperative projects and economic development success stories.  Participants will have an opportunity to learn about the very latest innovations for internet technology.  The conference will also present a vision for technology tools to facilitate the state's goals for higher educations.

The invitation to attend the Electronic Commerce Study Committee Meeting is open to all.  Indeed, from the RSVPs that I have received so far it appears that attendance will be good.  So, if these topics are important to you, this is a meeting you probably don't want to miss.

At the next light turn right onto Decatur Street.  Go two blocks, turn right onto Broad Street.  The Commerce Building is the first building on your left (on the corner of Broad and Marietta Streets).  The parking entrance is on your left after you turn onto Broad Street.

Street.  At the next traffic light, turn right onto Decatur Street.  Go two blocks, turn right onto Broad Street. The Commerce Building is the first building on your left(on the corner of Broad and Marietta Streets).  The parking entrance is on your left after you turn onto Broad Street.

From the Commerce Club parking lot, cross Broad Street and enter the College of Business (the Nations Bank Building).  Use the elevator in the atrium to go to the 7th floor.  When you exit the elevator, turn left, go through a doorway, down the hall, turn at your first left into the Atlanta Room.

At the July 1998 Digital Signature Task Force meeting, a strong consensus favored amending Georgia's present Electronic Records and Signatures Act so that "insecure" electronic records and signatures would be recognized as satisfying "writing" and "signature" requirements in Georgia.  Recall, Georgia's present act recognizes "secure" electronic records and signatures, but does not recognize "insecure" electronic records and signatures.  Note also, this would eliminate legal uncertaintly caused by the "Beeps and Chirps" case.

At the September 1998 Digital Signature Task Force meeting, the question was whether both "insecure" and "secure" electronic records and signatures should be recognized in the Act and, if so, whether the Act should distinguish between "insecure" and "secure" electronic records and signatures using an evidentiary (rebuttable) presumption.

Treasurers (NASACT) and several individual states, sought to create a forum to explore government use of public key technology in collaboration with private sector participants. Following a competitive solicitation of proposals, the National Automated Clearing House Association (NACHA) was selected to facilitate this effort.

As a result of continued and increasing interest in using XML for the automation and standardization of legal information exchange, Georgia State University's E-CT-Filing Project (http://gsulaw.gsu.edu/gsuecp/) has establishing this electronic mailing list for the purpose of bringing together in a common forum parties interested in creating standard/model legal XML formats.

From project inception, researchers realized that electronic court filing (e- ct-filing) implicated far more issues than network security, generally, and digital signatures, specifically.   Indeed, there are at least 20-25 separate and distinct, yet interrelated, e-ct-filing issues (or barriers) which jurists and technologist must consider in developing e-ct-filing (and other legal) applications.

Information Systems plans to encourage legal technical standards (see http://www.abanet.org/tech/ltrc/ldirec.html).  As a result of that call, I will be speaking to the Standing Committee on September 25 regarding general issues related to the exchange of legal information and XML and electronic court filing standards.

Please feel free to post comments to this list regarding XML for legal documents.  Please also submit relevant news of interest to developers of legal-XML solutions.  If there is enough interest, perhaps we can begin to formulate an specific agenda for moving forward, including a possible IETF charter, scheduling in-person meetings, and/or developing workproduct.

Mexico.  As some on this list already know, our court has been working on an electronic filing project about the same amount of time as AOUSC, and these prototypes will eventually merge into the next generation system for the federal courts.

Our current project, XML Court Interface (XCI) doesn't specifically address standardization of forms, but rather the far less ambitious and nearer term attainable goal of defining how documents can be securely transmitted to and from the court.

I am interested in working with members of this group on a standard open interface for courts, or at least the sharing of ideas.  In the XCI philosophy, XCI should be as simple as possible, the model for electronic filing being that it serves the same function as a court intake counter does for paper filings. XCI also allows for confirmation, noticing, etc.

Operating Officer at Findlaw, Inc (http://www.findlaw.com).  My background is both technical and legal, though these days I am focused exclusively on issues of legal information in the online environment.

I have recently come across both the UELP and Georgia legal XML standards sites and wanted to express my enthusiasm in seeing the concept of open, interoperable standards begin to have a presence in the world of legal information. This is the time to charge the hill of creating these standards because it is now that the legal profession is going through the transformation to computerized communications.

This is old, but I just ran across (did a search for XML in the federal register) the following Notice in the federal register from the Dept of Energy asking for comments about electronic filing. This is 6 months old -- the notice period close in June, but I thought it is an interesting tidbit into the thoughts of Federal Agencies into the data format issue.

Oversight Committee, per the recommendation of the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House, have approved the establishment of a data standards program, including standard generalized markup language [SGML] for data interchange of legislative information. The purpose of this program is to ensure that the preparation and exchange of legislative information is made more efficient through the use of data standards. Once published these standards will be used by all legislative branch agencies, including GPO in transmitting and producing information which is utilized in the legislative process. The Secretary of the Senate and Clerk of the House will be responsible for updating and maintaining and publishing the data interchange standards for legislative information.

The Clerk has also indicated that various steps are being taken to establish common standard generalized markup language (SGML) definitions for the creation of legislative documents in electronic format. This is consistent with actions being taken throughout the Legislative Branch. The Clerk should seek guidance from the Committee on House Oversight, the Joint Committee on Printing, Government Printing Office, House Information Resources, the Secretary of the Senate, private industry, and other interested parties, in establishing standards that are based upon past and ongoing GPO, HIR, and Senate efforts. The overarching objective should be the development of standards and systems that will be of common use by the Clerk and other interested Legislative Branch entities.

Any email you receive as a subscriber to this site or to any of its pages is intended only for you.  You agree not to forward the email to anyone else, unless the email itself explicitly waives this requirement.

These terms and conditions are subject to change, of which you will be notified by email.  Continued use of this service after notification of any change in the terms and conditions constitutes your agreement to the changed terms and conditions.

Send a digitally-signed email message to the discussion list, using GPG, the GNU Privacy Guard.  Store your public key on a public key server, so that your digitally-signed email can be verified by recipients, and so that you can, if you wish, exchange encrypted email with each other.

Some of your predecessors have found this (at the time, required) task frustrating, to put it mildly.  But bar associations around the country continue to consider requiring that lawyers who communicate with clients by email use encryption to do so.  Requiring this task has been intended to illustrate how unrealistic that might be.

Doctors will once again make house calls. Patients will not be waiting in their doctors offices, instead patients will visit their doctors via their home computers. This practice known as telemedicine is quickly changing the world as we know it.

Second it must be able to acquire and present clinical information, store and retrieve data, and present it in a user-friendly way to medical professionals. Third, the technology must be used and reviewed. This means that everything from remote interaction between physician and patient to medical education must be constantly reviewed to determine the systems effectiveness.

On September 15, 1999 a subcommittee of the Senate Committee on Commerce, Science and Transportation held a hearing on telemedicine technologies. Lieutenant Colonel Ronald K. Poropatich, MD., a member of the board of directors of the American Telemedicine Association (ATA), testified before the subcommittee and addressed legal problems facing telemedicine which would require changing existing laws and regulations. Lack of payment for services and state medical licensure were the two major issues addressed.

The AMA has strongly opposed this current practice of online prescription sales and has urged state regulators to take action. As a result, state medical boards are now attempting to monitor sales and physician conduct by bringing licensure actions against online physicians. Although legitimate online sales benefit disabled patients and patients without convenient access to pharmacies, the lack of accountability and adequate safeguards render unsuspecting consumers without a clear cause of action.

State and Federal agencies disagree as to who has the authority and the jurisdiction to police online pharmacies. Presently, there is no state or federal regulation of Internet prescription sales, and it is unclear if online pharmaceuticals will fall under state or federal jurisdiction. While the Food and Drug Administration (FDA), Federal Trade Commission (FTC), and American Medical Association (AMA) all support regulation of the online pharmaceutical industry, they continue to pass the regulation to the states.

The use of telemedicine services may increase liability exposure for physicians, since it may change the local practice standards used to determine medical liability. The development of a national practice standard could reduce this liability, but until such a standard is developed, liability for all involved is increased.

One of the leading cases advocating a national standard of care concluded that any purported disparity between the skills of practitioners in various urban centers has been primarily been eliminated. [viii]Medical education has been standardized throughout the nation through a system of national accreditation. Also, the significant improvements in transportation and communication over the past hundred years cast further doubt on continued vitality of the doctrine. Increased access to evidence-based data, clinical guidelines, and successful practices will have a far greater impact on the standard of care than nationally accredited medical education and widely available journals did years ago. The computerized medical record and medical malpractice litigation.

The computerized medical record will be built from self-documenting inputs and barcode-based systems. It will record and time-stamp all interactions with the patient and log the identity of involved care providers and the information they had available at an exact point in time.

As provider databases gather more information about their patients, and providers become more skilled at exploiting new technologically-mediated marketing channels, including one-to-one marketing via the Internet, their marketing practices will evolve and implicate liability laws. The learned intermediary rule, which set up the prescribing physician as the primary defendant in a failure to warn case, is being eliminated by the growth of direct-to-consumer pharmaceutical advertising, which will necessitate a reassessment of manufacturers liability.

Some states have moved to address medical record privacy concerns of their citizens, but the HIPAA Privacy Rule establishes a privacy threshold that must be met in every U.S. jurisdiction. HIPAA is the abbreviation for the "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", and it was passed to provide easier entry into employee sponsored group health plans for employees with preexisting conditions.

HHS calls the interim final rule the first installment of a HIPAA enforcement rule to be published later. The interim rule establishes rules of procedure for the imposition of civil money penalties on entities that violate standards for the format and protection of health information under HIPAAs administrative simplification provisions. The penalties include civil fines or exclusion from federal health programs. The department in the interim rule reiterates its intent to enforce HIPAA rules through a complaint-driven process and seek voluntary compliance from noncompliant entities before moving to impose penalties. The interim rule becomes effective on May 19, 2003, and included a public comment period ending on June 16, 2003. The interim final rule will cease to be in effect on Sept. 16, 2003. The HHS Office for Civil Rights will enforce the privacy rule; the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services will enforce remaining HIPAA administrative simplification rules.

Under the Regulation, a family member or other individual may act on the patient's behalf to pick up filled prescriptions, medical supplies, X-rays, or other similar forms of protected health information. The Regulation permits the health care provider to reasonably infer that doing so is in the patient's best interest and in accordance with professional judgment and common practice. In response to concerns about earlier versions of the Regulation, the Department of Health and Human Services issued guidance materials and a press release on July 6, 2001 that explicitly stated that the rule allows a friend or relative to pick up a patient's prescription at the pharmacy. Therefore if pharmacies prohibit this common practice, it is their own policy, not one mandated by the HIPAA Privacy Regulation.

White House issued a report in March 2002 estimating the costs of implementing privacy over ten years at approximately $17 billion and estimating the savings incurred from putting the transaction standards in place over ten years at approximately $29 billion, thus saving the health care industry $12 billion overall. There will be additional savings in the long term because patients will have more faith in the health care system, so they will be less likely to withhold vital information from their doctors, and will more readily seek care.

A person's medical information would be immediately available for the attending doctor. Therefore if an individual was injured in another part of the country, the attending physicians would have the patient's entire medical history at their fingertips. Included in this information could be life saving information that would be invaluable to the attending doctor; and (3) The creation of a large database would allow researchers to track certain diseases as well as to patients' responses to certain drugs. This information could be valuable to drug companies for research purposes only. The creation of these databases would allow for better organization and more legibility of medical files.

Those who have successfully utilized the doctrine of trespass to chattels in regard to cyberspace, have convinced the courts that the alleged trespassers are either endangering their computer systems and/or networks, or that other indirect harms will inevitably result from the trespassers? activities.

Verio, from using automated software to access and collect registrant contact information contained in Register.com's database, and from using any of that information, however accessed, for mass marketing purposes.  Register.com sued under Section 43(a) of the Lanham Act, the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act, trespass to chattels, and breach of contract.  The court granted Register.com a preliminary injunction, finding they were likely to succeed on the merits for each claim, and that irreparable harm would result without the injunction.

Tickets.com (TX), defendant, moved for summary judgment against Ticketmaster (TM).  TM's claims against TX were based on copyright, trespass to chattels, and copyright theories.  Both parties were in the business of selling tickets to the public for various events, and each business had publicly accessible web sites for such purpose.  Summary judgment was granted for TX for the claims based on copyright infringement and trespass to chattels.  However, the summary judgment in favor of TX on the contract claim was denied.  The court found that the access to TM's web site was not sufficient for a trespass to chattel claim.

Actual harm or damage suffered must be shown in order to recover for intermeddling.  Trespass to chattels only protects against actual harm of the chattel, not its inviolability.  The owner of a chattel is permitted to use reasonable force to protect the chattel where there is no legal remedy.

The interference must involve physical contact with the property.  Trespass to land can be unintentional involving little or no harm to the land.  Some cases have allowed recovery for intangibles such as sound waves, microscopic particles, dust or smoke, but most courts treat these intangible interferences under nuisance law which allows for a balancing of interests.

Trespass to chattels has been identified as the little brother of conversion.  Actual dispossession of the chattel would give rise to both causes of action, though conversion is more commonly applied.

The court relied on unusual cases that treated intangible interferences in land as trespasses, even though intangible interferences in real property are more commonly treated under nuisance law.   Thrifty-Tel allows for trespass to chattels where an intentional interference has proximately caused injury.

Spiders are programs used by search engines to collect and create information about the web.  Like spam, spiders affect web sites without discrimination.  But most Internet users appreciate the benefits from the use of spiders.  Search engine databases are populated with the information gleaned by spiders crawling the web and indexing the contents of sites.  Those web sites who wish not to be publicized may invoke the Robot Exclusion standard, which is open and voluntary, like most Internet standards.

In many cases a user agreement defines what conduct is and is not allowed.  Where a user agreement excludes the use of automatic search software, a user may manually access the site.  But when that same user activates an automated program to gather the same information, they violate the access agreement.  At that point the user has exceeded the scope of consent and may be liable for trespass to chattels.

The court further emphasized that if BE was allowed to continue the activity, then copycats would begin the same activity and eBay would undoubtedly be harmed by the accesses of multitudes of companies.

Contrasting  Intel with  eBay, the court for the Northern District of California had found that threatened harm did exist where a denial of the injunction might encourage the activity sought to be prevented.

Finally, the  Intel court noted that Hamidi used the e-mail system for its intended purpose as a communications tool for employees.  The system transmitted the e-mail as designed without being subjected to operational or physical degradation or damage.

It has been suggested that the negative consequences were overlooked and overshadowed by the apparent positive impact of having a weapon with which to wage war against spam.  The flaws in using trespass to chattels as a remedy for cyberspace issues supposedly became more apparent with the use of the doctrine to regulate spiders.

It has been suggested that the few detrimental effects attributed to spiders have been vague, attenuated, or even disproved; and that the possibility that spiders might overburden or crash a server, can be addressed through remedies for nuisance like behavior, even on the Internet.

Prior to Intel v. Hamidi, cyberspace trespass to chattels appeared to treat computers, networks, and even processing power as chattels.  While this is clearly true for computers, it is less clear for networks or processing power.

Yet Ticketmaster found no damages and thus no trespass to chattels.  Attenuated and indirect forms of harm have sometimes been allowed as evidence.  Only if the network or the processing power is considered chattel though, have damages been found.

The advent of the Internet and the World Wide Web has provided a new, electronic  medium that facilitates the distribution of information, products, services,  etc. that were traditionally distributed through physical mediums, such as  face-to-face meetings, hard-copies, and   store-shelf packaging.  The advent of this electronic medium has necessitated   new means for providers  to form contracts with consumers (or users) regarding   the distribution of  their offerings. Click-wrap and browse-wrap, as  they are commonly referred  to, have emerged to provide this new means to  form contracts over the Internet,  particularly over the World Wide Web.   Thus, the basic purpose of click-wrap  and browse-wrap is to form a contract   (or agreement) between two or more parties (i.e., persons, businesses, etc.),   where the terms and provisions of the agreement, and the consent to them,   are communicated over the Internet.   It is noted that the concept  of click-wrap and browse-wrap evolved, to some extent, from the concept  of "shrink-wrap," which is a continuing practice, primarily of computer  games and software providers, to present the terms and provisions associated  with the use of a product within a sealed packaging (e.g., in a written  or electronic format) that typically can only be accessed after the product  has been purchased and unwrapped. See the CPTech shrink-wrap survey    for some further discussion of shrink-wrap agreements.

Click-wrap (or click-wrap agreements) typically consists of a presentation   within a web-page of the terms and provisions of an agreement or contract   along with a button, link, or other means that requires the reader, such  as a user or consumer, to indicate the acceptance of the terms and provisions   before proceeding with any further transactions. Click-wrap agreements   are typically presented in a scrolling window (or scroll box) or a frame  of a web-page, and a popular means to obtain consent from the reader is a  button or link (i.e., hyper-link) located in the vicinity of the agreement  that is labeled "I Agree." See the Intel    license agreement for an example of a click-wrap agreement. Click-wrap    agreements may also be referred to as "click-through" or "click" agreements.

Notice is an important legal issue in regard to the enforceability of click-wrap  and browse-wrap agreements. This is because the enforceability of most  agreements (or contracts) requires all parties who are expected to be bound  by such agreements to knowingly agree to the terms and conditions  of the agreements. Therefore, a party typically must have notice of  the existence of a click-wrap or browse-wrap agreement in order to agree to its terms and conditions.

Notice of the existence of a click-wrap agreement is usually not a problem.   For example, if a user attempts to obtain a service or product over the Internet  that involves a click-wrap agreement, the click-wrap agreement is typically  presented up-front to the user on an initial web-page before the user can  proceed with the transaction.

Moreover, clicking on the  text did  not take the user to the text of the agreement. Nevertheless,  the court decided that people sometimes enter into a contract by using a service without seeing the terms first.

Using the analogy of a person purchasing an airline ticket stamped with terms and conditions, the court decided that even without obvious notice of the contract terms, a contract was formed.  The enforceability of browse-wrap with respect to notice was one of first  impression for the court in this case.

In  accordance with basic  contract law, the parties to an agreement or contract must consent to the  terms and conditions in order for the agreement to be  binding upon them.  This act of consent may also be referred to as assent, mutual assent, or a "meeting of the minds." Although explicit consent to an agreement is preferred and most respected by courts in determining contract disputes, consent can also be implied. For example, if a party  is aware of the terms and conditions of an agreement and the party takes action that indicates the acceptance of them, a court may bind the party by its implied consent to the agreement, even thought the party never explicitly  submitted consent.   However, a court may be less likely to find that  a party is bound to an agreement  by implied consent, if the actions relied  on for implied consent are not intentional or if the party had no notice of the agreement and, therefore,  could not consent.

Click-wrap, as discussed above, typically provides a means to indicate  consent  and requires the user to select the means before  proceeding with  a transaction.  For example, the presentation of a  click-wrap agreement  in a web-page may  include a button or link that is  labeled "I agree" or "I accept." Thus,  click-wrap agreements typically   provide a sufficient  means for a user to indicate consent to an agreement,   although there is some  legal dissension over the appropriate particulars   for this means. For  instance, even though a click-wrap agreement provides  a button or other means  for a user to select to indicate consent, the legal  sufficiency of this consent  may be questioned if there is not a clear acknowledgement  in the click-wrap  that selecting the button will indicate consent to the  agreement. As  another example, if the button or other means is located  in a position such  that the user can select it without seeing some, or maybe  even all, of the  terms and conditions of the agreement, the legal sufficiency  of the consent  may come into question.

As discussed previously,   browse-wrap typically does not even present the   existence of the agreement   to a user in an up-front and conspicuous manner.   Instead, browse-wrap   agreements are typically drafted to indicate that  a user's consent is submitted   by the act, for example, of the user browsing   a web-site or conducting transactions   within the web-site.

I.Lan Systems selected the  "I Agree" box. I.Lan  Systems argued that it had not assented to the  terms of the license agreement,  since they were  not known to it at the time  of the purchase and, therefore,  were not part  of the bargained-for exchange.  The court rejected this argument and  held that I.Lan Systems explicitly consented to the clickwrap license agreement  when it clicked on the box labeled "I Agree."

Fairness may include considerations   of the conscionability of the terms and condition of the agreement as well   as the amount of bargaining power that is shared by the parties in making   the agreement. For example, as with most forms of contracts, a court   may find a click-wrap or browse-wrap agreement unenforceable to some extent   if it includes terms or provisions that go against public policy or otherwise   shock the conscious of the court.  As another example, a court may limit  the enforceability of a click-wrap  or browse-wrap agreement if it determines  that one or more of the parties  was placed in the position of having an insufficient  amount of bargaining  power to affect the formation of a binding agreement  or contract.

With respect to both click-wrap and browse-wrap, fairness can be a concern.   For example, the accepting party of a  click-wrap or browse-wrap agreement,   such as a user, usually does not have  the opportunity to negotiate the terms   and conditions with the offering party of the agreement, such as the provider,   since click-wrap and browse-wrap agreements are presented over the Internet,   instead of person to person.

As another example, and possibly as a  consequence of the foregoing example, click-wrap and browse-wrap agreements  tend to include terms and conditions that may be deemed unconscionable in  view of the public policy of various jurisdictions. For instance, some  click-wrap and browse-wrap agreements may include terms and conditions that  give the offering party the authority to freely invade the privacy of the  accepting party, for example, by scanning a user's computer or uploading personal information without the user's explicit consent. In another instance, some click-wrap and browse-wrap agreements may include terms and conditions that completely shield the offering party from liability for knowingly providing a defective product or service but hold the user liable to the fullest extent for misuse of the product or service.  Thus, there may be instances when a court will limit the enforceability of  click-wrap or browse-wrap because of fairness issues.

It allegedly did not provide toll-free customer  service numbers, required reporting of complaints by e-mail without providing  an e-mail address for such complaints,  and engaged in such poor customer service that the result was a backlog of  approximately 100,000 unanswered customer complaints.

In many cases,  PayPal froze disbursements from accounts but allowed deposits into accounts.  Relying on the terms of its browse-wrap user agreement, PayPal sought to compel arbitration and prevent consolidation of the plaintiffs' claims. A link to the text of the browse-wrap user agreement was provided but the link did not need to be opened for the application to be processed.

With the increasing use of click-wrap and browse-wrap agreements over the  Internet, issues such as notice, consent, and fairness are likely to arise  in legal disputes over these emerging forms of contracts.

The last couple of decades have been an era of changes, with the world becoming smaller and smaller because of countries' ability to overcome many barriers of reach; nations of all sizes have been able to bridge gaps through the utilization of technology, dramatically changing the lives of people and the way in which companies conduct business. Although technology has allowed a faster, more efficient way of communicating, it has also instigated many issues in its governance due to its highly resistant nature to traditional forms of governmental regulation. There are certainly some unique aspects to Internet-based e-commerce. The fact that the Internet makes compliance with existing laws difficult to enforce is one of the ways in which e-commerce differs from other commerce.

By operating in "real time" over open networks, Internet-based e-commerce has eroded economic and geographic boundaries and caused a surge in productivity and economic growth. Although experts may have some trouble defining exactly what "it" is, Internet-based e-commerce appears to be different in at least two ways that interact with regulatory issues: first, in extending the reach of commerce beyond the easy reach of governments, and second, in creating new issues related to confidence, trust, and verification.

The borderless world of the Internet is causing governments everywhere to reexamine their policies and practices toward commercial activity. This reexamination challenges existing, settled assumptions in areas such as our federal structure, the role of litigation as a timely mechanism to resolve disputes, and the ability of the Congress itself to move quickly in legislating practicable solutions. Areas of the law as diverse as jurisdiction, patents, privacy, and intellectual property must be revisited given the operating challenges posed by the world of e-commerce. Moreover, our domestic experience in revisiting these current practices is dramatically affected by global challenges to U.S. precedents. If Congress is ill-equipped at this point to address many of these concerns, the situation is even more complex on a global scale where the institutional frameworks either do not exist or are new and relatively untested.

One of the major issues that has arisen and alerted many nations, especially the United States, is that of taxation. The United States is questioning, "Is e-commerce like ordinary commerce?" The answer is both yes and no.

Yes, because even before the Internet we already had a variety of technologies -- telephone, fax, and private networks using electronic data interchange, which allowed long-distance or remote electronic commerce. Many firms and individuals already use fast computers to process information and search for the best products and prices, especially in finance and banking services, and with standardized commodities, as in agriculture and mining. No, because although Internet sales may be a relatively new phenomenon, the sales tax issue is an old one, as exactly the same issue applies to old-fashioned mail order (and "phone-order") sales.

Governments should regulate the Internet in just the same way that they regulate other commerce; however, many of the problems faced by both regulators and the regulated in e-commerce are related to ensuring compliance with current regulations.[2] That fact, by itself, indicates that it is not easy to treat e-commerce like other commerce. Nevertheless, before one can assume that e-commerce requires different treatment, either preferential or punitive, strong proof that such treatment is justified is needed because in many respects e-commerce is already regulated. If something is illegal off the Internet, it is also illegal on the Internet. One cannot engage in fraudulent practices, transmit pornography or sell alcohol to children, or discriminate on the basis of race, religion, or sex. But, contrary to popular belief, sales and use taxes are also applicable to Internet-based transactions.

U.S. economy continues to squeeze state and local tax revenues, pressure is increasing for federal legislation to require all retailers to collect sales taxes on merchandise sold over the Internet. Even retail real estate landlords are joining the forces behind such legislation, as they believe that tax-free online shopping gives Internet retailers an unfair advantage. ICSC newsletter - Feb. 2003. As early as 2001 in a presentation to the Oversight Subcommittee of the House Ways and Means Committee, the International Council of Shopping Centers ("ICSC") expressed their position that all goods, regardless of the method by which they are purchased (Internet, traditional retail stores or catalog), should be subject to the same state and local taxes.

The ICSC encouraged Congress not to implement Internet access charges or new taxes on electronic media but rather allow the states to collect the existing charges that shoppers are already obligated to pay and are supposed to remit to their states voluntarily. Retailers whose only format is the Internet, such as Amazon.com, remain adamantly opposed to taxing on-line sales and are supported in their efforts by the New York City based Direct Marketing Association.

Both believe that the Internet has created a venue for small entrepreneurial retailers who would be over burdened with the prospect of implementing a tax collection process. These retailers hold to the rule that they only have to collect taxes where they maintain a physical presence and if their dot-com subsidiaries have no physical presence in any state then they are exempt from collecting taxes at all.

Interstate sales and use taxes are shredding normal partisan boundaries. Conservative Republicans such as Kasich argue that Washington should preempt the most powerful tool governors have--the right to tax. And liberal Democrats such as Glendening find themselves defending the sales tax, though it is often criticized as being unfair to the poor.[6] The debate is taking a particular toll on the GOP--where Republican governors such as Leavitt of Utah and John Engler of Michigan are going toe-to-toe with their political brethren, like James S. Gilmore III of Virginia. And it is splitting business, with some e-tailers angling for the subsidy and others preferring to see all merchants collect the tax, regardless of their medium.[7] John W. Sidgmore, vice-chairman of MCI Worldcom, scoffs at the notion that taxing online sales will crush the Web.

Based on these sales and future projections, The Washington, D.C. based National Governors Association estimates that state governments will lose $27 billion this year on uncollected online sales tax and $41 billion by 2005.[14] In fiscal year 2002, state revenues nationwide fell 6%, the first time since World War II that revenues were down for an entire year.[15] This recession that made times tougher for individual Americans also played havoc with state governments. Not only did the downturn mean lower tax collections, but the bear stock market reduced investors' capital gains and the states' share of capital gains taxes. On the expense side of the ledger, health-care and other costs continued to soar. In an updated study by the University of Tennessee, with data provided by Forrester Research, released by Utah Governor Mike Leavitt on October 2, Donald Bruce and William Fox, the authors, projected that state revenue losses from Internet sales would reach $45 billion by 2006 and nearly $55 billion by 2011, translating into state revenue losses in 2011 of between 2.6 to 9.9 percent of total state tax collections. The entire report is available at the University of Tennesse's web site. State and local governments already may be losing on the order of $5 billion in sales tax revenues annually from their inability to tax most mail-order sales.[16] This loss of revenue could significantly impair the ability of some states and localities to meet demands for education funding and other services.

The stated fundamental purpose of the Agreement is to "simplify and modernize sales and use tax administration" so that the burden of compliance is greatly reduced and treats all sellers, regardless of their type of commerce, equally.[25] The Agreement identifies ten (10) specific areas of focus, including: A. administration of sales and use tax, B. uniformity in state and local tax bases, C. uniformity of major tax base definitions, D. a central, electronic registration system for all member states, E. simplification of state and local tax rates, F. uniform sourcing rules for taxable transactions, G, H, I. simplified exemptions, tax returns and tax remittances and J. protection of consumer privacy.[26] Each state that becomes a member is required to provide state level administration of all their sales and use taxes so that sellers only have to register with and remit tax returns and funds at the state level, eliminating the need to interact with the various local taxing jurisdictions within a state. Online, registration systems must be established by each member state and no registration fees are allowed.[27] The states are then required to distribute the taxes amongst the appropriate taxing jurisdictions.[28] To provide for an orderly transition, the Agreement requires states with local taxing jurisdictions have a common tax base throughout all of the local jurisdictions through December 31, 2005. After that date the local tax bases and the state base must be identical, excepting the taxes levied on motor vehicles of all types.[29]After the December 31, 2005 date states may not impose different tax rates on personal property, except they may impose a single additional rate on food and food ingredients.[30] Further, member states may not enact a product based exemption if the Agreement does not have a definition for the product and if there is a definition, then any exemption must include all items within the definition.[31] State tax holidays must also incorporate only items defined in the Agreement and be uniformly applied throughout a state.[32] To make tax filing simpler for sellers and to reduce the number of errors, all tax rate changes require advance notice, defined as "with as much advance notice practicable" to requiring a minimum of sixty (60) days for local rate changes and that all take effect on the first calendar day of a new quarter.[33] Member states however bear the significant administrative burden as they must provide and maintain a database that describes boundaries for each taxing jurisdiction based on the five and nine digit zip codes.

Each member state further agrees to work with other members in developing an address system for assigning tax jurisdictions.[34] In trade for agreeing to collect the taxes, sellers are relieved from any liability for collecting the wrong amount, if they relied upon the database established by a member state.

Defining terms consistently is one of the key objectives of the agreement, supported by the National Governors Association in their Policy Position.[35] The Agreement establishes a library of definitions that each member state agrees to utilize, which are set out in Appendix C of the Agreement. One of the more important definitions is defining the taxing source. Retail sales, excluding leases or rentals, are to be sourced when the products are received by the purchaser at a business location of a seller, a location indicated in delivery instructions by the purchaser or an address of the purchaser included in the seller's business records or ascertained during the consummation of the sale. If no receipt address is available, then the seller is allowed to use the "shipped from" address for its taxing source.[36] Other special treatments and definitions are established for the sale of telecommunication services, leased and rental transactions and goods and services subject to multiple points of use.

Agreement is that they are granted amnesty by the member states for uncollected or unpaid sales or use tax for transactions that occurred before joining. In exchange, sellers agree to collect and remit sales and use taxes for all taxable member states, including any that join after the seller has joined.[39] With this mutual agreement, both sellers and states start with a clean slate and no fear of retroactive legal action.

"We start with first principles. The Constitution creates a Federal Government of enumerated powers.[52] As James Madison wrote, "[t]he powers delegated by the proposed Constitution to the federal government are few and defined. Those which are to remain in the State governments are numerous and indefinite."[53] "The powers not delegated to the United States by the Constitution, nor prohibited by it to the States, are reserved to the States respectively, or to the people." - Tenth Amendment, U.S.

As the growth of the internet continues, the famous quote "there are only two things that are certain in life, death and taxes" is challenged by the complexity and uncertainty of Internet sales tax. The Internet begs the question, does the borderless economy mean that local and state governments must give way to national authorities when it comes to the imposition of taxes and regulations? That remains to be seen, as in many respects, the debate over this question is just beginning. As governments and more specifically Congress gain experience with new technologies and new forms of business, they may find that they are able to apply what now appear as outdated means of regulation more efficiently than creating new means..

Applying the confusing and sometimes inconsistent legal rules and tests to the Internet may prove very difficult though. First, if courts follow South Carolina's lead in Geoffrey, they could find that creating a web site with metatags that attract Internet users is purposefully directing an activity at a state's forum. Pop up ads and e-mails that are sent to or flash on a computer screen without any affirmative actions on the users part could be construed as even more applicable. Following the same line of analysis, the court could find that a web site is Intellectual Property and its presence in the homes of state citizens creates a "situs" within the forum state, requiring the owner of that Intellectual Property to contribute their support to the local government that protects its rights. A web site that allows an individual to communicate with it and browse for hours uninterrupted could surely be viewed as more than a "slight presence." Further, states might claim that they have nexus over the activity of selling as the actual purchase occurs in the forum state, through the actions of the buyer on their computer, following the logic of National Geographic. A web site that is available to customers twenty-four hours per day from the comfort of their home, that even provides answers to questions, allows people to follow their purchase in transit and provide feedback to the vendor would surely constitute "establishing and maintaining" a market within the home (located in the forum state) of a vendee.

Perhaps too, the courts might even move toward the opinions expressed in the dissent of Miller Brothers and agree that states need to raise revenue to support their citizens and that vendors should be treated equally, in state and out of state. Certainly states will continue to raise this issue as their revenue sources are impacted by the over all economy and e-commerce. Courts may come to acknowledge that when an out of state vendor makes a sale, even over the somewhat anonymous Internet, they know the destination of the merchandise and the burden to add a tax is minimal. If states move to simplify their taxing structures then this argument becomes even stronger. Further, states could argue, and the courts agree, that if Internet vendors are allowed to avoid collecting and paying sales taxes it will eventually discourage sticks and bricks retailers, further harming their revenue base.

Users must log onto their computers and choose to "surf", whether they use words tied to metatags or not. Further, when a vendor creates and maintains their web site they do not control nor dictate who has access to it. They do not know which forums their marketing is directed to and therefore their actions cannot be construed as purposeful. Courts could determine that the intellectual property owned by an e-tailer or vendor does not find its situs in a forum state but rather it resides in the home state of such vendor or within the world wide web, it merely travels through interstate commerce and never actually "comes to rest." As differentiated in National Geographic, the Internet has its connection with a taxing state exclusively by means of the instruments of interstate commerce.

By entering into the agreement, states will actually begin taking actions that will serve them well should Congress ever choose to legitimize out of state sales tax collection. States would create simpler tax codes and establish software for processing, remitting and disbursing the funds collected. Retailers would also gain; they would no longer fear the liability for past tax collection on sales made under the current system. However, states and retailers open themselves to a court challenge by entering into the voluntary system. They run the risk of a commerce clause challenge by a vendee or a vendor who feel they were harmed or perhaps a neighboring state who feels they were deprived of revenue from their own citizens. Is this likely; perhaps if proponents are unsuccessful in gaining widespread membership; however, citizens that think they have been harmed must realize that the tax was always due. The only real issue has been and will continue to be, who is responsible for collecting and remitting the tax, the vendor or the vendee. Certainly large, national retailers and states gain by the voluntary program, alleviating some uncertainty and increasing tax revenues, and both will and should consider it thoroughly. Small retailers, with minimal "sticks and bricks" presence, will be harmed the most and stand as the most likely challengers.

Where does the answer lie? Is the voluntary SSTA the solution or would it run afoul of the legal tests for substantial nexus regardless of its good intentions? The answer appears to lie with Congress. Just as in GEICO, if Congress enacts the proposed streamlined sales tax provisions of either HR 1410 or Senate Bill 512 then the courts would focus on whether their delegation of taxing authority was valid rather than the uncertain tests of substantial nexus and due process.

It is difficult to predict whether Internet purchases will remain tax free. Internet taxing provides both advantages and disadvantages to vendors, consumers and government entities. However, the question remains as to balancing the pros and cons of Internet taxation between the various entities. The advisory panel created by Congress to study the Internet sales tax issue is hopelessly divided. The challenge lies for governments and policy makers around the world to protect their sales and tax revenue models without adversely affecting the continued and diverse growth of electronic commerce. Some members want the Internet to be a tax-free zone; others want Congress to require states to collect sales taxes on out of state purchases while states are simply trying to make ends meet. Because the Internet is the wave of the future and e-commerce is continuing to grow exponentially, the deadlock between the opposing views is not necessarily a bad thing. Electronic commerce is too important an engine for economic growth to ignore the risks of unintended consequences from premature application of Internet taxation. It may well be that the best thing for Congress to do is NOTHING.

What follows is greatly simplified and ignores subtle variations in the nature of computer code. It only provides a quick overview of p2p networks and software, and why p2p is unique from other network architecture.

Peer-2-Peer programs are variations of computer networks for file exchange that eschew the need for an entirely centralized network. Traditional file exchange involves each individual user, called a client or node, remotely accessing a central location, or server, where the desired software is located.

Wide Web- each web browser is a client that accesses the centralized web servers retrieves the file making up the web page. Without at least one server the many clients would have no practical use. In contrast, p2p software either greatly reduces the need for a central file server or removes the central server entirely. P2P distributes the network among many computer clients rather then running from a central server. Each client can communicate directly with other clients and they all send files to one another. However, depending on the software used, a central sever may exist to facilitate these exchanges, perhaps a registry of all the files available; this distinction is very important in the developing case law.

The most notorious of P2P applications, Napster, fell under the category of p2p software that, despite transferring files client to client, used a centralized server to facilitate these exchanges. After downloading the Napster client software, a user would register with the company. At this time the user had the option of allowing music files on their computer to be shared with other Napster users. If the user chose to share, Napster's central server would maintain a list of the files available at that client to be updates with each log-on.

When a user searched for a music file, Napster searched these lists and reported back an active location of the file. The two clients then communicated directly to transfer the file. A great majority of these files were of course copyrighted music - and this management of registered song list would be critical in the resulting court case.

However, supernodes were numerous and distributed amongst the client - it was user who chose to act as supernodes. For purposes ona analyzing current cases remember FastTrack is the licensed software protocol used by Grokster and KaZaa [xv] . These two new networks grew fast- very fast. For example, FastTrack managed 20,000 users in its first month.

The software now reports user statistics between 3 and 6 million clients depending on the time and day. All together these computers share close to a billion different files, equaling around 7 million gigabytes of files - about 8 trillion floppy disk worth of data available to search and download. No one denies that a significant amount of this data is composed of copyrighted work, even if no real way to estimate the percent amount exists. The effect is staggering.

Two issues arise in the p2p controversy; the first is how to deal with the direct infringers- the millions of users who download music from file sharing networks. The second issue is how to address the potential liability of those who produce or manage the p2p network software. It is this second issue, the question of if liability exists, that has given rise to the majority of legal controversy.

Napster stated that absent any specific information a computer system operator could not be liable merely because the structure of the system allowed for the exchange of copyrighted material [xxvi] . Grokster clarified that constructive knowledge arising from the mere possibility of infringing uses does not equate to specific information about infringement. A genuine awareness of direct infringement is needed to satisfy the first prong of the contributory infringement test [xxvii] . Aimster further clarified that software features, such as or encryption, installed for the specific purpose of preventing knowledge, does constitute willful blindness [xxviii] . The Grokster, Napster and Aimster courts all found little difficulty in attributing actual knowledge of end user infringement to the software providers.

First one should look to centralized control, then to the extent of knowledge that infringement in occurring. Knowledge of each specific act of infringement is not needed, but more then just the potential knowledge of potential infringement is. For the affirmative Sony defense to be successful, actual non-infringing uses of the technology must be substantial in comparison to the known infringement.

These uses must be real, or very probable. The presence central control underscores material contribution if it includes some manner of inventory of search engine, or otherwise may imply a requirement to modify the software to prevent infringement.

Fifth Amendment is not violated by this form of electronic surveillance if, as in Olmstead, the suspects were voluntarily conducting their business over the telephone and were not compelled by law enforcement to do so.

Title III of the Omnibus Crime Control and Safe Streets Act of 1968 codifies rules regulating the use of wiretaps by law enforcement.  Wiretaps may only be used in the investigation of certain offenses, including counterfeiting, fraud, and offenses punishable by death, and then only when the government can show probable cause that the suspect has committed, is committing, or is about to commit an allowable offense and there is probable cause that a wiretap will reveal communications concerning the offense.  The government must also show that other means of obtaining the information have been exhausted.  Court orders may authorize surveillance for a maximum of 30 days (with the possibility for a 30 day extension), and require reports to the court every 7-10 days.

The laws regulating pen/trap devices are less restrictive than those regulating wiretaps.  In United States v. New York Telephone Company 2, decided in 1977, the New York Telephone Company refused to provide technical assistance and facilities to aid law enforcement in the installation of a pen register, claiming that it could only be ordered to do so in connection with a Title III wiretap order.  The court held that, because pen register devices do not intercept the content of communications, Congress did not intend Title III restrictions to be applied to their use.

While the government has equated pen/trap phone number tracking and pen/trap e-mail surveillance, a telephone pen register simply collects a list of phone numbers dialed by a suspect, information which would automatically be recorded by the telephone company in the normal course of business.  Carnivore, by contrast, collects e-mail addresses of the sender and recipient as well as website information, internet search terms, web browsing activities, and time spent on various websites by suspects.  Under the PATRIOT Act, the FBI can implement the more intrusive Carnivore under less-restrictive ECPA rules, rather than the more restrictive Title III requirements.

The Multiple Listing Service ("MLS"), until recent years, was the only "internet" advertising of real estate across the country.  This service allowed brokers and real estate agents ("brokers") to access a database containing properties for sale across the country.

Individuals who wanted to buy real estate would contact a broker, who would then access the database using parameters given them by the buyer to print out a list of potential homes, then usually drive the individuals to each home for a viewing.  Traditionally upon the sale of a home using a broker, the owner would have to pay roughly 3% of the sale price to one agent for just placing the home in the MLS and another 3% to the agent that eventually found the actual buyer 1.

Many full-service brokers have realized that due to the internet, their overhead has dramatically decreased, and their profit margin has risen, but only a few of them now simply charge substantially less in commissions than their competitors 6.

Currently, in addition to being governed by Federal advertising real estate laws, these sites are also governed by individual state real estate advertising laws 7.  These state laws can regulate internet sites doing business in their state as long as they meet jurisdictional requirements and do not come directly into conflict with federal law per the Supremacy Clause of Article VI of the U.S. Constitution 8.

Beyond a direct conflict with federal regulation, the states can regulate everything not constitutionally granted to the federal government to regulate, but the federal government generally regulates any area of law they deem necessary or the federal court system strikes down any state regulation they deem unconstitutional generally by using the Commerce Clause, protection of a fundamental right as made out in the Bill or Rights, Privileges and Immunities Clause, Equal Protection Clause or Due Process Clause.

We will explore the parameters of personal jurisdiction as they apply to internet advertising and sales and the lines in between.  Then we will explore some possible constitutional arguments for and against state and federal regulation of internet advertising and particularly real estate advertising.

In light of this, where a company would normally weigh the benefits and costs before deciding to expand their business on this level, because of unrestricted access to the internet, if a company chooses to have an active website, they quite possibly choose to contract with citizens of any and every forum state in which a consumer wants to purchase their product.

Case law has set guidelines to establish weather or not a state has personal jurisdiction over a website.  All current authority on jurisdiction over websites seems to relate it to weather a site is passive, or an information only website, or weather it is active or, enters into contracts with customers and allows downloads, transmissions or exchange of files between the site and customers.  If the site is passive, courts tend to find that the individual states do not have personal jurisdiction over the website, but if a site is active, it would meet the minimum requirements for personal jurisdiction 10.

Under current personal jurisdiction law as applied to business, a company is subject to the jurisdiction of a state when they purposefully avail themselves to the laws of that state.  A company purposefully avails itself to the laws of a state by making certain minimum contacts within a state such as targeting advertisements to citizens of the forum state, contracting in business with citizens of the forum state, or generally having knowledge that their products will end up in the forum state and could possibly do harm there 11.

States may try to argue that forcing advertisers to carry brokerage licenses protects the consumer.  Brokers are charged with and governed by particular guidelines, ethics, and laws in their advertisements.  However, one clearly does not need to be a broker to become and stay educated in these minimal guidelines i.e. dealing with fair housing laws, not offering rebates, not offering contests, etc.

For example, Maryland publishes a real estate advertising checklist for brokers and realtors to follow 12.  So why can the federal government simply not do the same thing, with common rules for all advertising in all states?  The only items brokers would have to add is their licensing information and organization name 13.

Although the reason for a state to publish these guidelines is actually to protect consumers, it is an interest achieved by overbroad, if not irrational, means by having at least 51 different guidelines published for each of the states and the District of Columbia.

It would them seem that the only possible reason a state could have to want to regulate a service that charges real estate brokers to post MLS listings is to appease a strong lobby of real estate brokers, unless the state is getting something from these regulations also.  This is discussed infra, see "Deprivation of Property for Public Use".  Because the advertisers are already subject to federal law addressing advertising and specifically advertising real estate 14, it seems unfair and altogether unnecessary for states to be able to further regulate websites that nationally advertise real estate because of the heavy burden on website owners to acquire and maintain broker licenses in all possible states, and a heavy burden on sellers in that in order to use a nationally reaching website advertising medium by paying a reasonable advertising fee, they typically have to enter into an exclusive contract with a broker whom they may not need nor want, but they also have to pay a 6%-7% commission upon the sale of their house to that broker.  This commission is roughly $15,000 on a $200,000 house.  Sellers are not typically allowed to simply pay an advertising fee like brokers do, amounting to less than $500 at the present time, to advertise their property on Realtor.com.

Keep in mind that if one is a licensed broker, one can place an advertisement on the MLS and Realtor.com for one's own personal residence and only have to pay the listing fee.  This service is denied to the average seller by MLS services and Realtor.com, without going through a broker.

Therefore, Congress could use the Commerce Clause to enact common regulations governing not only the advertisement of real estate, but they could go so far as to enact common regulations for the actual purchase and sale of real estate.  As described supra, the current state of the jurisdictional issues and current state of having 51 different jurisdictional laws applying to advertisements on a single website, or in a newspaper, most certainly qualifies as interstate commerce and these conflicting state laws are a burden.  The fact that more than one state's law may apply to a website is by definition a least one type of "interstate activity".

If Congress has the authority to enact laws under the Commerce Clause dealing with commerce and transportation on highways, roads and waterways, then it is only a small step for them to extend this to the property adjacent to highways, roads and waterways.

There may be no greater impact of interstate commerce than those activities related to any and all citizens visiting or moving their residences from state to state, affecting local merchants and economies, affecting populations and voting districts, affecting city, county and state infrastructures and tax bases, funding of the construction of local and interstate highways, impact on national mortgage lending services and banks, as well as the affect on nationwide construction indexes and tourism.

Some typical vacation destination states, such as Hawaii, Florida, Alaska and North Carolina have enormous investments in property used to bring in money from visitors from other states.  Clearly, at least in the aggregate, real property is in the stream of interstate commerce.

When a state law places a heavy burden on interstate commerce, the Supreme Court has often invalidated the laws under the Commerce Clause.  For example, in Bibb v Navaho Freight Lines, 17, the Supreme Court invalidated an Illinois law that required contour rear fender mudguards on all trucks and trailers on Illinois highways.  This forced trucks passing through Illinois not to use mud flaps lawful in 45 states because it created too heavy a burden on interstate commerce.

Iowa statute barring double-trailer trucks on their highways as a burden on interstate commerce, reasoning that the safety concern was illusionary whereas the trucks were allowed in the surrounding states.

Here, state laws have created a heavy burden on website authors/owners to acquire a broker's license from every such state simply to place a photograph and some information about a house on the internet.

To have states competing over cases, moving attorneys and documents from state to state to state in attempting to determine the proper jurisdiction for contract and tort cases dealing with real estate and/or real estate advertising, is not only a waste of time and money, but is very judicially inefficient.  The first rule in the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, created by the U.S. Supreme Court reads "These rules...shall be construed and administered to secure the just, speedy, and inexpensive determination of every action"

Property owners, brokers, newspapers and website owners are not themselves each as a group, protected classes.  Therefore, in order to survive an equal protection challenge, the states need only show that the classification in the advertising laws is (1) reasonable, (2) not arbitrary, and (3) bear a rational relationship to a permissible governmental objective.

Concerning reasonableness, the newspaper exception to many of the states' broker licensing requirements for advertising throws a monkey wrench into the state's argument that their laws are valid.  Before the advent of the internet, there was a reasonable classification between broker listings of properties and newspaper advertisements.

Simply put, broker listings included extreme detail about each property, rooms, sizes, county information, school information, age of the home, amenities, price, etc.  Most newspaper advertisements simply put a couple of the major characteristics such as price, type of home, size and city.

Now, with the advent of the internet, not only do many newspapers include the traditional real estate advertisements, but they also have their own websites advertising real estate in much more detail 22.

Many websites have sprung up that attempt to allow consumers to simply advertise their real estate listings without getting overly involved in the eventual sales transaction such as the many "for-sale-by-owner" websites 23.

Again, concerning reasonableness, making a distinction between newspaper advertisements and these new online services is clearly difficult, if not impossible.  The law then, as applied, is clearly arbitrary in that the newspaper advertisements by some states are considered "legal" while the "for-sale-by-owner" website advertisements are not under some states' laws.

Then again, we do not need to even address the last issue of determining if the classification bears a rational relationship to the states' objectives because of the arbitrary application of the laws themselves.

Web sites such as realtor.com 24 that accepts broker listings from across the country without allowing consumers to place their own advertisements may be considered an equal protection violation as well.  There the website charges a fee ranging usually less than $500 per listing to a broker, but may deny the general public the same advertising opportunity at any price.

States sanction such real estate advertising websites by providing these brokers with state real estate licenses 25, and, by receiving revenues via taxes and fees upon the sale of these properties, see "Deprivation of Property for Public Use" under "Takings", infra.

Therefore, brokers and websites accepting real estate advertisements strictly from brokers should be subject to equal protection scrutiny in its business practices as a state sanctioned licensee, see Moose Lodge No. 107 v. Irvis Et Al, 28.  Here, although not a protected class, home owners trying to sell their property should be entitled to, at a minimum, a non-arbitrarily applied, rational basis for denying them access to advertising services.

Both are merely trying to advertise a particular property for sale, both want to merely pay an advertising fee for the service, and both want to pay for the exact same service.  If these sites want to provide brokers a discount for using their listing service, they can achieve this by allowing discounts after some number of advertisements have been purchased by a broker or individual within a particular time span.  Individuals who want to make a dollar can simply place advertisements for friends and family without getting involved with the sales process, having the same access to the advertising medium as brokers.

If courts do not consider brokers selling property as part of their business, and home owners trying to sell their own home to be "similarly situated", then the court should consider an alternate but very common situation.  Brokers selling their own homes are allowed to advertise their own homes on Realtor.com, but do not have to pay a sales commission, to themselves.  But non-brokers, being the general public, are denied this same advertising medium, unless they pay a broker a sales commission for placing the advertisement for them.  In this respect, the non-broker, general public, is denied equal application and/or equal protection of the law.

The fact that realtor.com is not a private business in the traditional sense may help the courts or legislature in their analysis.  If it were a private business, it may have more leeway in determining who can and who cannot advertise at its site.  Instead, it is basically a composition of listings from not only competing brokers in one company, i.e. ReMax, but it is a composition of listings from competing, separate realtor businesses such as Coldwell Banker, ReMax, Century 21, etc.  It seems irrational to prevent individual homeowners to add a single listing to the site.

The current regulation in many states is that companies who advertise real estate on the web have to become licensed real estate brokers in the state in which they advertise.  Currently, FSBO.com is involved in a lawsuit, 29, where they are fighting for their right to run their website in the state of California without possessing the required broker's license.

Their argument is that the service they provide is comparable to that of a newspaper advertisement for real estate which is permissible without the broker's license as an exception to the CA law as we discussed earlier under the equal protection argument.  Their main argument is that that states should not be allowed to regulate this type of web advertising of real estate because it would be a violation of the websites First Amendment right to Freedom of Speech 30.

The nexus of the First Amendment Free Speech argument for online real estate advertising services against state licensing requirements is that state regulations imposed to enter a profession have to have a rational relation to ones fitness or capacity to practice the profession, Taucher v. Born, 31.

Although the state has the authority to regulate the profession of real estate brokering, in the case of real estate web advertisers, the regulation's purpose is to regulate speech, not brokering activity, violating the web advertisers' First Amendment right to freedom of speech 32.

The next question the court faces is whether or not the speech is constitutionally protected speech or solely commercial speech.  38.  The speech is deemed commercial if the sole purpose of the information provided is to propose a transaction between the plaintiff and their client.  In Taucher 39, the court found that the speech is of the type that is protected by the constitution because the websites do not solely propose a commercial transaction (defined here as a future's trade) and they do not provide any type of specialized advice to their clients.

In Taucher 41, the court found that the regulation was a prior restraint on speech.  A prior restraint on speech is considered a regulation that requires speech to be pre-approved before it can be disclosed.  The regulation that a person be licensed as a CTA before they can publish their opinions on future's trading provides a drastic prohibition on the rights of the publishers to freedom of speech.  Prior restraints on speech bear a presumption of invalidity except where harm created by the speech is certain and great and could not have been prevented by less restrictive means.  In Taucher 42, the court finds that this is not the case.

As a result, anyone who advertises real estate in the state must obtain a brokers license or face a complaint being brought against them.  Obtaining a license requires special training either in addition to a college degree or more extensive training in lieu of a degree, real estate job experience, passing an examination and paying certain fees.

Taucher.  The penalty is not defined as a felony and is not as severe as the penalty in Taucher, however the possibility of any jail time raises the severity of this regulation to a critical level as a serious infringement on civil rights therefore the court may be more likely to find that the speech is constitutionally protected 44.

Next we will examine a brief fact comparison between the services rendered by a licensed real estate broker and what services our hypothetical plaintiffs FSBO.com and Realtor.com render.  A licensed broker or real estate agent sponsored by a broker seeks out his client for the purpose of selling to him or matching him to a buyer of real property.  The real estate broker will facilitate the transaction from listing the home through the closing.  The real estate broker will meet with the client face to face and offer advice and service based on that particular client's needs and desires suggesting perhaps that a moving seller drop their price lower or at an earlier date than a seller who is merely trying to maximize his investment on a rental property through its sale.  Realtor.com does not take place in the real estate transaction whatsoever and the actual service Realtor.com sells is a listing site to licensed real estate brokers for their MLS listings.

In addition to advertising space on their website is advice and information on how to sell a home, but this advice is not customized but is the same for every seller.  FSBO.com does offer a help line for sellers to call and get more customized advice and will get involved in writing contracts for their clients.  FSBO receives a flat fee from their clients for the information and service that they provide and they receive the fee whether or not their client sells their home.

The next level of scrutiny is that of whether this is constitutionally protected or commercial speech.  The test from Taucher is whether the sole purpose of the information provided is to propose a real estate transaction between the plaintiff and their client 45.

Neither of these sites proposes to sell real estate and in the case of Realtor.com, they offer to connect potential buyers with real estate agents to complete transactions.  Finally the court will look to determine if the constitutionally protected speech is being violated through the regulation.  In this case, the court should find as it did in Taucher, that it would be a prior restraint on speech to require providers of real estate listings to be licensed as real estate brokers and therefore the requirement would be an unconstitutional violation of the first amendment protection of free speech.  The nexus of the free speech argument is that the regulation, if regulating speech, must relate to the fitness of the one practicing the profession.  If a website is merely advertising real estate for sale and is not involved in the actual sale, they are not practicing the profession 46.

The Supreme Court said in Erznoznik v. Jacksonville, 47, that an overbroad state statute may deter the legitimate exercise of First Amendment rights.  However, invalidating the statute automatically may interfere with a state regulatory program, forcing the Court to proceed with caution in determining if the statute could both be narrowed and if the statute, as it stands, has a substantially detrimental effect on legitimate expression 48.

For advertising real estate, the state interest of consumer protection and truth in advertising could easily be narrowed, as the Court discusses, supra, by forcing a common set of real estate advertisement disclosures, no matter who is doing the advertising.  And, if a broker or agent is placing the advertisement, the broker's or agent's license information, name and company name should also be included.

Keep in mind that the situations below only apply to property owners who are forced to use a selling broker in order to simply advertise their property in a competitive way, and therefore are forced to pay a broker's commission upon the sale of the property.  The situations below do not apply to those owners who prefer a traditional full-service broker and should pay for their services as rendered.

Several Supreme Court decisions have given us a small array of enumerated property rights which, when infringed upon by government actions, allow landowners to challenge as Constitutional takings.  These rights, although they may be expanded by state law, at least involve the right to exclusive possession of the property, Loretto v. Teleprompter Manhattan CATV Corp. Et Al,49, the right to exclude others, Nollan v. California Coastal Comm'n, 50, the right to use the property Lucas v. South Carolina Coastal Council, 51 and the right to freely alienate (sell) the property Hodel v. Irving, 52.

It is the practical aspects of this last right we are concerned with here in the internet era.  If the right to freely alienate is a fundamental property right, then it would seem only appropriate that the Court strike down state laws that put an excessive burden on individual's ability to freely alienate their property as it has when excessive burdens are placed on other constitutionally protected rights.

For example, in Hodgson v. Minnesota, 53, the Court held unconstitutional a Minnesota's law requiring notice to two adults if a woman under 18 wanted to have an abortion as an excessive burden, violating Due Process.

In Emmett v. Kent Sch. Dist. No. 415, 54, where a high school student was suspended for posting "mock obituaries" of his two friends to a website was held as burdening, and therefore a violation of, the student's First Amendment right to free speech.  In Loving v Virginia, 55, the Court held that individual liberty was too heavily burdened when an interracial couple violated Virginia's anti-miscegenation law, which was held to be unconstitutional.

In the current internet era, it is often impossible to compete with broker-only websites that advertise real estate, such as "realtor.com".  Individuals are free to create their own websites, but due to the technology of the internet, no one would know the website is there, and it would not be searchable with the other home listings.

Another argument in favor of consumers is that the result of the advertising laws is that states are seemingly protecting broker business privileges and income at the expense of the general public's fundamental right to property (money).

The brokers' commission is arbitrary in that the brokers' effort involved in advertising a $500,000 home on the internet is the same as the effort involved in advertising a $100,000 home, but the brokers will reap over 5% of the sales price upon the sale of the home, regardless of how or whom homes are sold 56.

The question here is: can state laws requiring broker licensing for advertising real estate, and hence, broker commissions on property sales, be considered a taking under the Fourteenth or Fifth Amendments?

If we go beyond viewing property as simply real estate to also viewing money as property as the Supreme Court has on many occasions, as in Goldberg v. Kelly,57 and E. Enters. v. Apfel, 58, then by forcing owners to pay a commission in order to simply advertise their real estate for sale would seem to be a taking under the Fourteenth Amendment.  In Apfel, 59, the Court said that a new federal law that forced retired coal miners to pay more in medical benefits that what was settled when they retired was a constitutional taking.

This ruling could then be used to extend a takings claim to all property owners who are forced to pay a "standard" sales commission, beyond a reasonable advertising fee.  The ruling would not be limited to those who just lose more money than they gain.  This would be true at least for individuals who purchased their property before the advertising law was enacted, taking care of factors (2) and (3) above, but it might be limited by factor (4): owners who bought their property before the laws were enacted.

In Cienega Gardens v. United States60, the Supreme Court held that a Fifth Amendment taking occurred when real estate developers were deprived of money from existing mortgages and other contract provisions, when new federal laws were enacted that abrogated their gains.  This reinforces that a taking may exist for all owners who lose money to brokers, if by force, as opposed to just those who lose more than they gain.

The situation with state requirements that advertisers be brokers, and therefore charge broker commissions to advertise and have exclusive right to sell an individual's real estate is most succinctly described by Justice Chace in Calder v. Bull61 when he said that presuming the legislature has been entrusted with the power to make laws that give all of A's property to B "is against all reason and justice."

In takings analysis in the purest form, the Courts look to see if an individual's property was taken from them, without just compensation, and basically handed over to the public for public use.  Forcing individuals to use a broker to advertise their home for sale, and thus paying the broker a commission is a taking in nearly its purest form as described.  The taking is just not immediately obvious.

My answer is again, the taking is not immediately obvious.  Brokers and agents, paying an average 6% state income tax, and even a %15 average federal income tax, are paying a combined 20%-25% of that money back to the state and federal governments via income taxes, where it gets distributed to the general public through government programs!  In this example, that would be roughly $3 million to $4 million per every 10000 homes sold.  There is your taking in nearly its purest form.

Using the same figures, under the current tax laws, for every 10000 homes sold by owner, with no broker or agent commissions, the state and federal government get zero dollars ($0) in income tax from the sales.  The entire amount of the sale is usually non-taxable, where buyer and seller retain their hard-earned money.

If 90% of those homes were sold by brokers who have an average combined state and federal income tax rate of 21%, the federal and state governments will receive a combined income tax of roughly $11 billion.  If even 10% of those sales were by people who did not wish to sell their home by a broker, but were forced to just so they could competitively advertise their home on realtor.com, that would come to over $1 billion in takings under the Fifth and Fourteenth Amendments.

To make matters worse, when using brokers and agents when one does not wish to, they need to increase the price of the house by a few percentage points, which is usually accomplished by an appraiser merely appraising the home for a few thousand more than what it was worth the year, or two years, before, in order to make the sale go through.  It is common knowledge that if an appraiser starts valuing homes less than the asking prices, banks will stop calling them to handle their appraisals because it delays or prevents the closing.  So, no matter the asking price, unless outrageous, the house will appraise for the elevated asking price.  Everybody wins, except the buyer.  Now, the county tax assessor comes along and increases the tax value of the home for the new buyer, causing the new buyer to pay higher property taxes on the home that was identical in every aspect to the home the seller owned a few days, weeks, or months before.  The property tax dollars are also typically spread out amongst the community for social programs as well.

So, if state laws force sellers to use brokers to advertise their property, and thus, pay a commission, a taking occurs on every level of government including the federal, state and county by way of income and property taxes.

Fourteenth Amendment liberty is expansive as to include "the right of the citizen to be free in the enjoyment of all his faculties; to be free to use them in all lawful ways; to live and work where he will; to earn his livelihood by any lawful calling; to pursue any livelihood or avocation; and for that purpose to enter into all contracts which may be proper, necessary and essential to his carrying out to a successful conclusion the purposes above mentioned."

Property owners selling their homes usually give up their freedom to associate and contract directly with other home buyers when they voluntarily sign an exclusive listing agreement with a listing broker in exchange for the broker's services.  If not given up entirely, the broker usually ensures that they still receive a commission if the owner sells the property on their own.  The broker's services usually involve placing a sign in the front yard, a lock box, advertising on an MLS or other listing service, advertising on realtor.com, potential newspaper advertisements, taking phone calls from other agents wishing to view the home, showing the home themselves to prospective buyers, being active in the negotiation for the sales price, and making sure the entire transaction occurs smoothly.

By states requiring a broker's license to advertise real property competitively on the internet, and thus brokers charge their customary commission upon the sale of the property, and, that brokers rules are also state regulated, states are in effect forcing home owners to pay a state mandated, out of proportion, commission to brokers.  In addition, in order to sell real estate, states are effectively forcing individuals to involuntarily contract with brokers, and preventing owners from contracting with prospective buyers directly.  Both of these situations seem to violate the fundamental rights of freedom to associate and freedom to contract.

He claims that when it comes down to the final price negotiations, brokers and their commissions are what really get in the way: "Usually, the haggling occurs over a 5% to 10% difference, and that is, more or less, the broker's cut of the sale price.

Internet real estate advertising offers nationwide exposure to home sellers and nationwide accessibility to prospective home buyers.  Buyers can quickly scan almost every home for sale in a given area from the comfort of their home or place of work without having to order outdated newspapers or catalogs from the towns of interest, or, bother a real estate agent until the buyer has narrowed his selection to particular areas or even to particular homes.  This reduces the time, resources and costs of buyers, sellers and real estate agents and brokers to affect a home purchase.

Along with the advantages of online real estate advertising for consumers, along comes conflicting interests as well.  What was once a broker controlled advertising medium, and hence broker specific state laws to protect consumers from potential misrepresentation and fraud by a state regulated profession, has now become an advertising medium open to the general public.

Now, however, without the need for brokers to access real estate listings via the internet for consumers, the state laws "protecting" consumers are now the same laws that are burdening buyers' and sellers' ability to freely contract directly with other buyers' and sellers to save time, money and the convenience of direct contact.  The trade off for consumers is they do not get the benefit of a professional broker's expertise, and, may get fewer disclosures from a homeowner selling their own property, but recent state laws requiring disclosures for termites, inspections, structural and other known problems have diminished this risk significantly.

If the purpose of the state laws is to force advertisers to abide by certain disclosure requirements in order to protect buyers, then an option for the U.S. Congress would be to simply enact common disclosure requirements in order to advertise real estate.

This would also further the public policy of providing affordable real estate advertising for consumers because advertisers would have much lower overhead, allowing them to charge lower advertising fees if advertisers do not have to acquire, maintain and pay for broker licenses from every state and district in the U.S.

Georgia State University and expects her J.D. in May 2005.  Ms. Minton has two years of experience in the computer training industry, and three years of experience in the manufacturing industry and is currently work at a swimming pool supply and service company as the Office Manager.

Americans were surprised when they turned on the news the next morning and realized that they were still without a new President.  The drama that unfolded over the next several months had people clamoring for new voting technology.

With election officials looking to reform voting, but not yet ready to embrace Internet voting, Riverside County, California became the first all electronic voting county in the U.S. in 2001. 6  The next year, Georgia followed as the first all electronic voting state.

Online voting experiments are taking place, not only in the U.S., but all over the world.  In response to declining voter turnout, the UK passed legislation that allows local authorities to experiment with new ways of voting.  Electronic voting was first employed in the London Mayoral election of May 2000.

Internet voting offers greater convenience, increased accuracy and nearly instant results reporting, but experts recommend a gradual progression towards Internet voting.  An intermediate step is electronic voting.  This method of voting is mandated by state law in Georgia.  Voters insert a voter identification card into ATM style machines located at their voting precinct to cast their ballot.  Cards are read and votes are counted by machine.

Presidential election. 4  The report outlines a three part phase-in of Internet voting.  First, offer the technology as an option at traditional polling places, offering convenience and efficiency, while allowing election officials to control security and technology.  The next step would include Internet voting from kiosks at shopping malls and grocery stores, outside polling precincts.  The third and final step would be remote Internet voting from home or work, which requires a much greater level of security.  Experts believe this technology will not be adequate for at least 10 years.

In 1965, Congress went farther than courts, as exhibited in the Lassiter case, had been willing to go by implementing the Voting Rights Act in 1965 in order to invalidate the system of disfranchisement that existed in many states.

"Congress has found that case-by-case litigation was inadequate to combat wide-spread and persistent discrimination in voting, because of the inordinate amount of time and energy required to overcome the obstructionist tactics invariably encountered in these lawsuits.  After enduring nearly a century of systematic resistance to the 15th Amendment, Congress might well decide to shift the advantage of time and inertia from the perpetrators of the evil to its victims." South Carolina v.

Ultimately, online voting will not depend on technology, but public confidence and accessibility.  Online voting has both technical and social aspects that need to be resolved before Americans can cast their ballot online.

Invidious discrimination is action that is based on prejudice or it tends to denigrate the disfavored class, i.e., it is intended to harm.  "Discrete and insular" minorities are those that are so disfavored and out of the political mainstream that the courts must make extra efforts to protect them because the political system will not.  The group does not have much political power because of past discrimination against them, such as keeping them out of the voting system.  There is recognition by the courts that the majority will likely vote as a block against the minority, so the court acts as protector of the minority against successes of the majority.  Carolene Products Co. v.

Even though the court would use strict scrutiny to review any laws affecting the right to vote, a state law adopting Internet voting would unlikely be struck down on 15th Amendment grounds, as the legislature would not have a discriminatory intent and any disparate impact would probably not amount to invidious discrimination.

The 24th Amendment establishes that "the right of citizens . . . to vote in any primary or other election . . . shall not be denied or abridged by the United States or any State by reason of failure to pay any poll tax or other tax". After slaves gained the right to vote, grandfather clauses, poll taxes and literacy tests were deemed unconstitutional because they directly deprived citizens of their right to vote.  Shaw v. Reno, 509 U.S. 630, 659 (1993).

If remote voting were to become a reality, the argument could be made that owning a personal computer and maintaining an Internet connection amounts to a poll tax.  The need to be able to use a computer could amount to a literacy test.  Continuing to offer other methods of voting would help to eliminate such concerns.  However, even if Internet voting were adopted as only one additional method to cast a ballot, those who have the ability to vote from home or work are more likely to participate in an election, skewing the socio-economic voting statistics.  This may result in the votes of a disfavored class being less powerful, which could result in a constitutional claim.  Once government grants the right to vote, every vote must count equally.

Amendment if his right to vote is deprived.  For example, a voter may have a vote deprivation claim if he was planning to vote online waited until shortly before the polls close to vote and then had problems with the voting system, causing him to miss the time deadline for voting.  Governments could establish safeguards to prevent this type of deprivation, such as having the Internet voting cut-off earlier in the day than voting at the polls.  That way, if anyone has a problem voting on-line, he would have time to go vote at the polls.

Poor security of an online network that allows hackers to manipulate votes or system glitches to cause some votes to be lost or miscounted could result in litigation.  In most cases, security and hacking issues would amount to negligence or breach of contract claim with vendors and service providers, rather than a constitutional claim for the complete deprivation of the right to vote.  Security and system problems could slow down the voting process or result in the votes being tallied incorrectly.  But through access to back-up data and auditing procedures, the problems may not result in any votes being lost or miscalculated.  As a result, the negligence or breach of contract claim could come from the government body administering the election for its inconvenience, rather than from individual voters.  Montgomery County v. Microvote Corporation , 2000 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 983.

In Montgomery County, standing was a key issue because the government is not allowed to bring a vote right infringement claim on behalf of voters.  In this case, the court held that the government did not have standing because the voters, not the government, were actually the injured party.  Because the elections were conducted and completed, there was technically no injury to the voters and no one lost his vote.  Furthermore, no voters complained.  Montgomery County v. Microvote Corporation , 2000 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 983.

The court requires more than mere inconvenience to find that there has been deprivation of the right to vote.  Where long lines existed at a polling place due to voting machine malfunction, the court declined to recognize a constitutional deprivation of vote.  Hennings v. Grafton, 523 F.2d 861, (7th Cir. 1975).  In Hennings, the refusal of voting officials to take statutorily-prescribed steps to insure the voting system was safe from being tampered with and their refusal to recount the votes to verify that votes had not been tampered with were found to fall short of constitutional infractions.

Computerized voting technology is expected to make strides due to recent federal funding to replace punch card and lever machines and to require at least one machine that allows blind and disabled voters to cast their votes without assistance.  Internet voting is not a completely foreign concept; Americans already use computers in voting process and to count ballots.  Americans routinely move stocks and health records via the Internet and the Internet continues to gain popularity.  It took radio 38 years to achieve 50 million users.  The telephone took 30 years to accomplish the same goal.  Personal computers reached 50 million users in 16 years and the television took 13 years.

MovieBuff in it's metatags. Metatags  are "hidden" or "buried" code, not visible to web users, but "used by search  engines to determine which sites correspond to keywords entered by a web user."[91] The consumer chooses (via hyperlink) from the list produced by the search engine, where the user can tell where he is linking, therefore there is no blatant source confusion necessary to find infringement. The Brookfield court instead relied on "initial interest confusion" -- where a mark is used "to capture initial consumer attention, even though no actual sale is finally completed as a result of the confusion, may be an infringement"

Finally, the authors of this webpage freely grant permission to anyone wishing to link to this webpage without        misrepresentation; the owner will gladly remove any link from  this webpage       upon request from the linked entity; this website is not  sponsored or   associated    with any particular linked entity unless so stated in truth   by that entity;    and the existence of any particular link is simply intended   to imply potential    interest to the reader.

Industrious thieves use many mediums to obtain this information, such as sending letters to potential victims while masquerading as legitimate businesses or government entities, and asking for a victim's personal information.

They also go through an individual's or company's garbage in search of identity information (also called "dumpster diving"), or look over their victim's shoulder as the victim gives out a credit card number or other personal information to someone on the phone or to a cashier (also called "shoulder surfing").

In order to gain access to many websites or in order to purchase online, consumers are often required to give personal information, such as their mother's maiden name, credit card number, date of birth, address, and sometimes social security number.

Hackers have been able to access this information by entering the website's "back door", the secret way into a website that allows the hacker access into the website's confidential administrative files.

Additionally, industrious hackers and identity thieves have created programs, called "worms", which enter the website from an infected disk or through email and silently sneak around the server or database, and send back confidential information to its host.

The worm shuts down virus security software, such as Norton, and creates a backdoor on the computer and takes control of the computer's modem, often attempting to direct the computer to dial out over the internet so gathered information can be sent to a specific location.

Only three percent (3%) of those who complained to the FTC believed that their information was stolen over the internet, but the FTC believes this number is lower than the actual number of thefts that occurred over the internet.

However, the court held that a 1976 amendment to the Act gives the United States the power to punish people who use false numbers when dealing with licensing agencies, because states are allowed to put social security numbers on licenses.

This bill would help to protect students from having their social security numbers on a database that could become compromised.  The bill also would place stricter requirements on banks and retailers by requiring the businesses to call customers before giving credit or loans in a person's name.

The court discussed the growing problem of identity theft and how the use of false social security numbers on a bankruptcy petiton could not only hurt an unknowing individual, but that it could prevent a creditor from becoming aware of the petition.

If the offense "involves the transfer or use of one or more means of identification if, as a result of the offense, any individual committing the offense obtains anything of value aggregating $1,000 or more during any 1-year period,"the offender can receive a fine or imprisonment for not more than twenty years, depending on the how or why the crime was committed.

This Act details the circumstances where a consumer report can be released to businesses and gives consumers a procedure to correct any mistakes on their credit report.  If a thief procures a person's identity in order to obtain credit cards or other financial gain using a person's credit, the victim can notify credit bureaus of the problem, which in turn should investigate to ensure that the information listed on the credit report is accurate.

This statute protects all consumers from abusive debt collection practices, but is especially helpful in stopping debt collection of victims of identity theft. Under the FDCPA, persons who are victims of identity theft will not be victimized again by debt collectors attempting to collect money on debt created by identity thieves.

Several sections of the Truth in Lending Act were amended to create the Fair Credit Billing Act, including adding procedures to resolve billing errors on credit card accounts and giving the limit a consumer is liable for fraudulent credit card charges.

In the past there was little, if any, protection for people who had their debit card number stolen; however, through this Act, the victim is given greater protection from responsibility for purchases or transfers he did not authorize.

The Bill's purpose details recent increases in indentity theft, including statistics that "hundreds of thousands of Americans are victims of identity theft each year, resulting in an annual cost to industry of more than $3,500,000,000."

The Bill proposes another amendment to the Truth in Lending Act in an attempt to make credit card holders more aware when certain activities, such as address changes or the ordering of extra cards to a new address, occurs on their account.

The Bill also proposes to amend the Fair Credit Reporting Act to update Fraud Alert, an action consumers can take once they believe their identity has been stolen, and allows one free credit report per-consumer per-year.

The amendment still proscribes prison time of one-to-ten years and restitution, and adds a possible fine not to exceed $100,000 for a first offense. This amendment seems evidence that Georgia wants to be tough on identity theft offenders.

South Carolina also has a bill before the General Assembly, Senate Bill 43, which specifies procedure on how victims of identity theft can quickly clear their name, increases identity verification for credit card issuers, creates an identity theft database, and blocks bad credit information resulting from identity theft from credit reports of victims.

This requirement limits the scope of the statute and those who can be prosecuted under it.  Identities are not stolen solely for economic benefits, but rather can include staying in the country illegally, and Kansas' limitation takes away protection from the victim and gives the protection to the thief.

If an individual has his identity used on "an application ... for a loan, credit line or account, credit card, charge card, public utitlty service, mail receving or forwarding service, office or desk space rental service, or commercial mobil radio service" by an unauthorized individual then the victim is given greater rights.

This statute requires the businesses to turn over the information, which in turn may lead to stricter identification standards by the business.  The victim can request, along with copies of the documents, proof of the methods of identification checked with the application.

The thieves in this case stole mail, garbage and recycleable material, broke into cars, and hacked into websites and personal computers in order to gain information such as names, dates of birth, and social security numbers.

These same individuals used software to hack into commercial sites in order to mirror the keystrokes, which allowed them to capture credit card account information.  These crimes led to $400,000 in fraudulent purchases.  One defendant was sentenced to forty-one months of prison time and required to pay restitution in the amount of $70,025.98, and a second defendant was sentenced to fifteen months in prison and was required to pay restitution in the amount of $52,379.03.  Both defendents pled guilty.

If the defendant is found guilty he can face up to thirty years in prison, one million dollar restitution, and/or an amount two-times the pecuniary gain or loss if convicted of the wire fraud charge.  For the conspiracy charge, the defendant faces up to five years in prison, $250,000 restitution, and/or a fine two-times the gross gain or loss.

The Plaintiff had her identity stolen and it was used to obtain up to thirteen credit cards and accounts.  When the Plaintiff learned she was a victim she contacted the Defendant to learn the proper procedure for inquiring into the accounts and to be shown to have a Fraud Alert.

The Plaintiff charged the Defendant with negligence in the handling of her claims, because the "method of reporting information in consumer credit reports based on information obtained from credit providers is unreasonable."

Here, it was found reasonable procedures were used and it was reiterated that a credit reporting company cannot be held strictly liable.  The Defendant was not aware there was any reason to doubt the information, and therefore was found to not be liable for negligence.

While it could be suggested that personal information should never be given out over the internet,  that practice would prevent a person from being able to take advantage of many activities that make the internet so useful.  The key to giving out information, such as your name, address, or credit card number, is verifying the receiver is a reputable company and runs a secured website.  Most secured sites give visitors notification it is such a site prior to requesting any private information.  Amazon.com, a popular retail site, uses the Secure Sockets Layer (SSL) software.

Additionally, an internet user should never give out a social security number online.  Social security numbers are the key identifier of United States citizens, and while having other personal information stolen, such as credit card numbers, theft of a person's social security number can open the door to stealing a person's entire identity, including good credit, clean criminal record, and citizenship status.

In order to protect the information stored on a personal computer from hackers, it is important to install a firewall.  With the increase in cable modem and DSL activity, users are online potentially 24-hours-a-day, which allows inventive hackers to enter computer systems and database to retrieve information without being detected.  Firewalls will protect computers from hackers, dataminers (cite this, and in footnote, put that a dataminer is a worm that attaches itself to a personal computer and reports back to the host server the types of internet sites a person visits so that popups and advertising can be catered to that person's interests), and other spyware in most circumstances.  Many personal firewalls are available free-of-charge on the internet.

Even if a computer is not firewall-protected or an aggressive hacker manages to break through a firewall, they cannot steal what is not available to them.  A computer user should never inventory personal information on their computer.  Storing information, such as pin numbers, credit card numbers, and passwords on a personal computer makes it easy for hackers or worms to steal an identity.

One of the most vital ways an individual can protect himself is to get credit reports on a regular basis.  These credit reports can be obtained from Equifax , Experian , and TransUnion. An individual can request these companies place a "Fraud Alert" on their credit file.

Once it has been determined that a person is a victim of identity theft, there are several steps that should be taken.  The companies, service providers, or agencies with whom the identity has been fraudulently used need to be contacted and a report filed.

Many companies will swallow a financial loss in order to keep hacking by outside or inside sources a secret for fear of loss of customer confidence. Emerging state law, like the statute enacted in California in 2003, could promote honest reporting of potential hacking of company computers by providing a civil penalty for failure to report.

Federal and state governments are continuously amending and adding laws in order to better protect identities and private information.  Governments are also establishing more stringent penalties for the hackers and thieves who steal the private information.  While the government is attempting to meet the need for a greater level of protection, individuals also need to become more aware of their surroundings and the things they can do to protect their identities.  Identity theft will likely continue to be a problem in the future; however,  laws are being created and modified to keep pace with increasingly advanced technology.

In 1998 the Internet Corporation for Assigned Names and Numbers, ICANN, was created to control the system of maintaining domain names 4. ICANN is a non-profit corporation which is a coalition of private sector internet businesses, technical,  noncommercial and academic communities 5. ICANN oversees the registration of all official  domain names. Through its system, ICANN has accredited over 100 registrars,  in many countries, in an effort to create competition in the domain name market 6, such as Network Solutions, Inc. Registrars, Registration Technologies, Inc., Dotster, Inc., and many more. Each individual registrar obtains the needed information for registering a domain name and then enters this information into the ICANN master records 7. The information submitted by the domain applicant is kept in a database known as the "WHOIS" database 8. This database is accessible from many of the registrars sites and searches of the database provide information about the owner of a particular domain name along with his/her contact information and the dates of registration and expiration 9. Unfortunately, the registrars do not check the accuracy of the information provided by the owner or the patent office for trademarks, which can lead to disputes between trademark owners with unknown domain name owners. Most disputes between domain name registrants and trademark owners are settled after a series of negotiations, however, in the event that they are not settled, the trademark owners can turn to either traditional trademark law, anticybersquatting law or dispute resolution systems provided by ICANN 10.

Administrative proceedings for the resolution of these types of disputes are governed by the Rules for Uniform Domain Name Dispute Resolution Policy, better known as the "Rules," as well as some Supplemental Rules 16.

The complaint must include the name, postal and e-mail addresses, and the telephone and fax numbers of the complainant (trademark owner) and any of the complainant's representatives, Rules. The complaint must also specify the method of communication and the type of Panel, whether it is a single member panel or a three-member panel 18. The complaint must provide the name of the domain name holder and all the information concerning the domain name holder that the complainant was able to obtain either on his own or through the WHOIS database. Next, the complaint must specify the domain name which is subject to the complaint, the registrar who registered the domain name, and the actual trademark or service mark the complainant is basing his/her claim, along with how the domain name is confusingly similar to the trademark, that the registrant has no legitimate interest in the domain  name, and that the name was registered in bad faith 19. Once the complaint is  complete, the complainant must forwarded to the Provider to review for compliance.  Once compliance is established and fees are paid, the Provider has 3 days  to forward the complaint to the domain name holder 20. Once a date for the commencement  of the administrative proceeding has been chosen by the Provider, the domain  name holder then has the opportunity submit a response.

The domain name holder has up to 20 days after the commencement of the administrative  proceeding to submit a response to the Provider. Like the complaint,  the response must be submitted in both hard copy and electronic form as well as with his/her contact information, method of communication and whether he/she agrees with the complainant's choice of Panel. The domain name holder must also identify any, if any, other proceedings that are related to the same domain name as is the subject of the complaint and then send a copy to the complainant 21. If the domain name holder elects not to respond to the complaint, then the Panel, in the absence of exceptional circumstances, shall decide the dispute based solely on the complaint 22.

The Panel, whether one member or three members, will decide the complaint based on all of the statements and documents submitted in accordance with the Rules and applicable principles of law 23. Typically, the Panel will provide a decision to the Provider with in 14 days of their (his) appointment.

Congress created the Anticybersquatting Consumer Protection Act, ACPA, to  discourage the increasing practice of cybersquatting. "Cybersquatting is the practice of registering brand names as Internet domain names in order to force the rightful owners of the marks to pay for the right to  engage in electronic commerce under their own brand name," 27 . The ACPA amends the Lanham Act  43 to allow trademark owners stronger remedies against cybersquatting 28.

In conjunction  with stronger remedies, the ACPA was passed to remedy the shortcomings of  applying the Federal Trademark Dilution Act in cases "where the offenders  are often anonymous or difficult to find jurisdictional purposes"

Basically, a trademark owner only has to prove three things, (1) the domain name is a distinctive or famous mark entitled to protection, (2) the domain name is "identical or confusingly similar" to the trademark or service mark, and (3) the domain name holder registered the domain name with the bad faith intent to profit from the mark 34.

When examining whether a domain name is considered confusingly similar to  a particular trademark under the Anticybersquatting Consumer Protection Act,  courts typically ignore the top-level domain name, ".com", ".org", etc.  According to the court in Shields v. Zuccardini, domain names that are "confusingly similar" are those that are misspellings of distinctive or famous trademarks 38. The court goes on to state that this type of intentional registration of a misspelled distinctive or famous name, which causes a consumer who slightly misspells the trademark name to visit an unintended site, is within the scope of the ACPA 39. Some factors a court might examine when considering confusion are (1) the strength of the mark, (2) similarity of the mark, (3) similarity of the goods or services, and (4) the channels of marketing used 40.

Not all factors must be met in order to find bad faith. If the domain name holder believed and had reasonable grounds to believe that the use of  the domain name was a fair use or otherwise lawful, then the courts will not find bad faith intent 45.

Under this provision of the ACPA, a domain name holder who is aggrieved by an overreaching trademark owner may commence an action to declare the domain name registration or use by the registrant is not unlawful. In order to establish a claim under the reverse domain name hijacking provision of the ACPA, the domain name holder must establish (1) that it is a domain name registrant; (2) that its domain name was suspended, disabled, or transferred under a policy implemented by a registrar; (3) that the owner of the mark that prompted the domain name to be suspended, disabled, or transferred has notice of the action by service or otherwise; and (4) that the domain name holder's registration or use of the domain name is not unlawful under the ACPA 50.

Please feel free to provide feedback on any of the site contents, including the student papers posted on the site.  Feedback is previewed before being posted to this site, and may be edited for style and length.

Internet? "The Internet has become a valuable research tool; on-line services, such as Westlaw and Lexis, have increased productivity; faxes have decreased communication time; and electronic mail (e-mail) promises to enhance communication capabilities with clients, courts and other attorneys."[5] Computer technology holds the potential "for transforming the way business will be done in the twenty-first century."[6] The Internet "present[s] enormous promise for addressing the unmet legal needs of many Americans with lower incomes."[7] With this vast potential comes a "host of ethical issues" touching on areas of confidentiality, competency, conflicts of interest, and negligence.[8] Because issues involving legal professional responsibility are often complicated (even absent the Internet), a lawyer will look to his state's model rules to guide his decisions and to minimize potential harm to the client and to the lawyer's practice.

Part I discusses how the use of the Internet affects attorney-client confidentiality and other ethical issues. Part II discusses the relationship of the model rules' limitations on a lawyer's advertising to Internet advertisements. Finally, Part III discusses Internet communications in light of state prohibitions on the unauthorized practice of law.

One of the key elements required before a duty of confidentiality will be imposed is the existence of an attorney-client relationship. Legal advice may pass through the channels of Internet communication listed below. Part III of this Article addresses how and when, if at all, that relationship is forged through Internet communication.

Also like regular mail, transmitters send messages through third parties to reach intended recipients. The U.S. Post Office, FedEx, or UPS deliver paper-based mail to recipients. E-mail is delivered in one of two ways: (1) if the recipient is located within an internal network like a corporate network or within an ISP's network, the e-mail remains is delivered only within that network or (2) if the recipient is not located within an internal network (as a client would often not be located on the lawyer's network), then the e-mail travels through computers connected to the Internet to reach the recipient.[21] This Section focuses on e-mail delivered through third-party computers connected to the Internet.

"[L]awyers who lead their clients to believe that the lawyer will always promptly receive and act upon e-mail must ensure that they do so."[61] This prevents the situation where the client reasonably sends an urgent request to a lawyer who would be better reached through another means of communication.

Authenticity presents another potential issue with e-mail communication.[62] The client could receive a message that appears to be from their lawyer but is in reality from either someone who has gained access to the lawyer's computer or someone who has modified his message to appear as if it was from their lawyer.[63] In the first instance, the lawyer should take reasonable care to prevent unauthorized use on his computer: access to the computer should be protected by a password that would be difficult to guess and that is periodically changed. In addition, the lawyer should "lock down" his computer whenever he is not at his desk to prevent someone from accessing the open computer. In the second instance, which is more difficult to prevent, the lawyer could employ technology so that clients confirm the identity of the message's sender. An example of such technology is discussed at this site.

While e-mail is a popular form of Internet communication, it is not the only form. Other forms of Internet communication exist that are similar to e-mail in that the parties intend the contents of the communication to be private, while others provide a more public forum.

"If reasonable precautions are not taken to protect access to computers which can access the stored e-mail, then the information, even if safely transmitted over the Internet to the lawyer's mailbox, can be misused."[70] One of the most important steps a lawyer can take to prevent intrusions into the firm's servers is to install a firewall.

This Section discusses the ethical obligations that lawyers must abide by when advertising via the Internet. In particular, this Section discusses the ways in which the Model Rules have adapted to deal with the Internet and how they apply to forms of advertising such as Websites and attorney solicitation through the use of e-mail.

An argument could be made that these practices violate Model Rule 7.1, which specifically states that "[w]hatever means are used to make known a lawyer's services, statements about them must be truthful" and also states that "[a] truthful statement is also misleading if there is a substantial likelihood that it will lead a reasonable person to formulate a specific conclusion about the lawyer of the lawyer's services for which there is no reasonable factual foundation."[106] When Websites utilize these devices to give them priority placement, there is an argument to be made that they lead a reasonable person to think that a particular Website is the most visited. Currently, the Model Rules do not specifically address the ethical implications that using these devices have, instead, any alleged impropriety will be judged under the existing interpretations of Model Rule 7.1.

With the relative ease and low cost in which spam can be sent, it may be tempting for lawyers to solicit prospective clients through e-mail. It is therefore important to understand the ethical implications that may arise when lawyers use e-mail to solicit clients.

ISPs purchase a specific amount of bandwidth based on the projected usage by the ISPs user base. For smaller ISPs, the cost of acquiring bandwidth represents the greatest portion of their budget.[114] Without spam, greater consumption of bandwidth would normally mean an increased number of customers.[115] However, when a spammer consumes bandwidth, the ISP is forced to either 1) let the paying customers cope with slower Internet access, 2) pay for increasing bandwidth, thereby lowering profits, or 3) raise rates.[116] Either way, the costs are borne on the public, not the advertiser.

In addition to the consumption of bandwidth, the sheer volume of spam creates tremendous burdens on ISPs.[117] The volume of spam has undoubtedly contributed to the access, speed, and reliability problems associated with IPSs.[118] The great volumes of spam lead to the displacement of normal e-mail. In the late 1980s, marketers began flooding businesses that used fax machines with fax advertisements.[119] These ads contributed to normal business related faxes to be lost in the shuffle.

Ultimately, these uninvited faxes led to the Anti-Junk-Fax laws.[120] It can be argued through analogy that spam can and will overwhelm electronic mail boxes just as junk faxes overwhelmed businesses.

Finally, despite claims to the contrary, deleting spam is a time consuming process. In the business world, time equals money. If a company has 100 employees and each employee spends a mere 5 minutes a day sorting through and deleting spam, it would equate to over 8 hours a day. Those eight hours of otherwise productive work time are lost because of spam.

In Shapero, the Supreme Court distinguished targeted direct-mail solicitation from live, in-person solicitation.[151] In Court's view, advertising through the use of direct mail did not have the "coercive force of the personal presence of a trained advocate" and did not involve the "pressure on the potential client for an immediate yes-or-no answer to the offer of representation."[152] Therefore, as long as e-mail is regarded as "targeted-mail," it does not appear that the strict regulations found in Model Rule 7.3(a) will apply.

Model Rule 7.3 currently applies to the use of e-mail and state legislatures presently consider e-mail closer to written solicitation than the in-person or telephone type of solicitation. It can be argued that e-mail communications share characteristics with both types of solicitation.[153] E-mail is arguably more personal than traditional written material due to its proximity to real time transmissions.[154] On the other hand, e-mail is like written targeted mail in that it is easily dispensable like postal mail.[155] As most Internet users know, it doesn't take long to delete spam e-mail out of an inbox. Despite these conflicting characteristics, states' ethics committees and recent scholars indicate that e-mail more closely resembles direct mail solicitation than real-time in-person or telephone solicitation.

The face of the practice of law is changing, yet the inherent challenges faced by small general practitioners continue to exist. [160] Internet technology has given lawyers the opportunity to greatly expand his client base through practice over the Internet. However, the extent to which the law should permit a lawyer to use the Internet is a subject of much debate. This Section identifies the problems and questions involved in practicing law over the Internet and suggests possible solutions.

The fact specific question of "reasonable reliance" is even cloudier with sites such as LegalZoom offering to help users "[s]ave time and money on common legal matters!" The site further claims it was "[c]reated by top attorneys [to] helps you create reliable legal documents from your home or office." In order to claim no lawyer-client relationship exists because no user can reasonably rely that he has established a relationship for the receipt of legal advice, LegalZoom must argue that such offerings as that of "reliable legal documents" are false, thus creating potential fraudulent advertising claims. LegalZoom also prepares legal documents for users who "simply answer a few questions online." LegalZoom then prepares an answer within 48 hours and even "reviews" the answers and "guaranties" satisfaction. Like all guaranties, this statement invites reliance.

The ABA also makes clear that "any changes in the basis or rate of the fee" must be articulated to the client.[181] Websites such as freeadvice.com , LegalZoom.com, and Lawguru.com can have problems living up to these standards. Each of these sites offer a mixture of "free" services, with links to paid services. Where canned responses and responses to past questions are available, the "lawyer" Website's work requires no time and labor, in no way precludes other employment, and takes no time at all. It is difficult to determine a fee customarily charged for the service, because Internet legal service is such a new device and is in many ways different from the traditional practice of law.[182] Because these factors are so unclear, it becomes impossible to determine what constitutes a "reasonable fee" in cyberspace.

Internet in its Model Rules of Professional Conduct. Until it does, the practice will continue to lack concrete standards of conduct for lawyers, and make it more difficult for lawyers to use the Internet without risking dire consequences for actions they thought were appropriate.

The Authors of this Article also recommend Doug Isenberg's GigaLaw.com. Whether implementing a new technology to communicate with existing clients, venturing into cyberspace through a Web presence or through advertising, or acquiring new clients using the Internet, the lawyer should be careful in evaluating the costs and benefits of each approach and understanding the legal and ethical implications.[200] Though the Model Rules are arguably inadequate in addressing many ethical issues created by new technology, they at least provide a general framework for guiding a lawyer's decisions.

Jurisdictional issues raised by these new technologies remain unresolved, complicating the analysis of which ethical rules apply to lawyers on the Internet. [FN9] Counsel who fail to comply with the ethical rules of a jurisdiction risk being subject to disciplinary action, regardless of the location of counsel's physical office.

The rule does not make any special provision for a situation in which a lawyer admitted to practice in one jurisdiction engages in activities that have a "predominant effect" in other jurisdictions unless the lawyer is also licensed in the other jurisdiction. Therefore, it would appear that under the current Model Rules, a lawyer or law firm conducting business on the Internet can avoid disciplinary action so long as they act in accordance with the ethical rules of the states in which the firm's attorneys are admitted.

The Free Advice Forums are intended to enable consumers to benefit from the experience of other consumers who have faced similar legal issues. Free Advice does NOT vouch for or warrant the accuracy, completeness or usefulness of any posting or the qualifications of any person responding. Use of the Forums is subject to our Terms and Conditions which prohibit advertisements, solicitations or other commercial messages, or false, defamatory, abusive, vulgar, or harassing messages, and subject violators to a fee for each improper posting. All postings reflect the views of the author but become the property of Free Advice. Information on Free Advice or a Forum should not be relied upon and is not a substitute for advice from an attorney licensed in your jurisdiction who you have retained to represent you.

Lawguru.com is one such site, and its terms and acceptance page is available at http://www.lawguru.com/cgi/bbs/user/submit.cgi. Here again, the page might help avoid contract liability, but the fact that an Internet user clicks on an "I accept" icon might not indicate that the site has provided a clear rejection of the lawyer-client relationship.

As far as Internet related business methods such as Amazon's one-click patent, it doesn't appear that the rising costs of development come into play. Although Amazon's one-click patent was clearly novel, it may not necessarily be "innovative" and it clearly was not created though a costly research process. In fact, it could be argued that Amazon was simply the first to utilize an otherwise simple idea that was eventually going to be utilized by countless other companies.

In theory, the granting of patents causes the disclosure of useful inventions that will benefit society. However, the disclosure rationale does not hold much weight when it comes to many Internet business methods. Internet businesses are practiced in public, available to everyone. Therefore, offering patents as a means of getting Internet companies to disclose their business methods seems almost entirely unnecessary.

A final objection to business method patents, and Internet business patents in particular, is that the USPTO has neither the administrative experience nor the prior art base to efficiently evaluate and patent applications for business methods.

Whether or not business methods should be subject to patent protection is an issue that will never be agree upon. However, despite the increasing amount of criticism, the fact remains that business methods are clearly subject to patent protection. If Section 101 can't keep business methods from being patented, it will be up to other patentability requirements to do the job.

The second economic justification for the nonobviousness doctrine is that "granting patents to obvious developments may compromise the incentives that the patent system provides to develop nonobvious inventions."  [83]  For example, a patent on an obvious invention may diminish the royalties paid to the holders of earlier, non-obvious patents.  [84]  A third economic justification is "that granting obvious patents may create a proliferation of economically insignificant patents that are expensive to search and to license."

The bottom line is that an argument can always be made that an invention is too simple or obvious. In fact, most patents are not for ground-breaking new discoveries, but small advancements to prior art. With the recent publicity caused by Amazon's one-click patent, only time will tell how the USPTO, the courts, and Congress will adapt the nonobviousness doctrine of Section 103 to meet the unique characteristics of Internet related business methods.

Rogan expressed a desire to move away from the status quo and the backlogs which plagued the system and were "hurting technology" and hurting the economy.  [99]  Rogan noted that while the patent office was approving 65 to 70% of business method patents, the office is (as of policies implemented in 2002) approving only 30 to 35% of business method patents.  [100]  While the problems in the office are greater than just business method patents (the office "has granted patents for side-to-side swinging on a swing set and for making a peanut butter and jelly sandwich without a crust"),  [101] the changes mentioned above have in fact tightened scrutiny on business method patents.

Under the shopping cart model, "a purchaser using a client computer system (such as a personal computer executing a web browser program) could select an item from an electronic catalog, typically by clicking on an 'Add to Shopping Cart' icon, thereby placing the item in the 'virtual' shopping cart."

"Finally, the purchaser would 'click' on a button displayed on the screen or somehow issue a command to execute the completed order, and the server computer system would verify and store the information concerning the transaction."

Amazon.com was entitled to a presumption of irreparable harm in connection with its request for a preliminary injunction and the company actually suffered irreparable injury; (5) the balance of hardships weighed in favor of Amazon.com, further supporting the issuance of a preliminary injunction; and (6) the public interest would be served by such an injunction."

This litigation leaves an undisclosed settlement, a call for reform, and a continuing call for a boycott. All the while, Amazon retains an enforceable patent, though it is admittedly selectively enforcing it. To provide this convenient purchase mechanism online, competitors must obtain a license from Amazon to avoid the potential for litigation (and some have: see this statement from Apple).

In 2000, ad marketer DoubleClick filed suit against rival L90 for alleged infringement of DoubleClick's patent "related to a technology for the delivery of Internet advertising by a third-party ad server to a network of Web sites or to individual sites."  [171]  L90 filed a countersuit, claiming that DoubleClick "used 'fraudulent procurement and unlawful assertion' to receive" its patent.

Although the flood of business methods being patented has subsided significantly over the past year, the controversy surrounding whether such patents should be eligible for patent protection at all will continue. As the amount of prior art grows and the USPTO becomes more efficient in filtering out obvious business methods, controversies such as the one surrounding Amazon's one-click patent will become less likely to occur. However, the reality is that groups of people will always be opposed to patents on business methods. On the other hand, there will always be supporters of business method protection, including those who continue to think that Amazon's one-click patent is deserving of protection. In years to come, the question that will remain is not whether business methods deserve patents, but how we dictate which ones are in fact worthy of patent protection. Hopefully, a middle ground can be reached.

Though this statistic is wholly unscientific, the organizers of a discussion on this topic (two of which are the authors of this Article) posed the question to the participants of whether the one-click patent was obvious and thus invalid. Seven responded that the patent was obvious and five responded that it was patentable, relying primarily on the view that the process was probably not obvious in 1997. The discussion was not published.

There is also a similar Internet business method that the courts did not discuss: cookies. See commentary at http://www.gnu.org/philosophy/amazonpatent.html . For more information on cookies, see here .

At best, the significantly different interpretations of the district and appellate courts in this case indicate how legal evaluations of the obviousness of computer updates can vary widely and how uncertain and potentially misleading predictions about these evaluations can mislead patent holders and potential infringers. At worst, the narrowly focused and divergent assessments of these courts may reflect hidden and varying criteria for evaluating invention obviousness, criteria which may depart materially from the Supreme Court's direction that determinations of invention obviousness should turn on the meaning and implications that designers with common skills would draw from prior art when conducting routine design analyses in the same or analogous design fields.

Commission derives its powers from Congress through legislation. It not only is given the ability to create regulations for business practices but also the ability to adjudicate issues arising under those rules.

The decree is then posted for public comment for sixty (60) days. After that period the Commission decides whether to make the agreement final, giving it the force of law and subjecting any violations to a monetary penalty, according to Commission Rules.

For each violation of the final order, the Commission can enforce a civil penalty of up to $11,000. Under section 45(m)(1)(B), the Commission can also impose a fine on any party that violates the final cease and desist order if it can show that they have actual knowledge or knowledge fairly implied . . . that such act is unfair or deceptive." According to the FTC Office of General Counsel, to prove that a company had actual knowledge the Commission would have to show that it had provided the violator with either a copy of the final disposition of the issue or a synopsis of that disposition.

Both cases ended in settlements, and were only made public after the consent order had been worked out among the parties. The cloaked manner of these proceedings anger many consumer advocates who argue that people have a right to know when their privacy has been violated or is in danger of being violated. Companies and government officials often rebut that argument saying that without confidential channels between companies and regulators, the companies might never report breaches or lapses of their information security for fear that they will be victimized before they can make repairs. Although the final consent agreement is not made public until the matter has been resolved, the process may be uniquely helpful in getting other companies to realize their need for looking at their promises about privacy and work to create better security. The shocking facts in these cases shed more light on the debate of whether the public right to know outweighs the corporations right to protect its vulnerabilities.

Lilly, a major pharmaceutical manufacturer produces the anti-depressant drug Prozac and runs its website, www.prozac.com (promoted as "Your Guide to Evaluating and Recovering from Depression") as well as its own site, www.lilly.com. Both websites collect personal information from visitors. From March 15, 2000 until June 22, 2001, Lilly offered to consumers the "Medi-messenger" e-mail reminder service. Customers who used Medi-messenger could design and receive personal e-mail messages to remind them to take or refill their medication. Once a consumer registered for Medi-messenger, the reminder messages were automatically e-mailed from Lilly to the subscriber at the e-mail address she or he had provided, and according to the subscriber's requested schedule. These reminders were individualized e-mails and did not identify any other subscribers to the service.

June 27, 2001, a Lilly employee created a new computer program to access Medi-messenger subscribers' e-mail addresses and sent them an e-mail message announcing the termination of the Medi-messenger service. The June 27th e-mail message included all of the recipients' e-mail addresses within the "To:" line of the message, thereby unintentionally disclosing to each individual subscriber the e-mail addresses of all 669 Medi-messenger subscribers.

According to the FTC's complaint, Lilly claimed that it employs measures and takes steps appropriate under the circumstances to maintain and protect the privacy and confidentiality of personal information obtained from or about consumers through its Prozac.com and Lilly.com Web sites. For example, Lilly's privacy policies included statements such as, "Eli Lilly and Company respects the privacy of visitors to its Web sites, and we feel it is important to maintain our guests' privacy as they take advantage of this resource."

FTC complaint alleges that Lilly's claim of privacy and confidentiality was deceptive because Lilly failed to maintain or implement internal measures appropriate under the circumstances to protect sensitive consumer information, which led to the company's unintentional June 27th disclosure of Medi-messenger subscribers' personal information. In fact, according to the complaint, Lilly failed to: provide appropriate training for its employees regarding consumer privacy and information security; provide appropriate oversight and assistance for the employee who sent out the e-mail, who had no prior experience in creating, testing, or implementing the computer program used; and implement appropriate checks and controls on the process, such as reviewing the computer program with experienced personnel and testing the program internally before sending out the e-mail.

Commission initiated its investigation of the Passport services following a July 2001 complaint from a coalition of consumer groups led by the Electronic Privacy Information Center (EPIC). The Microsoft Corporation agreed to settle Federal Trade Commission charges regarding the privacy and security of personal information collected from consumers through its "Passport" web services. As part of the settlement, Microsoft will implement a comprehensive information security program for Passport and similar services.

The proposed consent order prohibits any misrepresentation of information practices in connection with Passport and other similar services. It also requires Microsoft to implement and maintain a comprehensive information security program. In addition, Microsoft must have its security program certified as meeting or exceeding the standards in the consent order by an independent professional every two years.

It remains to be seen whether there will be enough enforcement power behind CAN SPAM to act as a disincentive to spammers or if the CAN-SPAM action to legalize non-fraudulent spam, allowing every business in the United States to send an unspecified amount of unsolicited e-mail repeatedly, until the recipient asks to be removed could create a new spam movement among small businesses. It's also unclear what effect any U.S. law might have on spam routed internationally, something that Congress did not seem to recognize prior to passing this bill.

Federal Trade Commission is shaping the manner in which the Internet is used by focusing on its two most important missions (1) enforcing U.S. antitrust laws (competition laws) and taking action to end anti-competitive behavior and (2) as the principle consumer protection agency, going after unfair deceptive trading practices so that people can feel safe to participate in the market.

In the time that has passed since September 11, 2001 we have seen our way of life change in many ways. On September 11, 2001, we saw the sense of security that we once took for granted destroyed before our own eyes. Americans were taken by surprise by the terrorist attacks on September 11, 2001 and in some way, everyone saw that day as a wake up call. We wanted to feel secure again.

We felt more vulnerable than perhaps we have ever felt. In response to these feelings, our leaders declared a War on Terrorism and they enacted legislation with names like the USA PATRIOT Act so that we would feel like something was being done. We felt as if our American way of life had been threatened.

Our leaders told us that the way to get back what the terrorists tried to take from us was to tighten current security and to enact new measures that would help in the fight against terrorism. Naturally we wanted to protect America, but protecting our American way of life goes far beyond protecting the lives of Americans. We must not forget that it is equally, if not more important, to protect all of that which makes America a great nation. After all, the terrorists hated and wanted to destroy more than just our lives. They wanted to rob us of the freedoms and liberties that we enjoy as Americans. It seems that laws such as the USA PATRIOT Act focus solely of the goal of protecting American lives at the expense of protecting our civil liberties and the freedoms that set America apart as a nation. There are also serious doubts as to whether the USAPA accomplishes the narrow goals that it is designed achieve. But even if we assume that the measures enacted by the USAPA actually do aid the government in the fight against terrorism, we still must question whether the price we are paying for this protection is too high. The War on Terrorism will be an eternal battle because there will always be terrorists. We will never enjoy a total sense of security because American lives will be lost in the future at the hands of terrorists. We will never be able to declare an absolute victory and say that we beat them. However, if we refuse to sacrifice the freedoms we enjoy as Americans, no one will ever be able to say that the terrorists beat us.

Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof; or abridging the freedom of speech, or of the press; or the right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition the Government for a redress of grievances.

The right of the people to be secure in their persons, houses, papers, and effect, against unreasonable searches and seizures, shall not be violated, and no Warrants shall issue, but upon probable cause, supported by Oath or affirmation, and particularly describing the place to be searched, and the persons or things to be seized.

This provision also allows the reasonable period of time to be extended for good cause shown to a court for any wire communication or electronic communication or tangible property. [FN 19] d. Section 215 and 505 expand the governments power to obtain personal records without the traditional checks and balances surrounding search warrants and subpoenas.[FN 20] Section 215 allows the FBI to demand business records, such as Internet use patterns and gun purchases, with an order from the Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Court, even if a subject is not a suspected terrorist. [FN 21] This provision has been called by critics a rubber stamp. [FN 22] The Department of Justice claims that Section 215 has not been used to obtain business records.

Mark Loveless is the founder of Nomad Mobile Research Center, which is a hacker lab that provides individuals with a way to anonymously discuss and share information about computer-security issues without fear of personal retribution from others.[FN 72] The hacker lab is set up to protect hackers from legal action brought by software vendors or government agencies.

Not only does the PATRIOT Act present opportunities for abuse, it also may mandate that the act be used in ways that are unconstitutional. The Justice Departments Goodling said that law enforcers have a responsibility to use laws that Congress provides to fight crimes, Americans expect us to use every tool available to do our jobs in enforcing the law. [FN 77] Thus, if the PATRIOT Act granted any powers that are unconstitutional, law enforcers still have a responsibility to use the law.

But the most dangerous effect of this change is that it may scare individuals away who would normally protest. The troubling effect is that our right to free speech is stifled. If we are granted freedom of speech but that freedom may be exercised only under the risk of a serious criminal penalty, then there is no freedom at all. The FBI is routinely monitoring civic groups it believes might commit acts of violence or terrorism in the hope of furthering political goals.[FN 92] An FBI spokesman described the interest of the organization in the activities of civic groups, our interest is in individuals, or groups, or terrorist groups that would either be committing acts of violence or criminal activity in support of their particular causeour interest is in developing intelligence about criminal or violent activity that could have an effect on individuals who might be protesting legally.

Act expansion was the only controversial part of this legislation, and it prompted more than a third of the House, including 15 conservative Republicans, to change what is normally a cakewalk vote into something truly contested, said Timothy Edgar, ACLU Legislative Counsel. [FN 126] ACLU Legislative director Laura Murphy defends the organizations concerns by stating that historically, when the government has had these powers, it has abused them.

Solicitor General Wayne Easter defended the actions of the government by appealing to Americans fear of terrorism and asserting that national security is fundamental to a working economy.[FN 149] Arar now seeks acknowledgement that U.S. officials violated international law and his constitutional rights. [FN 150] He also wishes to make sure than no one else will be rendered to a foreign government for interrogation and torture. [FN 151] Gore Vidal believes that the USAPA is just as despotic as anything Hitler came up with and even used much of the same language (for example, rights will only be suspended for a brief time was precisely the language used by Hitler after the Reichstag fire).

These concerns take for granted that the PATRIOT Act actually does aid in the fight against terrorism. There is no proof that the act would have prevented the attacks on September 11, and there is no proof that the advances we have made since that time would prevent another attack of the same proportion.

Assuming constitutional theory has some value in interpretation, there are several questions that such theories should address. These include questions about the legitimacy of imposing a given theory to declare acts of other branches of government unconstitutional.4 In addition, a theory must address its application by courts in the past 5, and how it will address new constitutional questions in the future.6 Application of the Constitution and constitutional theory to issues raised by the internet is a question that should be of considerable importance into the future, given the increasing number of Americans venturing into cyberspace.

As illustrated by his endorsement of the Brandeis dissent in Olmstead, Professor Lessig believes that a translated constitution has been successful, when applied, in meeting technological advances brought on by changing times.27 However, Lessig finds that the internet is a different sort of technology, and, as currently developed, translation cannot provide an acceptable method for applying the Constitution to the internet.

Clearly, the adoption of the Fourth Amendment was at least in part a reaction to general searches. 32 The worm hypothetical presents a general search because it examines hard drives on computers absent any suspicion that the particular computer contains the contraband sought. Thus, the values of the framing generation can be said to support an argument that such a search violates the Fourth Amendment.

On the other hand, no harm is done to the disk, and the worm erases itself if no contraband is found. The search produces no false positives. Therefore, essentially all that the search at issue here has in common with a general search is that it is widespread and suspicion less. It has little effect on anyone, save those who are in possession of contraband.

Whether a "worm" search would survive Fourth Amendment scrutiny is unclear. Those who believe the Fourth Amendment exists to protect against the collateral burdens of suspicion less searches would find the worm acceptable; those who see the Fourth Amendment as limiting the powers of the government would probably find the law unconstitutional.34 The problem, according to Lessig, is the lack of evidence as to which of these principles the Fourth Amendment actually favors. This is an important question because, as writers of code, we can design searches to remove collateral consequences. This can create a new code search which is more invasive and widespread, and which also reduces the time burdens imposed by such a search.

Little if any scholarship has attempted to take issue with Lessig's view of the Constitution and the role of judges in cyberspace particularly. However, it is possible to make several observations from the scholarly comment on translation generally, which apply in the internet context as well. First, to the extent that translation fails to explain non-originalist decisions made by the Supreme Court, the prediction that the court will abstain from deciding internet related constitutional questions seems to lose some force. If judges have in fact justified decisions on non-originalist grounds in other contexts, it is more difficult to argue that they will not simply do so again in the internet context. Second, Lessig's argument that the court's non-political view of itself will prevent it from translating founding values in the face of democratic majorities, and when the translation appears to be political can also be challenged as not always accurately descriptive. Even the most praised constitutional opinions are criticized by at least some as being political.45 If the court has "translated" in these types of cases, it is quite possible that they will do so in the context of the internet as well.

Little has been written on the relationship between existing constitutional theories and how they will be able to incorporate or fail to incorporate cyberspace and technological change into the analysis. The work of Professor Lessig is an important exception to that general lack of scholarship. In applying his translation approach to constitutional interpretation to the issues raised by cyberspace, Lessig challenges constitutional scholars to look forward as well as backward when approaching constitutional theory. Though scholars have challenged some of the assertions of this theory, and raised questions about the necessity and purpose of the translation approach, Lessig has done a service by providing at least one framework from which to view constitutional questions in cyberspace. As our lives increasingly shift toward the cyberworld, it can be expected that other constitutional scholars will follow Lessig in exploring the relationship between the constitution and cyberspace.

It claims that the purpose was frustrated and the rights granted to it were rendered utterly worthless by the advent of file-sharing services such as Napster, which made recordings of the live performances they contracted for available on the internet free of charge.

People often surf the net to find out information about their favorite television shows, movies, actors, actresses, and musical acts. Sometimes surfers use sites licensed to disseminate information about a particular person or show like People, TV Guide or E!online. There are even many shows and movies that have their own in depth website offering all the most current information about the show or singer like Buffy, the Vampire Slayer, Clay Aiken, Kelly Clarkson and others.

But then, there are those sites that are like guilty pleasures. The sites that an individual can go to in order to find out all the scoop that other sites will not print. Or maybe there is a fan site that does an extraordinary job of compiling all the information available on a particular person or show. When it is the individual fan site, there is always information of when and where did they get their information. Is it original content, or is it a reproduction of something that they found somewhere else and transcribed or scanned and than uploaded onto their fan site? Many of these fan sites face copyright issues in the majority of their content and are a copyright infringement suit waiting to happen.

Part I will discuss the history of copyright from early England to present day America. Part II will discuss the six exclusive rights afforded to copyright owners including the right to reproduce, the right to distribute, the right to make derivative works, the right to perform publicly, the right to display publicly and the right to perform sound recordings via digital audio transmission. Part III will discuss defenses to infringement including the statute of limitations and estoppel, abandonment, innocent infringement and fair use. Part IV will discuss the areas of infringement currently engaged in by fan site operators with their use of text, photographs, audio, video and fan fiction. Part V will address who is being infringed, and Part VI will talk about their responses to date. Finally Part VII will conclude the paper with a discussion as to where we are presently and what the future looks like.

The fourth exclusive right given to copyright holders is the right to publicly perform the copyrighted work.[30] A performance is defined as meaning to "recite render, play, dance, or act it, either directly or by means of any device or process or, in the case of a motion picture or other audiovisual work, to show its images in any sequence or to make the sounds accompanying it audible."[31] This right only applies to works that are made public. There is no restriction from performance within the confines of your own home, including members of your family or small circle of friends. The Court has found that renting out a room with a VCR and multiple seats for a "private" viewing is actually an infringement on the public performance right.[32] Public performances also include a transmission, either in person or by the use of a device, to a substantial group of people outside of the normal circle of friends and family. Additionally, there are rights in the actual performances of live music that are statutorily protected.[33] There are anti-bootlegging provisions preventing unauthorized broadcasts or fixation of the performance, and provisions preventing the reproduction and distribution of unauthorized fixations. There are exceptions to the public performance right including non-profit performances where the money is going to a charitable use, educational use, distance learning over the Internet, and others.[34] The public performance right does not cover the area of sound recordings, which are addressed in the right to perform via digital audio transmission.

The fifth exclusive right is the right to publicly display a copy of the work, using a film, slide, television image or any other device or process. This right applies to literary, musical, dramatic, and choreographic works, motion pictures and other audiovisual works.[35] Owners of lawfully purchased copyrighted works may utilize either a direct or indirect display of no more than one image at a time and the viewer has to be present in the same location as the copy.[36] This limitation works similar to the first sale doctrine for the right of distribution. The right to publicly display copyrighted works does not apply to sound recordings.

The first consideration, the purpose and character of the use, focuses a great deal on the commercial nature of the infringing work. It is not fair use for a photocopying store to make casebooks from copyrighted materials without paying licensing fees, even where the same action of making copies of each part would be fair use if done by the teacher.[52] If the nature of the entity committing the infringement is commercial, there may be no fair use defense, even where the reason for the infringement is scholarship or research.[53] However videotaping is considered a fair use, because the purpose is time shifting so that the item may be viewed at a later time.[54] However, at that time, there was no archiving of videotapes expected like there is today. There was also not the consideration of the types of technology that are present in our society. In the present, there are machines and software to transfer videotapes to the computer, and the newest technology includes Tivo and digital video recorders, which will save your programs to DVD. There have been no cases that have further addressed this particular issue.

The third consideration in a fair use analysis is the amount and substantiality of the portion used in relation to the copyrighted work as a whole. Over time the analysis has moved from one of the quantitative aspects of infringement to the qualitative aspects. Where the infringing portion of the work goes to the heart of the matter of the original work, fair use will not be found.[56] In Harper and Roe, the defendant had obtained a pilfered manuscript of Gerald Ford's biography. Prior to the plaintiff's publication, the defendant used that work in his or her own work. The Court felt that although only 300 words were used out of a body of work constituting more than 220,000, the defendant chose the most important part of the work to include in his own. Even though it was not quantitatively substantial it was qualitatively substantial.

The final consideration in a fair use analysis, the effect of the use upon the potential market for or value of the copyrighted work, is the one that the courts have put the most focus on. The fact that the plaintiff has not entered a particular market does not preclude them for bringing an infringement claim.[57] In Castle Rock, the defendant made a trivia game based on the characters of the television Seinfeld. The defendants argued that the material contained in the trivia was precluded from copyright protection because it was derived from the facts of the show. The court held that elements of a fictional show are never facts; therefore they do qualify for copyright protection. Additionally, whether or not the plaintiffs had exploited a potential market is irrelevant to the determination of whether the infringing work could harm that potential market. The courts have also determined that infringement may deny the copyright owner of monies that they may have received had the infringement not occurred.[58] In the Church of God case, the court found that the reprinting of religious materials denied the original congregation of weekly donations they might receive for the lawful use of the materials. The court felt that the second congregation not only utilized infringing documents, but that their use also hurt the plaintiff's potential market because it encouraged members to go to the second congregation to worship.

There are several areas of possible infringement on a fan website. There are also several different types of fan websites. There are websites devoted to a show or movie. These are the websites that have received the most attention in the courts to this time. Twentieth Century Fox has been persistent is quashing sites affiliated with their copyrighted works. In the late 90s, the studio began sending cease and desist letters to many webmasters demanding that they remove infringing material from their websites.[59] Fans of shows like The X-Files,[60] Buffy, the Vampire Slayer,[61] and Angel[62] often set up personal websites devoted to every element of the show.

The first area of copyright infringement is in the textual offerings of the fan website.  There are both infringing and original contributions on a fan website. Some websites may reproduce full copies of the episode/movie for individual web surfers to view.[68] Others may merely provide episode recaps. In addition, there are several websites on the Internet, which provide spoilers to upcoming episodes of television shows.[69] Within many fan sites, there will be a news section providing information about the show or its stars. There is also the possibility of infringement where the site reproduces news articles by either transcription of the article or by scanning the article and placing it wholesale on the Internet. The scanning of articles into a computer and then their publication on the Internet is blatant infringement because the reproduction is identical in every respect. There is no fair use application for this because it is a total replication both quantitatively and qualitatively.[70] There are sites that avoid this type of infringement. Several sites merely link to the online location where the article may be found.[71] Therefore, the Webmaster avoids a suit for infringement, and the news may be dispersed to a particularized audience. There is also a possibility for infringement when the website reproduces and distributes the song lyrics or sheet music to a particular musical composition.

The DMCA has provisions that make it illegal to remove "copyright management information." This is the information about where the picture comes from and who owns the copyright. The Copyright Act states that no person shall provide copyright management information that is false or distribute information that is false. Additionally, no person shall intentionally remove or alter any copyright management information or distribute the copyrighted work without that information or with altered copyright management information.[75] There are many fan sites that take copyrighted photographs, remove the copyright management information and then put the domain name of their fan site on the print as a signifier of where the photograph came from. In the process they are wiping out all the information about who the legal copyright owner is. Removing this information makes it much easier to reproduce the photograph into infinity without any actual idea about where it came from. There is also less likelihood that the web surfers perpetuating the infringement by making numerous reproductions would even be aware that they are committing an illegal act of copyright infringement and that they could be held liable.

Many websites offer varying types of audio files. There are interviews with celebrities that they have gotten from other sources. Some fan sites offer sound clips from episodes or movies that are popular to viewers and web surfers. There are also sites that offer the songs that either appear on the show or movie or are sung by the celebrity.

A significant number of website have video offerings. Just like the audio offerings, there are several different types of video. Some sites offer scenes from the television episode.[78] Willow's Alley offers clips over every scene that the character of Willow Rosenberg (Buffy, the Vampire Slayer) appears. Since Willow is a principal character in the show, there are multiple video clips for each show. Infringement is possible because when viewed together, the clips may divulge a substantial amount of the show both qualitatively and quantitatively.[79] Another area of infringement is the inclusion of interview clips from various sources. Usually airing in other television programs, these clips provide information about the celebrity or the projects that they are working on. Although summarizing the content of the clips may not be infringement, it is possible that making the clip available could constitute infringement if directly posted on a fan site rather than the site of the copyright owner. Additionally, there are several sites where fans make their own home produced videos. These may either be their versions of the trailers of movies or music videos using popular songs and clips from their favorite episodes.[80] Courts have held that personally made film clips and trailers placed on the Internet infringe.[81] One reason is the possibility that the information conveyed is not in the same light as the copyright owner may wish to show. Other reasons are that the content of the trailer might not be the same as information that the studio would want released. There are also questions of length. The studio may only release a thirty second trailer, while a private individual may make one five minutes or longer if they wished. There is also the possibility that if the trailer is not very good, the people viewing it on the Internet may mistakenly believe that it was licensed and supported by the studio.

Many webmasters include disclaimers about the use of copyrighted material on their fan fiction site. Whether or not there is a disclaimer on their site does not lessen the fact that their reproduction is an unauthorized use if the copyright holder does not license it. Meridith McCardle addresses the fact that many fan fiction sites also use disclaimers that state that the story is fan fiction, it is taken from X show, the characters are merely borrowed rather than taken, and that the fan fiction is for fun rather than for profit.[85]  McCardle goes on to state that many of these authors of unauthorized derivative work are under the impression that their work will not infringe, and if it does would be covered by the fair use defense because they are not posting the story for a profit. However, it should be recognized that noncommercial use is still infringement and will not protect a defendant from liability.[86] But the use of a disclaimer may make it more likely that a court would reach a fair use finding.

Cease-and-desist letters are generally not well received by the Internet public. Cecilia Ogbu discusses the blackouts and protests that many fan site operators have tried to get organized. In addition, many webmasters have given out the information of the studio and the address so that angry web surfers may fire off an angry letter or e-mail.[92] But studios are worried about their properties. In the case of Fox, they didn't want their failure to act to preclude them from future actions for infringement. Also the studio is responsible to other parties for licensing agreements and pay-per-use provisions.[93] Not removing the infringing use may impede the studio's lawful use.

The other response is no response. Many infringed parties either don't know the extent of the infringement, or don't care about the infringement. They may see the infringement as increased exposure to their work that may even result in higher profits for the copyrighted work. Meridith McCardle also addresses the point that the work often does not have an effect on the market to which the copyright owner has a right.[94] However, that is not often a factor in the fair use analysis because the focus is on the ephemeral potential market. There have not been any major cases dealing with fan sites and copyright infringement to this date. This is still a new area of law and computer technology, but shows promise to make it to the courts in the next few years as people push the infringement boundaries.

So, now we know that there is online infringement. The question is where is it going to go from here? Cease-and-desist letters seem to be the prevalent method of control so far. Many fan site operators are teenagers and young adults who cannot afford the legal costs associated with a protracted legal battle. When they are sent a cease-and-desist letter, many shut down their fan site or remove the infringing material. As of yet there has been no David to fight the Goliath of the entertainment industry.

There is the question of whether personal fan sites are fair use. Many of the fan sites are of a noncommercial nature. The Webmaster runs the site because they like a particular show, movie or celebrity rather than as a brilliant money making scheme. Many of the operators also pay a sliding scale monthly web fee based on the amount of traffic that their site is getting. But the real issue here is the proliferation of material on the Internet. If an individual site provides unauthorized and infringing content, that material has the possibility to reach the majority of the world population. The issue becomes one of control - what the fan site puts out there versus what the copyright owner wants out there.

In the future, there is a great possibility that one of these cases may actually make it to court. At that point, the Internet as it is today could change remarkably if it is found that personal fan sites containing infringing material are not covered by fair use. Because everyone knows that the best information does not come from the official site.

This paper explains how con artists fraudulently portray themselves as known, legal corporations to gain the trust of, and sometimes take advantage of, Internet users.  The nefarious hacker may defame the corporation, the first victim, by posting information to seemingly authentic websites.  Perpetrators then often steal usernames, passwords, credit card information, social security numbers, and other personally identifying information -- committing identity fraud -- against their second victims, Internet users.

This paper also describes how corporations and their legal counsel can fight back against these criminals and protect their corporate identity.  Several Congressional Acts have been enacted to prevent fraud on the Internet.  The Federal Trade Commission (FTC)1 and Federal Bureau of Investigations (FBI)2 actively hunt down and prosecute these con artists.  Corporations also have civil remedies available against Internet identity thieves using statutes including the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act3, the Lanham Act4.  Understanding these civil actions and knowing about available criminal actions will make corporate counsel more ready to target the phishers.

While personal identity fraud may receive much of the press5, corporate identity fraud can be much more destructive when figuring the amount of money at risk.  Marketing effectiveness, press coverage, and public perceptions are all affected by identity fraud schemes.  Corporations can mitigate these damages by protecting themselves and aggressively reacting to their identities being hijacked.

The word "spoof", which means "to deceive"1, is derived from a game of trickery2, invented by a British comedian, Arthur Roberts.3 For the purposes of this paper, spoofing refers to intentionally deceiving an Internet user into believing the website or e-mail he/she is viewing is authentic as to its apparent origin, when in reality it was developed and/or communicated by another entity.

Websites can also be spoofed to make the site appear to come from a trusted source, when it was actually generated by another disguised host.  Often the content of websites can be easily copied with the source code and images on websites available for downloading at the click of a mouse.  Unlike e-mail messages, the website address' domain name will disclose the true source of the page and cannot be easily altered.  However, reports of a bug in Internet Explorer versions 5 and 6 for Windows have surfaced that allows falsifying of even the domain name of a viewed website because of an input validation error.12  Even without this bug, the rich HTML content available on webpages allows for robust forgery of legitimate websites.

Spoofing can also describe the falsifying of an IP address.13  While this certainly represents a challenge in investigating computer hacking activity, its scope is beyond this paper's primary issue of describing corporate identity fraud in the forms of spoofing and phishing.

To compare the terms another way, all phishing must practically entail some amount of spoofing to fool the user into believing they are viewing an authentic e-mail or website.  However, not all spoofing is done for the purposes of phishing.

Whether Amazon.com's actions will effectively stop spoofing of their identity remains to be known.  It does seem this aggressive stance against e-mail fraud would deter many would-be spoofers.  There are still plenty of other famous corporate identities to spoof.  Of Amazon.com's defendants, Rockin' Time Holdings had been previously sued by Microsoft in June 200314 for e-mail trademark infringement15, and Edward Davidson had been previously sued by America Online in 1998 related to adult-oriented spam16.

"Dear PayPal User, Today we had some trouble with one of our computer systems. While the trouble appears to be minor, we are not taking any chances. We decided to take the troubled system off-line and replace it with a new system. Unfortunately this caused us to lose some member data. Please follow the link below and log into your account to make sure your information is not affected. Account balances have not been affected."

Recently we have received an order made by using your personal credit card information. This order was made online at our official BestBuy (sic) Web site on 06/17/2003. Our Fraud Department has some suspicions regarding this order and we need you to visit a special Fraud Department page at our web store where you can confirm or decline this transaction by providing us with the correct information."

As the world's largest bank59 Citigroup's Citibank makes a prominent target for corporate identity fraud.  Like the other phishing examples, the con artist sent out an e-mail preying on the topic of privacy and financial institutions that's caused a bit of confusion among the general public.60  This e-mail message asked the user to consent to new Terms and Conditions for their Citibank checking account.61 With all the notification announcements sent by financial institutions, this request would not seem unusual.

Citibank has placed copies of many examples of spoofed e-mails on a UK website64 to notify the public of phishing attempts using the Citibank identity.  To view more examples of phishing, this is a valuable resource.

Many other financial institutions have had their identities fraudulently used in furtherance of phishing schemes.  These scams do not merely affect United States banks -- HSBC of Hong Kong and Barclays of the United Kingdom are prominent international banks who have been targeted65.  While any company that handles personal information over the Internet may be a victim, Internet users expect a higher level of trust from grant banks and financial institutions.  For these companies to maintain this trust with the public, however, they will have to combat the hijacking of their identities by online con artists.

Once of the fastest methods to get illegitimate e-mail distributed is by propagation through a virus or worm.  Spoofed e-mail for phishing has been distributed using two infamous e-mail viruses.  As of December 2003, neither of these virus' authors had been prosecuted.  Virus phishing creators can face unique charges in court including knowingly spreading a computer virus with the intent to cause damage in addition to other fraud-related charges.66   Additionally, if caught, the authors of these viruses could also face charges associated with phishing.

Swen's damage to Microsoft may be more substantial.  Microsoft had to post information about valid system updates to prevent infection, alerts about differentiating spoofed e-mails from authentic e-mails70 and defend itself against claims of Microsoft Windows' susceptibility to virus infections.71  Above all this, is the lost trust between Microsoft and it's software customers who rightly or wrongly associate its software update procedures with this fraudulent e-mail message.  As with any identity theft case, the victim must work to affirmatively separate themselves from the perpetrator.

Notice the use of Microsoft name, colors, and fonts.  However, closer inspection reveals a lack of Registered Trademark notification on "Microsoft" and an awkward opening to the letter.  For novice users, or even experienced users not looking for clues, this spoof could pass as authentic.

For large corporations, Lanham Act trademark violations may be the best weapon against spoofers and hackers.  By their very nature, spoofed e-mails and websites will contain unauthorized reproductions of the target company's trademarks.  As in the aforementioned cases of e-mail spoofing against Amazon.com, the trademark may even be used as part of the fraudulent return address.

The victim company will usually have standing to sue the spoofer or phisher based on trademark infringement.  If the spoofed e-mail or website improperly used "any reproduction, counterfeit, copy, or colorable imitation of a registered mark in connection with the sale, offering for sale, distribution, or advertising of any goods or services" then the corporation who's identity was appropriated will have a claim for trademark infringement.17 In cases such as spoofing or phishing, where the conduct harmed the trademark owner, showing unauthorized infringement would be relatively easy for the targeted company.

The civil action for false designation of origin (15 USCA 1125(a))18 goes after exactly what the phisher is attempting when appropriating a company's trademark.  To show standing, the company only must show the misuse of their trademark "is likely to cause confusion, or to cause mistake, or to deceive as to the affiliation, connection, or association..." with their own goods or services.19  Only having to show likelihood of confusion allows companies to aggressively pursue all fraudulent uses of their trademarks upon discovery, not just after actual complaints or phished users.

Some courts require that competitive injury has occurred to bypass showing actual damages for either monetary relief or any relief.20  However, in cases of phishing, the phisher is acting in direct opposition to the goals of developing the public trust through the corporation's trademarks, so competitive injury should be an easy element to prove.

Congress passed the Anticybersquatting Consumer Protection Act (ACPA) in 1999 mainly to protect against domain name squatting.  The statute in 15 USC 1125(d)(1)(A)(ii) provides a civil cause of action for an unauthorized user who "has a bad faith intent to profit" and "registers, traffics in, or uses a domain name" based on a registered trademark.21  This action can benefit a corporate victim of piracy in at least two important ways.  First, if the spoofer falsifies a trademarked domain name, as in the instances with Amazon.com, they may be liable for cyberpiracy.  Notice, to fit this cause of action requires misuse of a domain name.22  Secondly, often web spoofers will register a domain name very similar to the targeted company's domain name for temporary usage in furthuring the illusion of their phishing scheme.  For example, see the previously discussed Dealertrac Inc. and PayPal phishing examples.

With "exceptional cases" courts may also provide "reasonable attorney fees to the prevailing party." (1117(a)(3)).  Courts define "exceptional" as "malicious, fraudulent, deliberate, or willful infringement."30 or with a finding of "culpable conduct on the part of the losing party, such as bad faith, fraud malice, or knowing infringement."31.

Based on either of these similar standards phishers would broadly fall into the malicious, fraudulent, and bad faith categories.  In case similar to spoofing, the court in SNA, Inc. v. Array, 173 F.Supp.2d. 347 (E.D.Pa. 2001) found an "exceptional" case where the defendant acted in bad faith when adding the plaintiff's trademark to their meta tags to fool users into discovering their website.  If a court can find bad faith with trademarks used in meta tags, certainly the fraudulent use of trademarks to steal customer information will be found exceptional.

As suggested in earlier examples, targeted companies can turn to the Federal Trade Commission (FTC) for assistance in filing charges against spoofers and phishers.36  The Federal Trade Commission Act provides for civil penalties up to $10,000 per violation for cases of unfair competition and unfair or deceptive trade practices.36  By their nature, spoofing and phishing attacks against commercial entities will fall into these categories.  Also, a new charge of "pretexting" from the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act37 can be used against phishers dealing in "sensitive financial information".38  The FTC's resources can be especially valuable for small businesses without the time or money to pursue con artists.

Also, the CAN-SPAM Act makes unlawful "harvesting" or developing addresses through "automated means" of e-mail addresses off the Internet.  These are common measures used by phishers to gain extensive lists of victims.  Bill Gates42 and Microsoft42 have called for this provision in the past as a spoofing prevention tactic.

Many state statutes and state-based common laws exist that may be used in combination with federal laws against spoofers and phishers.   Trademark infringement, unfair trade practices, identity theft49 and fraud laws are just some of the various laws that should be investigated on a per state basis.  For use of various state penalties in addition to federal causes of action, see the previously mentioned Amazon.com e-mail spoofing examples.

Other solutions, both legal and technical, may provide even greater strength to existing prevention and enforcement capabilities.  The FTC has also proposed legislative and procedural changes for better fighting deceptive spam.1  As presented here, though, there exist plenty of laws against the activites performed in a spoofing or phishing campaign.  Modifying or clarifying these laws may be reasonable, but more statutes are not required.

Improved and new technologies are developing to combat fraudulent e-mail and websites.  For example, Brightmail has developed an Anti-Fraud service to protect customers against spoofing and phishing.5 Tumbleweed, an electronic communications company, supports digitally signed e-mail becoming the standard practice, so that users know for sure the origin of their received e-mail.6 With unsolicited and fraudulent spam becoming so prevalent, this type of authenticated e-mail may be the best solution.

For companies, or other trusted entities, targeted by con artists using the Internet, there exist many laws that can provide remedies against spoofing and phishing.  The costs of sending e-mail and establishing hoax websites are so low that victimized companies need to raise the stakes for would-be spoofers.  By aggresively pursuing the perpetrators using all means possible, the message can be sent out that the crime doesn't pay.  Companies cannot rely upon government protection any more than a business would normally entrust its identity with the state.  And, unfortunately, technology will only improve the ability of spoofers and phishers to generate more realistic and harmful fraudulent e-mails and websites.

In Latin, virus means poison. In the biological world, a virus is a shell that contains some genetic material. A virus infects a cell, combines with the DNA in the cell and replicates to create more viruses. Eventually the cell dies and the viruses are released back into the environment. Computer viruses are the common cold of modern technology. 4.

They are very similar- they are self-replicating computer programs of various types. A virus is "written with the sole intent to cause damage to a machine or to invade the machine to steal information." A virus is a program that infects a computer by inserting a copy of itself into the computer and harms the computer in some manner, generally without the computer user's awareness.

In the computer world, viruses can be divided into 4 groups based upon these characteristics- environment, Operating system (OS), different algorithms of work, and their destructive capabilities. Within the environment, there are 4 types of viruses- file, boot, macro and network viruses. Every virus attacks certain parts of the OS. Concerning their destructive capabilities, they range from harmless on up to very dangers so as to actually cause damage to the computers moving parts. 6. The damage that they cause is call the payload.

The Melissa virus that was released in 2000, and is discussed below, is a good example of how a virus works. It was a macro virus that would propagate in the form of an email message containing an infected Word document as an attachment.

Where <name> is the full name of the user sending the message. The body of the message is a multipart MIME message containing two sections. The first section of the message (Content-Type: text/plain) contains the following text.

The next section (Content-Type: application/msword) was initially reported to be a document called "list.doc". This document contains references to pornographic web sites. When a user opens an infected .doc file with Microsoft Word97 or Word2000, the macro virus is immediately executed if macros are enabled.

Upon execution, the virus first lowers the macro security settings to permit all macros to run when documents are opened in the future. Therefore, the user will not be notified when the virus is executed in the future. The macro then checks to see if the registry key "HKEY_Current_User\Software\Microsoft\Office\Melissa?" has a value of "... by Kwyjibo". If that registry key does not exist or does not have a value of "... by Kwyjibo", the virus proceeds to propagate itself by sending an email message in the format described above to the first 50 entries in every Microsoft Outlook MAPI address book readable by the user executing the macro. In order to successfully propagate, the affected machine must have Microsoft Outlook installed; however, Outlook does not need to be the mailer used to read the message. Next, the macro virus sets the value of the registry key to "... by Kwyjibo". Setting this registry key causes the virus to only propagate once per session. If the registry key does not persist through sessions, the virus will propagate as described above once per every session when a user opens an infected document. If the registry key persists through sessions, the virus will no longer attempt to propagate even if the affected user opens an infected document. The macro then infects the Normal.dot template file. By default, all Word documents utilize the Normal.dot template; thus, any newly created Word document will be infected. Finally, if the minute of the hour matches the day of the month at this point, the macro inserts into the current document the message "Twenty-two points, plus triple-word-score, plus fifty points for using all my letters. Game's over.

In the 1980s, according to the legend, the Amjad brothers of Pakistan ran a computer store. They were continually frustrated by computer piracy so they wrote the first computer virus, a boot sector virus called Brain. The Brian was a tiny 3.5 kilobyte virus that was dubbed The first alien assault on American computer culture. The interesting thing is, the authors did not know they had created the first virus. When we were contacted by Time magazine, we were extremely surprised by the panic it had caused.

In 1988, one of the most common viruses, called Jerusalem, was unleashed. The virus was activated every Friday the 13th and the virus affected both .exe and .com files. It would delete any programs that would run on that day. MacMag and the Scores virus cause the first major Macintosh outbreaks. In 1990, Symantec launches its anti-virus programs. In 1991, Tequila was the first widespread polymorphic virus that was found in the wild (a polymorphic virus makes detection difficult for virus scanners by changing their appearance with each new infection)".

The Chernobyl virus spreads quickly via .exe files. As the notoriety attached to its name would suggest, the virus is quite destructive, attacking not only files but also a certain chip within infected computers". Id.

In May of 2000, the ILOVEYOU virus was unleashed on the world. It clogged computers and caused problems all over the world. During the next few months, several variants of the virus were released also and many managed to catch out companies and individuals that didn't do enough to protect themselves from the first round of the virus. 10.

The Lovebug virus was released in 2000 by Onel De Guzman, from the Phillipines, and it caused over $7 billion in damages. However, since there were no laws in his home nation outlawing his actions, he was set free. 1.

In 1982, at the Xerox Park research institute, a worm was created that was designed to find idle machines. It was used to distribute workloads and was not a malicious worm. So worms aren't always harmful and destructive- they can be helpful to their authors or purchasers. Id.

A computer science student at Cornell University released a worm on the internet in November 1988. It was definately malicious. It "exploited ``bugs'' in sendmail, fingerd, and rexec (3 modes of attack), to infect new machines. It used several techniques to hide itself, tried to crack password files, once a site was infected it tried to infect other sites, if two worms were at a site it would negotiate to commit suicide, but the negotiation had a bug so sometimes both worms would live. 11. Worms are similar to viruses. However, one major distinction is that worms multiply without any human interaction. A worm can wind its way through a network system without the need to be attached to a file, unlike viruses ... 5.

The Sobig worm becomes the one of the first to join the spam community. Infected computer systems have the potential to become spam relay points and spamming techniques are used to mass-mail copies of the worm to potential victims. 10.

All computer virus makers are people- they have to write the code. A computer doesnt just generate a virus. Virus senders are also almost always young, leading some to argue for restraint in punishments. 1. They are often a young computer wiz who is both curious and eager to show off his or her expertise by pointing out the flaws in the "system" or in the computer safeguards erected by others. 3.

The government is far behind technology in prosecuting computer virus authors and virus dispensers. In 2002, over 200 viruses or worms were released onto the internet but less than 10 authors were arrested. 14. It is very wise to try and protect yourself from computer viruses.

On your own computer: Antivirus software is essential, as is a little common sense. For instance, dont download every attachment that comes to you via email. Use a little discretion. Also, you may want to check with someone who sent you the email in the first place. Make sure they meant to send it if the file looks suspicious.

Some big names in the industry are Symantec, Network Associates, Computer Associates, and Trend Micro. 2. These companies, as well as many others, offer regular updates. Id. How do their products work? Scanning software looks for a virus in one of two ways. If it's a known virus (one that has already been detected in the wild and has an antidote written for it) the software will look for the virus's signature -- a unique string of bytes that identifies the virus like a fingerprint -- and will zap it from your system.

Apparently fed up with the seemingly lighthearted investigations and adjudications of these computer criminals, in 2003 Microsoft offered up huge rewards for any information on cyberspace outlaws. Microsoft set up a $5 million fund to help catch various criminals. For instance, they offered $250,000 for information leading to the arrest and conviction of the author(s) of the Blaster worm and another $250,000 for the same sort of information regarding the Sobig virus creators and distributors. 16. Microsoft Senior Vice President Brad Smith said releasing a computer virus is not a harmless schoolboy prank, but a very serious crime. "These are real crimes that disrupt the lives of real people. Every part of the Internet community suffers from the criminal act of releasing viruses and other malicious code - businesses, governments, schools, and families in their homes," he said. 17.

In the global setting of this problem, it is important to also see what other nations are doing to help combat viruses. China has adopted two regulations in an effort to help stop future computer virus attacks. These were in the aftermath of the Love Bug virus. According to the new rules, confirmation of a virus and the effectiveness of anti-virus software should be carried out by organizations designated by the Ministry of Public Security, rather than individuals or any software producer. The Ministry of Public Security, which formulated the regulations, successfully fought the "PINGPANG", the first computer virus to appear in China, with its free virus-killing software "Kill" in 1989. The promulgation of these two rules will help improve the legal framework for virus fighting efforts in China, and put an end to unfair competition among virus-killing software makers. 18.

In the United Kingdom, the Computer Misuse Act makes it a crime to make an unauthorised modification on a computer. If you own a computer, you can authorise anything you want for that computer, so you can spread a virus on a computer you own. A virus makes a modification, so if someone deliberately spreads a virus on someone else's computer, that's a crime. Giving a virus to someone else isn't a crime if it's with his/her knowledge and permission, however. So, sending a diskette with a virus on to an AV company, together with a note saying "There's a virus on this disk, please investigate it for me" is legal.

One stoke of genius in this new act, albeit rare from the government, by specifically not defining a virus, and rather describing the act, the drafters have left it open to cover the next wave of technological attacks on information systems, whatever form that may take. 3.

In May 2000, then Governor Tom Ridge signed legislation into law that outlawed the spread of computer viruses. Those who spread computer viruses could face up to seven years in jail and will be forced to reimburse virus "victims" for any damages caused by their technological terrors. 21.

Connecticut just introduced a law in January of 2003 concerning the contamination of computers. Its stated purpose is: To amend the definition of "computer crime" in section 53a-251 of the general statutes to include the introduction of a computer virus or worm into a computer system. 24.

In Idaho, it is similar to many other states. The Idaho statue reads: Any person who knowingly and without authorization alters, damages, or destroys any computer, computer system, or computer network described in section 18-2201, Idaho Code, or any computer software, program, documentation, or data contained in such computer, computer system, or computer network commits computer crime.

Louisianas statue reads as: A. An offense against computer equipment or supplies is the intentional modification or destruction, without consent, of computer equipment or supplies used or intended to be used in a computer, computer system, or computer network.

Conclusion - In the new world of computers, the villians are the computer viruses. Fighting this evil takes common sense as well as support from the government through the criminal justice system. The best way to protect ourselves is to be smart and to keep updated on anti-virus software.

Clearly, as small a percentage of total retail sales as e-commerce sales may be, the income these sales generate is by no means negligible. As the Internet, and these figures grow, so does discussion as to the proper ability, method, or right, to tax these transactions. This paper will discuss the current case law dealing with e-commerce purchases,<![if !supportFootnotes]>[iii]<![endif]> sales and use taxes, and the efforts and rationales for including or excluding Internet purchases from the method of taxation used to tax traditional brick-and-mortar and mail order purchases presently.

While there is no question that this definition is easily applied to the traditional brick-and-mortar retail store purchase, Internet purchases raise new concerns about the imposition and collection of taxes. Already, the issue arises as to whether the definition of taxable property is adequate to suit the new, emerging, and often-intangible types of property for sale on the Internet such as digital media.

While state and local jurisdictions have lost sales and use tax revenues to mail order and out-of-state purchases for years, the rise in use and popularity of Internet purchases, and current confusion and misunderstanding about how these purchases should be taxed, or if they should at all, is of great concern. As the Internet continues to develop as a dominant retail sales source, we must question whether it should be confined to the current tax laws, or if new law should follow its? course. In order to discuss this issue, a brief description of the nature, and legal conceptualization, of the Internet and Internet commerce transactions is in order.

Internet must be considered in the event that the physical presence standard is overruled. Then, determinations of jurisdiction and many courts? following decisions will factor heavily on their conceptualization of the Internet.

Regarding intrastate retail sales taxes, jurisdiction is satisfied when a purchaser buys property within the taxing state, but use taxes on interstate commerce are not so easily imposed (or collected). As electronic commerce is almost always a question of interstate commerce, the Commerce Clause has been a large limitation on the States? power to tax certain purchases.

The substantial nexus prong, which has been interpreted by the Court as requiring a physical presence in the taxing state,<![if !supportFootnotes]>[lxxxii]<![endif]> has proven to be the most contentious of the prongs.

Courts in some states have taken advantage of this lack of definitive federal direction in determining their requisite levels and types of presence to establish nexus, and without guidance from the Supreme Court or legislation on the issue, the potential for conflicting rules and interpretations will expand.

Very aware of this possibility, states want a piece of the pie, and do not want to lose the revenue from taxes on Internet sales like they have reluctantly lost from taxes on mail-order sales (that do not satisfy the Quill test).

If reform efforts such as economic presence (as opposed to the current physical presence standard) are considered, state and local tax authorities could impose tax collection obligations on remote sellers meeting a certain threshold of activity, but without simultaneous efforts to simplify this collection and administration, the burden on interstate commerce may be too large. For now, however, states will rely on the Quill physical presence test in seeking jurisdiction over Internet vendors and sales in their state, like they do for mail order companies, and likely continue their efforts at simplifying and streamlining their taxes, so that if the standards or laws change, they may reasonably comply. Consumers, though, are much more difficult to predict. Some say that taxation of Internet sales is only the rightful collection of what is rightfully owed. Some say that the Internet is a new medium, unaffected and undefined by current law, and that taxing it in its infancy would stunt its? potentially limitless growth. This growth, however, and the inability to harness it as revenue, is the biggest concern of the States, and as the Internet continues to grow, so too will the issue.

Whether the end result is a permanent tax moratorium on Internet access and sales, or a compromise situation like the Streamlined Sales Tax Project where states may tax Internet sales to some degree, Congress should seek to establish rules that are fair to traditional and online retailers, state, local, and municipal taxing jurisdictions, and easy to comply with and understand.

For example, Joe owns a business called Jet's Hosiery that makes women's stockings in all sizes and colors. Jet's Hosiery is sold in all major department stores. Since Joe produces the most superior quality of women's stockings, his business thrives and Jet's Hosiery is well-known throughout the country. The business's name, "Jet's Hosiery," is now very famous and Joe obtains a tradmark. Joe decides to expand his sales base and develops an Internet site on which his customers can order hosiery and have it delivered directly to their homes. Joe wants his website to be named www.JetsHosiery.com.

However, when Joe goes to register his domain name, he is surprised to learn that it is registered to another user. Will Joe be required to find another domain name? What are his avenues, if any, of recourse against the owner of the domain name? This paper will examine the steps that Joe should take when deciding on a domain name and what to do if that name is previously registered.

By using his business name as the SLD, web searchers who are looking specifically for his product will not be diverted when they type his business name into their browser. If they were to type, for example, hosiery the searcher may get links to www.nononsense.com, www.danskin.com, or www.justmysize.com. Therefore, Joe's decision to name his website specifically and not generically will allow his customers easier access to his product and increase his sales.

The advantage of having a generic trademark, such as www.Hosiery.com, will get people to the website. The drawback is that many generic domain names are already taken, having a generic domain name does not ensure additional sales, and generic names cannot be trademarked. [13] Distinctive names allow for trademark protection and give the customer an easy way of gaining access to the product. Joe's website will accomplish both goals of being unique enough for a trademark and specific enough to let his customers know where to find him.

On way a potential website launcher can check the availability of a domain name is to search the domain records on InterNIC through the Registry Whois. On Whois, a searcher can enter a domain name, registrar, or name server and obtain public information on the search such as the domain name, registrar, referral URL, name server, status of the site, creation date, and expiration date. [25] This simple search gives quick information to the future website owner on the availability of potential domain names. Even if a domain name is not currently being used does not mean that it is available, however, because the rights to that name may be protected by trademark laws. The Registry Whois does not provide information regarding trademarks, only existing websites. An individual who does hold a trademark could ensure that his/her trademark is not being infringed by checking the name as a domain name.

Registering, however, does not bestow any legal rights onto the domain name, only the right to be registered as the owner of that domain name. Therefore, Joe should take further precautions to protect himself and his domain name by way of trademarks.

Second, advertising one's own products or services is not a service that qualifies for a trademark . [34] Third, a mark composed of merely a surname will not have any significance as to justify a trademark.

The Internet is used on a global basis. As discussed above, trademarks are issued by the United States government. This raises complex issues regarding the value of a United States issued trademark outside the country.

Trademark infringements, dilution claims, and cybersquatting are only a few problems that arise when dealing with domain name disputes. The following are examples of case law regarding each of the above-listed types of disputes and how these disputes are typically handled.

The Statute defines dilution as "the lessening of the capactity of a famous mark to identify and distinguish goods or services, regardless of the presence or absence of 1) competition between the owner of the famoud mark and other parties, or 2) likelihood of confusion, mistake, or deception."

If an entity is the owner of a trademark and finds that another has bought that trademark as a domain name and is holding it until the trademark owner pays for it, then the trademark owner is the victim of cybersquatting.

In this case, the Court considered whether a domain name has the inherent attribute of a trademark. [81] The Court reasoned that although the Defendant was not engaging in commercial enterprises on the websites at issue, he did intend to hold on to and profit from the sale of these domain names and that constituted a commercial enterprise for purposes of the dilution law. [82] Therefore, the Defendant was liable for trademark dilution.

If a domain name owner rightfully owns the domain name and there are no illegalities about how the owner acquired the name, then the only option is to purchase the domain name. Individuals can buy a generic domain name because it cannot be trademarked and then sell it to the highest bidder.

Another option is to register a variation of the name. This could lead to difficulties if the domain name is has a trademark because doing business under a similar name could be construed as blurring or tarnishing the trademark owner, which is not allowed under the Lanham Act. Additionally, varying the name could lead to confusion as to where the website for a particular business or person may be found. Also, the person could use an alternative TDL such as .net or .org if their desired domain name is taken under .com. For example, Joe wants to set up a page at JetsHosiery.com. Suppose he does not have a trademark on the name and someone else has already obtained registration for the site.

An individual should carefully select his domain name to optimize the benefits, financial or otherwise, received from the domain name. Once the desired domain name is selected, the individual should ensure that his domain name has not been previously registered by another. If so, the individual should either take legal action through ICANN if the domain name is violating trademark law or determine another suitable name if that domain name is lawfully registered.

The Internet will continue to grow and with that the complexity of the DNS will increase. Like most aspects of technology, the government will be slow to catch up leaving areas open for actions such cybersquatting. Until the laws catch up with the technologically savvy, this will continue to occur.

Therefore, the best option for those hoping to obtain and maintain an Internet website is to use every legal avenue available to protect their rights. As the Internet is continously changing, the laws will also continue to change to provide the greatest amount of protection. In the meantime, if the trademark owner or domain name owner also works to protect his rights then the likelihood of misconduct within the DNS will decrease.

Imagine that you are a well known, well respected, Atlanta based lawyer. Imagine further that you also have an excellent speaking voice and have landed a well-paying, once a week, hourly radio show in which you get to advise other lawyers who have questions that they have not been able to find the answers to.

I represent a Wife who wants a divorce from her Husband. They had been married for 7 years when the relationship started going south. Curiously, that was about the same time the couple bought their first computer and gained Internet access. While the Wife would go to bed at a reasonable hour, her Husband would stay up until the late hours of the evening working on the computer. The Wife was amazed at how much time the Husband would spend online, and how little time he would spend with her. Though she missed his company, she did not suspect anything illicit, at first.

One night, around 2 in the morning, the Wife got up and went to the kitchen for some water. As she passed the family room, where the computer was kept, she noticed her Husband was working on the computer intensely.

As time went on he became more and more secretive and eventually signed up for his own private Internet account. There was still only one computer, which they both used, but he would not reveal his password her, so she had no access to his account or E-mail. This bothered her and so she decided to pay close attention to what he was doing. She was not Internet savvy, though, so she started learning about the Internet from her 8 year old son.

As it turns out, her son was a good teacher and the Wife learned fast. She learned that even though he uses a different account, he still uses Internet Explorer to browse the web, and it keeps track of the History of web pages viewed. That History is accessible to any user. She noticed he was spending a lot of time in chat rooms, so she checked some of them out and found out they were almost all sexual in nature. She was concerned that he was cheating on her.

She talked him into putting some security software on the computer to monitor what their son was doing on it. She told her Husband that she had seen it on Oprah and it looked like a good idea, and he told her that it was fine with him. The software had a key-logger built in that tracked every keystroke made on the computer and saved it to a file. She did not point that out, but it was in the documentation. It was her hope that her Husband would chat while the program was active, so she could see what he was saying.

At first the plan did not work because he would turn the security off as soon as he got onto the computer, but one night he forgot. When the wife retrieved the file the next day she got much more than she expected. It turned out that her Husband was chatting with an ex-girlfriend and the discussion was explicit. There were innuendos of meetings and sexual acts, and she was shocked. Additionally, the key-logger caught the strokes of a very sexual email he typed and sent that night, and it also caught the passwords that the Husband used to log on to his email and Internet accounts. With that password she was able to access his email account and read almost a hundred emails, some which talked about sexual encounters that either had taken or were going to take place. She knew right then that she wanted a divorce.

The problem for her is that, otherwise, he is a good guy. Hes a loving father and he takes care of the house. She has a better education than he does, so she goes off and works while he stays home and works on his novel.

Except for these affairs, of which the only evidence is electronic, there is nothing to help her out in this divorce. The bottom line is: Is this evidence admissible and are there any consequences to admitting it?

In order to answer the caller's question you would have to be well-versed with Georgia statutes. This question may appear on the surface to be fairly simple to answer by using the guiding hand of common sense, but there are some surprises in Georgia law that could come back to haunt you if you attempt to admit this evidence without first being certain of all the facts involved. Your best answer would be to take the caller's number and let her know that you will do some additional research before giving her a final answer.

In beginning your research you would be surprised to find that very little Georgia case law exists on this particular subject. There is a wealth of information available on discovering electronic evidence in federal civil proceedings2 and there is also no shortage of data on gathering and using electronic evidence in criminal proceedings3.

There is not the same quantity of information when dealing with individuals, not law-enforcement officials or employers, who have obtained arguably private electronic information for use against either the sender or recipient of the electronic information4.

Discovery has been bypassed by directly obtaining the electronic evidence , in this case email correspondences given to you by your client, so the first question you should ask is whether email is admissible as evidence in Georgia Courts. To determine the admissibility of email evidence, you should look to the Georgia Electronic Records and Signatures Act5.

An effective motion in limine to block the evidence could argue that by not allowing this illegally obtained electronic evidence in the present trial, then another person in a similar position will not attempt to illegally obtain evidence for her trial, because such evidence would be useless. The Court could also decide to allow the evidence in if it is seen as unlikely that someone will try to repeat the act somewhere else. Though illegally obtained evidence is not de facto inadmissible, it is certainly not assured that such evidence will be admitted.

An example of electronic evidence from the scenario above that does not contain statements by a person is the stored History files from Internet Explorer showing the web pages the Husband had been visiting. Because the History files are simply a computer record of what sites have been accessed by the computer, that evidence does not qualify as hearsay.

The primary matter of concern should be to make certain the electronic evidence was obtained legally by your client. This next section will deal with making that determination and what may happen if the evidence was obtained illegally.

Computer Theft is defined, in pertinent part, as, Any person who uses a computerwith knowledge that such use is without authority and with the intention of: (1) Taking or appropriating any property of another, whether or not with the intention of depriving the owner of possession; (2) Obtaining property by any deceitful means or artful practice;24.

In the above scenario, however, it isn't as clear. Both the Husband and Wife purchased the computer together, from the same pool of funds. By the time the Wife obtained the evidence, she was proficient on the computer and using it regularly. There was never any ownership assigned to the computer itself, and in a divorce it would likely qualify as marital property. It seems unlikely that the Wife would not be found to be the co-owner of the physical computer.

Though the scenario gives the impression that the Wife accessed his emails by dialing into his I.S.P. that is not expressly stated. Some email accounts, such as Hotmail28, allow you to either read and store your mail online or download it directly to your computer and store it on your hard-drive. In the event that that the Husband's emails were stored directly on his computer it is unclear whether the Wife would be found to have violated this portion of the Act.

The arguments for the first two factors are basically the same as they are for Computer Theft, listed above. The third factor, intent to remove, is noticeably different. This statute does not define "remove", and that presents a problem for a Wife in the scenario. Remove may mean to actually take out of the computer's memory so that the computer cannot access the data. It could also mean to make a copy of the file (that copy would then be data on the computer also) and take that copy. It could reasonably be argued that remove even means to make a printout or other "hard copy" of the data contained on the computer or network.

How the Courts will interpret the word "remove" is still undecided, as there is not yet any Georgia case law to look to. This poses an obvious risk to any client who wants to introduce such evidence into Court. Depending on the exact definition the Court adopts for "remove", the Wife is either guilty or innocent of computer theft.

Those penalties are fairly severe by anyone's standards and are enough to make a lawyer take pause before permitting his or her client to present evidence that may have possibly been obtained in violation of the Act.

The factors for a violation of this statute, that are pertinent to our scenario, are a) Did a person intentionally access and obtain information from b) a protected computer c) without or exceeding authorization? There is no doubt that the wife meant to and was successful in obtaining the electronic evidence. In the case of the Wife gathering information from the family computer, the computer has likely been used for online shopping or communication with some source outside of Georgia. If either spouse has ever received emails from other states or had something shipped online from another state, their computer would qualify as a protected computer. Authorization is not defined in the Statute, so it is speculative to decide whether the wife was without authorization on her computer. However, it is likely she would be found to have exceeded any authorization she may have had, especially if she accessed the information from an online source, which would be another "protected computer".

The key words "without authorization" appear once more and are a matter to be considered once again as a factor. This statute would seem to plainly apply if the Wife had accessed the email messages from an online database, though it is unclear from the lack of cases available nationally as to whether she would be prosecuted under it.

Though exceptions to this statute do exist,48 none of them apply in the current scenario. The factors under this statute are a)intentionally b) intercepting and disclosing c) electronic communications.

This Act was originated prior to the internet and was designed to prohibit people from "trapping" communications as they were being sent. This Act probably does not apply to searching a non-networked computer for files, but it may apply to using acquired passwords to read mail sent from a central location. Additionally, it would probably apply to using keylogger software to gather information when a person types a message on the computer with the intent of sending that message through the internet. In the current scenario, the Wife may have violated the Act by using the keylogger software and accessing the email from a central server.

Clearly, the main issues for all the statutes are going to be authorized access and exceeding such authorization. The likely argument to be made is that the Wife was authorized to use the family computer. It was marital property and there was no expectation of privacy for unprotected data. Had she simply found a folder that had illicit emails in it, the chances of her getting into trouble would be very slim. She did more than that in this scenario, though. She installed software, or had her Husband do it, that tracked computer use. Had she done that without his knowledge, it seems fairly clear that it would have been a violation of a number statutes and she could face some stiff penalties. The fact that her Husband was aware of the keylogger being installed and running, as was evidenced by him turning it off most of the time, might go to illustrate that the Wife did not act by a deceitful or artful means, but with most of the statutory language, it simply doesn't matter. The access to the keyloggers file, which both parties were aware of, might be found as authorized, and so it is possible that the data it captured would be authorized as well. Once she used the obtained password to gather information, she almost definitely exceeded her authority and would be in violation of both State and Federal law.

Even if the emails assist in getting a better judgment, that judgment might be looked at as damages to the Husband, who may be able to sue in State Court under the Georgia Statute or in Federal Court under the Federal Statutes. It is not worth the risk to attempt to admit the emails obtained off the computer.

The recent case of Rosenberg v. Rosenberg, 2002 WL 15649 (2002 MN), did not allow access to the computer database. The primary reason that the Court did not allow discovery of computer information was because the request was based on conjecture that the husband was not reporting all of his income; there were no factual indications that that was the case. Had the wife had such evidence, even just a little, the Court might have granted her discovery request. The lesson of that case is to state some factual basis for a discovery request when attempting to access information stored on a hard drive.

None of the above cases are controlling in Georgia, but they do illuminate possible interpretations the Court may make and potential pitfalls and hurdles to the client attempting to admit evidence. To summarize: Electronic information is acceptable as evidence, but it must be gathered properly. This means that the collection of unprotected data on a computer that may be community property will likely not be found to be a violation of applicable laws. For any password protected or otherwise private data, a party should gain possession of the computer (so the files can not be erased or corrupted) and get the Court to grant discovery of the contents of the hard drive, remembering to state factual reasons for your request. Be aware that opposing counsel is going to threaten criminal sanctions in an attempt to get you to keep the evidence out, and even if the sanctions would not apply it is your responsibility to inform your client of the potential risks involved in the attempted admission of this type of evidence.

Courts   interpretation of obscenity has evolved overtime to create a standard that   adjusts to our changing society. This examination will display the  difficulties the Court has had creating a standard that adequately protected citizens First Amendment rights, while still providing the government with enough power to protect its citizens. The Court has been particularly concerned with protecting the welfare of children. This overwhelming concern in making sure that children are protected from the harm that pornography causes, has led to the court establishing an almost absolute ban on child pornography.

But, technology has made it necessary to amend this standard. And, with technology advancing everyday, it appears that a new standard is going to have to be set for child pornography. The second half of the paper discusses these issues, and attempts to determine who holds the burden of showing the actuality of the child pornography and how this burden is frustrated by the internet..

This speech,  unlike advocating jay-walking, is prohibited because of its ability to cause  imminent danger to all those in the theater, as opposed to someday causing  a breaking of a law. Thus, the Court preserves most of the freedom of speech rights guaranteed by the First Amendment while still protecting the community at large.

Hence, images of young children engaged in certain action may be obscene when similar acts using adults would not. But, CPPA seeks to go beyond the Ferber holding by making computer created images of children obscene.

The court determined that the governments evidence was sufficient for the   trier of fact to reasonably conclude that the government had carried its  burden of proving that the images depicted actual children.

With the First Amendment protecting virtual  pornography, the government appears to be taking the position that they have  the burden of showing that they are not trammeling on this right. If  the burden was placed on the defendant, would the government be going against  the First Amendment by constitutionally premising legislation to control persons private thoughts?

His testimony that he knew at least one of the images was of "somebody under   18," and the fact that the people in the pictures were obviously minors,  led the court to rule against the defendant.111  But with the new technology and the Ashcroft decision, is anything obvious any more.

States, the court is left with a jurisdictional dilemma in regulating what is distributed over the web.# Absent any international treaty, the governments ability to regulate speech on the internet is limited to sites within the United States. Even within the United States, the governments ability to regulate speech is still limited by their ability to find the producer of the speech. The speed at which one can create and destroy websites enables one to avoid detection by government agencies. Moreover, the government still seems unable to monitor file-sharing networks where members are able to distribute information between one another without establishing a website.

Unfortunately, the regulation was still content based, thus would still face  First Amendment scrutiny based on the Miller test. Due to the Internets  world-wide nature, the community standard is inapplicable because there is  no one community to establish a standard from.126 Ultimately, this bill died in committee.

But, this initiative may not take place without First Amendment scrutiny and federal legislation that compels companies to implement them. In January of 2003, two computer groups and the RIAA established a policy to work with the government to voluntarily implement this program.

The doctor advised Mr. Chernoff to stop taking the medication recommended by his psychiatrist and prescribed an unorthodox cocktail of drugs. Mr. Chernoff committed suicide and many speculate that his suicide was attributable to the change in medication.[84].

Tests showed that Mr. X had normal testosterone levels for his age and the "normal" levels of testosterone advertised on Dr. Carruther's web site were higher than those used by testing laboratories.[89] Mr. X's general practitioner reported Dr.

The US FDA reports that there have been 43 arrests and 22 criminal convictions for selling medicines without a valid prescription over the internet.[118] But, it is very hard to monitor sites as they have the ability to create new web sites under different names.

At the same time, traditional regulatory frameworks remain in place. So, one may still ask where, precisely, does the practice of medicine take place when a cyberdoctor "sees" a patient who lives in another state? So far, no legal precedents exist to answer that question.[144] But there is still the question, if a cyberdoctor "sees" a patient in another state, is that cyberdoctor practicing without a license?

Cases used in determining physician-patient relationship include Bienz v. Central Suffolk Hospital [184] where the court held that a relationship existed between the physician and the patient.[185] The court held that the relationship was created by a telephone call to schedule an appointment.[186] The court did not consider what, if any, advice was given, but held that giving any medical advice over the telephone would imply patient-physician relationship.[187] Another case considered was Davis v. Weiskopf.

Internet to formulate plans, raise funds, spread propaganda, and to communicate securely. In his statement on the worldwide threat in 2000, the Director of the Central Intelligence Agency (CIA) George Tenet testified that terrorists groups, "including Hizbollah, HAMAS, the Abu Nidal organization, and Bin Ladin's Al Qaeda organization are using computerized files, e-mail, and encryption to support their operations." In one example, convicted terrorist Ramzi Yousef, the mastermind of the World Trade Center bombing, stored detailed plans to destroy United States airliners on encrypted files on his laptop computer. While we have not yet seen these groups employ cyber tools as a weapon to use against critical infrastructures, their reliance on information technology and acquisition of computer expertise are clear warning signs. Moreover, we have seen other terrorist groups, such as the Internet Black Tigers (who are reportedly affiliated with the Tamil Tigers), engage in attacks on foreign government web-sites and email servers.

Intelligence Services - Foreign intelligence services have adapted to using cyber tools as part of their espionage trade craft. Even as far back as 1986, before the worldwide surge in Internet use, the KGB employed West German hackers to access Department of Defense systems in the notable and well documented "Cuckoo's Egg" case. Foreign intelligence services increasingly view computer intrusions as a useful tool for acquiring sensitive U.S. government and private sector information.

Information Warfare - The prospect of "information warfare" by foreign militaries against our critical infrastructures is perhaps the greatest potential cyber threat to our national security. We know that several foreign nations are developing information warfare doctrine, programs, and capabilities for use against the United States or other nations.

The effect of these viruses and worms should not be underestimated. For example, in the United States, the Slammer worm shut down the automatic teller machine system and caused significant transportation delays when electronic ticketing used for airline travel was affected.

Many of the viruses and worms we have seen so far were created by the everyday hacker, not cyberterrorists. Hackers are interested in exploiting the detailed underpinnings of the Internet and its security ramifications for their own personal gratification, or for fame and recognition. The mindset of the hacker is "I want to do something either for the shear thrill of the challenge or for the public recognition of my abilities." The cyberterrorist is a completely different animal.

Infrastructure Advisory Council to help develop a national strategy for cybersecurity and suggest standards and best practices for putting it in place. Although CIOs won't officially serve on the council, they can have a critical role behind the scenes working with CEOs to identify risks to the nation's computer infrastructure as well as developing and deploying information security measures recommended by the group.

Security Law, which was passed in November of 2001, required airlines to deploy state-of-the-art computer security to prevent tampering with passenger lists - which law enforcement officials used to identify the September 11 hijackers. This law paved the way for additional voluntary security measures that could result in airlines deploying new IT systems.

Investigations and Operations - The operational response arm of the Center. It supports and, where necessary, coordinates computer investigations conducted by FBI field offices throughout the country, provides expert technical assistance to network investigations, and provides a cyber emergency response capability to coordinate the response to a national-level cyber incident.

Second, the bill would increase protection for the privacy and confidentiality of computer information. The bill criminalizes those who misuse computers to obtain Government information and, where appropriate, information held by the private sector, subject to prosecution. The harshest penalties would be reserved for those who obtain classified information that could be used to injure the United States or assist a foreign state.

Act were not carefully studied by Congress, nor was sufficient time taken to debate it or to hear testimony from experts outside of law enforcement in the fields where it made changes. "The civil liberties of ordinary Americans have taken a tremendous blow with this law, especially the right to privacy in our online communications and activities." Yet there is no evidence that our previous civil liberties posed a barrier to the effective tracking or prosecution of terrorists.

In fact, in asking for these broad new powers, the government made no showing that the previous powers of law enforcement and intelligence agencies to spy on U.S. citizens were insufficient to allow them to investigate and prosecute acts of terrorism. The process leading to the passage of the bill did little to ease these concerns. To the contrary, they are amplified by the inclusion of so many provisions that, instead of being aimed at terrorism, are aimed at nonviolent, domestic crime.

Owners of these trademarks have the exclusive rights to use the mark in a particular market on particular kinds of goods or services. Since that right is exclusive, trademarks have a way of providing consumers with a reliable indication of source.

As an example, say someone brought home a bag of McDonald's fries. The McDonald's label on the bag conveys to most persons a representation of the quality or taste of McDonald's products. The McDonald label protects consumers from getting confused by a similar copy cat of McDonalds fries of different quality.

These trademarks have to be legally protected to discourage others from using the logo's or symbols of another company and mislead purchasers who believe they have purchased the products or services from the original organization.

However registration with the Patent and Trademark Office has its advantages such as bringing the mark under protection of international treaties which facilitates foreign priority and recognition of the mark. Also, registration prevents a state from requiring that the mark be altered prior to use in that state. There are many such other benefits which can be viewed by visiting this Digilaw website.

For years, the media has been means of mass communications for businesses in advertising and developing brand recognitions to consumers. Examples of this media include television, radio, newspapers, and now the Internet. Over the years as the internet has developed, it has developed from being an advertising mechanism to a marketplace where consumes can buy and sell goods. The internet has essentially changed the way the world does business. Millions of people world wide have access to the internet to shop, communicate, research, play games, read magazines, watch movies and concerts. With this expansion of the internet, businesses have recognized the need to have a presence on the internet to succeed and stay competitive and because of that trademarks are as important in cyberspace as they are in the conventional media.

Trademarks are used on the web to identify many of the online services such as yahoo.com or google.com. Advertising deals with web sites that operate like television commercials or computerized billboards which offer scrolling advertisements. Product identification involves web sites and online channels using trademarks to identify the products and services they offer for sale such as the ever popular amazon.com. Domain names have become a very prominent legal concern when dealing with trademarks and the internet because trademarks are often used on the internet as the address or domain names of Web sites themselves.

There, a bulletin board operator distributed unauthorized copies of Sega games online and the court found there was trademark infringement because the public would likely be confused into believing the games came from Sega.

If a mark appears more than once in a document or package, the notice symbol is only needed once and online the symbol should be displayed at least the first time it is presented to the user and in connection with digital goods it should be displayed when the material is used or viewed by the end-user.

The rights to use domain names has become of the largest issues of online trademark law and it involves owners of trademarks who feel that their trademarks are used improperly by third parties as domain names.

Wal-Mart, registers for the domain name wal-mart.com, consumers using the internet to seek out Wal-mart products may go to the site walmart.com and not find the content they are looking for or become confused about what they find. Thus, domain names play an active role in developing trademark law online.

Domain names are usually combined with a transfer protocol (http) to form a uniform resource locator (URL). When a person uses a Web browser such as Netscape to access a page on the web, the person types the URL in (e.g., http://www.yahoo.com) into browser and the server then matches the domain name to the IP address of the domain name server and is relayed to the appropriate host computer, thus allowing yahoo.com and its wonderful search engine to appear on your computer screen.

But as internet became a marketplace for businesses to advertise and operate, many companies doing business online wanted domain names that provided an easily identifiable address for themselves online. As more companies sought out distinctive domain names, conflicts started arising. Consumers usually expect to find companies they are seeking at an evident address. If you are looking for flowers you may seek flowers.com.

Offline in the real world, general trademark practice allows organizations to use similar or even completely identical marks as long as the organizations are in distinctly different lines of business and there is no likelihood of confusion in the marketplace. However, under the current Internet naming system, one of these companies will not be able to include its mark in its domain name, since there can be only one apple.com or Microsoft.com.

There also arose conflicts between businesses that used similar names. Most of these cases simply involved persons who had no purpose for obtaining the name other than to harass the rightful trademark owner such as the Kaplan v. Princeton case. It is too bad Kaplan did not get their beer, so much for harassment.

In response to Quittner asking Williamson if there is anything that could stop him from registering a name such as mcdonalds.com, Willamson said,  There is nothing that says I can stop you from doing that. We really need some policy.

Well, Quittner went and registered the mcdonalds.com name himself and asked readers to send him suggestions for extortion in case the world popular company of McDonalds wished to acquire the address from him. He also began using the e-mail address of Ronald@mcdonalds.com. Of course McDonalds objected to this use of their name and they ended up acquiring the mcdonalds.com domain name in exchange for a $3,500 donation to a grade school.

That argument concerned the perspective that domain names are simply part of a required protocol, an electronic address, and therefore are no different from telephone numbers or postal addresses. From that perspective, domain names are simply functional or descriptive marks, with no secondary meaning, and as such, they would not generally be eligible for trademark registration.

NSI assigned domain names on first-come, first serve basis and assigned those domain names to only one owner and did not perform a trademark or service mark search before granting these domain names. Because it did not perform those searches, thats where the domain conflicts arose. The only search NSI did was to make sure that no other party registered the name as a domain name.

NSI provided an established process through which a party who registered for a trademark or service mark could challenge the assignment of a domain name to another party. The challenging party would have to demonstrate that its registered mark is identical to the challenged domain name and that the date of first use identified in its trademark registration predates the date of the challenged domain names NSO registration. The party currently using domain name would then have right to demonstrate its history of use of the mark in question.

The National Science Foundation (NSF), which was under the authority of Congress, elected not to renew its contract with NSI in 1998. That action removed NSI from the domain management role and NSI filed to offer its stock to the public in hopes of expanding its commercial role. There were many reasons why the government chose to move away from allowing NSI to continue its operation in domain management. One reason was the demand for establishing competing domain name registries because of the absence of competition in domain name registration.

The U.S. Department of Commerce and NSI reached an agreement that provided for a shared registration system. That system was established to provide for a competing unlimited number of registrars for domain name registration using one shared registry under NSI administration. The Internet Corporation for Assigned Names and Numbers (ICANN) was established in November 1998 by the U.S. government which began accepting applications for entities that wish to become domain name registrars. There are currently many registrars world-wide, here are a few of them: Domain Purpose, Norid, & Easyspace.

This law has not been without its critics and has some areas of concern. Will someone who merely registers a domain name, but does not create a web site qualify be found liable under this act because the Act requires that the trademark be in use in commerce. After all, many cybersquatters simply register the names and do not take the time to create website at their registered names.

Toeppen operated an Internet service provider and registered 240 Internet domain names. He sought to sell or license the domain names to the companies whose names he had registered. Included in his bank of names was intermatic.com. Intermatic was a manufacturer and distributor of electronic products that had registered the mark Intermatic five times and been in business since 1941.

In May 2000, John Zuccarini registered the internet domain names of electronicboutique.com, electronicbotique.com, ebwold.com, and ebworl.com. Back in 1996, Electronics Boutique had registered the internet domain name of ebworld.com and in 1997 they registered the domain name of electronicsboutique.com. On its websites, Electronics Boutique had sold products associated with video games and personal computers. Electronics Boutique also sold these products in over 600 different locations throughout the world. The video game and software retailer had used the service mark Electronics Boutique since 1977 and had obtained several registrations with the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office. The company registered the Electronics Boutique in 1987 and uses the mark on a variety of it products and advertising. Electronics Boutique used its websites to attract customers and its revenues increased as it made $1.1 million in sales from its website and over $273 million in total sales for the year of 1999.

Cybersquatters are those who purposely register website addresses identical or confusingly similar to a company's trademark to divert business, confuse customers or stymie a company's ability to establish an easy-to-find online location.

The practice of cybersquatting began way back in the first few years of the internet domain conflicts and the NSI with cases such as Kaplan v. Princeton Review. Cybersquatting harms the integrity of the internet and it also harms consumers, electronic commerce, and the goodwill equity of valuable U.S. brand names, upon which consumers increasingly rely to locate the true source of genuine goods and services on the Internet. Cybersquatters typically target distinctive and famous trademarks for a few reasons. One of the obvious reasons is to make a profit from owners of well known brand names by forcing them to pay for the right to engage in electronic commerce under their own brand name.

In order to prove a case of cybersquatting under the ACPA, a trademark owner must prove all of the following: (1) the domain name registrant had a bad faith intent to profit from the trademark, (2) the trademark was distinctive at the time the domain name was first registered, (3)the domain name is identical or confusingly similar to the trademark, and (4) the trademark qualifies for protection under federal trademark laws, meaning it must be distinctive and its owner was the first to use the trademark in commerce. To avoid a finding a bad faith, a registrant of a domain name would have to convince the court that they had reasonable grounds to believe that the use of the domain name was a fair use or otherwise lawful. Here is an excellent site which provides further details of cybersquatting.

The Internet has changed the way our world operates. With the ever expanding internet, issues arising from the laws of the offline world and the online world will continue to increase as we are only a decade or so into the mass communication device known as World Wide Web. As more businesses and individual bring their operations online, their legal rights also come online.

Trademark law offline and online are no different. The same guidelines apply whether it is trademark infringement or trademark dilution. The evolution of trademark laws and internet domain names has grown from one without much regulation in the early NSI days to one now where the law concentrated on minimizing domain name conflicts. Particularly, the culprits known as cybersqautters are being increasingly being held liable for any bad intent to profit from or to harass companies/individuals for may want to bring their business online.

To stop a cybersquatter, an owner of a trademark who finds that their mark is being used already as a domain name could bring an action under the Anti-Cybersquatting Consumer Protection Act or you can initiate arbitration proceedings under the ICANN process. As evident by the new laws that have become enacted since the early days of NSI, the law will continue to confront the many issues which are sure to arise on the Internet as this new world of opportunity and communication continues to grow.

This element is satisfied when the defendant intentionally directs action in the forum state and this action creates a "substantial connection" with the state. The second element that must be satisfied is that the action directed to the forum state or activities carried on in the forum state must relate to the proposed litigation. Without this relationship, sufficient "minimum contacts" do not exist and the action in forum state can not be litigated because of lack of jurisdiction. The final element of this common law jurisdictional test is that the courts exercise of jurisdiction must be "reasonable." Some of the factors that are used in determining whether it is in fact reasonable are the "burden placed on the defendant, the forum state's interest in the outcome of the litigation and the Plaintiff's interest in obtaining relief, the judicial system's interest in the most efficient resolution, and furthering social policies shared by the states." [25] In order for a court to find that a person or organization has satisfied the aforementioned "minimum contacts" such that they are subject to the courts jurisdiction, the activities of the defendant must be continuous and systematic. This minimum contacts analysis can provide for personal jurisdiction in two ways, the first of which is specific jurisdiction over a defendant "where the activities of the defendant within the forum state are the subject of the suit. This is the type mentioned above.

The exercise of general jurisdiction is permitted even if the cause of action in the forum state is not related to activities of the defendant within the state because of the type and volume of activity that occurs in the forum state.

In this case the plaintiff was the operator of a bar in New York City called "The Blue Note." The plaintiff owned "all rights, title, and interest in and to the registered mark for that name."[53] The defendant in the case owned a bar in the state of Missouri that operated under the same name. The Missouri Bar advertised on a Web Page that included the contact and ticket information for the establishment. The site did not allow for any other interactivity between it and the user other than the users ability to read the contact information. It did not allow for the purchase of tickets on-line but rather suggested that customers call the bar directly on the telephone.

Most courts have agreed on an appropriate decision regarding passive web sites and their subjecting operators to personal jurisdiction. They have determined that the existence of a passive site by itself does not satisfy the requisite minimum contacts required for the exercise of personal jurisdiction.[59] "By creating a passive web site, a defendant has in no way purposefully availed herself of the privilege of doing business in the forum or specifically targeted that forum state for business."[60] A defendant that operates such a site could not reasonably foresee being haled into court in the forum state. The people who operate these passive sites have no control over who accesses them. Once they are posted to the Internet they are available for viewing by any individual that has access to the World Wide Web. These operators are not purposefully availing themselves of any particular forum and as such it would be improper and unjust to exercise personal jurisdiction over them.

The defendant tried to persuade the court that its activities were not directed particularly at the state of California and as such they should not be required to appear in the courts of that state. They claimed that any injury that was felt occurred in Cyberspace. The court found that simply registering a domain name is not enough to exercise personal jurisdiction alone in the state where the actions are felt, but accompanied with the prospect of extortion the exercise of personal jurisdiction was warranted.

One fact that does not change in the Internet context is the basic principles of contract law. For example, evidence of fraud, duress, or unconscionability will render any contract, including those on the Internet, unenforceable. Therefore, when inquiring as to the enforceability of an online contract, the first stop is always whether it is valid under traditional contract law.

There are three main types of Internet contracts. Their common names are "Shrink-Wrap," "Click-Wrap," and "Browse-Wrap." The distinguishing factor between the three is the method by which the user agrees to the contract. The courts have wrestled with the differences between them and how to, or even whether to, enforce them. This paper will discuss the characteristics of these agreements, their treatment by the courts, and the enforceability of these agreements today.

The "classic" way to protect a software owner's rights has been through the shrink-wrap agreement. Shrink-wrap agreements are either printed on the back of or included inside a box containing commercial computer software. The name comes from the method by which software is packaged. Typically, software comes in a box that is shrink-wrapped. By opening the box and thus breaking the shrink-wrap, the consumer is agreeing to the license terms printed thereon.

The enforceability of these agreements was tested in the ProCD v. Zeidenberg 86 F.3d 1447 case. ProCD compiled information from more than 3000 telephone directories into a database. They sold a version of the database, called SelectPhone, on CD-ROM. The box that the software was packaged in had verbiage that stated the software came with restrictions contained in an enclosed license. The license limited use of the application to non-commercial purposes and was both encoded on the CD and printed in the manual, and appeared every time the user ran the software.

The usual contract exceptions apply to shrink-wrap agreements as well. In other words, if the terms are objectionable on grounds applicable to the contract then the agreement will not be enforceable. Common law contract exceptions that also might apply include fraud, duress, and unconscionability.

The controversy over shrink-wrap agreements has become whether consumers should be bound by an agreement that they (1) will probably never read and (2) do not have the opportunity to review in full before purchasing the software. Does opening the box really constitute an "acceptance" under contract law? The following cases discuss these issues.

In the Hill v. Gateway 105 F.3d 1147 case, plaintiff ordered a computer from defendant via telephone. The computer arrived in a box that contained a list of terms that the buyer would be bound to unless he returned the computer within 30 days. The term at issue here was an arbitration clause in the shrink-wrap agreement that came with the computer. The plaintiff was dissatisfied with the computer's performance and filed suit alleging that the product's shortcomings made Gateway a racketeer.   This court ruled that it was not necessary for the plaintiff to actually read a contract for it to be effective. The terms of service become a contract upon assent by the user, which in this case meant not returning the computer within thirty days. Because they had the opportunity to return the computer after reading the terms they were bound by them. This case extends the shrink-wrap agreement beyond software to encompass computer equipment as well.

Mortenson used Timberline's software to prepare a construction bid. A defect in the program produced an erroneous bid price that was $1.95 million off the mark. Mortenson sued Timberline for breach of implied and express warranties. Timberline contended that the license agreement clause limiting consequential damages would prevent Mortenson from recouping damages.

Supreme Court affirmed a lower court ruling which found that "the license terms were part of the contract," and "the limitation of remedies clause was not unconscionable and was therefore, enforceable."

The click-wrap license is generally an online variation of the shrink-wrap license. Typically, it displays an agreement to the user and there are links or buttons at the bottom that say "I Accept" and "I Do Not Accept." This indicates the user's willingness to be bound by the license terms. Usually clicking the "I Accept" button is required before the user can download the software or begin using whatever service is being offered.

Corporation v Van Money Pie Inc 1998 WL 388389 case is the landmark case in the area of click-wraps. Hotmail provided free web-based email to millions of subscribers. To obtain an email address, the user had to agree to Hotmail's license terms, which were displayed in a click-wrap agreement style. The agreement prohibited users from using Hotmail addresses to send "spam" (unsolicited email).

Hotmail came to learn that many users were indeed using their services to send spam, so they sued the spammers on a number of grounds, including breach of contract. Hotmail has been granted a preliminary injunction on the grounds that they would likely be successful on their claims.

As a result of this case it is widely accepted that click-wrap agreements are legally binding. As mentioned earlier, however, the use of a scroll box to contain the agreement may present a new challenge that has not been addressed yet.  Regarding the timing of the acceptance, the court in 1-A Equipment v. Icode, Inc. 2003 WL 549913 held that agreement terms disclosed after purchase, in the form of a click-wrap agreement, are enforceable. 1-A purchased software from Icode for use in its business. Icode had assured 1-A that the software would meet all of its business requirements. 1-A purchased and tested the program, concluding that it was in fact not suitable for its business, and demanded a refund. Icode refused and this suit was the result.

A browse-wrap agreement is one that a user may view online but does not require him to do anything to indicate acceptance. In other words, a link to the applicable terms is provided, but there is not an affirmative act required before the user can download or use the particular services in question.

Browse-wrap agreements were developed because service providers believed requiring the user to click "I agree" gives him one more opportunity to decide against it and turn back. With browse-wrap a website can present a contract without requiring users to take action, and allow users to purchase or download the software without being "scared off" by the legalese of a contract and a red "I Agree" button.

Pollstar alleged that by clicking on the access button to retrieve information from the web site, the user is agreeing to be bound by the terms of the License Agreement. They alleged Gigmania breached this contract by using Pollstar's information on their web site. Gigmania's motion to dismiss was the subject of this ruling.

This article focuses on how the interest for instant access to public records on the Internet effects individual privacy interests and the role of the government and courts to balance these effects. Part I of this article will introduce what is meant by public records and the historical roles they have played in our society. Part II will discuss the current public policy debate regarding how technology is changing the traditional notions of access to public records and the effect on privacy interests this new paradigm is having. Finally, Part III will look at examples of some of the laws, regulations, and rules regarding public record access that have been adopted, or are still being considered, by various state and local government agencies and the courts.

This article uses the term "Public Records" loosely to mean any record created, collected, maintained, or disseminated by a properly authorized federal or state government agency, division, or department, including courts, which is made available in any format to individuals, organizations, or entities outside the original government agency. In other words, for purposes of this discussion, the distinction between open records and regulated records will not be drawn, unless such distinction is clearly identified.

But this approach evolved before the Internet and before records were as detailed with private information as they are today.[13] A century ago, the public records on a private citizen contained very limited information.[14] At that time, records would most likely be limited to dates of birth and death and a history of real property title.[15] Public records today may contain detailed personal, financial, and/or medical information.

Although public records have enjoyed a long tradition of being readily available to many different parties, many are concerned that this policy is not sound in an Internet world. Today, many states, courts, and federal agencies (including the House of Representatives[29] and the Senate[30]) are considering legislation, rules, and regulations that would limit the availability of information on the Internet. Some provisions are aimed at entire records, while others are aimed at specific pieces of personally-identifiable information, such as Social Security numbers or home address.

United Reporting Publishing Corp., the Supreme Court addressed the issue of limiting commercial use of public records and the First Amendment impact such limitation would have on commercial speech.[36] California public records law was on trial in United Reporting, specifically, Cal.

Unfortunately, there is no uniform policy for the way public records are handled on the Internet. States, counties, and Courts are moving in conflicting directions. Jurisdictions have recognized the power of the Internet to fulfill the promise of open records and they have moved forward in putting as much information out there as possible. At the same time, legislatures are struggling with setting the appropriate balance between what information is necessary and what information is potentially dangerous to be on the record.

Anyone can access all of the documents in a case, from the complaint to the final decision. For example, one can obtain the documents related to the matter of Kaiser Aluminum v. Certain Underwriters.[92] The Superior Court of California, County of San Joaquin, on the other hand, provides only summaries of court action. Actual court documents are not available.

District Court for the Parish of New Orleans offers access to its electronic records for an annual fee of $250. The Clerk of Court for the Parish of East Baton Rouge allows access on an hourly rate schedule.[93] The Fourth Judicial District Court of Minnesota offers criminal defendant and civil case information online for a one-time setup fee of $35 and a monthly access fee of $31. There is also a charge of $.10/transaction and a fee that varies depending on the time of day a user accesses the online services.

For the purpose of this model policy, the term "Court Record" referred to "any document, information, or other thing that is collected, received, or maintained by a court or clerk of court in connection with a judicial proceeding."[97] This includes such items as the Court calendar, records of proceedings, and orders or judgments of the Court.

To date, the model policy is strictly an idea of a way to add structure to the problem of Internet access to Court records. The policy was initially issued as a draft proposal in February 2002. It was open for review and public comments for several months. The final report was issued on October 8, 2002. Since that time, there have been no further updates to the group's home page or the model policy.

Overall, the Committee seemed to agree with most of the concepts and recommendations in the model policy, but opted for a "Go Slow Approach."[105] According to the Committee, the State should allow for full public access to court records, but allow this access in a slow step-by-step method. This approach allows problems to be identified and resolved as they are encountered in the process.

State legislation has been adopted across the country that would remove certain personal identifiers from public records. The most common form of this legislation is to restrict the collection or display of Social Security numbers. Other legislation has gone further and tried to remove home addresses of all individuals, while most successful legislation in this vein focuses on certain groups of individuals (e.g., law enforcement officials, judges, etc.).

Identity theft, surveillance society, personal autonomy, accountability of individuals and governments, public safety, personal protection, ever changing technology -- all of these issues will continue to combine in unique and challenging ways to increase pressures on public records on the Internet.

The developer usually offers two options: shareware (for a fee) or freeware (paid for by advertising). Most adware programs are, in fact, free programs that are available on the Internet and are often very useful tools such as download utilities, games, media players and accounting software. So far so good. The user can choose between the free software with the slight inconvenience of a pop-up advertisement and the paid for software which is free of any advertising. If things had remained this way then there would be no problems to discuss today.

Earthlink also claims that up to 90% of all Internet-connected computers have some kind of spyware program installed. Thus, government initiatives to contain spyware have been "popping up" on both the state and national level.

We invite them in of course! Once we invite them in, we then install them (although most times unknowingly). Adware and Spyware are not stopped by firewall products because they are invited into our system and they are not stopped by antivirus products because they claim to be legitimate commercial products.

Why then would anyone agree to have a snooping spyware program installed on his or her computer? Because most users accept the EULA without even bothering to read it. You should read the EULA for every application that you install on your PC because it is what you agree to in the EULA that makes it legal.

The ECPA sets out the provisions for access, use, disclosure, interception and privacy protections of electronic communications. The law was enacted in 1986 and covers various forms of wire and electronic communications. The ECPA makes it illegal to intercept communications without a court order or permission of one of the parties. The Act only covers communications, not data stored on the hard drive of a personal computer, but collecting click-through data and other web browsing information can constitute a violation of the ECPA. However, applications that work with the consent of the user (however deeply buried in a user agreement the terms may be) or the consent of the websites being visited probably do not violate the ECPA.

Act, 15 U.S.C.  45(a), prohibits unfair or deceptive acts or practices in or affecting commerce. The FTC is authorized to initiate federal district court proceedings by its own attorneys to enjoin violations of the FTC Act and to secure such equitable relief as may be appropriate in each case, including restitution for injured consumers.

It also bans software that cannot be uninstalled or disabled, or that makes it seem as if the software has been uninstalled or disabled when it has not, or software that blocks or disables security software, including anti-spyware and anti-virus programs. The law sets forth a private right of action whereby a consumer could seek damages of $1,000 per incident and applicable attorney's fees.

Against Computer Spyware Act," proposes to prohibit anyone from providing and using a computer program to deceptively alter or manipulate a user's computer or online experience. The state's Attorney General would enforce this law by bringing civil actions or instituting equity proceedings to obtain injunctive relief or the lesser of actual damages or fines of up to $1 million for knowing and willful violations of the law.

There already exist large arrays of programs available to consumers - many free of charge- that clean PCs of pests and protect against future invaders. Internet service providers such as Earthlink and search engines such as Yahoo are competing to come up with spyware blockers to protect their customers. Such programs, while unfamiliar to many consumers today, may soon become as common as virus protection and anti-spam programs are now.

Squared Solutions LLC, a California company that allegedly used an onslaught of pop-up ads to sell pop-up blocking software. The settlement bans the company from utilizing such tactics in the future. D Squared Solutions was attempting to sell software by creating a problem that the software would purportedly repair. The FTC maintains that these pop-up advertising practices violated the FTC Act, which prohibits unfair or deceptive acts or practices in or affecting commerce.

For the trademark infringement claim the plaintiff's would have to show that there was a likelihood of confusion on behalf of the consumers. The court applied an eight-factor test set forth by Judge Friendly in Polaroid Corp. v.

WhenU is now one of the few advertising applications to be certified under the Aluria standards but it is still too early to tell if their certification will help WhenU avoid any future adware/spyware litigation.

Netscape Communications Corporation, playboy claimed that Netscape had improperly keyed the trademarked terms "Playboy" and "Playmate" along with other adult oriented terms. Thus, whenever a computer user searched for these terms, the search results would display not only the relevant trademarked Playboy and/or Playmate sites but also display advertisements of their competitors on the same search result web page. The verdict: Playboy wins! The court stated that online advertising is deemed illegal if the company that is being advertised displays its advertisement by way of taking advantage of an established company's reputation and good faith.

There are not any current cases that have claimed that spyware caused such a waiver but the fact that the program is capable of causing such a mistake to happen is one that can effect many confidential relationships.

The development of adware and spyware and their effects have proven to be the concern of many Internet users, legislators and commentators. While there is currently existing legislation and several proposed laws, no one is sure whether these laws will be effective against the proliferation of this PC annoyance. It appears that the most effective tool may be consumer education. If PC users are aware of these practice and are educated as to how to avoid becoming victims, the problem may soon become much easier to manage.

Have you ever received an e-mail from your bank, eBay, or other online merchant instructing you to update your financial information? Did that e-mail come to you as an ALERT that your password information is at risk, notifying you to immediately click the link embedded in the message so that you could keep your information safe and your account active? If so, you have been a phishing target. The use of the word "phishing" has been cited as early as 1996 and originated from phone "phreaking" where hackers stole AOL account passwords in order to use their internet access minutes (back when you had to pay usage fees per minute to be on the internet and the transmission rate was measured in something called baud) and to make free long-distance phone calls. These days you can't keep AOL from sending you CDs offering free accounts in the mail.

Phishing is an internet scam that involves sending an email to an individual that is designed to look like an official email from a trusted source. Perpetrators of these scams  mimic companies such as VISA, eBay or Citibank, then instruct the unsuspecting reader to click on a link to their website and update his or her password or account information. It is estimated that these scams cost businesses and consumers approximately $2 Billion last year alone.

Commercial online e-tailers still expect online fraud to rise, costing online merchants as much as an estimated $2.6 billion in 2004, up from the 2003 figure of $1.9 billion. While the costs are high for the online merchants, a study sponsored by TrustE found that when averaged out among the general internet population, the costs were only around $500 million. The actual costs may never be exactly pinpointed. Howard Schmidt, former special adviser for cyberspace security during the first George W. Bush's (White House website) term, who had also served as security chief to Microsoft and eBay, Inc. is confident that the problem will resolve within the year, despite reports that the problem is growing. Schmidt now works on the board of the Cyber Crime Advisory Board for the National White Collar Crime Center and hopes that improved efforts against phishing will aid in shutting phished sites down fast enough to prevent collection of consumer data.

In addition, because phishers have become so much better at imitating the websites that we as consumers know and trust, even the more experienced internet user has a fair chance of falling victim to these scams. During the month of October 2004, the growth of phishing scams grew at a rate of 110%. The scams grew at a rate of 33% in the following month of November according to the APWG.

A spoofed address is simply a fraudulent address that appears valid to the person reading the e-mail. Since the "from" information (technically this is referred to as the "header" info of a message) of a phishing scam is a spoofed address of someone the recipient knows or trusts, like the recipient's bank or a widely-used internet merchant such as eBay, it does not initially look suspicious.

The zombie computers are the main problem and make it difficult to single the messages sent from the zombie out as nefarious because most of the time, the origin of the message - the zombie machine - is legitimate, rather unauthorized. The contents of the message sent by the zombie computer and the destination of the links contained in the e-mail are fraudulent, and any attempt to confirm who the message came from would result in a confirmation that the zombie machine (which is most often a legitimate computer) was the originating machine.

During the first 6 months of this year, it has been estimated that more than 30,000 computers PER DAY were turned into zombies. Additionally, some phishing organizations have become so organized that they alternate zombie machines every day, from one country to the next, in order to evade law enforcement.

Nearly all of today's e-mail programs are either web-based or allow users to view mail in HTML format, which is why the phisher's message seems so compelling - it contains the overall look and feel of the websites the user is familiar with - the trusted brands they have spent money with in the past.

THIRD - the e-mail will ALWAYS contain either a link that looks like an official URL or an HTML form within the message that directs the user to a website or to a thank you page once they have obtained the personal, financial or password information they are after. The user clicks the link, enters the information, and the phisher mines that data into a database. The websites are in operation for an average of 2.25 days, according to one of APWG's recent status reports.

Code Kits online for download. Just as with all technology, phishing scams are becoming more and more sophisticated. In some cases, it may only require opening or viewing an e-mail to become a victim of a phishing scam. (By viewing an e-mail in the preview pane in MS Outlook, the message may activate a script, or piece of code, which propagates throughout one's bookmark file, rewriting those bookmarks and other information.) Some newer methods, dubbed "Blended Threats," of phishing include installation of "keylogger" programs upon opening a phisher's malicious e-mail.

Keylogger programs allow the phisher to log the keystrokes used by the end user. Others, making use of the holiday season and unsuspecting, harried online shoppers, are creating phishy, fake e-commerce storefronts which sell bogus products in order to get the purchaser's banking information. Some phishers make use of the legitimate website and security flaws existing in all browsers to direct the activities in pop-up windows that are activated by a click in the legitimate website, making it nearly impossible to tell from where the content in the pop-up window has originated.

For example, if a student received an e-mail message that said it was from Professor Wiseman, that looked like the following message and entered information there is no way to verify completely that the message 1) truly came from Professor Wiseman, and 2) that the data submitted is being transmitted to Wiseman. The e-mail address header information may be invalid (spoofed) and the underlying code may direct the posted information to a phisher's web server. Of course, after submitting the relevant information, the grade is never sent, or a fraudulent message is sent in its place.

Hello all, now that all of the final papers have been received, grades are available for the class. Since GoSOLAR will not display the grades until January, I have made the grades available via my website. Please enter your exam number, social security number, and last name and your grade will be e-mailed to the e-mail address listed with the College of Law and forwarded to the Registrar. You must provide the following information, else Tricia will not receive your final grade for the class.

Such acts would be punishable by up to five years imprisonment, hefty fines, or both. The law relies on definitions provided in the CAN-SPAM act, which initially addressed the problems created by massive sending of unsolicited, spoofed e-mail.

In addition, on July 15, the date of Senator Leahys proposal, a section was added to an existing law in the form of 18 U.S.C.A.  1028A that added the offense of aggravated identity theft. This states that if anothers identity is used in the commission of any felony, a mandatory term of two years imprisonment will be added to the sentences they incur for the identity theft. This section also includes a section on terrorism and identity theft which provides a prison sentence of five years.

The goal of the Identity Theft Penalty Enhancement Act is to simply increase the penalties for those who commit identity theft. In the past, those convicted of identity theft received either probation or short terms of imprisonment.

However with the threat of terrorism in everyone's minds, Congress sought to increase the penalties for those who committed identity theft for the purpose of committing acts of terrorism, immigration violations, firearms offenses and other related crimes. See, Purpose and Summary of H.R. 1731.

The ITPEA does not criminalize any new activity. Identity theft, terrorism, falsifying documents to enter this country and possession of firearms by certain individuals are already illegal. This Act merely increases the penalties for such offenses. In regards to offenses relating to terrorism, the Act adds an extra five years in prison. The act of identity theft is for many criminals a precursor to even more serious offenses, which are most likely death penalty eligible. Will an individual who will ultimately commits a crime for which he may receive the death penalty give a second thought to receiving an extra five years in prison for obtaining an ID which will allow him to enter into this country illegally? Will a person who manufactures US Visa documents, birth certificates or driver licenses in Bangladesh be subject to this Act?

The Federal Trade Commission FTC has taken a first step in alerting consumers about the hazards associated with phishing by developing a list of tips to follow so as not to get hooked on an internet phishing scam. Most of these are obvious and it is doubtful that education alone will protect consumers from phishing attacks.

FTC snared its first phisher by making use of the Graham-Leach-Bliley Act under that Act's provision making it illegal to obtain the financial information of another. The defendant was a minor who was charged with committing fraud and identity theft in 2002 where he posed as America Online and sent consumers e-mails claiming that there had been a problem with the billing of their AOL account. The e-mail warned consumers that if they failed to update their billing information that they would risk losing their AOL accounts and internet access. The teenagers message then directed the consumers to click on a hyperlink in the body of the e-mail that would connect them to the AOL Billing Center and when the link was selected they were directed to a sited contained AOLs logo, type style, logo, and links to real AOL web pages. However it was not AOLs Billing Center but rather a site the teen had created for AOL consumers to enter their credit card numbers to correct the billing problem. The site also directed consumers to provide their names, mothers maiden names, billing address, social security numbers, bank routing numbers, credit limits, pin numbers, and AOL screen names and passwords.

According to the FTC, the defendant used the information to charge online purchases and open accounts with PayPal. In addition, he used consumers names and passwords to log on to AOL in their names and send more spam. Finally, he recruited others to participate in the scheme by convincing them to receive fraudulently obtained merchandise he had ordered for himself.

The agency charged the defendants practices were deceptive and unfair, in violation of the FTC Act. In addition, the FTC alleged that the defendants practices violated provisions of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act designed to protect the privacy of consumers sensitive financial information.

One of the latest trends has been for industry groups to work with government agencies to develop anti-phishing initiative groups. The Digital PhishNet      initiative includes companies such as Microsoft, America Online, and VeriSign      teamed with the United States FBI, Secret Service, and Postal Inspection Service to improve coordination in identifying and shutting down phishing sites. The organization has created an Internet Fraud Complaint Center which will accept reports from users of the website to report incidents of internet fraud of all types, including phishing.

Act, in late 2003 eyebrows were raised when Microsoft offered a $250,000 bounty for information leading to the capture of the hacker who wrote the infamous Sasser e-mail virus that wreaked havoc on users of Microsoft e-mail programs. In May of this year, an informant provided information leading authorities and Microsoft to Sven Saschan, a 19-year-old German, who later confessed to authoring the worm.

Svens informant is also currently a subject of investigation, since authorities believe he too may be involved in the Sasser outbreak. While the bounty for the Sasser worm seemed at first blush to work at finding the culprit of that crime, many more outbreaks of virus attacks have come to pass. In the year since the Microsoft Bounty Program was announced, Saschan was the only person caught as a result of an informant, causing some to question the effectiveness of bounty programs. Even the FTC has cautiously come out in support of bounties for hackers such as phishers.

Most Wanted" list, it does include those persons wanted by the FBI but rather pose less of a threat. Echouafni was allegedly responsible for hiring hackers to take down websites such as Amazon.com. The Department of Homeland Security and a large television services company site called weaknees.com.

Act, but finding and developing a body of evidence is difficult when the websites are often taken down quickly, the servers used have the data written over very quickly, and the culprits may be located anywhere in the world. The first conviction under the CAN-SPAM Act  was handed down on September 27, 2004 when a Southern California man pled guilty to using unprotected Wi-Fi      hotspots to send out illegal spam. The practice of searching for and using unprotected hotspots is called "wardriving" and phishers are no strangers to the practice. A suspected phishing operation in Atlanta is under investigation for wardriving and using unprotected hotspots to commit phishing crimes.

Even with the potential jail time, surely many of the phishers think they will never get caught when the odds are in their favor. In perhaps one of the largest crackdowns under the CAN-SPAM act to date, Operation Slam Spam, law enforcement officials and internet executive industry leaders worked together to arrest and charge dozens of people for phishing and other identity-theft type crimes.

Much of the operation was funded by Direct Marketing Association, showing, that to make available the resources both in technical talent and law enforcement skill, requires significant funding that most likely would be held up by Washington red tape.

Phishing is not just a crime committed by technically savvy hackers on shopping sprees with stolen credit card numbers. Organized crime has gotten into the action as well. In early November 2004, Boston police arrested a suspected Russian gangster and phishing scam operator. From the initial investigation, it appeared that the suspect, Andrew Schwarmkoff, 28, had the identity information of over 100 victims.

In late October 2004, in an international sting to bring down a phishing operation, 28 people in seven countries were arrested in "Operation Firewall"      for using websites to steal identities, credit cards, and identity documents.

In all about 1.7 million stolen credit card numbers were bought or sold under the crime ring. The organization was also successful in creating fraudulent documents such as birth certificates. The sting required the coordinated efforts of the U.S. Secret Service, the Department of Justice and Homeland Security Department, the Royal Canadian Mounted Police, Europol and local police from nations such as Belarus, Sweden and Ukraine.

FTC has expressed support of private industry development of a standard e-mail authentication technology. An independent, international coalition called the Internet Engineering Task Force (IETF) has called for industry to develop e-mail authentication standards across the internet. When this forum discusses e-mail authentication standards, it is in the sense of authenticating, from computer-to-computer, within an organization, that the e-mail sent from person "A" going to person "B" really did come from person "A."

Currently there are a number of general protocols for how the messages are sent back and forth, but because a hacker can gain use of a zombie machine (another company's computer sitting in a data center) or router and send out messages, there is a need to ensure a real person or real entity is sending the messages or limit the number of messages that any one computer can send in a given timeframe.

Framework and How it Works), Microsoft has put forth a proposed standard to IETF for e-mail authentication that has drawn great ire from the internet community because of it's licensing provisions. See, Apache Says It Won't Support Sender ID. In response, or sheer stubbornness, Microsoft has modified its license in order to appease the open source community, but the license is still not final.

Even if Microsoft backs down on some of its licensing terms, which is the general consensus of what will be required before the SenderID would be adopted, the damage may be done to its intended purpose - protecting end users from identity theft, phishing and fraud, since no one (or at least the companies choosing not to bundle it with their products) will use it.

While Microsoft is pushing its SenderID technology to be the adopted standard, the internet community at large is pushing back and other companies are proposing and testing their own standards. Yahoo, Microsoft, EarthLink and AOL have formed the Anti-Spam Technical Alliance and published their own Technology and Policy Proposal. Other companies are abandoning Microsoft's technology before it has even rolled out, citing lack of support in the open source community.

Before all of the friction over the Microsoft SenderID license broke out on the internet, Yahoo!, mail service provider to over 39 million subscribers, and Sendmail, one of the original mega e-mail software companies, were in development of a technology called Domain Keys. Domain Keys attaches a unique tag to each e-mail. The tag on the e-mail is private and it has a counterpart that resides in a public database. At the time of e-mail delivery, if the keys match, then the message is delivered. If they cannot be corroborated, then the  can determine what to do with the message. AOL has recently scrapped the idea of using the full version of Microsoft's SenderID and use a limited portion of its technology called Sender Policy Framework (SPF), as well as investigate more fully using Domain Keys in concert with SPF.

Pennsylvania based, TurnTide (recently acquired by Symantec, those guys who provide the GSU anti-virus software) have developed a hardware technology - "Smart" Network Routers      - that look at the network traffic coming and going across ISPs. Apparently the tools used by spammers give up on sending the spam e-mails if the message doesn't go through quickly. More traditional and authentic e-mail servers will try continually, up to days to send messages.

Since much of the phishing occurs from web-based e-mails and spoofed sites, one useful solution is to stop the end-user from visiting the spoofed site in the first place. A company called WholeSecurity has developed a browser-based product called Web Caller-ID. The product uses real-time behavioral technology to determine whether a potential site the end user is attempting to visit is a phished site. Behavioral technology differs from the traditional blacklist-style technology proposed, since a single change in character in a domain name or IP address of a server would not appear on a blacklist. Another browser-based solution is Spoof-stick, a browser extension for Firefox and IE that explicitly tells the user what website they are visiting (e.g., "you are on E-Bay"). Yet another browser-based solution is the Deepnet Explorer (out of the U.K.) which makes use of the IE rendering engine, yet allows end-users to control cookies and floating ads (allegedly) more effectively to keep phishers from opening pop-up windows over a legitimate website, confusing a user into believing the pop-up is the actual web page of their bank or an e-commerce website.

While many of these technological solutions present end-users with the ability to identify phished websites, the ability and ingenuity of hackers to circumvent browser-based solutions may render many of these work-around solutions obsolete very quickly.

While the stand off between Microsoft and the world over SenderID and mail authentication standards elevates to a heated pitch, other companies are betting on the lack of a single, unifying standard. As of this writing, on September 11, 2004 the IETF rejected Microsoft's proposed SenderID because of its concerns over the patents Microsoft has applied for on the technology included in SenderID. A company called Port25 Solutions, Inc. is betting that it can bridge the gap between the differing standards and be the answer to the annual $1.2 billion problem facing banks and credit companies.

Another industry group is throwing its hat into the ring in an attempt to create industry working groups to operate as a "think tank" developed to combat phishing. The Trusted Electronic Communications Forum (TECF, pronounced "tech-eff") consortium is composed of 17 member companies and includes four working groups. One of the groups is focused on standards, best practices, social engineering, and governmental affairs.

While the FTC has made inroads to educate the public, some argue that the very companies profiting from online commerce should take some of the initiative to educate their consumers about the dangers of phished messages.

Given these developing trends, it now appears that employees' use of the Internet and e-mail is under more scrutiny today than ever before. Each time employees venture off work-related sites to pay their bills, catch the score of last night's game, or e-mail friends, their employers may be watching.

While employers possess legitimate concerns over employee abuse of workplace computer privileges, the current law in the area of employee monitoring, both statutory and common-law, appears antiquated and inadequate.

At first blush, current federal laws appear to protect employee privacy in the wired workplace. However, exceptions pierce these statutes, rendering them largely ineffective in balancing employee privacy against employer intrusions. Efforts to provide employees further protection following the Internet Revolution have failed.

NLRA protects these rights by prohibiting employers from using intimidation or coercion to interfere with employees' freedom of self-organization. To establish a Section 8(a)(1) claim, an employee must show that the employee's activity was "protected" and that the employer's conduct was "improper."

As noted above, the courts have typically sided with employers in issues surrounding employee monitoring. However, almost all employers would argue that their monitoring of employees does not merit more stringent regulation. As many employers point out, their surveillance of employees' electronic activities stems from concrete, pecuniary concerns. Conversely, employees argue that their privacy interests suffer in this arena and employers' uninhibited ability to survey their every move while on work computers deserves stricter scrutiny by the courts and the legislatures. This section will examine the arguments of both sides.

Employers often cite this interference with employees' work time as a nuisance. Such distractions, employers claim, can lead to "poor customer service, lost business, unnecessary overstaffing, high overheads, and lost profits." [146] In addition to the price employers pay for their employees' distraction, excess personal use of the company's Internet system can also place more pressure on the corporate bandwidth.[147] This in turn can lead to slower network response time and may even require an expensive upgrade. [148] Additionally, there are expenses involved with repairing a network system infected by a virus an employee obtains after visiting an unprotected site. Thus, the costs involved with employees' free use of their computers, employers claim, can be sizable.

The issues surrounding electronic monitoring of employees are not one-sided. Employee advocates have often harangued against employers' right to watch their employees unmolested. Although employer monitoring has garnered a great deal of support, employee supporters have strong arguments against the use of electronic monitoring in the workplace.

NLRA. Additionally, there is also the risk that some employers could use electronic monitoring to route out whistleblowers or fabricate a reason for firing an employee that satisfies just cause termination requirements contained in a collective bargaining agreement.[182] Further, since most monitoring systems allow for the detailed recording of employees' electronic activity, employees' risk of becoming victims of theft or voyeurism is considerable. The fact that employers face little accountability and have no public disclosure requirements regarding their use of electronic monitoring raises concerns that some employers may misappropriate these surveillance methods.

Finally, many employee advocates believe that electronic monitoring violates basic privacy rights and offends employees' fundamental human dignity. While employees currently enjoy little protection of their privacy in the workplace, some scholars argue that we should begin to rethink our understanding of individuals' "right to privacy." One supporter of this new conception of privacy is Edward Bloustein. Bloustein has challenged Prosser's traditional notion of privacy in which Prosser characterized privacy as an "intangible property" rather than a value.[183] Bloustein's concept of privacy is one that centers on human dignity and individual rights. He argues that in invasion of privacy cases the actual harm committed is not the mental distress that results from a privacy intrusion. Rather, according to Bloustein, this distress is simply a byproduct - the true wrong occurs in the privacy invasion itself. This is because the invasion of one's privacy is an intrusion into a liberty the Supreme Court has labeled "basic to a free society."[184] Although the Supreme Court has obviously given more credence to Fourth Amendment violations than in tort cases, Bloustein notes that "a similar wrong is perpetrated in both instances." Other courts have also begun connecting privacy rights and human dignity. In Hill v.

Thus, while courts do not often recognize invasions of employees' work e-mail or monitoring of their Internet activities in the office as legally offensive, such intrusions seem to violate basic precepts of human dignity. Not surprisingly, employee performance often degenerates when employers begin constant surveillance of their employees. Intrusion into one's privacy is one of the most personal forms of trespass, and the impotence most employees feel as a result of the invasion is only compounded by their general lack of legal recourse. Therefore, in addition to harming morale and exposing employees to possible crimes, electronic monitoring in the workplace also seems to offend a basic liberty inherent to the core of personal individuality - a right to seclusion.

This paper advocates the modification and modernizing of common law and privacy statutes to accommodate employees in the wired workplace in an effort to equalize the playing field. Although the common law doctrine of employment-at-will permits either party to sever an employment relationship, employees are at an inherent disadvantage, as they necessarily rely upon their employers for income and meeting all of their needs, from basics to luxuries. Certainly employees should not be wasting their employers' resources and should be productive; however, providing notice and bare protections from intrusions into workplace privacy would provide employees the basic dignity they deserve in our society. The current state of the law gives employers a distinct advantage, and the time for the law to adequately address employees' needs in today's wired workplace is overdue.

"false promises" because "the beneficial effects of civil tort litigation are episodic and do not generally effectuate real changes in the workplace behavior of employers," and "[b]enefits . . . are usually short-lived because courts that create these rights can, and do, limit and withdraw them over time.").

Pillsbury despite assurances to contrary, employees sending sexually explicit jokes via work e-mail had no expectation of privacy when warned employer could review their e-mails). The Garrity court also noted, as in Pillsbury, "Even if plaintiffs had a reasonable expectation of privacy in their work e-mail, defendant's legitimate business interest in protecting its employees from harassment in the workplace would likely trump plaintiffs' privacy interests."

This paper will focus on the advantages and disadvantages of cookies and their privacy implications. Specifically, this paper will address the applicability of federal privacy statutes, common law privacy torts, and common law trespass claims brought against companies using cookies. Section I describes what cookies are, their purpose, their advantages and disadvantages, and how society has developed new technology to address the problems posed by cookies. Section II examines the federal statutes governing electronic communications and how they address the privacy problems cookies have created. Section III examines how common law privacy claims relate to cookies. Section IV analyzes whether common law trespass claims can be applicable to cookies, and the final section discusses how proposed legislation and industry have tried to address the privacy issues surrounding cookies.

The development and proliferation of cookies has led to the formation and rise of internet marketing companies. As discussed in the previous section, these companies monitor a consumers on-line habits by compiling data on the websites that each consumer visits in an attempt to create individual profiles that assist in direct marketing schemes. The internet marketing companies compile the data for each individual by installing cookies on the users hard drive. Some individual users, upon their knowledge of such cookies, then generally sue these companies and the individual websites for the alleged invasion of privacy based on federal statutory violations of the Stored Communications Act (Title II of the ECPA), the Federal Wiretap Act (Title I of the ECPA) and the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act.

DoubleClick alleged that the affiliated users, as defined in the statute, authorized its activities and furthermore that all of the information accessed from plaintiffs hard drive was of or intended for those users, in this case the individual websites.

Therefore, because cookies are not temporarily placed on a users hard drive they fall outside the scope of the Stored Communications Act and internet marketing companies can not be held liable for installing and accessing them. After DoubleClick and subsequent litigation involving the Stored Communications Act, it would appear that internet users must accept that certain internet companies have access to their computers and may monitor the websites accessed and searches conducted. Furthermore, the courts holding in DoubleClick indicates that internet users have no privacy protection under Title II of the ECPA if an internet marketing company places a cookie on their hard drive with the consent of the individual websites.

In re Pharmatrak, Inc. Privacy Litigation [92] provides an excellent overview of judicial interpretation of the Federal Wiretap Act in the context of cookies and the obstacles that plaintiffs face should they decide to use this as the basis of their claim.

It appears from the case that the use of an automatic routing program is the only way for plaintiffs to satisfy the first element of a prima facie case. In the absence of such a program, courts are likely to conclude that an interception did not occur. Therefore, the success of a plaintiff's claim hinges on the method of interception, a fact that they cannot control and may have no knowledge about when they file the complaint.

Based on these facts, the court determined that Pharmatrak lacked the requisite intent. Although the plaintiffs in this case were unable to prove the intent element, the court seems to leave open the possibility that under different circumstances with different facts, plaintiffs may be able to satisfy this element.

Based upon this fact alone, plaintiffs likely face an insurmountable obstacle in showing that the sole purpose of installing cookies on hard drives was to commit a tortious or criminal act and not to make a profit.

Therefore, plaintiffs must show that the installation of cookies and the accessing of information only one time amounted to the $5,000 statutory definition of damage. Repeated access to personal information falls outside of the scope of the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act, making it difficult for plaintiffs to reach and surmount this threshold.

Perhaps one might argue that a website is guilty of the public disclosure of private facts tort by allowing third parties to intercept and place cookies on the users hard drive which keeps track of the users voluntary communications with the website. However, this argument is likely to fail because the website is not disclosing the information it has collected, but rather is allowing the third party to collect the information through its site with its own cookies.

Most of the following discussion will address how courts have dealt with trespass claims under the internet spam and software robot cases and how the courts reasoning in those cases can be applied to cases involving cookies.

Moreover, is it reasonable to believe that the individual users understand what a cookie is, its commercial purpose, and the information it collects? It is simply unlikely that individuals accessing these sites convey a knowing and genuine consent to the use of cookies on their computers.

Also, the fact that information on cookies is often contained in a websites privacy policy can be misleading. Most internet users probably expect such a policy will explain how the website protects the users privacy, not how it deliberately invades it.

By using a cookie, it is possible to differentiate between fifty unique people visiting a site and one person reloading the same webpage fifty times. To track the number of users, the site creates a new ID the first time a visitor arrives and it sends the ID as a cookie to the users hard drive. The next time the user returns the site can install a counter associated with that ID in the database and to know many times that visitor returns.

Microsoft Internet Explorer, cookies were placed anonymously and without alerting the user, but now users can set their browsers alert users that they are being offered a cookie. However, the formatting of the information may tell the user very little about what is actually being stored.

The applicability of cookies under these circumstances assumes that potential suspects did not know how to delete cookies from their computer or were unaware of other techniques available to manage cookies.

Individuals could prevent DoubleClick from tracking their internet use by 1) visiting the DoubleClick Web site and requesting an opt-out cookie; and 2) configuring their browsers to block any cookies from being deposited. Id. at 504 (internal quotations omitted).

U.S.C.  2701 et seq. At the time that plaintiffs sued for violations of the ECPA, the Federal Trade Commission was investigating DoubleClick for unfair and deceptive trade practices. However, the FTC concluded that DoubleClick did not engage in unfair or deceptive trade practices because it only used or disclosed users personal identifiable information for the purposes explicitly referenced in the companys privacy policy. In re DoubleClick, 154 F.

Id. at 20. Adopting Pharmatraks argument, would according to the court, lead to results inconsistent with the statutory intent because it would undercut efforts to protect privacy and lead to irrational results. Id.

Cape Publications, Inc. 840 So.2d at 283 (finding that allowing representatives of the news and media to enter private property where there is a disaster of great public interest was a long standing custom accepted by the general public).

Third-party cookies refer to content such as pictures or video, weather reports, stock and share price tickers, advertising images, and other content served from a domain other than the page in which it is embedded.

The rapid increase in the volume of unsolicited commercial email threatens the convenience and efficiency of electronic mail. Congress found that over half of all email is unsolicited commercial email (up from 7 percent in 2001) and most are fraudulent or deceptive in one or more respects.

The local benefits included alleviating the burden on Internet service providers, preventing inconvenience to individuals who cannot opt-out of receiving the emails, and cost-shifting from deceptive spammers to individual Internet users.

Specifically, commentators have hypothesized that the two provisions within the Act that spammers are most likely to challenge, the labeling requirements and any establishment of a national "Do Not Email" Registry, should withstand a court's scrutiny.

The CAN-SPAM Act prevents spammers from labeling their email messages in such a way as to mislead consumers as to the contents or subject matter of the message.[122] It also provides that they must allow consumers to opt-out of their emails, and the spammers must provide information about the nature and origin of their messages.[123] This information requirement essentially forces the spammers to "speak."[124] This speech is what may trigger First Amendment concerns.

Because of the possibility that the Act may not truly prevent spam, consumers and businesses alike looking to combat the problem of spam may have to look to alternative causes of action.[140] Two possible causes of action that may be used to address spam are common law trespass and nuisance claims.

Trespass to chattels occurs when one intentionally dispossess another of his chattel or uses or intermeddles with a chattel in the possession in another.[141] One problem that arises in these types of cases is that liability is limited to when the plaintiff can show that he suffered actual damage as a result of the spammers' actions.[142] In CompuServe, Inc. v. Cyber Promotions, Inc.,[143] an Ohio district court held that the sending of electronic signals could constitute a trespass.[144] To satisfy the actual damage requirement, the plaintiff may show that the spam emails demanded disk space, drained processing power, risked impairment to future service, and increased personal costs to deal with the spam.[145] Similarly, the court in America Online, Inc. v.

Although nuisance claims have traditionally been applied in cases involving interference with property rights and enjoyment, like a nuisance to real property, spam also constitutes a substantial and unreasonable interference with the use and enjoyment of an ISP's property.[150] The difference, therefore, between trespass and nuisance claims is that a trespass "is an act that dispossesses the rightful owner from his land," while a nuisance is "a substantial and unreasonable interference with the use and enjoyment of land."

The court found that the defendant spammer's actions "inflicted substantial harm, including substantial service disruptions, lost access to communications, lost time, lost income and lost opportunities."

Although individuals and businesses can connect to the Internet directly, most do not because of the expensive nature of such a connection. 5 While governments and universities often have their own direct connection to the Internet, most individuals, households, and business require a "provider" for access. Enter the Internet Service Provider ("ISP"). America Online, NetZero, CompuServe, and Joi are examples of ISPs. 6  These companies enable the home or business user to access the Internet from their home or place of business either through dedicated Internet lines, such as ISDN, DSL, or T1, or through a traditional phone line ("dial-up"). 7  The user's computer must contain certain hardware (such as a modem) that will enable the computer to access the ISP's local machinery. 8 It is through the ISP's computers and servers that all Internet "interaction" and "transaction" takes place, including surfing, downloading, uploading, and streaming.

It should be noted that "ISP" is defined and understood differently, depending on the context. 9 Statutes may sometimes contain similar, yet distinct definitions of ISP that vary by the ISP's particular service. 10  While AOL and Comcast are commonly understood as ISPs, under some statutory definitions Internet "service" providers may include libraries, Starbucks, or Georgia State University. 11 Furthermore, ISPs typically provide more than access to the Internet. 12 Subscribers are frequently provided with free email and a certain amount of personal web space where the user is encouraged to create and store her own web content. 13  The web space will typically retain its physical location on the computers or servers of the ISP.

This paper seeks to explore the role of ISP liability in several areas of the law, as the ISP is a central player in almost every Internet user's online experience. 18 Can we make the argument that an ISP should be liable for the torts of its customers? 19  What about the crimes of its customers? 20  Are ISPs capable of supervising and regulating their customers? Or as a mere conduit to the "information superhighway," should ISPs be exempt from all liability for user-created harms?

Deterrence and making the victim "whole" are two goals of tort law. 35 Vicarious liability effectuates these two goals differently. Arguably, holding liable someone who is technically "innocent" of causing a harm helps deter future harms by encouraging the innocent party to adopt better safety precautions. In this situation, the actual tortfeasor is not punished and is not held accountable for his actions. There is then no incentive for him to modify his behavior and prevent future harm. However, vicarious liability is premised on the idea that the innocent entity who is held liable for the tortfeasor's actions has some measure of control over the actor, i.e. is a parent or an employer of the actor. By holding the parent liable, courts provide an incentive for that entity to exert control over the actor and modify his behavior. In this way the goal of deterrence is met.

Vicarious liability may be necessary to "make the victim whole" when the actual tortfeasor is unable to do so. A child cannot satisfy a large monetary judgment, but its parent might be able to. Similarly, an employer, because of insurance, is in a better position to compensate a victim than an employee making minimum wage. Further, the employer has benefited from the fruits of the employee's labor (at least up until the point where the employee's negligence exposed him to liability).

The ISP-user relationship can be distinguished from the employer-employee or the publisher-author relationship; however, there remains an aspect of control that ISPs exercise that resembles the basis of vicarious liability in the employer-employee relationship. 39  The ISP is the access point through which end-users both push content out to the Internet and receive content from other users. 40 When an ISP provides users with web space, or a message board, or other forum on which users may post and store content, the ISP is arguably in the best position-next to the user himself-to control that content particularly because the content is physically stored on the ISP's servers. The ISP has the power and ability to quickly delete the content or turn-off the entire account. 41 However, due to the massive amount of information posted and transferred across the Internet, ISPs understandably argue that they do not have the power or the resources to conveniently monitor and assess each transfer, posting, etc. for unlawful behavior.

Holding ISPs liable for the end-users actions may lead to the ISPs helping to deter future unlawful acts-whether from fear of users losing their Internet access, from fines imposed by the ISP (based on a term of the service contract), or fear that the ISP will turn end-users over to the courts.  Under respondeat superior theory, this is accomplished by an employer deterring the acts of his employee-by docking his pay, demoting him, or possibly firing him. Here, the ISP is soliciting the end-users business and risks alienating his customers by trying to deter these wrongful acts. Interestingly, the ISP often benefits, at least indirectly, from users' unlawful activities. The ISP is being paid for its service-to provide Internet access to those who download copyrighted music, to those that defame others online, etc. Undeniably, ISPs have deeper pockets with which to make victims whole.

A pair of recently filed trademark cases may introduce a new component to the discussion of whether vicarious liability should be applied to ISPs. 45 Both cases are discussed in more detail below; however, each is premised on a similar argument. In each case, the defendant ISP allegedly derives a direct benefit from the allegedly infringing material, even though the actual infringer is not the ISP. Plaintiffs allege that the ISPs marketing and advertising encourages infringement. There is no safe harbor provision for ISPs in the context of Trademark law.

AOL and its suppliers shall not be liable for any indirect, special, incidental, consequential or exemplary damage arising from your use of the AOL services, software, the internet or for any other claim related in any way to your membership with AOL.

There has apparently been no litigation stemming from these provisions; however, traditional contract law analysis has not been accepting of these types of adhesion contracts, and therefore they are unlikely to afford ISPs any protection should litigation arise.

Traditional copyright law provided three means of liability for infringement: direct infringement, contributory infringement, and vicarious infringement. The Digital Millennium Copyright Act 48  ("DMCA") effectively insulated ISPs from liability by creating four "safe harbors" for ISPs' violation of copyright laws. However, academics have argued that the DMCA does not actually change the underlying law-that it is still applicable if the safe harbor provisions have not been met. 49 Under direct liability, ISPs could be liable for merely providing Internet service to an infringing user or for hosting infringing content on its servers. 50 Under the DMCA, this approach appears to have been eliminated, provided ISPs avail themselves of the safe harbors.

For purposes of the first limitation, relating to transitory communications, the DMCA defines ISP as "an entity offering the transmission, routing, or providing of connections for digital online communications, between or among points specified by a user, of material of the user's choosing, without modification to the content of the material as sent or received." For purposes of the other three limitations, "service provider" is defined as "a provider of online services or network access, or the operator of facilities therefore."

This safe harbor protects an ISP where the provider merely acts as a data conduit, transmitting digital information from one point on a network to another at someone else's request. This limitation covers acts of transmission, routing, or providing connections for the information, as well as the intermediate and transient copies that are made automatically in the operation of a network. The transmission must be initiated by a person other than the provider.

This safe harbor protects an ISP where the provider "retains copies, for a limited time, of material that has been made available online by a person other than the provider, and then transmitted to a subscriber at his or her direction. The service provider retains the material so that subsequent requests for the same material can be fulfilled by transmitting the retained copy, rather than retrieving the material from the original source on the network."

The provider must comply with rules about "refreshing" material-replacing retained copies of material with material from the original location- when specified in accordance with a generally accepted industry standard data communication protocol.

Any material that was posted without the copyright owner's authorization must be removed or blocked promptly once the service provider has been notified that it has been removed, blocked, or ordered to be removed or blocked, at the originating site.

ISPs will cache (or store a copy on its own server) material, like a web page, so that download times for the end-user are quicker and so that the ISP can save bandwidth rather than having each user tie up bandwidth when accessing it. So, Comcast might cache CNN or ESPN's homepage, since they are frequently visited, for the benefit of both the customer and the ISP.

The provider must not have the requisite level of knowledge that the material is infringing. The knowledge standard is the same as under the limitation for information residing on systems or networks.

The advent of online file-sharing, particularly of mp3 and other music files, has resulted in a string of cases in which the ISP has not sought refuge in the DMCA's safe harbors. To qualify for the safe harbors an ISP must block access to the infringing material once notified of the infringement. However, sharing of illegal music files is the primary reason users implement P2P software. Blocking access to the infringing files would effectively kill the ISP (as seen in the fate of Napster following its loss in court). Additionally newer P2P models are decentralized and may not even fit within the definition of ISP under the DMCA. Vicarious liability for copyright infringement requires control over the infringer; most of the P2P services have claimed not to have that control.

In Napster, Napster actually stored indexes of users' mp3s on its servers which users then searched. 52  Napster would connect the user to the file they wished to download at which point the connection became a P2P connection. The court issued an injunction against Napster to stop the file sharing. The court found that the plaintiffs had established a prima facie case of Napster's direct infringement for violating the rights of distribution and reproduction. The court also found that Napster had specific knowledge of infringement leading to both contributory and vicarious liability. Because Napster indexed files and used an "integrated system" in which users searched those indexes and then Napster connected them to the infringing files, Napster materially contributed to the infringement and therefore was contributorily negligent.

To establish vicarious liability, Napster had to financially benefit from the infringement and have control over its users. The court found that there was a financial benefit because Napster's business plan relied on expanding its user base, which was accomplished by facilitating illegal file sharing. The court also found that Napster had the ability to control and supervise its users. Napster indexed the files although they did not analyze the content of the files-still Napster had the ability to locate infringing material using its own search function and had the ability to terminate the account of users that were infringing. Because Napster could have exercised this amount of control over its users and their content, Napster could have been vicariously liable.

In Grokster, the court looked more closely at the issue of vicarious liability. Citing Napster I, it listed a three prong test for vicarious liability: 1) direct infringement by a primary party; 2) direct financial benefit to the defendant; and 3) the right and ability to supervise the infringers. Direct infringement by a primary party clearly occurred. The court then focused on the issue of the right and ability to control and did not look at direct financial benefits. Because Grokster and the other defendants used P2P software, 54  the court found that there was no right or ability to control, at least under the current versions of the software.

Examining the issue of contributory infringement, the court laid out a three prong test: 1) direct infringement by a primary user; 2) knowledge of the infringement; and 3) material contribution to the infringement. Again, clearly there was direct infringement. Looking at the issue of knowledge, the court relied heavily on Sony Corp. of America v. Universal City Studios. 56  There, the court held that there would be no contributory infringement even if the defendants knew that their product (Beta Max recorders) was being used to commit infringement, if the product was capable of significant non-infringing uses. In Napster the court held that if an ISP could show a significant non-infringing use, then knowledge could not be imputed, but that actual knowledge of specific infringing files would still create liability.

The Grokster court then found that the software was capable of non-infringing uses. Because the plaintiffs were decentralized, they also did not have specific knowledge of the infringement nor did they materially contribute to it.

The court never addressed the applicability of the DMCA's safe harbor provisions to Grokster-presumably because the plaintiffs were decentralized and did not fall within the statutory definition of ISP. This then creates a catch-22 for those seeking to impose ISP liability. If an entity abides by the rules for the safe harbors (specifically blocking access once notified) even if infringement has occurred in the past and maintains a central server, etc. then there is no liability. On the other hand, if the entity "allows" infringement but is decentralized, then there is no liability.

In Aimster court looked primarily at the issue of contributory infringement. Applying a similar test to that seen in Grokster, the court found that Aimster did have non-infringing uses. However, Aimster failed to offer any evidence that it actually was used for those non-infringing purposes.

Considering vicarious liability, the court questioned whether Aimster could have exerted control over its users had it tried to do so. The court then concluded that its failure to do so was simply more evidence that it had committed contributory infringement.

The court found that Aimster, while eligible for the DMCA's safe-harbors, did not fit within them. Rather than complying with the take-down notices or seeking to prevent repeat infringement, Aimster, in the court's eyes, encouraged infringement. Aimster's tutorial focused solely on obtaining copyrighted musical works and Aimster's sole source of revenue from the site was derived from pointing users to copyrighted works which could be downloaded using its software.

The courts in Aimster, Napster, and Grokster have apparently laid out a road map to protect ISPs from vicarious liability for copyright infringement. At least for now, a P2P service that is decentralized and avoids exerting any control over its users may be insulated from vicarious liability even without the protection of the DMCA. Most of the current crop of P2P providers appear to be following this model, and the RIAA, the primary vehicle so far in online copyright litigation has turned its attention (and legal muscle) on end-users.

In Verizon, the Recording Industry Association of America ("RIAA") sought a subpoena compelling Verizon to disclose the identities of users identified as illegal file-sharers. This was part of recent suits against individual users for illegal file-sharing. While the litigation actually centered on the issuing of subpoenas under the DMCA, it tangentially affects ISP liability.

The issue was technical-whether failure to include notice of the material to be blocked or removed by an ISP in a subpoena was fatal to the subpoena. 59 Verizon argued that when they were a mere conduit there was nothing to block or delete. The RIAA argued that an ISP could terminate an account, thus disabling or removing offending content.

While this was a technical issue of statutory construction, an alternate finding by the court would have opened a new avenue of potential liability for ISPs-where an ISP refuses to terminate an account of a known infringer even when the ISP is merely acting as a conduit of information and does not store any offending material on its servers, the ISP is liable.

There has also been litigation concerning whether ISPs are eligible for the DMCA's safe-harbors. Hendrickson was a filmmaker who made a documentary called "Manson;" bootleg copies of "Manson" were being sold on eBay's site. Hendrickson notified eBay of this fact but did specify which listings were bootleg copies and which were legitimate. The court found that Hendrickson did not satisfy the DMCA's notification provisions; therefore eBay had no actual or constructive knowledge of the infringement or duty to act to stop the infringing activity.

The court also found that eBay's policy of voluntary policing to qualify for DMCA's safe harbors could not cause it to lose immunity. The court held that "Congress did not intend for companies such as eBay to be penalized when they engage in voluntary efforts to combat piracy over the Internet."

In a similar case, a pornographic website sued an online age verification service for copyright infringement. The court questioned whether the age verification service was an ISP, but assumed that it was. The court found no evidence that Cybernet had actually terminated any infringers, despite its claims that it had. The court then held that "Because [we] find that there is a strong likelihood that Cybernet cannot establish that it has 'reasonably implemented' a policy directed at terminating repeat infringers, even in 'appropriate circumstances,' there is little likelihood that it can avail itself of section 512's safe harbors."

LoopNet is an ISP that allows its users to post real estate listings online. Some of those postings contained CoStar's copyrighted works. The court held that a Web site operator that passively and innocently posts infringing material received from its users is not strictly liable for violations of the Copyright Act, even if it fails to qualify for the DMCA safe harbor. The panel split, however, on the question of just how passive the operator must be to invoke this immunity.

Trademark litigation concerning ISP liability has not emerged as quickly as analogous litigation under copyright law. However, Tiffany's (the jeweler) has recently filed suit against EBay for trademark violations. 65 Unlike copyrights, which invoke the DMCA, there is no law dealing explicitly with trademarks and ISP liability.

Tiffany's estimates that as much as 70% of the "Tiffany's" jewelry listed on eBay is fake. Tiffany's claims are based on direct and contributory liability-although the direct liability claim is conceptually similar to a vicarious liability claim under copyright.

Similar to other contexts, eBay argues that its practice of take-down notices is an appropriate balance of between the duties of the injured and the ISP. A take-down notice occurs where the copyright or trademark holder informs the ISP of the infringing web content, and the ISP then carries a duty to remove the content from the website.

Contributory negligence in this case rests on whether eBay has a duty to actively search for counterfeit auctions. 75 Tiffany's claims that eBay should ban any user offering more than five pieces of Tiffany's jewelry. Like in a copyright infringement, this claim is most likely based on eBay's knowledge of infringement and material contribution to it.

Marvel Comics, the company that publishes comics featuring Spiderman, the Hulk, and other famous superheroes has filed suit against the makers of the computer game City of Heroes. 76 City of Heroes is a MMORPG ("massive multi-player online role playing game"), a game in which thousands of players design and play as superheroes in an online virtual city. City of Heroes' software, like many contemporary video games, allows players to create their own character in the game using thousands of variations in colors, physique, clothing, hair styles, etc. The complaint alleges that the makers of the game, NCsoft and Cryptic Studios, should be held liable for users who create characters in the game that infringe on Marvel's copyrights. Marvel also alleges that the makers of the game encourage this infringement; the game's marketing uses the tagline "bring[ing] the world of comic books alive." Marvel alleges that because the makers of the game own no copyrights in comic book heroes, they are encouraging users to infringe on Marvels' and other's copyrights.

Marvel has alleged direct, vicarious, and contributory copyright and trademark infringement in its suit. Many video games now offer this "create a character" feature; however, City of Heroes, while not unique, offers online game play, which both potentially allows the makers of the game to supervise players (if the online "arena" is hosted by the company) and may allow the makers of the game to use the DMCA's safe harbors.

The law did not impose a duty to actively monitor or search for child pornography. However, the law did impose liability regardless of whether the ISP or its users hosted the material and regardless of where on the Internet the material was found or published. Additionally, the law defined ISP as "a person who provides a service that enables users to access content, information, [or] electronic mail," exposing not just conventional ISPs such as Comcast or AOL to criminal prosecution but also libraries, schools, Starbucks, and any other place that offered Internet access to users.

Civil liberties groups immediately raised due process and First Amendment questions regarding this law. 119 The law requires only a showing of probable cause (that the material is child pornography) in an ex parte hearing before the ISP is required to disable access. The law also does not require notice to any person whose speech is potentially curtailed and access to lawful websites may be blocked if they share an IP address with a site that has child pornography. These issues, however, are not directly related to ISP liability. The law was soon struck down. Apparently no other states have passed similar legislation.

In the wake of copyright lawsuits and attempts to find out who is liable, there has emerged a technology "bounty hunter" of sorts who surfs the Internet looking for illegal file sharing. 128 At Stanford, private non-University related companies who monitor file downloading and traffic report to the school when there has a been a violation, thus giving the school the opportunity to handle the issue internally. 129 The University then uses a three-strikes method for punishing students, ultimately resulting in suspended Internet privileges. 130  The existence of this type of company illustrates that copyright holders have created a market for enforcing infringement laws.

One complication to Internet regulation is that the Internet is not limited by formal geographic boundaries. Instead, ISPs outside of the United States can post content that can be reached from the US. What does this mean for ISP liability and Internet regulation? What have other countries done to confront the problem of user's cyber-torts?

Holding ISPs liable for user's tortious and criminal actions is not a novel legal concept for the new millennium. While courts originally sought to fit ISP liability into traditional legal concepts, new legislation proved to enact an independent statutory scheme. The DMCA and the CDA are two clear manifestations of the Congressional policy of fostering Internet growth and development by providing legal protection for the ISPs. As the Internet and its technology have quickly developed, courts have begun to fill the gap between Internet pirates and the law. Soon the technology itself will give necessary teeth to court rulings and legislation so that law can become more established and more present in user's everyday Internet transactions.

Listed above are different types of downloadable software that enable an Internet user to infringe thousands of copyrights. Each of these applications enables the user to enter into some variation of Peer-to-Peer ("P2P") file sharing where two computers conduct a transfer of a certain file which may or may not be copyrighted material. Once downloaded and installed on your computer, these software programs will provide you with a user-friendly interface with which you can efficiently steal tens of thousands of dollars worth of copyrighted media. To download an mp3, for example, Kazaa will prompt you to search for a specific song, movie, or television show and then provide you with a list of potential users from which you can illegally download your now "pirated" media. Because many are wary of the illegality of such services, particularly after the wave of copyright infringement suits against these users, the technology has sought to reduce the trail of such an "illicit" transaction. BitTorrent for example, takes a given file and divides it into "shards" for easier download. The file is then downloaded piecemeal, from multiple users, thereby avoiding the "privity" of a P2P relationship.

Interestingly enough, the mere existence of these hyperlinks on this website could expose this website to contributory copyright infringement liability. Or could it? In the case of Universal City Studios, Inc. v. Reimerdes,  the court suggested that the mere linking to the download of copyrighted material may expose a site to liability for copyright infringement. While the court looked to the nexus between the hyperlink and the actual download in assessing liability, it asserted that "sites that automatically commence the process of downloading upon a user being transferred by defendants' hyperlinks, there can be no question. Defendants are engaged in the functional equivalent of transferring the code to the user themselves. Substantially the same is true of defendants' hyperlinks to web pages . . . [which] present the user only with the choice of commencing a download of [the copyrighted material] and no other content." While the download of the software applications listed above is not restricted by copyright (making the download legal), the use of such software enables users to effectively plunder the Internet of otherwise copyrighted material.

Electronic Frontier. The Internet has been called many things, and for children it is a virtual playground, complete with all the fun and excitement of the playgrounds frequented by children years ago.

Ever since the dawn of the Internet, child predators have found a new, and in their eyes, useful tool in fulfilling their illicit sexual desires. Law enforcement agencies have been forced to play catch-up with these loathsome creatures lurking in the darkness of the Internet.

They seem to be missing the point - The only people who can "protect" the children ARE the parents. There are laws in place to prosecute the offenders after they have been arrested, but that is missing the point of what can be done to protect. As will be discussed later, protection begins at home.

Whoever knowingly persuades, induces, entices, or coerces any individual to travel in interstate or foreign commerce, or in any Territory or Possession of the United States, to engage in prostitution, or in any sexual activity for which any person can be charged with a criminal offense, or attempts to do so, shall be fined under this title or imprisoned not more than 20 years, or both.

Whoever, using the mail or any facility or means of interstate or foreign commerce, or within the special maritime and territorial jurisdiction of the United States knowingly persuades, induces, entices, or coerces any individual who has not attained the age of 18 years, to engage in prostitution or any sexual activity for which any person can be charged with a criminal offense, or attempts to do so, shall be fined under this title and imprisoned not less than 5 years and not more than 30 years.

Court decided that it was irrelevant whether he was actually speaking to a minor or a purported minor, and that it was his intent to have sex with a minor AND his actions towards the fulfillment of that intent that allowed the government to secure the conviction.

Court viewed Murrells actions as dispositive of his intent, though it pointed out that the government did not carry the burden of having to prove intent under the plain language definition of intent coupled with 18 U.S.C.  2422. Phew, simply make the approach and you are gone.

However, just recently, the 11th Circuit Court of Appeals ruled that the federal governments power to regulate interstate commerce does not reach far enough to prosecute a Florida man for possessing child pornography on computer discs. The main stumbling block for the government was that the discs were recorded after he crossed the lines.

No. 03-14326 (11th Cir. Oct. 1, 2004). The case seemed to hinge on the inability to prove the source of the images on the discs. It is widely accepted that the Internet IS interstate commerce, but the decision may have troubling ramifications if the government cannot prove clearly where the predator met the child (in the cases of actually children).

Does this necessity of proving source trouble anyone? Does it make investigations to expensive and difficult. How hard is it now for the government to prove source given the high-tech encoding and other devices available to tech-savvy predators?

A law-enforcement investigator posts a profile on the Internet or goes into a chatroom posing as a girl or boy, usually in the age range of 13 to 15 and waits to be contacted by an adult seeking a young adolescent for a sexual encounter. The investigator responds to a conversation initiated by an offender and allows the offender to develop a relationship that culminates in a face-to-face meeting, where the offender is arrested.

The offender is charged with attempted sexual assault and, in some jurisdictions, illegal use of a computer to solicit a minor. In some cases other crimes, like distribution of child pornography, are committed.

The problems faced by these "proactive" investigations are the need to train police officers in high-tech computer work, in addition to maintaining evidentiary protocols. This means costs to maintain technology and technology-skill bases. However, it seems that the pay off is strong given the ease with which arrests can be made and also with which the offenders are willing to "play online."

Evil, by Terrence Berg, a then assistant attorney general and chief of the High Tech Crime Unit of the Michigan Department of the Attorney General, details many of the trials and tribulations faced by law enforcement. The Internet has made it possible for predators to find entire online fraternities of pedophiles with which to share experiences, to transmit child pornography instantly and anonymously to one another and experience the comfort of a reassuring support group. Worse yet, modern encryption technology also makes it possible for all these transmissions to be hidden in virtually unbreakable code. Is there enough funding available to keep up with these people?

Another issue is that looking at the statistics, it is not the true "pedophile" who is lurking in the electronic darkness, but someone more sophisticated and dangerous - a male with a taste for younger women, teenagers. These teenagers can be swayed with talk of relationships, and presents etc. The statistics hold this out to be true: The offender gave or offered victim money or gifts 47% (52), and the victim was in love or felt close to offender 50% (60). No parent wants to deny their child the emotional growth that is experienced during adolescence, but by the same token, parents whould be far more aware of what their child is doing and exactly how much the odds are stacked against the parents in this regard.

Their website provides more warning signs that a child may be involved in an online relationship - a case of closing the barn door after the horse has fled. It is paramount to preempt children and make them aware of their surroundings in the digital world.

This issue is not easily solved; however, and as with all efforts at enforcement, severe regulation only drives the problem deeper underground and out of the light. The one theme is that a) parents need to become more involved on the front end in order to help their children learn to spot potential predators, and b) the government and the private sector need to come together to create software and statutes that are ironclad and will withstand any attacks by groups such as the ACLU. Lastly, police forces need to continue to train and enforce though pro-active investigations. These investigations are the sole true buffer between sex-offenders and young people using the Internet.

NOTE: the court cases cited by this article may be accessed via the Internet by following the hyperlink contained in the Footnotes. A particular footnote may be navigated to by clicking on the footnote reference located in the document.

Imagine that today at school Lindsey, a determined sixth grader, had a lesson concerning the President and the White House. Her teacher, at the end of the lecture, mentions that the White House has a web site, an area devoted just for kids and that the students can look up the site at home at http://www.whitehouse.gov.

The site whitehouse.com was originally created in 1997 as a place for uncensored discussion on government policies, but the owner quickly learned that running a pornographic website was much more profitable than political commentary.

The Internet has come to play an ever increasing important role in the everyday lives of Americans. Today, the majority of children in the United States use the Internet. From 1997 to 2001, the percentage of American children using the Internet increased from approximately one-third to two-thirds.[2] The importance of the Internet as a commercial vehicle is projected to increase phenomenally in the future.

Cybersquatting is the registration of a domain name that is another entity's famous mark or trademark in an attempt to profit from selling the mark back to the owner of the trademark or rightful user of the famous mark.[5] On the Internet, there is an ongoing struggle between the owners of trademarks and the bad faith use of confusingly similar domain names.

DNS makes it possible to type into a browser the name "www.yahoo.com" instead of "216.109.117.106" to enable a computer to download Yahoo!'s home page. To register a domain name, a fee must be paid to any of a number of private domain registrars that compete with each other.

The ubiquitous ".com" in a domain name refers to the top level domain (TLD) and indicates what zone the domain is located in. DNS resolves domain names from right to left so that when a request for yahoo.com is made, the DNS server knows to search for "yahoo" in the ".com" directory. The TLD ".com" (pronounced dot-com) is an abbreviation for "commercial" and is intended to be used by commercial web sites.

Because cyberpirates are normally free-riding on the famous nature of a trademark and not attempting to sell a competing product, traditional trademark law often times provides little help to the legitimate owner of the trademark.

The United States Senate defined cybersquatting as "the bad-faith and abusive registration of distinctive marks as Internet domain names with the intent to profit from the goodwill associated with such marks."[13a] The Senate cited as a prime example of cybersquatting the registration of every possible combination of "mobile-exxon" by a speculator after Mobile and Exxon announced a proposed merger in 1998. [13b] The paradigmatic case of cybersquatting involves essentially a rip-off artist beating to the punch the owner of a trademark by registering the mark as a domain name and extorting an exorbitant fee to transfer the domain name to the trademark owner.

However, registrars such as Network Solutions also provide private registrations to registrants where the the personal information contained in the whois database is an alternative contact - not the actual owner of the registration.[27] Although Network Solutions touts this option as a means to protect a registrant's privacy, it also allows typosquatters to obscure their identity making it more difficult for trademark owners to take action against them.

Although the name dizney.com does resolve to a server on the Internet, when a user navigates to the address a blank web page opens.(http://www.dizney.com). Either DHL may have planned on typosquatting and has not gotten around to it or maybe DHL has had second thoughts about the practice.

The complainant submits the complaint to the UDRP provider. If the complaint meets the requirements of the UDRP the provider forwards the complaint to the respondent. The respondent has 20 days to submit their answer to the complaint after it has been forwarded to them. The panel bases their decision on the complaint and answer and may seek further input from the parties based on their sole discretion funneled through a case administrator. No unilateral communications between the panel and the parties are permitted.

Arbitration and Mediation Center to offer alternative dispute resolution services to resolve international commercial disputes, especially concerning intellectual property. One of the services they offer is resolving domain name disputes.[36] Although only one of many providers authorized by ICANN to resolve disputes under the UDRP, the WIPO is better situated to resolve many of these disputes due to its international character.

JK Rowling, author of the popular Harry Potter book series, successfully had typosquatted domain names transferred to her from Alvaro Collazo of Colonia, Uruguay in a UDRP proceeding administered by the WIPO. Ms. Rowling had registered the trademark JK Rowling in numerous countries to protect her rights to the use of the name.

Zuccarini argued that his use of the domain names were fair and lawful because he was attempting to exercise his First Amendment rights in protesting the joecartoon.com website. Mr. Zuccarini's argument that he was making a political statement was a sham. Following receipt of "cease and desist" letters from Mr. Shields, Mr. Zuccarini replaced the commercial content of the websites with a "political statement" protesting the violent nature of joecartoon.com and its potential adverse effects upon children.[52] Mr.

Note that navigation through intellectual property law and the procedure of the federal court system is a difficult task and quite impressive for a layperson to execute successfully. Such effort would require a significant investment in time and study.

If the court finds that use of the gripe site domain was used with the bad faith intent to profit from use of the trademark, then the court may find that the ACPA applies and the registrant of the domain will be exposed to its penalties. Such was the case in the lawsuit Coca-Cola v. Purdy decided by the United States Court of Appeals for the Eighth Circuit in 2004.[69] The defendant registered domain names containing famous trademarks such as "drinkcoke.com."

United States Supreme Court has yet to hear a case based on the TDNA and has only mentioned it in passing.[74] Therefore, it still remains an open question of whether the Act will survive constitutional scrutiny under the First Amendment of the Unites States Constitution, guaranteeing the right to free speech.

Although the TDNA may provide an effective deterrent in preventing cyberpirates from misdirecting Internet visitors to sites featuring obscene material, it still leaves open to cyberpirates any other means of exploiting these tactics that does not expose Internet users to obscenity. Whether the federal government may take further action against typosquatters other than Mr. Zuccarini is still left to be seen. Many of the popular children's entertainment figures that Mr.

There exists today a tension on the Internet between the desire to make it a safe environment for all ages to explore, transact business and a place where there can be the free and open exchange of ideas and opinions. There will always be profiteers willing to make a quick buck at any cost that will not bat an eye at exposing children and others to undesirable content. The TDNA gives the federal government the power to clamp-down on some of the worst of these profiteers. However, for the Internet to be a free and open forum, there will always be the risk of running into unsavory content and confusion. Users of the Internet must come to realize the open nature of the technology and be prepared for unwanted content. To protect children, parents must closely supervise their children's use of the Internet or invest in effective filtering products to prevent their children from running into objectionable content.

This is a simplified explanation of DNS - there is also other functionality provided such as providing for aliases and multiple addresses for one domain name (try opening up a command prompt on your PC and entering the command "nslookup www.yahoo.com" and a small sampling of the IP addresses in use for Yahoo! will be displayed).

This paper will look at what these changes may be and how they may be handled within the legal community. Interestingly, there is very little published case law regarding the legal implications of this change.

Although little case law exists, many individuals including, physicians and lawyers, have written on the topic and even developed potential guidelines to structure this new patient / physician relationship.

E-Health can be divided into telemedicine and cybermedicine although, similar, each represents a distinct concept, with different purposes. Each embodies different legal and policy considerations. Proper regulatory, legal and ethical policies will need to be developed for both.

The federal government has also supported the technology by the enactment of three laws, The Telecommunications Reform Act of 1996, the Balanced Budget Act of 1997 and the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act. These laws were either enacted or amended to help regulate the practice of telemedicine at the Federal level.

This paper will look at some of these and will focus on the practice of medicine on the Internet or via communication with patients through e-mail. This is the area of cybermedicine that raises not only the most questions, but also has probably the greatest liability.

Health care has been slow to join this proliferation of newer technologies. But as it does join in this evolution, one may hear "take two aspirin and e-mail me in the morning" and the future is likely to look like this: sitting in front of the computer screens with video cameras attached, patients and doctors will converse or leave messages. The doctor will examine a rash, monitor an electrocardiogram, or assess the patients affect.

Voice recognition programs will transcribe all communications, including interactions in the doctors office into an electronic medical record shared by doctors and patients. For patients, complex medical language in doctors notes will link automatically to explanations. Other links will lead to educational material relevant to the diagnosis, medication, or test. Patients and doctors will respond to one anothers note, offering elaborations and corrections. Doctors will distribute reminders about preventive measures and gather organized feedback from their patients. Patients will prepare, rank order and forward questions for their next virtual or actual encounter.

With this small glimpse into the future, one can only ask what is the problem? The problem resides largely with the uncharted waters that such a revolution brings. There are many questions regarding the ethical, financial and legal implications of the practice of medicine via these new communication devices. Some of these questions include: Is it possible to provide quality medical care (standard of care) without being able to do a physical exam, take an interactive medical history or lay hands on ones patient? What accountability do patients have in their own care when accessing these newer technologies for their health care? Do physicians have a lesser accountability or a greater one? How will the legal community view this new method of practicing medicine? Are there greater malpractice risks associated with cybermedicine or are the risks lower? Who creates the law, the State where the patient is or where the physician resides or is licensed? Is this only a State issue or is it a Federal issue crossing multiple national and international boundaries? Although these are only some of the questions, many more exist. These questions and others still wait to be answered, as clinical outcomes are evaluated and as legal issues arise and case law is created.

A recent Harris poll revealed that 90% of surveyed respondents would welcome the opportunity to communicate with their doctors by e-mail, with 56% of those surveyed stating that the ability to communicate with their doctors electronically would influence their choice of doctor.

CyberMedicine is a real issue of a large magnitude. This new method of practicing medicine raises several questions that will need to be addressed by the medical and legal communities if the practice of CyberMedicine is to become a transformational technology that has the potential to increase access to health care for many, and to improve patient education and adherence to their medical regimens. See Table 2. Theoretically, cybermedicine could allow for lower costs, improved medical documentation and overall improvement in the quality of care delivered to patients.

The legal issues of cybermedicine will eventually be defined, and structured standards will likely be developed that will provide guidance to practitioners. These will be discussed. Similar standards will need to be developed around ethical issues in the practice of cybermedicine.

Ethical standards that have been in place for many years in many of the medical specialties cannot easily be translated into the practice of cybermedicine. Potential breaches in ethical standards around cybermedicine may also result in future litigation.

Early in the development of cybermedicine it was recognized that besides the potential legal issues, there were clear ethical issues with the practice of medicine in this new era of electronic communication. These new ethical challenges arise from differences in the structure of the professional relationship that exists between the cyber-patient and cyber-physician.

These internet sites provided treatment via email. Questions are submitted by patients and trained psychologists and psychiatrists guarantee short and quick answers for twenty dollars a question. The question that arises is; does a professional relationship exist under such an arrangement? If it does, do the patients truly understand what they are purchasing for their money? Neither of these sites offered information regarding the nature and limits of the e-mail relationship.

One of the obvious ethical issues regarding the use of email in the practice of psychotherapy, and for that matter, other forms of cybermedicine is the lack of awareness that the patient may have regarding the confidentiality of the information that is being shared across the Internet. It has been well established that information in electronic formats is easily accessible by others, including employers unless it is protected. Without appropriate informed consent and understanding by the patient of the limitations and risk of cybermedicine it is likely that patients are going to be misled regarding the value, safety and confidentiality of the information they are receiving, or the product that they are purchasing.

It has become increasing popular for patients to access health care via the Internet and attempt to connect via e-mail to their physicians. Physicians, however, have been slow to use e-mail to communicate with their patients. Several reasons exist for this including concerns regarding confidentiality, reimbursement issues, fear of being overloaded with email, and lastly, a fear of the legal implications that email may bring. There have been no published cases of malpractice related to the use of email. There is however, a fear that e-mail could be used against a physician in future malpractice cases. Legal issues that could impact cybermedicine and will be discussed include fraud and abuse, medical malpractice, legal issues surrounding Internet Medical Call Centers and the use of e-mail in the practice of medicine.

The Federal government has established a large body of law that governs the financial relationships that providers can have with payers. These laws are in place to prevent conflict of interest that may interfere with the Patient-Physician relationship. As healthcare organizations consider entering into e-health activities like telemedicine and cybermedicine, fraud and abuse laws like the False Claims Act, the Anti-Kickback laws and the Stark laws need to be considered.

One can see that the law does permit for a patient-physician relationship to exist in cyberspace under some defined conditions, and this permits the establishment of the first requirement, a duty by the physician to care for the patient.

What then are therapists obligations? There are a number of questions that may arise in this scenario. Without the benefit of a patients history including medical, psychiatric and criminal records it would be nearly impossible for the clinician to make an educated assessment of the likely risk that this patient may pose to himself or others. Can the therapist make an accurate assessment without really having established a relationship with the patient?

One should always assume that e-mail is not confidential and can be difficult to maintain private without adhering to some standard security practices to help insure privacy of information. Some have referred to e-mail as electronic postcards since the information contained in them is virtually available for anyone to see. E-mail communications may be stored on other computers as they are routed through the Internet and routinely e-mails are retained indefinitely by some institutions, this virtually makes it impossible to assure the real time or future confidentiality of electronic communications.

Several high profile breaches in confidentiality in electronic communications have occurred in the recent past. In the medical arena in June 2001 Eli Lily and Company sent out the email addresses of 600 patients who were taking Prozac.

HIPAA has provided for increased awareness and accountability to insure confidentiality of patient information. However, the problem with the HIPAA regulations is that they are to hard to understand and difficult to implement.

Non-compliance with HIPAA can be associated with significant penalties including fines of up to 250,000 dollars and up to ten years imprisonment. So although HIPAA has done much to improve confidentiality, it is evident that this regulation has also placed a significant obstacle to the development of E-Health.

In September 2004, DeKalb County CEO Vernon Jones denied allegations he ordered criminal background checks on political foes, reporters, and top police officials. The background checks were conducted between March and August of this year. These background checks were requested from the Georgia Bureau of Investigation (GBI) online database through a DeKalb County police computer terminal.

The type of background checks conducted on these individuals, a drivers query, are computerized queries routinely done when a vehicle is stopped for a traffic violation. The check searches the status of the drivers license, outstanding warrants, and probation and parole status. In addition, the search accesses the Federal Bureau of Investigations (FBI) Crime Information Center.

County controversy is not the only case involving government and police officials conducting background checks on citizens that has made headlines in the past few years. Another line of cases involves police officers running the tags of attractive females in order to obtain their personal information.

However, the court held that defense attorneys are not considered a law enforcement agency under the statute therefore they are not authorized to receive the GCIC reports. The court further determined that the prosecution is prohibited from releasing the GCIC reports to defense attorneys unless there is written consent or fingerprints from each potential juror. Therefore, at least in Georgia, prosecutors have unfettered access to the potential criminal backgrounds of jurors while defense attorneys can only receive the information if they obtain the consent of each juror. It appears that this statute blatantly favors the state and gives them an advantage in the selection of jurors.

Ann. 19.-2-389(A)(1) was challenged. The statute authorized criminal background checks for the purposes of administration of criminal justice. The court noted that voir dire is part of the administration of criminal justice and a jurors criminal background can be relevant in regards to whether he can be unbiased. Like Williams, the court held the prosecutors could run background checks on potential jurors under this statute but defense attorney may not because he is not an officer or employee of a criminal justice agency.

In Tagala v. State,                     [13] the court noted that Alaska Statute 12.62.030(a) provides that criminal justice information can only be used for law enforcement purposes. The defense asserted that the use of computer-generated criminal records by a prosecutor during the jury selection process is not for law enforcement purposes because it neither controls nor prevents crime. The court disagreed and concluded law enforcement includes activities of criminal prosecution therefore the prosecutor did not violate the statute. However, unlike the previous cases, the Alaska court also ruled that the prosecutor must share the criminal records at the defenses request.

In an attempt to restrict government entities from unauthorized use, the statute states that a governmental agency must comply with certain restrictions when collecting personally identifiable information.

These steps include identifying the governmental website operator, how he or she may be contacted, a summary of how the information collected is going to be used, and the procedures a user may follow to access personally identifiable information. Utah has also enacted the Government Records Access and Management Act (GRAMA) which allows the public to access certain government records, with the help of governmental entities, subject to restrictions.

The statute also imposes a civil penalty of five thousand dollars for the misuse or unauthorized release of records. The Washington Statute provides for strong protection of the confidentiality of private records which citizens and businesses may have on file in an unemployment office. While there seem to be a number of bureaucratic obstacles (application, verification, and service of notice) to overcome, perhaps this is what is necessary to provide adequate protection to citizens and businesses unless there is an emergency criminal investigation. Further, the bureaucracy slows the process of retrieving information that should be challenging to access without proper justification.

Although it appears that states are attempting to solve the problem of unauthorized access by government officials, if one scopes the daily news, it is evident that the problem is not being resolved. Local governments need to keep a closer eye on their police departments - government agencies notorious for illegally performing criminal background checks and abusing their access to private records. While most people would favor tighter controls regarding access to their private information, few realize that personal information is so readily and easily available.

In Virginia, an illegal criminal background check is a misdemeanor with a maximum penalty of six months in jail and a thousand dollar fine. A second officer, Alvin M. Feltner, in the same department, was also charged with one count of unauthorized dissemination of criminal history information.

The police officers in Purcellville were utilizing the Virginia Criminal Information Network (which cannot be accessed by lay people), a computer system operated through the State Police of Virginia, which grants access to criminal records. As this example shows, unauthorized background checks are not just happening in large, corrupt cities with notoriously corrupt police departments. The Purcellville Police Department consists of only 7 policemen, including the two mentioned above. The two-square mile town only has 2,500 residents.

Even after Meneley conducted the criminal background check, the plaintiffs voiced their opinion regarding the petition. In fact, they went to the media and spoke about the progression of the petition and Meneleys use of the Interstate Identification Index. Therefore, there was no violation of the plaintiffs constitutional rights, and no basis for a 1983 action.

Encouraging open debate in the political arena is an important aspect of our society. The threat of a lawsuit might discourage individuals from participating in politics, a result that society should seek to avoid.

If Francesca were alive today she could track her lover's photos from his homepage instead of schlepping to the Piggly Wiggly to purchase the latest National Geographic.  Even if you are stuck in Peoria,[1] the family can gather around the key board, open up your Happy Meals and view some of the Best Photography in the world.

This paper presents a sampling of opinions and predictions about the application of copyright law to Net photos in relation to contemporary photographers; stock photo agencies; publishers; and Net users.

Contemporary Photographers are creating homepages to display portfolios on the Net to advertise for jobs, learn new skills, network with colleagues, and provide pleasure to the viewing public.  Stacy Rosenstock's portfolio is an example of the excellent photo art available for viewing on the Net.

The Net is a unique medium for photographers, offering one-on-one feedback from viewers, fellow photographers and critics on a scale not available from the typical art gallery or magazine venue.  The scale is larger in terms of the number of potential viewers and the boarderless international viewing audience who may choose to browse.

A photographer choosing the Net as a display venue can also use the net to learn about copyrights.  The American Society for media Photographers offers easy to read copyright information in the that Copyright Guide for Photographers .

Net photogs appear generous with fellow internetters when it comes to non-commercial use of photographs.  On the other hand, no one likes someone else making money of their work.  Photographer Philip Greenspun describes his frustration with unauthorized use of his pictures in, The Somewhat Nasty Copyright Notice . As an artist he not only wants to get paid, but desires a certain quality level for his photos.  On the other hand, Mr. Greenspun embraces the camaraderie of ``fellow internetters'` by authorizing redistribution of his text for non commercial purposes and requesting a source attribution and hyperlink for photos.

The camaraderie among photographers is further evidenced by the wellspring of resources for photographers on the Net.  The  Michigan Press Photographers Association  brings photographers together to share information, as does the  Atlanta Photo Journalism Seminar   and numerous other resources.

A special note to photographers establishing homepages from work.  Two authors warn of creating works using an employer's Internet connection because work-related products may be determined to be the property of the employer.[29]  For example, Allen Rose, Ordinary Photographer is employed by the Fort Worth Star-Telegram.  Mr. Rose's weekly photo series is copyrighted to the newspaper.  In a related matter, notice that Mr. Rose chose the location ``arose'` rather than something like ``telestar'` for his homepage locator.  Employees should be careful in choosing web locators so as to avoid trademark problems similar to MTV v. Curry, see Trademarks Along the Infobahn.

A traditional stock photo agency publishes catalogues with thumbprint photos which customers view and then purchase camera ready prints.[32]  Stock agencies publicize photos and also negotiate licenses in exchange for royalties.[33]  See  the STOCKPHOTO web site to learn about stock agencies. One advantage of an on-line agency may be the capacity to for customers to download photos immediately.  Another advantage to on-line agencies may be enhanced research resources for locating the right kind of photo among the thousands in stock.

State shootings wherein the photo was altered from the original shot by photographer, John Filo on May 4, 1970. The alteration eliminated a pole in the center of the photograph. David Friend, Life's Director of Photography says it was a done unbeknownst to the editors.  MPPA member Brian Masck responds, saying that credibility in the source of a photo is critical to photojournalism.

Mr. Kobre notes that a recent edition of The National Enquirer displayed a doctored photo of a battered Nicole Brown Simpson.[86]  The Enquirer noted in small type that the photo was a recreation.[87]  Rather than shying away from the technology and the potential abuse of altering on-line news photos, Mr. Kobre believes that increased photographic access assists in the discovery of truth.

With regard to replication, transmission and alteration, some Net users behave as if all Net information is up for grabs whether or not the material is copyrighted and has a copyright notice.[95]  Celebrity fan club postings like the  Brad Pitt Web Site are examples of users posting copyrighted photos to the Net.

Internet. Children while surfing for rated G information are finding information that is rated X. Additionally, pedophiles are taking advantage of children's trust on-line and then setting up meetings and raping children.

Movies are voluntarily rated PG, R and X so that children cannot see certain movies without adult supervision, or not until they turn a certain age. Yet, the Internet gives this free access back to the children, if parents do not closely monitor their children's activity on-line. Unfortunately, parents are not taking responsibility for their children on-line so Congress is actively working to fill the parents' role. As of October 1994, the Internet constitutes 2.5 million host computers with 7.8 million users. (6)  These are interconnected computer networks from all over the world and no one can control what anyone else sends or posts to the Internet.

The show talked about Internet sex. Net sex is when people "meet" on-line and tell one another what to do to their bodies and in response what they are doing to their own bodies. Before logging on there is a warning saying to log off if the user is under 18 but this does not prevent children from continuing into the program.  On-line sites exist talking about net sex and sex in general.  These sites sometimes do not even have a warning to prevent children from accessing the information, not that a mere warning will prevent children from continuing surfing anyway.

Children are even trusting enough to run away from home with the help of people they meet in the chat rooms. For instance, a thirteen year-old girl, Tara Noble, ran away from her Kentucky home to Los Angeles to meet someone whom she met on America On-Line through the chat line.  (24)  Thankfully, she was fortunate enough to call the FBI and is now home safely. Another example is a 15-year-old boy who went from Seattle to San Francisco using a bus ticket sent by an America On-Line gay chat room "friend." He too is fortunate and home safely. A parent taking responsibility for their children's surfing can prevent these horrible incidents.

Some information may be offensive to some people while others would not screen this information out of their child's surfing path. One possible example are sites to gay organizations that are not sexually graphic.  (27)  If parents do not control the Internet then the government will and they may censor information that you would not otherwise have censored. The Internet is dangerous for children but also has some wonderful benefits. As Robert Sudlow, a Georgia State University law student, so eloquently stated in one e-mail message "[p]arents should remember that opportunities for learning and growth increase with risk of being exposed to POTENTIALLY harmful materials."

Furthermore, the Internet is the way of the future. People are on-line conducting business, doing research, networking and even financial planning. (36)  Children will need to use this technology in school and in their future jobs, so parents should want their children educated on this latest technological development. Georgia State University's College of Law introduced a new class this summer, "Internet and the Law." Professor Patrick Wiseman taught the students using a private chat room to meet a few times during the semester. Additionally, the students were assigned discussion topics on legal issues like encryption which that they led class discussions through e-mail with their classmates.

In contrast, Newt Gingrich, Speaker of the House, although against pornography, does not support Exon's bill because it would violate the peoples' first amendment right. (59)  The subcommittees in the House have held hearings on this issue. (60)  The House Science Committee hearing on cyber porn is on the Internet. (61)  So the freedom of the Internet is on the House of Representatives shoulder. At the time of this paper the House has not voted on the CDA but a wide debate is occurring on whether the House will pass it.

The Internet is here to stay. Our children will continue to use the Internet as a tool for education and entertainment. We, as responsible adults, must take responsibility for our children and monitor their activities on-line. America is not a police state and the government cannot control what people "say" in cyberspace, therefore, we must control what our children read.

Every parent will monitor the Internet differently; each parent will differ on their definition of cybersmut. That is the right of every American to bring their children up as they see proper and the government should not be telling us, the American people, what is cybersmut and what is acceptable for our children.

As individuals, corporations and governments build in and populate that plane of existence known as cyberspace, security becomes an increasingly important issue.  Society, at least in developed countries, has become dependent on access to reliable information for the operation of economic systems (stock markets, banking, accounting etc.), and almost every other part of modern life.  The internet has accelerated the pace at which these structures grow and become interconnected.

As societies build more in cyberspace, the harm resulting from destruction of or tampering with these structures increases.  Information and information systems can be "attacked," "stolen," and "destroyed."  For example, a person's credit card data can be plucked out of a transmission stream and used by the thief.  Corporate secrets can be stolen by the competition.  Military plans can be accessed by the spies of other nations.  A virus (computer program that attaches itself to a "host" program and may have great destructive potential) is another constant threat to computer systems.  Also, hackers often have the ability to penetrate highly protected computer systems.  The list of risks goes on.  In response, computer scientists have implemented an increasingly sophisticated array of protection hardware and software such as password systems, firewalls, virus detection programs and encryption systems.   In the future, criminals, terrorists, law enforcement officials, militaries, corporations and average citizens will use these things to attack and defend information systems.

Encryption is one of the many methods of protecting the privacy of data, and is the focus of this paper.  For some time now, a debate has raged concerning the use and distribution of encryption technology.  Should citizens be free to use any type of encryption system?  Should government promulgate the use of a "standard" encryption?  Should government retain a key to private systems, whereby they can, pursuant to a warrant, decode private transmissions for law enforcement purposes?  Should export of encryption software be prohibited?  To what extent do encryption systems impact on national security?  This paper will explore some of the debate in the United States and briefly survey the debate internationally.

Because the U.S. considers cryptographic technology to be a threat to national security, export controls have been put into place, preventing software manufacturers from exporting many different types of software packages. This is accomplished under the authority of section 38 of the Arms Export Control Act.  The law allows the State Department to deny export of any item on the Munitions List, and encryption technology is on this list (along with grenades, warships, tanks...).  (note 4)  Breaking this law entails a maximum criminal sentence of $1 million and ten years imprisonment.

Advocates of export control have three main arguments.  The first is that export controls sharply limit the availability of the highest quality encryption software (the type that can only be broken by using many computers working in concert for a period of perhaps years...).  The second argument is that export control decreases the availability of low-level encryption software that hinders the ability of U.S. intelligence operations to sort out messages as they are intercepted (obviously, intelligence agents could more easily deal with unencrypted data transmissions).  The last argument is that the export control law results in companies applying for a permit to export, which allows the government to survey technological advances by examining the products.

Export control has drawbacks, especially for U.S. software producers.  Because the demand for computer security in both the business and private sectors is high, software companies have made encryption technology part of many of the top-selling software packages. The integration of encryption technology into popular software compounds the export restriction problem for the software companies because it increases the number of products that they are prevented from selling in foreign markets.  Also, most other countries (with some exceptions such as France) allow the export of encryption technology, so U.S. companies are at risk of losing their share of foreign markets to software companies in countries with no export controls.   Even so, the National Security Agency shows no signs of changing its position on the subject.  As a result, some software companies are lobbying Congress to lift the export controls (note 5).

Export control is probably an ineffective solution to the threat of other nations employing encryption software to protect their secrets.  It may be a viable temporary solution in that it reduces the volume and availability of encryption products in foreign markets, but at what cost?  Foreign software producers are already producing these products, so eventually everyone who has the money and the need will have very strong security.  Meanwhile, U.S. software companies stand to lose market share in one of the most important international markets. Intelligence gathering operations should concentrate on planning for the most likely scenario--that of widespread use of data encryption products, and U.S. policy should turn away from temporary solutions such as export controls.

A secure information infrastructure is vital to any developed country's national security.  The U.S. government set up an Information Infrastructure Task Force to study the situation and it produced a paper, NII Security: The Federal Role.  The study reccomended that the government research and work with industry to develop a plan of action in case of an emergency impacting the information infrastructure.  The study suggests that government agencies go beyond security devices such as encryption and begin training personel in security procedures.  Finally, the study reccomended developing a public-key encryption system for government use.

The Clinton Administration proposed a plan to implement key-escrow encryption as a government standard.  A key-escrow system basically works as a standard public-key encryption system except the government will retain a key.  The plan proposes that the National Institute of Standards and Technology and the Department of Treasury's Automated Systems Division would be the keyholders.  The key holders would be authorized to provide a key to law enforcement agencies only pursuant to a valid court order.  The Clipper Chip is the version of this system that applies to telecommunications.  The government plans a seperate system for computer data transmissions.  Both Clipper and EES (Escrowed Encryption Standard) would be hardware-based to prevent  tampering and/or discovery of how the algorithm works.

The Clipper uses the "Skipjack" algorithm which was designed by the National Security Agency and is classified.  The fact that scientists outside the government are unable to test the method for reliability has lead to distrust of the system by many.  Some have speculated that the system may not be as impenetrable as claimed, or that in addition to the key-escrow feature, the government has designed a secret trapdoor into the system.  In answer to some of these challenges, the government allowed a team of independent computer scientists to do some limited testing of the Skipjack algorithim.  Dorothy Denning's article, Resolving the Encryption Dilemma:  The Case for Clipper, argues that there is no significant risk that Clipper is breakable or contains a trapdoor.  But, a limited testing of Skipjack under controlled conditions will not be an acceptable substitute to rigorous testing by independent scientists who are chosen independently of the government.

The Electronic Frontier Foundation is one of the more vocal opponents to a government created Escrowed Encryption Standard.  In its policy statement on electronic privacy, the group enumerated very specific conditions for approval of the Clipper Chip.  The EEF would accept Clipper as a completely voluntary alternative to strong encryption technology developed by the software industry.  An escrow requirement would not be acceptable to the EEF.  Before these conditions could possibly be met, the government would need to lift export controls.  Additionally, the EEF advocates (1) public debate on encryption, (2) civilian encryption standards that are published and exposed to rigorous testing and challenges, and (3) encryption technology as part of the national information infrastructure.

Many people have expressed the opinion (on newsgroups etc.) that the government is planning to make Clipper the only alternative for encrypted communications.  The government would first flood the market with Clipper-based encryption products.  Export controls would operate to prevent the development of competing encryption products.  Additional pressure to use Clipper would result when the government adopts Clipper as its standard for information security, because companies dealing with the government would be forced to use it.  Even foreign companies would be forced to use Clipper when communicating with American firms.  Thus, in this scenario, The U.S. government would acquire access to all of the secure information within its borders.  Some have speculated that after Clipper gains some popularity, Congress will simply pass a law forbidding the use of any other type of encryption technology.

International law has not played much of a role in the development of the law of the internet; nevertheless, the course taken by other countries with respect to privacy and encryption may determine the value of the internet as a global forum.  If the U.S. Congress decides to control the method and extent of computer privacy by mandating key-escrow encryption, other countries may potentially follow that example.  Thus far, most countries have not begun to regulate the internet, but many are contemplating measures to moderate the internet.  A recent survey details specific restrictions on the internet thus far affecting privacy. Canada allows free export of strong encryption software, but is contemplating legislation that would restrict privacy on the internet.  In Canada, the use of encryption is not allowed on Intellec or Fidonet.  The survey also reveals that encryption is freely used throughout most of Europe.  France is the exception; there, you must apply with the government to use encryption technology and, if the government allows you to use it, you must turn over a key.  In Germany, right wing parties are in favor of restrictive measures, although currently, German law allows unrestricted use of encryption technology.  China and North Korea do not allow the use of encryption technology at all.

Although the U.S. government has not thus far restricted the privacy of individuals and corporations through key-escrowed encryption, there remains a strong possibility that it will do so in the futuure.  Congress has already shown a willingness to restrict speech on the internet, so it seems likely that many legislators would be willing to enact further restrictions, especially considering that the arguments involve national security issues Individual rights have been disregarded many times in the past where national security was an issue.  The executive branch has also demonstrated it view through the Clipper Chip proposal.  Some commentators have suggested that the Supreme Court could potentially find unconstitutional a law banning encrypted speech or even a law requiring key-escrow encryption.  For example, the Court could find that encrypted speech is protected free speech and that forcing people abandon the use of it is like forcing everyone to speak one language.  But, there are many differences between encrypted speech and speech translated to another language, and the court could just as easily determine that banning encrypted speech is not unconstitutional. The Court could also find such laws unconstitutional based on 4th Amendment protection from unrerasonable searches and seizuures.

A recent law review article, The Metaphor is the Key:  Cryptography, the Clipper Chip and the Constitution, points out that where a new technology becomes involved in a legal dilemma, the courts often analogize the new technology to an older one and attempt to apply the same law to the new one.  (Note 6) Thus far, no single metaphor dominates legal thinking about the internet.  So it seems that U.S. law could potentially ban encytpted communications or mandate government access to such communications.

Even if such laws were to be found constitutional, they would be unwise and ineffective as national security measures.  Because it would be technologically infeasible for the government to monitor all communications over the internet, it seems likely that terrorists and spies would continue to use encryption to guard their secrets, while average citizens would abandon the use of encryption.    Similarly, if key-escrowed encryption were mandated, it would be the criminals who would avoid registering a key with the government. Another problem with key-escrow is that there is the potential for great abuse by the key-holders.  The government has been guilty of conducting many illegal wiretaps (and other types of searches) in the past, and there is nothing to prevent such abuses from happening again (with even greater ease).

Encryption technology has progressed to a stage to where, by means of easily obtainable software, communications can be protected  from all attempts to intercept and read them.  The U.S. government has restricted the export of encryption technology at the expense of the software industry, arguing that the ban will prevent the spread of such technology and advance national security interests.  In fact, encryption technology is widely available in other countries and banning the export of it by U.S. software companies only damages the economy.  The government has also demonstrated that it may be willing to require citizens to allow government access to private encrypted commuunications.  This also seems unlikely to advance U.S. national security interests.  People who have a stake in hiding information from the government will simply break the law, at the risk of getting caught.  If governments find that encryption technology is a threat to national security (and it probably is) then they must fight the problem directly--by finding a way to get the information despite the protection of encryption.

In Georgia, "a lawyer may advertise services through public media, such as a telephone directory, newspaper or other periodical, radio or television, or through written communication not involving personal contact".[1] This is limited by O.C.G.A.  10-1-427 which prohibits false or misleading legal advertising in those media.[2] However what about the Internet? How should web sites, home pages, or discussion group contributions on the Internet be classified and regulated? Currently, the Georgia State Bar is considering the adoption of stricter rules on lawyer advertising in an effort to prevent further harm that bad legal adverting inflicts on the legal profession.[3] At this point, the Georgia Bar is working to draw adequate empirical data in order to justify restrictions on commercial speech.[4] While states are taking a renewed interest in the ethics of legal advertising, the issue of where advertising on the Internet, or "Netvertising", fits in needs to be included.

This paper will discuss these questions, consider various judical and legislative efforts to answer them, and propose rules and statutes that might help states better regulate the growing field of netvertising.

In that case the attorney went to the hospital to see if a recent accident victim would consider employing him as her lawyer in the matter. The prospective client, who had not yet graduated from high school, was in traction as a result of her injuries at the time. The Court stated that "in-person solicitation of professional employment by a lawyer does not stand on a par with truthful advertising about the availability and terms of routine legal services."[16] The Court went on to uphold the attorney's discipline by the state bar for his actions.

If an attorney's web site is considered a form of advertising, then it must conform to the lawyer advertising statutes of the state of the attorney and possibly of all states where the web site may be viewed.

On the other hand, one could argue that even the submission of free information in a web site, home page or discussion contribution, if improperly used, is not only advertising, but in fact, is an illegal, bait and switch type of advertising. In the case of Kentucky Bar Assoc. v. Gangwish, bait and switch scheme was held to be an illegal form of advertising that breached ethical rules prohibiting fraud and dishonesty.[23] In Gangwish, an attorney advertised a service wherein he would assist in finding peoples' parents. However, when people responded to the newspaper ad, he would reply and only then would he reveal himself as a lawyer. In actuality, the service under which the attorney advertised did not exist. Similarly these web sites or home pages that purely give information may not even identify the attorney as the source of the information and thus run into the Gangwish problem.

Additionally some web sites or home pages "may create an image of the owner as an expert in a field, that the site owner is a lawyer, thus enhancing his/her image having legal expertise in a specific area."[24] This also might be construed as misleading, unethical, and potentially illegal.

The view held by many Internet lawyers that a web site or home page is merely informative is beginning to change. Web sites and home pages are evolving away from merely being creatures of information.

As a result, for the purposes of analogyzing the existing laws and restrictions on current advertising mediums like print, radio, television and how they apply to netvertising, the content of web sites, home pages and discussion contributions on the Internet must be examined carefully. The types of content found on web sites and home pages fall on a continuum. At one end of the continuum there exist web sites and home pages that are exclusively comprised of free information. However on the other end of the continuum, there exits the purest form of netvertising, the straight forward ad for legal services.

Does the web site become advertising based on the information included on the lawyer's home page? For instance, if the attorney was merely attempting to provide free legal information, and did not list his or her name or even the firm's name, would it be advertising? By adding the firm name, real address, and e-mail address, does the "free information" turn into legal advertising? The courts have not yet addressed these issues.

Another issue to consider is whether or not the informative part of an attorney's home page, and the section which lists the attorney's e-mail address, guest book, and qualifications may be severable.

This is not so easy on a home page. What if an attorney were to establish two separate home pages, one with general legal information without their name, etc., and one which gave information publicizing the law firm, listing fees, etc. If the two pages linked together, it could be said that the line between the two forms of speech was blurred and could be misleading to the public.

This page is designed to provide research sources for technology lawyers, law students, businesses, etc. He has provided various hyperlinks to places on the Internet where legal information can be obtained. There is no "blatant" advertising of his expertise, his services, fees, etc.

Because the layperson may have read the information Mr. Kuester has made available, he or she may consider Mr. Kuester an expert in this area of the law and, because of his access to this information, may contact him for legal representation. For another example, see http://www.digimark.net/radiation.law/ and http://www.benedict.com/fund.htm#fund.

The "radiation" page is slightly more advertising oriented in that it does state that the attorney is available to represent people in areas in which he is experienced and tells people how to contact him. The second URL is to a site with information about copyright law. It has only a link to the developer's resume (http://www.benedict.com/resume.htm#resume).

The site of the Goodman law firm includes fee information and has an internal link from the beginning of the document to the paragraph that explains how to engage the services of the law firm. The site of Carol McGowan gives a list of six reasons people need a lawyer, followed by her name, address, and phone number. Also see the section of the Seamless web site which explains their offering and then invites you to form a business relationship with the firm.

In conclusion, it appears that a home page that only provides accurate general information about the law is not advertising or commercial speech, and is thus not subject to regulation. However, if the general information is followed by an invitation to employ the attorney, the entire page will be considered an advertisement and will be thus subject to regulation. An attorney may also be subject to discipline for fraudulent behavior if he initially hides his identity as the author of the page and then uses it to gain new clients.

The flexibility of the Internet, and the World Wide Web in particular, forces a reevaluation of ethical restrictions. Lawyers are not limited to the equivalent of a newspaper advertisement. Lawyers also indirectly "advertise" by displaying their expertise in discussion groups and chat rooms. The flexibility of the medium brings up new issues.

One evolving issue is whether or not an attorney who offers information on the Internet is "giving legal advice", thereby opening himself up to malpractice claims, the attorney-client privilege, confidentiality and other issues relating to general attorney-client relationships. For instance, see the "Seamless Web" site.. At this site, anyone can get free advice on wills, trusts and estate planning. There is a disclaimer that the advice only pertains to California law, but it is not located at the beginning of the information. It's possible that laypersons from other states may follow this advice in designing their wills, but may not have noticed the state law limitation disclaimer. See also http://starbase.ingress.com/tsw/alawyer/criminal.html for a page concerning criminal law. Would the attorneys who provided this information be liable if the layperson's will were found invalid in their state? This is a frightening and very real concern for many lawyers. It is unknown whether or not malpractice insurance carriers have addressed theses issues. The prudent attorney should carefully read the exclusions listed in their insurance policy to be sure such communications are not excluded.

Also note the part of the disclaimer recited above which states that the information contained in the web site may or may not reflect the most current legal developments. If a person did not know the law had changed after relying to their detriment, could the attorney be liable? Must attorneys who provide information carry the burden of continually searching the case law and legal developments to update their links in order to avoid liability?

If a person sends the attorney a question regarding a particular area of the law and the attorney responds, has the attorney-client relationship been created? If so, have the client and the attorney impliedly waived their right to confidentiality by communication over the Internet where access to such information by others is relatively easy? Does the attorney have the duty to warn the person at the outset that they may give up their right to confidentiality by sending any information to the attorney via e-mail? This is an especially hot topic for attorneys in discussion groups who receive inquiries from laypersons. Does sending a private reply rather than to the group save any privilege?

Attorney A contacts attorney B requesting advice in regards to attorney A's client. The client's name is not disclosed. Attorney B gives advice. Is attorney B later foreclosed from representing or litigating against attorney A's client in a separate matter?

This is a big concern for many attorneys. If attorney B is foreclosed, this tactic could be used by sly attorneys with large corporate clients. Do we want to dissuade attorneys from communicating with each other in discussion groups? This would seem counter to the spirit of cooperation and camaraderie of the legal profession.

Most current advertising mediums such as newspaper, radio and television have a limited jurisdiction or limited receiving audience of the advertisement. In comparison, the Internet has no such jurisdictional boundaries. Once a lawyer or law firm posts an advertisement on the Internet in the form of a web site, home page or discussion contribution, the netvertisement is there to solicit clients from all over the world. The Internet has no station range or circulation limitation and this possess one of the biggest ethical problems with advertising on the Internet. For example, a Georgia lawyer might place an advertisement on a local television station where the broadcast range of that advertisement will not go outside of Georgia and thus not outside the area in which the lawyer is licensed to practice law. However, a Georgia lawyer placing a netvertisement on the Internet will have an advertisement that may be read around the world or at the very least, outside the jurisdiction in which the lawyer is licensed to practice law.

Not only is this misleading, but it is also potentially the unauthorized practice of law. This unethical practice of law issue does arise in the context of traditional advertising, but its effects on netvertising are significantly more prevalent.

"Unfortunately, given the global nature of the Web, it is not inconceivable that an attorney advertising via a Web page could find his/her self charged with practicing law without a license, or with misleading advertising, for a Web advertisement that may comply with one state's advertising rules yet violate another".[39] For example, in Georgia and according to Georgia Bar Standard 6(b) and (c), a written communication to a prospective client must be marked "advertisement" on the envelope of the advertisement and on each and every page.

Also, a copy of any written communication must be kept for four years. However Georgia's ethical rules may not be the same nor comparable to Florida and South Carolina's ethical rules. As a result, lawyers run the risk of violating other state ethical codes when they netvertise on the Internet. So, as the debate unfolds, the issue is whether these strict restrictions or requirements placed on the traditional legal advertising mediums should be applied to advertising on the Internet? And if so how?

Is such a belief truly valid? Because one's practice focuses on civil rights and constitutional issues, the attorney must still be licensed to practice in their state. Simply because the information is provided over the Internet would not seem to convert their state license into a country-wide license. Some guidance from the courts would be helpful.

To assist in applying this standard to multi-media presentations now possible, the section states that "The message means the effect in combination of the spoken word, sound, background, action, symbols, visual image, or any other technique employed . . . ."[43] Although this prohibition fully covers the area of electronic multimedia advertising, it is somewhat vague. What types of presentations would be considered misleading? Would a message stating that a firm won twelve personal injury claims for over $100,000 each be misleading even if it were true?

The Act also establishes a "safe harbor" for electronic advertisement.[50] The Act provides that the provision of information such as specialization, fees for routine services, articles that the attorney has published, and foreign language ability will be presumed to comply with the statute.

If the Bar determines that "substantial evidence of a violation exists", the lawyer still has an additional three days to withdraw the advertisement and still be safeguarded from further action.[53] In practice therefore, an attorney has 31 days from the date of the initial complaint to safely withdraw the advertisement.

If an attorney does not take advantage of these safe harbors, he could be subject to a penalty of up to $5,000 per broadcast that violates the Act.[54] This money is to be paid into a "'Client Security Fund' maintained by the State Bar."[55] The Act makes it clear that this remedy is in addition to any other cause of action that might exist.[56] The Act also requires that a copy of all advertisements be kept for one year.

The primary one is that they establish a category of "electronic media" that purportedly includes computer networks, but the provisions aimed at the category were clearly developed with an eye toward radio and television advertising.

Netvertising is fundamentally different from television and radio advertising. One of the characteristics of broadcast advertising that makes it vulnerable to regulation is the almost passive nature of the receipt of information via the media. A person turns on "Gilligan's Island" and tucked in between scenes is an advertisement for a personal injury lawyer. The person does not seek this information, it is simply broadcast at him. The same is not true for netvertising. People browse web sites looking for information and entertainment. They actively select locations.

On the other hand Netvertising has two characteristics which make it more dangerous than television advertising: it's high information capacity, and it's worldwide character. The economics of Netvertising enable it to provide much more information than would be feasible via television or radio. One law firm has summaries of over twenty cases that it has won (http://tsw.ingress.com/tsw/talf/cases.html).

Even within the area of the Internet there are different methods of communication. Conversation in an IRC channel is much different than a home page or a discussion list. While a strong analogy can be drawn between an IRC channel exchange and a telephone conversation, on the other hand,a home page is a unique form of communication.

An individual or corporation advertises within the state when he places advertising material where he reasonably expects people from the state of Georgia to access it without a clear and conspicuous disclosure that the service is not available to those whose legal issues pertain to the state of Georgia. A statement to the effect that the service is only available to persons whose legal issues pertain to the States of A, B, and C (not including Georgia) will suffice. All advertising material must be clearly labeled as such at the beginning and end of the document (electronic or otherwise).

An individual is qualified to perform a particular legal service if the individual is licensed to practice law in Georgia, or the advertised service concerns solely issues of federal law, will not foreseeably involve appearance in a federal or state court within Georgia, and the attorney conducts no more than 25% of his business with Georgia clients, and the individual is licensed to practice in another state.

A corporation is qualified to perform an advertised legal service if an employee of the corporation is licensed to practice law in Georgia, and that employee will be responsible for performing or directly supervising the provision of the advertised service, or the advertised service concerns solely issues of federal law, and will not foreseeably involve appearance in a federal or state court within Georgia, and the corporation conducts no more than 25% of his business with Georgia clients, and the individual perofrming the work is licensed to practice law in another state.

Advertising material is any combination of sounds, images, and text which could be reasonably expected to increase the likelihood that the person reading the material would select the attorney providing the material as their attorney.

There is a rebuttable presumption that material which gives only general information about the law, and which is scholarly in tone, is not advertising material, even if the material gives the author's name and electronic or postal address and phone number. Such material should be accompanied by a disclaimer placed no further down than the third screen of the web site. Such disclaimer should state that the information is only being provided for general use and is not being provided in the nature of the attorney-client relationship.

There is a rebuttable presumption that information is advertising material where the information gives any indication that the attorney is open to establishing a attorney client relationship or to discussing specific facts, or where an expedited way of contacting the attorney is provided. This includes a situation where a person is invited to register their "visit" to a home page if the attorney ever sends additional material to those registering which would be classified as advertising material under this paragraph.

It is already illegal for a lawyer to include false or misleading material in advertisements.[73] The use of electronic media such as the internet increases the amount of material that may be disseminated and thus requires that more specific direction as to what types of material may be provided be given.

Law Firm and California's restrictions. How is one to know whether the synopsis complies with the restrictions? Note that there are no "losing" cases included. Unless the firm has never lost a case, isn't this in itself inherently misleading?

Direct solicitation of clients either in person, via telephone, or through real time electronic exchange is prohibited. Direct solicitation includes the provision of legal advice if the attorney subsequently establishes an attorney-client relationship with the individual. This paragraph does not apply if the discussion of legal issues is prompted by the prospective client.

The rule which requires attorneys to keep copies for a number of years (four years in Georgia[74]) of all advertisements as they were disseminated is unworkable as to web sites. There is no way to take a "snapshot", if you will, of a web site as it is viewed by persons who use the Internet.

Generally information is not deleted from the site; instead it is added to the site. The current rule should be amended to require attorneys to save a copy of their web site every six months, or prior to the deletion of any material, or prior to a substantial change to the site. The computer file copy could then be kept for the appropriate number of years.

The Internet is a new a complicated medium which creates an entirely new way to communicate and to conduct business. Although there are many issues pertaining to Netvertising that have not been addressed, bar associations and lawyers alike are in need of guidance.

Gender harassment has received a lot of press in the past few years, particularly since Anita Hill's now famous accusations against U.S. Supreme Court Justice Clarence Thomas.  Women seem to be becoming increasingly subject to offensive, sometimes threatening behavior in the workplace, on campuses, and now, on the internet (net).  In fact, it appears that the overwhelming majority of people reporting online harassment (to universities, servers, etc.) are women.

This paper will examine the nature and types of gender harassment occurring on the net.  It will explore possible causes of this online offense, particularly characteristics of the net which make it a fertile ground for proliferation of offensive contacts.  Since styles of communication vary by gender, the paper will address the effect of these different styles on the perceptions of net users.

Further, this paper will explore whether online gender harassment rises to the level of an actionable claim (tort), and will examine some of the inherent problems in pursuing such claims, as well as pursuing criminal charges against offenders.  Finally, several ideas on how to prevent or address harassment will be identified.

The legal definition of harassment is "a course of conduct directed at a specific person that causes substantial emotional distress in such person and serves no legitimate purpose" or  "words, gestures, and actions which tend to annoy, alarm and abuse (verbally) another person." [Black's]   This seemingly vague definition provides little guidance in establishing what behavior might subjectively be construed by another as harassment.

Harassment, when it takes on a threatening tenor and the subject of the harassment is placed in fear, may become actionable not only in civil courts, but criminal courts as well.  Various state and federal statutes regarding harassment and "stalking" have been enacted to attempt to deal with such unwelcome attention, and its harmful effects.  As technology progresses, so have legal regulations and remedies.

Further, the Michigan statute specifically excludes "constitutionally protected activity or conduct that serves a legitimate purpose." [Michigan statute]  This language would seem to address any concerns of statutory infringement on free speech rights.

Finally, the statute defines "stalking" as willful, repeated harassment of another person that causes them to feel "terrorized, frightened, intimidated, threatened, harassed, or molested." [Id.]  This type of charge might be appropriate in the case of multiple hostile e-mails or repeated threats.

A similar analysis made be given to online harassment, which one commentator has characterized as a "clash of two cultures:  the male dominated world of computing and women trying to enter that realm." [Peak]  Seeing cyberspace as their "domain," some men apparently feel that female users must be ready to accept hostility as the price for online participation. [Id.]  This rationalization for open hostility and harassment toward women seems to be analogous to the experiences of women entering traditionally male-dominated professions and trades, particularly during the past three decades.

There are generally two types of harassment on the net -- through electronic mail (e-mail) and during "chats" on an Internet Relay Channel (IRC). [Vang]  These messages take many forms:  inappropriate sexually explicit language; unwelcome questions about one's physical appearance or sexual practices; or threatening or hostile messages.

Communication on the internet differs in many ways from face-to-face or even telephone communication.  These differences, while attractive to some, are believed to contribute to the emergence of online harassment and hostility.

Several sources have documented the relatively low percentages of women in the computer sciences and online in computer networks. This situation, which has been described as a "male dominance" of the net, may contribute to the frequency of harassment of the minority gender.  [See Herring; Shade].

The internet provides an almost unprecedented opportunity to communicate with others while remaining anonymous.  This aspect allows anyone to become their own fantasy -- one can change their looks, personality, lifestyle, income, education, and even their gender with a few key strokes.  One commentator compares the "faceless world of the internet" to a masquerade party. [Peak]  In fact, some users say this is the most attractive feature of online services, and probably drives the popularity of commercial servers.

Further, the anonymity of the net fosters an outlet for outrageous, often sexist or degrading humor that would otherwise be suppressed. [Truong]  One who is inexperienced at dating or relationships may also, even innocently, act inappropriately or aggressively toward someone of the opposite sex.  This seems to be particularly true of young men, who are generally believed to disproportionately contribute to the amount of harassment and hostility on the net.

Face-to-face communication provides a context for the listener, giving them the opportunity to balance the actual content of a message with the facial expressions, intonations, and volume of the speaker.  Absent the visual clues, telephone communications provide the same features, with the added benefit of timing (for example, a middle of the night phone call v. midday).

In contrast, online communication via written text is generally one dimensional.  This problem of text-only communication often leads to misunderstandings and missteps, particularly regarding sexual issues. [Truong]  While several antidotes have been created by users (for example, all caps SHOUTING to emphasize a message; the use of "smiley" faces, such as :-), to temper language; etc.), miscommunications will certainly continue.

It is not only the unique characteristics of the medium for online communications that contribute to the potential for harassment and "stalking" on the net, but perhaps the vulnerabilities and desires of those who choose the internet, or an online service, for their social communications.

Due to the internet's global reach, there is a very real question of whether state or federal courts have the jurisdiction to hear and resolve cases.  The issue has been raised in a case involving CompuServe, where the court held that the mere "incidental" online presence of someone's software would not bring him under the jurisdiction of a state court where no other contacts with the state existed. [Friedman]  In cases involving international claims, the jurisdictional issue is even more complex.  After extensive online debate, there is no definitive answer to this perplexing question. [Id.]  With the potential for extensive litigation regarding threats or harassment, copyright infringement, privacy, etc.,  it seems clear that the jurisdictional rules will need to be established soon.

Even considering the highly offensive nature of harassment, the issue of whether actual harm is done by the conduct is still hotly debated.  Once again, some users stress that much of the conduct is from immature boys or harmless recluses, and that targets should simply ignore the messages until they go away.  Again, this "boys will be boys" rationalization is similar to the messages given to women attempting to fight workplace discrimination.

Even with the potential that women could be dissuaded from online participation, become offended by inappropriate and explicit sexual inquiries, or even become frightened by hostile messages, the question becomes whether the problem is significant enough to make the next step -- governmental control or censorship.

The issue of net censorship is so hotly debated that volumes of material have been produced for publication on newsgroups and web sites. Unique problems exist when applying existing First Amendment principles to communication on the net.  For example, in defining what is "indecent" or "obscene," case law tells us to look to "community standards." [Miller]  Is the community, then, the virtual or "cybercommunity," a geographic community of the sender, or the community of one of the potentially hundreds of thousands of recipients? [Branscomb at 1653.]  It may be necessary to replace geographic communities with "virtual" communities, in order to properly identify standards by which to judge communication.

In instances such as the Jake Baker case, a First Amendment analysis might involve defining who the intended recipient of the communication was.  In R.A.V. v. City of St. Paul, 112 S. Ct. 2538 (1992), the Court names the reasons for true threats being outside First Amendment protection as "protecting individuals from the fear of violence, from the disruption that fear engenders, and from the possibility that the threatened violence will occur." [RAV at 2546]   It is necessary to view a statement in light of its foreseeable recipients.  Therfore, when posting on a bulletin board, a public area on the internet, how many millions of people might that be?

Finally, when balancing personal protection and constitutional guarantees, it is important to remember that in terms of cyberspace, the First Amendment is a "local ordinance." [Branscomb at 1646]  Many other countries do not have a constitutional protection of free speech, and there may be no such correlative rights.

Though there are many theories under which tort claims could be brought for harassment or stalking on the internet, such claims are most likely to survive under claims of defamation, invasion of privacy, or intentional infliction of emotional distress.

In order for intent to be proven in a tort claim, it may be necessary for claimants to prove that they were foreseeable recipients of the challenged communication.  This would probably not be problematic if the communication was by e-mail, but certainly could be if it was a bulletin board posting, or done in a public area of the internet.

In order for assault to be committed, no actual contact is needed; rather the plaintiff must have been placed in apprehension that an imminent (immediate) harmful contact would occur.  It is distinctly a mental or emotional, rather than a physical, injury.

While it is understandable that a target of harassment on the internet may suffer mental distress, it is less likely that she (or he) would have actual apprehension (which is different from fear) that a harmful contact is imminent.

In order for battery to occur, it is necessary that the actor make actual contact with the target's person (body or that which touches the body), and that the contact be made without the consent of the target.  Since physical contact is required, it is not likely that words alone would amount to a "contact."  In this way, communication on the net might be similar to telephone communication.  People who receive obscene or harassing phone calls, for example, do not generally have a claim for battery, but must seek damages under another theory.

"Intentional infliction of emotional distress" is defined as, "[o]ne who, by extreme and outrageous conduct, intentionally or recklessly causes severe emotional distress to another, is subject to liability for such emotional distress, and if bodily harm results from it, for such bodily harm."  [Restatement (Second) of Torts section 46.]  Though a court found that Jake Baker's "fantasy" writings on the newsgroup did not amount to threats [Court Order], it could have found that it was sufficiently "reckless" to establish a claim for intentional infliction of emotional distress.  Since intent is not a requirement of this tort, the fact that he never intended the named woman to see or hear of the communication is not a necessary fact that would have to be proven in order for such a claim to prevail.

Once a net contact has been established as unwanted, and that the sender of communication is aware that further contact is unwelcome, a plaintiff might be able to advance the claim that continued unwanted contact has interfered with her enjoyment of her property (computer), as well as the service of the internet, which she may need for educational, business, or entertainment purposes.

While it is unlikely that an invasion of privacy claim would survive based on a single harassing e-mail or online "chat", in a case such as the Jake Baker case, where posting on an electronic bulletin board with information about individuals being made known to potentially millions of people, an invasion of privacy claim might survive.  It is doubtful that that particular "intrusion" would be considered as anything other than "highly offensive to a reasonable person."

Similarly, using the above case as an example, if the person is represented to have attributes or character other than she truly does, she may have a claim for false light invasion of privacy.  However, it appears that the young woman in Jake Baker's fantasy wasn't being portrayed as anything other than a potential victim.  If instead she was represented as seeking such abuse, or enjoying it, it may have given rise to a viable claim.

The necessary elements for any claim of misrepresentation or fraud are that it be a material misrepresentation, with knowledge of falsity, an intent to induce reliance, and justifiable reliance on the misrepresentation.  For an example of how courts have handled similar issues, see Daniel v. Dow Jones, Inc. discussed in the "negligence" section below.

Therefore, it would seem that if a person was harassed online by the posting of defamatory material, the service provider may or may not be liable, depending on the assurances that were extended to the user of the service.

Plaintiffs have brought charges against internet providers and individuals dispensing information on the internet for making negligent false statements, which the plaintiff relied on to his detriment. [Daniel]  In this case, the court held that no different analysis was necessary for the internet than for newspapers or any other "established means" of communication. [Id. at 340]   It is likely that courts might use a similar analysis when considering harassment claims which are based on a negligence theory.

Consent to a communication may be charged by a defendant if he can show that an accuser willingly responded to his communications, or that she failed to tell him that his electronic advances were unwanted.  Further, if he can show that an accuser repeatedly joined him in a private chat, or failed to leave a channel, he may be able to successfully claim that the target impliedly consented to the contacts.

Some users assert that women who use the net must accept the risk that they may be harassed, stalked, or otherwise offended. [Vang]   For example, they point to the use of chat lines and newsgroups, particularly singles and sexually-oriented groups, as instances which should raise warning flags about potential harassment, even to new users.  Further, the creation of a home page with suggestive or provocative pictures may increase the likelihood of harassment.

As noted in the "Beware" file on the AOL bulletin board, some women openly acknowledged the risk of "meeting" men online.  If any of these individuals sought to bring a claim and their postings were subsequently downloaded, there would be ample evidence that they had assumed the risk of getting into a potentially distressing relationship.

Using traditional terms to define "computer trespass" is problematic. [Baker at 68] Some federal legislation has changed the scienter requirement from "knowingly" to "intentionally." [Id.]  It is easy to make careless mistakes and gain access to a computer (or an area of the net) without intending to do so, and only those who have "clear intent" should be liable. [Id.] Similar problems could arise in tort litigation for trespass.

Obviously, the offender, if one can be identified, may be subject to a claim, depending on the court's jurisdiction. [See Jurisdiction, supra.]  However, some commentators believe that many harassers are underemployed men with a lot of time on their hands.  In that circumstance, one may find that such a defendant is "judgment-proof," meaning that they are financial unable to pay damages to the victim.  In fact, some of these defendants would probably file for bankruptcy protection, leaving the plaintiff with no remedy.

Since the burden of proof falls on the person asserting a claim, it is critical that one begins documenting any contact with a harasser as soon as possible.  This may include producing hard (printed) copies of communications, ensuring that others witness the harassment (for example, in newsgroups or IRC's), and noting any reports made to servers, university officials, or other agencies.

Even if one is able to prove that harassment occurred, it may be difficult to prove damages.  Unfortunately, this is a common problem in harassment cases, and one which is outside the scope of this paper.

As was demonstrated in the Jake Baker case, it is difficult to sustain criminal charges against an individual for their communication on the internet.  Since much of the communication on the net may be regarded as "pure speech," it is likely to have a very high threshold of First Amendment protection.

If, however, Jake Baker's e-mails had gone to the young woman, or anyone who was an object of his "fantasy," rather than to another person who merely shared his sexual dreams, it might have been quite a different case altogether.

Currently, in every state but Michigan, Alaska, Oklahoma and Wyoming, prosecution would have to be based on criminal statutes that do not address computer-based communication, e-mail, or the internet.  If the federal and state statutes discussed herein become law, then guidelines for legal electronic communication will become clearer.

Likewise, the federal anti-stalking bill proposed by Congressman Mfume is seen by some as inadequate, because it treats the telephone and electronic communication identically.  The impact of spoken words, it is argued, is different than e-mail messages, where there is no inflection, hesitation, or tone of voice. [Id. at 426-27]  Under this proposed statute, a user sending a "flame" could be prosecuted for a federal crime.

Some harassment and stalking on the internet contains material elements that should result in prosecutable criminal offenses.  Laurie Powell, a woman in South Carolina, was stalked for two years by a man who threatened her life, and threatened to rape her daughter.  He posted her home address on an e-mail message accessible to twenty-five million people.  The FBI, Secret Service, and local authorities have not been able to locate her stalker. [Ross at 405]  It is hopeful that when they do, existing law will allow for his successful prosecution.

In fact, some commentators assert that harassment will continue until user attitudes change regarding what is acceptable net behavior. [Peak]  This may require women to get increasingly involved in the creation and enforcement of net server policies.

Until that happens, users should be made aware of the potential risks of the net, and encouraged to take steps that will reduce the likelihood that they will be subject to harassment.  Such steps include familiarizing oneself with the nature and scope of a newsgroup before participating; limiting the amount and type of information included in user profiles which are accessible to other users; and choosing genderneutral passwords.

If the harasser can be identified, the first, most crucial, step to take to end harassment is to tell the offender to stop.  This demand must be communicated clearly, with no evidence of hedging or uncertainty.  This is important to invalidate any claim that one has consented to the ongoing contacts.

One may be able to identify witnesses or other targets of the harasser, particularly in chat lines or newsgroups.  Besides validating your claim of harassment, they may be able to provide support in efforts to stop the offensive behavior.

If this doesn't work, some regular users recommend simply ignoring the harasser, reasoning that they are simply attention-seekers who will quit if ignored.  However, users should be aware that some offenders will expand their efforts if ignored.

System administrators can often be reached through e-mail at root@host. [Peak]  The administrator may be able to stop the harassment by notifying or otherwise disciplining the harasser.  However, it may be difficult or impossible for a target to get information about an alleged harasser from a service, which generally keeps client information and identities confidential.  This situation has apparently hindered police investigations in recent cases of children being coaxed from their homes by adult predators, although servers were eventually forced to release records of communications between the parties.

America Online has online "terms of service" that specifies conduct that is and is not permissible for its users. [Appendix E]  Harassment is a form of conduct that is not permitted.  If an online user is experiencing harassment from another user, she can summon a "guide" (an individual employed by AOL, who acts as a monitor for offensive conduct.)  The guide can reprimand the offender, order them to get off-line temporarily, or permanently remove them from service.

Several other ideas have emerged regarding technological advances that could inhibit harassment.  For example, the creation of a blocking function, similar to the telephone company's "call blocking" service, could effectively stop a harasser from getting to his target.  Once an objectionable e-mail message pattern begins, a user could forward a message to their server to block all communication from the identified source.

Similarly, a "caller I.D."-type function may be helpful in allowing a target to immediately trace a message to its source, without the assistance of a server.  This would balance the benefits of anonymity in chat groups, etc., with the freedom from harassment -- only those who send e-mail messages would be identifiable.

In addition to providing a consistent and dependable weapon to fight harassment, development of such technology takes the burden for ending harassment off of the target, who is otherwise forced to change her password, address, nickname, etc., all in an attempt to evade the offender.

It seems clear that, for some users, harassment on the internet has impaired their ability to fully utilize its resources.  In the extreme, other users have experienced severe emotional distress as a result of unwanted contacts.  Unfortunately, s with other types of harassment, dealing with online offenses often requires the target of the attack to make significant, inconvenient changes to end the problem.  While this is a problem that is certainly not exclusive to harassment, it is indeed unfortunate that the technology that was to equalize communication also fosters, for some, a hostile, inaccessible environment.

Ultimately, then, the issue becomes who should control communications on the net -- the users, servers, universities, government, or all of the above?  Clearly, there is a concerted effort among net users and servers to avoid any governmental censorship of the medium.  Hopefully, these same forces will work just as diligently at achieving the internet's potential for being gender-blind and equally accessible for all.

This paper was produced for the "Law and the Internet" course, taught by Professor Patrick Wiseman, at Georgia State University College of Law in Atlanta, Georgia.  Some of the comments expressed in the text were contributed by course participants during the summer of 1995.

I always prided meyself on being levelheaded, mature and not given to flights of fancy. I fell in love deeply and hard. We shared something special. We were going to meet this month for a romantic getaway. Last night, when I logged on to meet him for our usual midnight date online, he was nowhere to be found. My email would not send and he had erased himself from my life. Maybe he is online under another name, I don't know. I only know my heart is broken and I don't even know why. Some holiday this is going to be huh? Am I a prize fool or what?

I recently signed onto AOL and to be perfectly honest, I was looking to meet some people and find some companionship.  As to be expected, I did meet somebody and we had lots and lots of long, intimate, romantic talks online and on the phone.  All the right things were said, and although we were both very different people, it looked very promising.  I wrote him letters and sent him cards.  He called all the time, wrote lots of email, sent gorgeous, expensive flowers, and was very attentive.  The whole works.  It was very, very intense and romantic.  We even talked about the future with me moving me and my kids to Virginia (we live in Texas) and sharing our lives together.

He told me he loved me, and I told him the same.  He shared his dreams with me and what he wanted to do with his life.  He told me about his job, his home, his childhood, old girlfriends, etc., etc.  It felt so right.  I can't even explain, how right it felt.  We made plans to get together and meet in October.  He wanted to meet sooner, but something told me to give it time.

He agreed to this, but always made a point of saying that it was my choice that we were waiting so long.  I sent him a picture.  We made plans for me to come visit him Thanksgiving and meet his family.  He said he wanted to settle down.  He always insisted on calling me back when I called him so I wouldn't incur the long distance charges.  He was sweet and kind and said wonderful things online as well as on the phone.  Everything seemed really good, but something inside me nagged me.  It didn't seem right. Number 1, he wouldn't send me a picture.  He kept saying he had to get some made.  Then he stopped answering the phone.  Where at first he would answer the phone at all hours of the night, suddenly he just stopped.  He claimed he was tired from working so hard and turned the ringer off.  He started to not answer his beeper.  And most telling, I started noticing holes in his stories.  Little things that made me uneasy.  Well, it all blew up today.  I came to find out he didn't have the job he said he did  I don't even know if he has a job.  At one point he FedExed me a gift, claiming he had his secretary send it.  Well, today I called the number on it  it was a disconnected number.  I did an address search on the location  it doesn't exist.  But that's not the clincher.  After doing even more detective work  I find out he didn't give me his true legal name.  He doesn't even have a home of his own (apartment or otherwise)   he lives in his mother's basement!  Everything he told me about himself was a LIE.  I feel like such a fool.  He was such a good actor.

After reading all of the postings on here, I recalled all of my horror stories. I dated alot, both from BBS and aol to friends, blind dates, guys I met somewhere, etc. and I have to say this much...it doesn't matter if it is AOL or the gas station or college where you met, there are psychos, nuts, freaks and duds everywhere...I fortunately met someone off of here ( you are looking at a BIG cynic of meeting good people online) that is everything the other guys weren't. Sure, I met a ton of the bad ones on the way, god, the war stories I could trade, but you have to in any case to meet or find something good (think of aol as the cyberspace fleamarket...ahh...kind of tacky...you get the idea!) All I have to say is...trust your gut...even if the guy is talking about all the romance and ideas he has, even a woman, for that fact, there has got to be more than that..give yourself time. And another word of advice, get a good private investigator, I use a friend of mine to do background checks, it is worth the money if you are serious about meeting someone...I've had more than one guy tell me he was never married, but they were in fact VERY married...also, meet them on your terms, at a public place and if there is a hotel room involved, get your own....it will be much worth the money rather than have to deal with trying to avoid a bad situation. So just to commiserate with everyone...here is just a sample of what I have met up with...a member of Wicca (a witches coven ..he was also a vampire), a self proclaimed racist (yelled racist terms for asians in a chinese restraurant), quite a few "married" fellas, a guy who said he was physically fit and a perfect ten (neglected to tell me he had club feet and was 200 lbs overweight), and quite a few guys who were concerned about what I looked like but not about themselves. Which comes to my other piece of advice, don't string someone along, and be honest with people, don't post someone else's picture and don't make yourself up to be someone you aren't......

And by the way...I know of the8thman...and just a small comment. 8th, I resent you for saying that women are money hungry and don't want you because you are of another race...that is wrong...the reason may be more obvious than you think...take inventory of what people are saying in response to your ads and stop being so darn critical of everything that is said on here.

Private Investigator in their area...turns out everything he said was a lie....and that he has a police record...  He left me without knowing I even knew this stuff, and he left others as well I have since found out......  So, spend the $, if you get serious, have a PI check them out before you agree to meet face to face......Best of luck to all.....

I'm brand new to AOL but I thought I'd jump in and post a warning about a dude who goes by the code name of MagicMagic.  Watch out for him.  He's bizarre, most likely has a few kinks loose and will email you relentlessly.

Unless sparks fly, two meetings in four months is a platonic vacation.  I would have to say if you're going to be picky, feel them out first if they are unwilling to meet in a neutral place, one that you both know, they're probably not going to want to try out a new relationship.

Then, I got this one IM from some guy (I suppose) and he seemed to know everything about me.  I hadnt told ANYBODY my features or had I even filled out my profile.  He started telling me what he would like to do to me and how he would like to torture me and all this gruesome, gothic stuff.  Anyway I got upset enough that I signed off (might i note this was before my learnings of TOS).

So it all starts out harmless enough with causual chat and then when he says he wants to crush me in business someday and make my life miserable I figure Ok. Here's a really immature person who is playing games. No problem I see it a lot on here.

Pretty soon it occurs to me after some more strange statements like: you are a liar and you must be stopped from causing pain on here. I begin to realize that this is one messed up person who is in urgent need of psychiatric care.

You may have a disagreement with someone's point of view  we encourage lively discussion in our chat rooms and message boards  but personal attacks, or attacks based on a person's race, national origin, ethnicity, religion, gender, sexual orientation or other such affiliation, are prohibited.

"Scrolling" means repeatedly causing the screen to roll faster than Members are able to type to it.  It is caused by a user entering a set of random characters or by repeatedly entering a carriage return or any such action to a similar disruptive effect.  Scrolling is an expressly prohibited form of disruption.

Members must avoid the portrayal of AOL personnel or other persons in all forms of online communication, including, but not limited to, screen names, member profiles, chat dialogue and message postings.

This includes purposefully interfering with the normal flow of dialogue in a chat room.  Room disruption may occur by repeatedly interrupting conversation between Members, or by acting in such a way as to antagonize, harass or create hostility in a chat room.

When using the Internet and all of its components, Members must conduct themselves responsibly according to the Internet's own particular code of conduct. Participating successfully on the Internet is really a matter of common sense. Although AOL Inc. does not control the Internet, your conduct on the Internet when using your AOL account is subject to the Terms of Service.

Internet focuses on a particular set of topics and posts not related to these topics are not welcomed by the participants.  We suggest that all AOL Service Members become familiar with the guidelines, themes, and culture of the specific newsgroups and mailing list in which they wish to participate.

It is important for members to make themselves aware of the various conventions, guidelines and local culture in newsgroups before becoming an active participant.  Read the document titled "IMPORTANT: Please Read" for general guidelines, as well as the articles posted to aol.motd, news.answers and news.newusers.questions.

Internet) is inappropriate and can result in your account being terminated or your access to newsgroups being restricted. If you receive a chain letter from an America Online member, report it to postmaster@aol.com immediately.

Posts not related to these topics are not appreciated by the participants. It is important that America Online members become familiar with the culture and guidelines of a particular Newsgroup BEFORE posting. Doing so will make your experience with newsgroups much more pleasant.

Most valid complaints against a member will result in the offending article(s) being canceled and the America Online member receiving a Terms of Service warning. Additionally, your access to newsgroups may be restricted depending on the nature and severity of the violation.

Second instances of abuse will result in your account and all screen names associated with it being restricted from newsgroups access. Second instances of commercial abuse of newsgroups, or of commercial chain letters, will result in your termination from America Online.

America Online also reserves the right to either restrict access to newsgroups or terminate accounts for severe cases of Newsgroup abuse. This would include what is known as "spamming", which is the act of posting large numbers of (usually irrelevant) messages to numerous newsgroups.

America Online local newsgroups (those which begin with "aol.") are fully subject to America Online Terms of Service. Members should familiarize themselves with AOL's Terms of Service by going to keyword TOS before posting in local newsgroups.

NewsMaster can cancel a newsgroup article up to four days after it was originally posted. Due to the nature of newsgroups, it is important that cancels be issued as soon after the original posting as possible preferably within 24 hours.

You may not use the AOL Service to send unsolicited advertising, promotional material, or other forms of solicitation to other Members except in those specified areas that are designated for such a purpose (e.g., the classified area).

Transmission of chain letters and pyramid schemes of any kind is not allowed on the AOL Service.  This material places an unnecessary load on our mail system and is considered a nuisance by many Members.

Letters or messages that offer a product or service based on the structure of a chain letter are also of questionable legality. At minimum, they are a waste of resources and are not permitted on the AOL Service.

WARNING: This paper is intended to help parents learn the basics about their kids and the Internet.  It contains links to some sources that are not appropriate for children.  These links are provided so that parents can realistically evaluate the type of information they are potentially introducing into their home if they have  Internet access.

The authors do not intend to fuel the "cybersmut" scare by providing this information.  We hope that parents will weigh the bad against the good and follow the recommendations provided to help parents guide their childrens' journey on the information superhighway.

Because the Internet can be accessed and contributed to by anyone with a service provider, available resources run the gamut from Disney to "Debbie does Dallas".  Consequently, the Internet is both an invaluable learning tool and a depraved wonderland.  Many parents are concerned that, if they allow their children access to the Internet, their children will be exposed to information that they consider to be inappropriate.  Thus, the issues are whether or not children can safely "surf the net" and what parents can do to help.

Parents are bombarded with media stories about the dangers of the Internet.  All of the media attention on this issue has created a kind of panic.  The media has helped to create the impression that the Internet is full of prowling child molesters and inappropriate materials.

All of this publicity and panic has prompted a number of politicians to jump on the "cybersmut" bandwagon.  At least two proposals have been introduced in Congress to regulate the Internet. These proposals suffer from a woeful lack of information and understanding about the Internet technology.

The perception is that there is a large quantity of both sexually explicit and otherwise inappropriate information that is easily accessed by child users.  It is as if every time the Internet is accessed, a giant pair of naked breasts greets the user.  While there are certainly some problems with pedophiles on the net and access to other "bad" things, these problems are not without fairly simple remedies.

This widespread panic is fueled partly by the lack of computer knowledge.  Many adults who cannot even program their VCR's are terrified by this technology that they do not understand.  They feel powerless to protect children from the dangers of the Internet.  As a result, many have called for widespread censorship which, under ordinary circumstances, would outrage most intelligent adults.

Parents and politicians need to inform themselves before they try to monitor and control the Internet.  Once they become informed, they will see that there are a few simple, unobtrusive steps they can take to make the Internet a fun and safe place for children to play.

Obviously, the majority of users are over 18.  Consequently, most of the information on the Internet is written for a mature audience.  The problem is that unless a resource is password protected, all information can be accessed by anyone with the requisite computer skills and equipment.

Penthouse, Playboy , and Hustler all have online sites.  The sites contain text and some pictures, but most of the nude pictures have to be downloaded in order to be viewed.  There is also a Web site for frequently asked questions (FAQ's) about sex related newsgroups that includes links to referenced sites.

Inappropriate material is not limited to "girlie" magazines and sexually explicit images.  Jake Baker, a student at the University of Michigan, recently posted a homepage to the Internet containing violent sex tales reminiscent of "snuff films."  One story in particular detailed the exceedingly violent rape and murder of a female student from one of his classes.

Prosecutors brought charges against Baker, which were eventually dropped.  The controversy surrounding these stories, and the subsequent attempt at prosecution,  has only increased the availability and popularity of Jake Baker's stories.

Many groups with extreme or radical ideas have home pages where they can communicate with like thinkers and attract new converts(**find some).  One racist group from the United Kingdom has a site called "Saved by the Bell".  This site contain their racist views, rather than information of the television show by the same name, as one might expect from the site title.

Internet.  That is, the items are published to the Internet and, when accessed, can only be responded to by e-mailing the site publisher.  There is no real contemporaneous or personal interaction.  Chat groups and newsgroups, on the other hand, are interactive by design.  In chat groups, conversation is live.

When a user joins a chat channel they are plunged into the midst of an ongoing discussion.  Topics are subject only to the whims of the participants.  A number of chatgroups are devoted to "adult" topics, but anyone can get join in (see, FAQ's above).

Newsgroups are groups to which interested users can subscribe and receive organized e-mail discussions from a specific group of people.  These groups suffer from the same problems as the live chat group, except that the conversation is by e-mail.  Because the discussion is not live, a parent can more easily monitor the groups with whom their child has contact.

"chats", kids cannot  keep adults from trying to befriend them by presenting to be other kids.  On the Internet the only cues to a person's identity are their written words.  The verbal and visual cues  usually used to "get a feel" for someone are lost.  This makes it difficult to make judgments about whether or not a chat pal is an appropriate or desirable friend.

Recently, hot media topics have been children accessing sites containing sexually explicit material, participating in chat or discussion groups, or encountering material generally considered inappropriate for minors.   In just the last few months, there have been many stories warning parents about the danger of the Information Superhighway.  There was a story about a teenager who ran away to meet a acquaintance she met on the 'net, and a story about a boy who was raped by an Internet "friend".  Major news magazines have devoted entire issues to children and the Internet.  Newspapers give these Internet "horror" stories liberal coverage.  Atlanta news stations have special segments on the dangers. Because the tragic experiences get a great deal of media coverage, a climate of fear has been created.  The media has done little to highlight the potential of the Internet as a resource for kids.

The story of Tara Noble garnered a great deal of media coverage (6).  She ran away from home to meet a man she had met on America Online.  Fortunately, she called the FBI a few weeks later, and they brought her home.  Without Internet access, the chances of a young teenager starting a relationship with an older man would have been slim.

Dateline NBC ran a story about a teenage boy who began communicating with a man, who turned out to be a pedophile, on a computer bulletin board (8).   After they had been communicating for some time, the man asked the boy if he could come over and help install some computer equipment.  When the boy went to the man's house, he was raped.

Unsolved Mysteries told the story of a High Tech detail set up by the San Jose, California Police Department to catch "cybercrooks" (9).  One of the High Tech officers posed as a pre- teen netsurfer to catch a pedophile who had been trying to lure young boys to meet him.  The officer was able to make contact with the molester, establish an ongoing discussion, and eventually set up a meeting where the police arrested the man.

A Newsweek article printed a story written by the mother of a net savvy 12-year-old year who had been spending a lot of time on the Internet (10).  The mother was concerned about all the time that her child was spending on the computer and decided to read her daughter's e-mail.  She discovered that her daughter had been sending sexually provocative e-mail messages seeking responses from those looking for a "hot babe".

Newsweek also featured an article about sex on the Internet that described many of the sites where explicit material could be found (11).  The stated purpose of the article was to make parents aware of the kinds of pornography available online.  The impression left by the article, however, was that smut is widely available and easily accessed on the Internet.

With the media printing article upon article about children running rampant through all sorts of sexually explicit stories, magazines, images, etc., there is a definite perception that sex and sexually explicit material permeate the 'net.  The media helps create the impression that everything on the Internet is "dirty", and that there is little information of value to young Internet users.  The stories on pedophiles and chat pals "gone bad" suggest that interactive discussion groups are dangerous places that children should never be allowed to go.

Internet by running frequent and often repetitive articles,  the problems involving children, the Internet, and sexual misconduct appear to be much more widespread and commonplace than is actually the case.  While the pain suffered by children victimized online should not be underrated, these occurrences are not the norm.  Nonetheless, the impression that the Internet is a dangerous and seedy place has gripped the nation and spawned widespread panic.  The result is a knee-jerk reaction by parents demanding that someone take action.  And, some one has . . .

Because many of the more vocal and active constituencies have demanded a solution to the perceived Internet problems, politicians have responded.  The legislative proposals  have been based on many of the same misperceptions created by the media.

Senator Patrick Leahy (D-Vt.)  suggested an alternative to the drastic measures proposed by Sen Exon.  His bill have addressed concerns about the Internet by sponsoring a study that would assess the actual problems and find technical solutions to any problems the study uncovered.  Unfortunately, his bill was never even voted on.

"Protection of Children From Computer Pornography",   is designed to prevent the transmission of pornography to children over the Internet.  It uses such vague language as "knowingly".  This proposal would also criminalize conduct that violates the proposed bill.

Internet and how it works before recommending sweeping restrictions.  It seems likely that some legislation will be passed in the near future to censor what can and cannot be done online without regard to whether these measures will actually solve the "problem".   The Internet is a powerful and ever changing resource that, if utilized properly, can benefit millions of people.  It is a shame that our elected officials, in an attempt to pander to a vocal minority, may cut this valuable resource off at the knees when there are many simple, unobtrusive ways to make the Internet safe for kids.

The majority of the aforementioned recommendations involve the use of some form of ratings system.  The problems with a ratings system are that the rating is subjective and generally voluntary.  Also, the usual means of verifying age, i.e. presentation of identification is inadequate.  Therefore, any ratings system may be easily circumvented.

None of the proposed solutions measure up to what is probably the most obvious and effective means of protecting children on the Internet - active parental involvement.  It seems ironic that parents who would not allow their children to venture out into the world alone would allow them to wander unsupervised through a virtual world.  Parents are the best judges of what is or is not appropriate material for their children.  They, therefore, not the government, are the proper monitors of their child's Internet use.

Hopefully, this paper will help concerned parents to make informed decisions about whether or not they want to bring the Internet into their homes.  While their is certainly a lot of information that is inappropriate for children, parents who actively monitor on-line use can eliminate or reduce their child's access to such information.  The Internet is a very valuable resource, the importance of which is likely to grow.

America Online has an Academic Assistance Center with bulletin board on subjects like math and history.  Kids can post homework questions and get detailed responses within a day from over 800 volunteer teachers and professionals. In the chat rooms there are online monitors who watch for trouble and keep younger kids involved in the discussions.

Some sex chatters equate typing quickly, writing competently and spelling correctly to physical attractiveness. Since visual or non-verbal communication are nonexistent, introductory lines are extremely important.

Today's "earth-bound legislators and courts" are perplexed with applying legal concepts to cyberspace. (52) Consequently, lawmakers and law enforcers can not be expected to create or enforce rules compelling social conduct.

Certainly the members of the legal profession need to critically evaluate and monitor attorney's use of  net resources for practices such as advertising, communication of services,  advice  and client representation; however,  it is not practical  to create, monitor, enforce or discipline  legal net manners in cyberspace.  First, numerous  rules and guidelines already  are enforced (formally or informally) on the Internet. Written or unwritten guides are enforced through  computer  systems,   organizations,  participants and/or  internet providers. (53)   Specific manners  for the legal profession would encumber the use and expansion of cyberspace.

Second,  regulations mandating manners are apt to infringe on firmly rooted  constitutional doctrines such as the Freedom of Speech and Right of  Association.   Third,   the net is non-invasive medium; therefore net users can avoid contact with unsolicited or unwelcome material and conduct.  Fourth, social pressure is a more practical mechanism to enforce net manners.

Dave Schroeder, Ph.D.  suggests  "The network is like having hundreds of thousands of house guests (and being a house guest in hundreds of thousands of houses.)" (55)  Consequently when determining the appropriate level of behavior for the net activities (whether E-mail, Usenet or IRC) consider  the lifestyles and philosophies of the other participants.  A considerate house guest respects the rules of the house by conducting himself based on the purpose of his visit  (i.e. business or pleasure) as well as to the type of individuals in the house (i.e. children, elderly, family  or close friends).

On the other hand,  activities conducted by the legal profession on the net such as advertising, publicity, practicing law or offering advice are currently regulated and enforced through non-cyberspace laws.  As a result, an attorney, as a member of the cyber-community, merely needs to be aware of and practice the informal or formal rules, guidelines and cultural traditions of the net resources.

Cyberspace offers greater potential for interactive communication between information senders and receivers than more traditional communication medium such as newspaper, radio and television.  Freedom of speech as guaranteed by the constitution is not an absolute right.

Depending on the medium through which information is delivered various degrees of free speech protection is granted.  Cyberspace communication may be analogous to a specific existing communication medium or several at one time.  Current free speech protection approaches break down when applied to Cyberspace.  A traditionalist approach to free speech protection centers on core values and yields results that are medium neutral so that content allowed via one medium is permissible in all mediums.

Perhaps concern for the English use of prior restraint (licensing of press) and seditious libel was reason for including the first amendment in the bill of rights.  When the first amendment became law the printed page was the main non-verbal medium of speech.   Speech involves more than verbal communication and includes pictures, movies, radio, television and expressive conduct..  [1]  As additional communication medium developed (technology advanced) speech was given various levels of first amendment protection depending on the medium through which the information was delivered.

Cyberspace is a matrix of computer systems permitting millions of people to communicate with one another on a daily basis.  Cyberspace may mirror other types of communication medium singularly or several at one time.  Current free speech protection approaches break down when applied to Cyberspace since they may prohibit speech when delivered by one medium but permit identical speech delivered via a different medium..  A core values approach protects identical speech regardless of the medium it is delivered by so is a better frame work for Cyberspace and yet to develop technologies.

That,  "Congress shall make no law..., or abridging the freedom of speech", suggests an absolute right to speak.  Justice Black dissenting in Konigsberg felt that freedom of speech was absolute. [2]  Justice Harlan writing for the majority rejected an absolute right, noting that protected freedom of speech was less than an unlimited license to talk.  When examining a restriction on speech the court will look for a compelling government interest to warrant the restraint on speech.  Also the court will look to determine if the regulation accomplishes the governmental objective in the least restrictive way.

Miller v California is the current test a court should apply in determining if speech is obscene. [5]  The test has three parts: 1) whether an average person applying contemporary community standards would find the work taken as a whole appeals to prurient interests, 2) whether the work depicts or describes in a patently offensive way sexual conduct specifically defined by applicable state law, and 3) whether the work taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political or scientific value.  The first two parts of the test apply based on standards of the local community so that what is obscene may vary with the locality.  The third part is based on a reasonable person standard and is not based on local community standards.  For a work to be found obscene all three portions of the test must be found.

Indecent speech does receive first amendment protection.  However in the context of broadcast radio and television courts have upheld FCC regulation of "adult speech".  In Sable v FCC the court invalidated a law prohibiting indecent Dial-a-Porn phone messages which were not obscene. [6]  There the court found congress could regulate to protect minors by requiring use of credit cards, access codes and scrambling rules.

Early cases did not give commercial speech (advertising) first amendment protection.  In Pittsburgh Press the court held that the exchange of information in commercial speech was important as in other types of speech. [7]  Modern cases provide first amendment protection to commercial speech.

Speech has been  regulated differently depending on the medium over which the communication has been made.  The printed medium has been found to enjoy the broadest freedom of speech protection.  When radio and television cases arose the courts upheld the right of FCC regulation based on the scarcity of broadcast channels and to provide for needs of viewers and listeners rather than licensed broadcasters. [9]  For cable television some courts have held that government has less ability to regulate program content than for broadcast television. [10]  Different FCC regulations apply to the commercial use of phone lines.[11]  Congress has applied many regulations satellite broadcasts that were earlier applied to broadcast television.

Satellite does not suffer from limited channels as broadcast television does so courts may permit less regulation of satellite broadcasts than traditional television.  Finally it has been held that a person may possess obscene material in their own homes, [12] so while production or distribution of obscene material is not protected ownership is at some level.

Tennessee obscenity laws. [13]  A Tennessee postal inspector joined the Thomases' system.  He downloading sexually oriented pictures, ordered a video tape and sent the Thomases' an unsolicited child-porn video.  A Memphis jury found the California couple guilty.  Here protected speech/activity legal in California was illegal in Tennessee.  An argument can be made that the community standard of Miller would allow a conservative community to force their standards on another state for conduct performed in the other state.

An example of how Cyberspace can increase discourse of expression and ideas involved hate speech messages on Prodigy.  Some users denied Holocaust occurred and disparaged Jews.  Other users were able to respond, disagree with and label as bigots the original group.  In reviewing the incident the  Electronic Frontier Foundation (EFF) found that on balance both sides were able to express their viewpoints. [14]  Due to the interactive nature of Cyberspace more people are able to express themselves.  Unlike printed press where there are publishers and readers or television where there are broadcasters and viewers Cyberspace allows a far greater level of interaction amongst users.

In Cubby, Inc. v CompuServe, CompuServe was found not to be liable for distributing the materials of others. [15]  Like a real world distributor of books it would not be reasonable to expect CompuServe to review all messages and files passing through their system.

Others point out that Cyberspace is unlike other communications media and therefore should not be regulated at all or should have a different standard. [18]  Current politics is attempting to draft legislation to either restrain or protect from regulation from Cyberspace.

Robert Corn-Revere has described the inconsistent protection/ regulation through an example involving a regulator simultaneously viewing an identical sex scene on five televisions. [19]  One of the televisions is receiving its signal from a broadcast tv station, another from a cable television feed, another from a VCR, a fourth via satellite and the fifth via fiber optic phone lines.  The paradox is that identical expression/content on the five sets may be subject to five or more types of regulatory schemes and receive varying levels of free speech protection.

Revere describes three judicial approaches which may be used in determining what level of free speech is afforded, incrementalist, revisionist and traditionalism.  The incrementalist approach reflects current reality where different standards are applied to different media even though the speech content may be identical.

The traditional approach ignores the medium through which communication is transmitted and analyzes the content of the message to test if it warrants free speech protection.  LaurenceTribe has referred the constitution's core values. [21]  The core values would be universal beliefs and ideals that would not change with new technologies.

Tribe put forth five axiom's that applied to Cyberspace issues would maintain the First Amendment's vitality and ability to guarantee free speech.  First the constitution limits what government may do and changes in technology do not expand what government may do.

Existing free speech protection devices that regulate to varying degrees based on the medium of communication rather than the content transmitted do not provide a suitable framework to protect speech in Cyberspace.  A core-value approach to speech protection provides equal protection to identical speech content regardless of the medium through which the information is transmitted.  A core-value approach therefore provides a stable framework for addressing free speech issues in Cyberspace and technologies yet to develop.

Where child pornography is concerned, Miller does not tell the whole story. Though non-violative of the Miller test, a state can proscribe the distribution of material which portrays minors in a sexually explicit but non-obscene manner.

Further, though the Court had previously held in Stanley v. Georgia, that the mere private possession of obscene material by an adult may not be made criminal [16], twenty-one years later, in Osborne v. Ohio, the Court held that the state's interest in preventing the sexual exploitation and abuse of children is so strong that even the private possession of sexually explicit nude pictures of children may be prohibited  [17].

A statute is overbroad if, in addition to proscribing activities which may constitutionally be forbidden, it also sweeps within its coverage speech or conduct which is  protected by the guarantees of free speech or free association. [19]  A law must be narrowly tailored to its legitimate concerns.  The doctrine of vagueness is similar, but not identical, to that of overbreadth.  A statute will be held void for vagueness if the conduct forbidden by it is so unclearly defined that persons "of common intelligence must necessarily guess at its meaning and differ as to its application."[20]  A law must be sufficiently precise so that those bound by it can understand the conduct which will subject them to the sanctions imposed by law.

Historically, the war against obscenity has been waged over books, newspapers, magazines, movies and art.  [23]  However, obscene material on the Internet exists in a very different universe.  The Internet is a "virtual community... defined not by geography, next door neighbors, voting precincts or national borders, but by computers linked with the twisted copper wires and the fiber optics of the modern telephone network."  [24]  The Internet is a vast unknown, inhabitable by anyone.  Since the Internet is such a recent development, there has been little of precedential value to indicate how a court should treat a case involving the distribution of obscene materials on it.

Perhaps the most significant part of the ruling is the Judges' recognition that laws already exist to prohibit on-line distribution of obscene material.  The CDA is not the only weapon with which to defend against obscenity and pornography on the Net.

It is likely that any statute that does not distinguish between the different methods of communication available on a computer network, but which attempts to regulate indecent speech on the computer network, will be unconstitutional.  [36]  Just as there are different levels of constitutional protection for speech in different forums, so too should there be an examination of the different forums available to "speakers" on the Net.  [37]  The on-line forums of e-mail, chat rooms, bulletin boards and Web pages should be examined for similarities and dissimilarities among themselves and the more traditional First Amendment forums of public streets and parks, television, books, radio, telephones, newspapers and mail.

On my first day of law school, I was told the standard adage: "We will teach you to think like a lawyer."  As I near the end of my law school education, it is distressing to me that for all of my time and money that I have invested in my legal education, no one has bothered to even attempt to teach me how to actually act like a lawyer, much less be a lawyer.  I guess I had a romantic view of what law school would be like, but I pictured it to be more of a trade school, for lack of a better term.  I expected that my professors would put on clinics for advocacy, in essence teaching me the law while also how to convince others that my position was the proper interpretation.  Since this is decidedly not the case, I have noticed that an alarming number of lawyers that I know could not argue their way out of a paper bag.  Therefore, since I have the resources to make my opinion known, I have decided to discuss the lost art of advocacy and the resources available on the WWW for those who wish to act as Indiana Jones and play Raiders of the Lost Art.

This discussion will break down into what I personally consider to be the three P's of advocacy:  personality appeal, psychological appeal, and perseverance.  When I use the word "subject," I mean the focus of your attention, the person to be ultimately convinced or your position.  Be forewarned, this page does not profess to be an authoritative dissertation on this subject, but only what I have gleaned from my self-education regarding advocacy; basically just my opinion of what advocacy is.  But if there is one overriding theme to all of this, keep it simple.  No one is really impressed by how smart you are: those who are smarter do not regard your accomplishment as anything much while those who are not as smart simply resent the fact that you use words that they don't understand.   Better to keep it simple.

This is mainly a tool that everyone possesses, but not everyone knows how to use it to full advantage.  Unfortunately, it is one of the most important tool a successful lawyer can master.  The art of persuasion, and therefore successful advocacy, depends heavily on making the subject, a jury for example, WANT to help you personally.  A lawyer who comes off as snobbish and arrogant stands little chance of appealing to the subject on a personal level.  For example, Marcia Clark was successful in alienating the entire jury.  She couldn't have gotten a conviction for a traffic violation because she had no sense of camaraderie with any of the jurors.  On the other hand, Johnny Cochan appealed to the jury on many different levels and the jury was willing to go along with him on anything he proposed, no matter how outrageous it might otherwise seem.  That jury wanted to help him and was willing to give him whatever he asked.

You may be asking, "How do you make someone want to help you personally?"  Well, you don't.  You cannot really make the subject do anything.  The idea is to appeal to the subject on a level which each individual can readily understand and can eventually commiserate or empathize.  A personal bond between lawyer and subject is the goal, and some facet of the lawyer's personality can often serve as that bond.  The beautiful thing about a personality is that none is single-faceted.  Human beings are complex and contrary animals and as such they have many different levels to their personality.  The trick is to control each facet in a way that might appeal to the greatest number of people, possibly on different levels.

More often than not, this requires a multi-faceted approach where personality must be used as a tool.  For example, a jury comprised of 12 people with different backgrounds and interests.  Appealing to such a wide range of interests is like adding and subtracting fractions, you must find a common denominator, a toe-hold which will serve as a foundation.  A subject who agrees on at least one facet or opinion of the lawyer will be more likely to listen and follow along on another proposition.  Each proposition is like a brick, laid upon the initial foundation and eventually building the lawyer's case.

Contrary to what clinical psychologists would have you believe, each and every one of us has a rudimentary understanding of the human psyche.  Every child knows how to appeal to the kinder side of parents, usually before they are able to walk and talk.  That's all advocacy is, appealing to the kinder side of the subject.  This is where you really go a long way towards making the subject want to help you.

Some ideas are simply repugnant.  That doesn't mean that you won't have to zealously advocate a repugnant idea, it requires you to make it as palatable as possible.  The art of psychology and advocacy means that you take a repugnant idea and fashion it in the best possible light so as to make it more palatable.  This is done by appealing to the psyche of the subject in a way that allows him/her to digest an idea that he/she would not otherwise accept.  Sometimes this is a simple as minimizing the bad while stressing the good.  Other times it means characterizing a repugnant idea as something more palatable by way of analogy.  Either way, you must make your idea appeal to the subject in a way that he/she can rationalize agreement.  My father is fond of telling me that a person can rationalize doing anything, it just depends on how much he wants to really do what he is rationalizing.  If a person can rationalize agreement with your position in a way that will not offend their conscience, that person wants to help you and is just looking for the chance to do it.

Sometimes delivery is more important than the message.  As my favorite lawyer said "You never really understand a person until you consider things from his point of view--until you climb into his skin and walk around in it."  You may recognize these as the words of a fictitious lawyer, Atticus Finch.  That ought to tell you a little about my psyche.  To successfully appeal to a subject on a personal level, you must understand things from his/her point of view.  Think about how you would react if the roles were reversed.  Which is another of my favorite ideas regarding psychology, "A man who is warm can't understand a man who is cold."  Understanding a subjects point of view is at least as important, if not more important, than the proposition that you want him/her to grasp.  That is why I say sometimes delivery is every bit as important as the ultimate message.  Different points of view demand different delivery.

This last "P" is the most simple, but is the least flexible.  No matter what you do in regards to personality appeal and psychological appeal, you can never, ever waiver on perseverance.  This reminds me of some of the first year classes in law school.  Often the professor would attack an answer, even if it was correct, just to test the conviction of the student.  If the student wavered or abdicated in his/her conviction, it only brought the wrath of the professor down upon them.  If you hope to be successful, stick by your guns in the face of adversity.

Now, there will be times when advocating a position may be frivolous and you may incur sanctions as a result.  I am not saying that you should persevere in these circumstances because that goes beyond zealous advocacy into the area where fools rush in, but angels fear to tread.  My point is that if you hope to win the subject over to your position, you must show unwavering conviction in your own ultimate position.  To show anything less means that you are conceding the point.  Which in some circumstances, such as minor details, may be the best route to take if it avoids losing credibility with the subject.  Don't bog down on every detail and lose sight of the ultimate goal.  It is this ultimate goal which requires unwavering conviction.  Believe in what you want the subject to believe and stick by it.  Simple.

When I say that, I mean that you must zealously advocate your ultimate position no matter what.  Even if it becomes apparent that you are advocating an idea that is silly or contrary to common sense, you must not waiver in you conviction, unless of course you do not want to convince the subject.  The subject is going to look to you for guidance as to the right decision to make.  If you waiver in your own conviction of your position, the subject will not go along with you.  If the subject looks to you, and sees you doubting what you propose, there is no way the jury can rationalize agreement with you.

The three P's of advocacy: personality appeal, psychological appeal, and perseverance.  You must appeal to the subject on a personal level through skillful use of you personality.  You must fashion your ideas in such a way that will appeal to the psyche of the subject, sometimes through delivery and always with the subject's point of view in mind.  Lastly, you must not waiver in your conviction for the proposition which you advocate.  You must persevere in that conviction.  Above all, remember to keep everything as simple as possible and appeal to this simplicity.  People like everything to wrap up into a neat little package.  If it is possible to persuade them that everything does indeed fit together neatly, you are halfway home.

Here are some resources that I have perused on the WWW that make some sense to me.  This is by no means a complete list, not is it really even a good partial list, but it does contain some places to find good ideas regarding advocacy.

The explosive growth of online activity has facilitated the advent of true globalization for many businesses which have incorporated the use of electronic commerce into their infrastructure. However, the use of electronic commerce gives rise to significant new challenges to traditional jurisdictionally based rules and regulations. One area particularly affected by these challenges is the area of tax law.

Current tax laws rely on the presence of tangible, readily definable geographical boundaries, which may in some cases be entirely circumvented in the online marketplace. The economy is being redefined by new technologies which control bits of data or information transferred virtually, instantaneously, and inexpensively.

Unlike the broad, all-encompassing provisions defined for tangible personal property, the tax provisions for services are typically narrowly drawn, with very specific categories of taxable and tax-exempt activities. [13] This treatment raises considerable confusion for activities which do not fall precisely within one of the defined categories, or which may overlap into several different areas. As with transmission based taxes, the use of value-added services and bundling further complicates the issues regarding the tax treatment of these "services".

States also vary as to whether they include direct costs, indirect costs, or both in the definition of cost of performance. [19] A minority of states attempt to factor in an analysis of where the benefit was received, and tax the sale according to that apportionment. [20] Typically, the benefit of the sale is received in the jurisdiction(s) where the service was used or consumed.

These states are attempting to force electronic commerce into an existing regulatory mold which is ill-equipped to handle the complex new issues. The cost of the medium in these cases is often insignificant compared to the data or information stored in the medium, but these states must fall back on regulations based on physical, tangible properties and characteristics.

Partnership v. Groppo, the Connecticut Supreme Court held that a computer-based provider which offered worldwide information about hotel availability was not a taxable computer service because the computer was merely the method of delivery.

The Telecommunications Act of 1996 promises to further confuse the regulatory environment. As the barriers for the Regional Bell Operating Companies (RBOCs) and cable companies are eliminated, the distinctions between the different mediums becomes increasingly unclear. In the fiercely competitive telecom industry, the different communication channels will combine, resulting in more bundled services, value-added services, and technologically inspired issues.

Since tax law trails considerably behind the rapidly changing technology, companies must often rely on the courts to interpret the statutes and apply them to the increasingly complex technological environment.

In addition to domestic jurisdictional problems, companies and individuals transacting on a global scale must be prepared to address international tax issues. Global exposure over the Internet affords companies and individuals numerous advantages, but also subjects them to inherent conflicts between the different governments over tax revenues. Current tax laws do not adequately handle the concept of a virtual presence, and are largely rooted in the physical world.

The United States currently determines whether income is taxable by looking to the source of the income and the residence of the recipient. [29] Under many tax treaties, most countries reciprocally agree to let residence-based rules take precedence over source-based rights for foreign-taxation purposes. [30] The Internal Revenue Code provides certain tax credit and exemption provisions to prevent double-taxation of foreign source income.

Unlike domestic activities, the presence of an independent agent will not in itself trigger authority over the company absent a significant level of authority given to the agent, and/or other factors which may be deemed to further enhance the appearance of a "permanent establishment". [42] In the case of G.L.S. Leasco Inc., McKinley Transport Ltd. V.

Different issues also arise about the applicability of existing laws, and the ability to reconcile the new communication mediums with these laws. Electronic commerce may share many characteristics with other commonly used business activities, including the lease of real estate space, mail order, magazine advertisements, catalogs, solicitation, and many others.

For intangibles, the Internal Revenue Service has ruled that "an unqualified transfer in perpetuity of an intangible can constitute a transfer of property under certain circumstances." [47] However, it is unclear how different electronic transactions will be construed and treated since forms of distribution can take so many forms and share such different characteristics. There is some validity to the argument that the method of delivery should not effect the characterization of the transfer and the resultant tax consequences.

Since electronic transfers frequently involve the distribution or dissemination of copyrighted information, there are frequently restrictions on use and distribution. These restrictions may substantially effect the characterization of the property despite the fact that the subject matter may not change.

This is particularly troublesome for software companies, shareware distributors, Internet service providers, and other electronic publishers which may have difficulty discerning the tax consequences of their actions in all of the different jurisdictions.

In the United States, the Internal Revenue Code taxes income connected with a domestic trade or business. [55] Foreign companies doing business in the United States must exhibit a continuous and regular course of economic activity beyond "casual or incidental transactions" before income tax liability will attach. [56] Further, the presence of an employee or contractor for a foreign company will typically be scrutinized according to their business activities and certain "bright line" tests established in applicable treaties.

The Internal Revenue Code provides that sales income tax can only be applied to a nonresident if the income is "effectively connected" with the United States through an office or fixed place of business which regularly carries on the type of activity which generated the income, and is a "material factor" in producing the income. [57] The presence of an independent agent will not alone create tax liability, but a dependent agent can only escape tax liability if the agent does not regularly exhibit authority to contract, or maintain an inventory for the company. [58] Arguably, the lease of server space could be structured to fall under the penumbra of the business utilization of an "independent agent", and may be treated as less than a fixed place of business.

State authority to tax commerce is based on the powers enumerated in the Due Process Clause and Commerce Clause of the United States Constitution. [59] The Commerce Clause imposes a more substantial burden on the state, requiring that the activity being taxed bear a "substantial nexus" to the state, beyond the "mimimum connection" required under Due Process.

However, enforcement in an online forum becomes prohibitively difficult when jurisdictions have no established mechanisms for ensuring that participating residents remit the appropriate taxes to the jurisdiction.

Most states have not comprehensively addressed the "virtual presence" possible on the Internet, and existing regulations may result in conflicting, arbitrary, and unfair treatment to individuals and companies conducting business via electronic means.

Intangible, as well as tangible properties may give rise to sufficient presence to satisfy the nexus requirements for the taxing state. A number of states have adopted the approach in Geoffrey, where the state Supreme Court held that the licensing of a trademark used in the state was sufficient to subject the licensing company to state income tax. The analysis used by the court was one of "purposeful availment", resulting in more than a "de minimis" presence in the state. [69] The application of this approach could have enormous ramifications for electronic commerce, where "intangibles" are readily distributable online, possibly subjecting companies to tax liabilities in numerous jurisdictions.

Along the lines of "purposeful availment", some states are considering whether to attribute nexus to various financial institutions under a theory of commercial exploitation sufficient to create an economic presence. [70] To date, this imputation has been limited to financial institutions, but it is not inconceivable that the non-physical analysis may well be extended to internet companies under a similar approach. [71] One theory which has already been put forth is the idea of a transactional presence based on the occurrence of a taxable event in the jurisdiction. [72] Although this approach is targeted at a non-physically based analysis, it raises serious Constitutional questions, enforcement issues, and will unquestionably meet with considerable criticism.

Similarly, in SFA Folio Collections, Inc., another court similarly denied nexus to a sister corporation despite a wealth of shared resources, including financial data, trademarks, officers, and directors. [77] Clearly, the courts are limiting the Supreme Court's holdings regarding attributional presence to solicitous activities, barring extraordinary behavior on the part of the affiliates.

On the domestic front, the Treasury Department has released a report stating it will take a "neutral stance" towards electronic commerce, and that there will be no new taxes for Internet activity. Instead transactions conducted over the Internet will be taxed under the current regulations for non-Internet activity, such as sales, telecommunications, and income generation.

The Bank Secrecy Act passed in 1970 imposes reporting requirements on the import and export of all currency. [91] The Act has been arguably ineffective because enforcement is largely based on self-reporting. The non-disclosure policies of some governments have hindered past efforts to prevent tax evasive behavior and money laundering, and these policies are likely to prove even more problematic as untraceable electronic currency transfers across international borders become more and more commonplace.

While this argument has some merit, it seems to assume that only government approved institutions will be able to handle e-cash, and that e-cash will not become generally transferable, barterable, and accepted as currency which does not need to flow through an institution. Perhaps, like cash, the government will only be able to maintain control through taking primary control of all valid, digitally authenticated, verifiable monetary disbursements.

The U.S. Treasury Department has claimed that it will actively combat these problems and will consider establishing the equivalent of electronic "tollbooths" to monitor cross border Internet transactions. [94] The feasibility of the electronic "tollbooths" is still in question, but is representative of the dilemmas confronting revenue collectors now and in the future.

The global effects of electronic commerce will make it necessary for the different governments to coordinate their efforts towards creating an enforceable tax environment which will prevent forum shopping and tax evasion, and not unduly burden business.

Governments, both domestic and international, must confront a multitude of new issues and legal challenges which transcend traditional physical realities and incorporate enough flexibility to respond in a timely manner to the rapid new developments which occur in the telecommunication and technology fields. Adaptability is critical to any new tax laws because the electronic environment is highly dynamic, a constantly moving target which nevertheless requires some level of predictability and consistency in order to encourage voluntary compliance. In the United States, limited resources make voluntary compliance an essential component of the tax structure, and enforcement is largely based on its ability to deter evasion.

Since the information age undermines the very foundational structure on which our current laws are based, it may be necessary to implement a structure which provides a framework for analyzing situations on an case-by-case basis, with an in-depth study of specific facts and circumstances in light of the current technological environment. However, while this approach may satisfy the need for flexibility in the tax system and prove easier to implement, it may also run afoul of the need for predictability and consistency offered by the "bright line" tests, and prove to be extremely difficult to maintain. Legislators and judicial decision-makers would necessarily need to stay abreast of new developments in technology, and there would be an ever increasing need for experts to help advise on the latest technological issues.

Leaders in the industry could help determine the direction technology is following, but will obviously have certain biases and self-serving interests which run counter to the need for objective analyses.

Perhaps an even more insurmountable task is the need to create a structure which is not based on physical boundaries, and represents a collaborative and cooperative effort between all the industrialized countries in the world. The Information Superhighway is global by nature, and must therefore be addressed at a global level.. Despite the enormous legal and political challenges, the Internet should serve as our bridge to virtual multicultural new worlds unfettered by physical limitations.

Although the pen has always been considered mightier than the sword, with today's technological revolution and an increasing number of on-line users, the keyboard may prove to the mightiest of all.  At one time, only the press had the means to express and disseminate ideas to large audience.

Today, for a small monthly fee, any individual with a computer and a modem has the power to communicate with millions of people.  This power, however, is not unconditional, and with it comes some restrictions and responsibilities, which society has always required of civilized men.

With a rapidly growing number of computer-communication users, the potential for on-line defamation increases.  Electronic mail, discussion groups, and bulleting board services are just a few examples of new vehicles in which defamatory statements can travel on the superinformation highway.  Unsuspecting users of these services may not be aware that they are "publishing" a defamatory statement when they post a message on a bulletin board criticizing their stock broker.

Similarly, they may not anticipate that their message will be received in distant state or even another country.  Because cyberspace presents a host of issues that traditional defamation law has never before addressed, some development and adaptation may be required by the courts when analyzing a case.

Part I of this paper will first overview defamation law as developed in the United States.  Part II will discuss liability of online service providers for defamatory statements, and review how courts have analyzed cyberspace defamation cases thus far.  Part III of this paper will address personal jurisdiction over non-resident defendants in a cyberspace defamation suit, and some of the issues that arises therefrom.

There are two traditional types of defamation:  libel, which generally covers written or printed defamation and slander, which traditionally covers oral defamation.(4)  Written or printed words, which are deemed more premeditated and deliberate, are also considered more harmful than spoken words.  In addition, whereas spoken words are gone once uttered, printed words last longer because printed words are put in a form in which they can remind the auditors of the defamation.  Text on a computer screen shares more traits with libel than with slander.  In addition, a message posted on a BBS and displayed on a computer screen can become a printed message immediately to an attached printer.  Therefore, because it takes more thought and effort to type a message than to speak, and because such a message is more permanent than a spoken one, postings on bulletin boards more closely resemble written than spoken words.  Liability for bulletin board defamation should thus come from libel rather than slander law.

The Court in a sense "federalized" defamation law in those cases involving a public official plaintiff.  Later, in Curtis Publishing Co. v. Butts,(10) the Supreme Court extended the "actual malice" standard to "public figures" as well.  Generally, a public figure is meant to be a person who "command[s] sufficient continuing public interest and ha[s] sufficient access to the means of counterargument to be able 'to expose through discussion the falsehood and fallacies' of the defamatory statements."(11)  This definition, which relies on a person's "access" to the means of rebuttal, contemplates that a plaintiff who can engage in self-help requires less protection from the courts.

In sum, the requisite degree of fault necessary to establish a cause of action depends on the plaintiff's status.  If the plaintiff is a "public figure", he must prove by "clear and convincing evidence" that the defendant published the statement with "actual malice"(22)  A defamation plaintiff who is not a public figure need only show that the defendant acted negligently in publishing the defamatory statement.(23)  However, if a private plaintiff seeks presumed or punitive damages for a defamatory statement which is a matter of public concern, proof of "actual malice" is required.

However, secondary publishers, who merely act as distributors of defamatory material such as bookstores, libraries and news dealers have no responsibility for, and usually no knowledge of, the contents of the materials.  Thus, distributors may be held liable only if they know or have reason to know about the defamatory statement.(27)  The Restatement (Second) of Torts section 578 provides that "[e]xcept as to those who only deliver or transmit defamation published by a third person, one who repeats or otherwise republishes a defamatory matter is subject to liability as if he originally published it."(28)  To be considered a secondary publisher, the distributer must not alter, recopy, or otherwise exhibit direct control over the original material.

Furthermore, the person originally responsible for the libelous statements, even if he or she be adequately identified, may not be worth suing.  Thus, the real issue is whether the sysops, with their deeper pockets, are culpable for words they had no part in articulating.  If not, an injured party may be without a remedy.

CompuServe's CIS product is in essence an electronic, for profit library that carries a vast number of publications and collects usage and membership fees from its subscribers in return for access to the publications...  While CompuServe may decline to carry a given publication altogether, in reality, once it does decide to carry a given publication, it will have little or no editorial control over that publication's contents.  This is especially so when CompuServe carries the publication as part of a forum that is managed by a company unrelated to CompuServe.

The Court distinguished the case from Cubby v. CompuServe(33) which ruled that CompuServe was not liable for defamatory statements in a publication in its electronic library because CompuServe's product was, "in essence, an electronic-profit library that carried a vast number of publications, and that CompuServe had little or no editorial control over the contents of the publications."  According to the Court, "Prodigy held itself out to the public and to its members as controlling the content of its computer bulletin boards."  Furthermore, "by actively utilizing technology and manpower to delete notes from its bulletin boards on the basis of offensive and bad taste, Prodigy made decisions as to content and thereby, exercised editorial control."

However, to the extent that an online service markets itself as regulating the contents of its bulletin boards and takes on a role analogous of a newspaper or television network, it must also accept the legal consequences.  Also, the Court noted that the issues in the case may ultimately be preempted by the Communications Decency Act of 1995 currently pending in Congress.

DIALx science anthropology computer bulletin board.  In Rindos v. Hardwick, an American anthropologist posted a message criticizing the University of Western Australia for refusing to grant tenure to the plaintiff, a professor at the University, and for dismissing him.(34)   The defendant replied to this posting, and alleged that the plaintiff's academic career "has been built not on field research at allo, but on his ability to berate and bully all and sundry on the logic of his own evolutionary theories.  In the local pub, drinking and chain smoking all the while for that matter."(35)  The plaintiff sued, alleging that along with this comment, the defendant had posted a message accusing the plaintiff of engaging in sexual misconduct with a local boy and of being a racist.(36)  In a 1994 unreported decision, the court awarded the plaintiff $40,000 in damages plus interest, making no distinction between defamation on a computer bulletin board and the more traditional media.  The court's decision has been criticized for its failure to acknowledge the nature the Internet.

Furthermore, the critical question in the analysis is whether the sysop exercises editorial and supervisory control over the material.  This could result in a double edged sword for many service providers.  Legislation such as the Telecommunications Act of 1996, which includes the Communication Decency Act of 1996, may require the sysop to monitor and regulate indecent materials.  However, active control and supervision could expose the sysop to liability for defamation.  Until the laws become more user friendly, travelers in cyberspace should take some caution when utilizing the Internet, and service providers should seek some legal advice regarding their potential liability.

Cyberspace defamation not only raises questions with regard to who to sue, but also issue as to where to sue.  Generally, a defamatory statement is published where ever the statement is seen, heard or read.  Therefore, a cyberspace message posted in California can give rise to a cause of action if downloaded in Florida.  The California user, even though he has never set foot in Florida, may be subject to the Florida court's jurisdiction.   Personal jurisdiction over a nonresident defendant, however, has constitutional limitations grounded in Fifth and Fourteenth Amendment.

In International Shoe Co. v. Washington,(38) the Supreme Court established a two-part test to determine whether the jurisdiction met constitutional due process.  First, the defendant must have sufficient minimum contacts with the forum state.  Second, the exercise of jurisdiction must comport with notions "fair play and substantial justice."

The critical question of jurisdictional due process is "whether the defendant purposefully established 'minimum contacts' in the forum State."(45)  Whether a defendant's actions are "purposefully directed" toward a forum state, however, is a challenging analysis.  Courts must determine whether activity that occurs outside the forum state is "purposely directed" toward the forum state, and whether personal jurisdiction over the nonresident defendant offends due process.

Unlike traditional letters which must include a particular state in the address, an E-mail message does not include a destination state in its address.(47)  The sender of a e-mail message may not know in which state the recipient resides.  Similarly, many users posting messages on a bulletin board do not know in which state the central computer receives the posting.

Likewise, a small circulation newspaper that loads an article on the Internet can anticipate that individuals in states outside its circulation area may download the article.  Yet, this newspaper is not "circulating" the article in the forum state in the truest sense of the word.  Furthermore, the fact that a plaintiff chooses to download in a particular state is a mere coincidence, caused by the unilateral action of another.  Therefore, true "purposeful direction" towards the forum state where the material is downloaded is lacking.

Cyberspace activity differs from traditional publication, such as those in Calder and Keeton.  In cyberspace, E-mails are predestined, however, the sender may not have actual knowledge of the recipient's address.  In addition, the review and downloading of posted BBS messages into another state is fortuitous; the "publisher" does not where the message will be read or if it will be read at all.  Thus, the absolute knowledge of the publication's circulation in a particular forum and fair warning that a user may be subject to suit there is absent in most cyberspace activity.

Applying these principles in cyberspace, court's should refrain from exercising jurisdiction over a nonresident defendants simply because an online message can be read in that  state.  Whereas the connection between the defendants' conduct and the automobile accident in World-Wide Volkswagen was too attenuated, the nexus between a cyberspace user posting a message in one state and the user that ultimately downloads the same message in another state is also remote.  In both cases, personal jurisdiction over the defendant is inappropriate because there is no purposeful activity directed towards the forum and because there is no certainty of the contact.  Because mere awareness that one's product may travel into another state was insufficient to support jurisdiction, mere awareness that a message may be downloaded in another state should also be insufficient.

The factors are: the burden on the defendant; the state's interest in exercising jurisdiction; the plaintiff's convenience; the court's interest in the proper administration of justice; and the application of general policy concerns.

Most of these factors will generally have little significance for cyberspace defendants accused of libel.  However, the first factor -- the defendant's burden/inconvenience -- weights heavily against jurisdiction.(59)  In many cases, the burden of appearance on a cyberspace defendant will also be so onerous that it would render the exercise of jurisdiction over the nonresident defendant unreasonable.

If a defendant's contact with the forum state are as attenuated as some of the contacts contemplated ..., the burden on the defendant in defending the suit in a distant forum, standing alone, may require that the assertion of jurisdiction on a nonresident defendant outside the state be recognized as patently unreasonable.  Thus, assertion of jurisdiction over persons whose contact with a forum is, at best, attenuated and fortuitous would conflict with "fair play and substantial justice" as we know it.

Whether online service provider should be liable in a defamation suit, and if so, in what jurisdiction are just examples of the issues that arises when the long arm of the law reaches into cyberspace.  Another question not addressed in this paper is whether online plaintiffs should be considered public figures, and held to a higher standard of proof.  One of the rationales for requiring a higher standard for public figures is that such persons are deemed to have greater "access" to the media and greater opportunity to rebut the statements made against them.  In cyberspace, online plaintiffs similarly have easy "access" to the media -- assuming that the Internet can be considered the "media" in the traditional sense of the word.  Furthermore, the issue of forum shopping will have to be addressed by the courts as jurisdiction over online activity expands.  These questions may not be adequately answered with traditional law.

The magnitude of computer networks and the consequent communications possibilities were non-existent at the time this statute was enacted.  Applying the present libel laws to cyberspace or computer networks entails rewriting the statutes that were written to manage physical, printed objects, not computer networks or services.  Consequently, it is for the legislature to address the increasingly common phenomenon of libel and defamation on the information superhighway.

"out there" differs significantly from the customary modes of communication such as print or speech.  Moreover, courts must not shy away from understanding how the technology works, how it differs, and how it will impact our lives and the laws that govern us.  Developing the law is as much within court's province as interpreting the law.  Moreover, as defamation on the Internet becomes more common, legislatures must determine the applicability of current statutes, and redeveloped those laws if necessary.  Cyberspace is not an easy concept to imagine, and many are still reluctant to venture into unknown territory.  But, if the laws are going to extend into cyberspace, then courts and legislatures must also be willing to make that journey.

Information, particularly digital information which can be stored, searched and manipulated so easily, is a fundamental economic resource, but also a powerful weapon which, in the wrong hands, can do incalculable damage to individuals. Just as technology does not stand still, data protection rules must also continually evolve if they are to be effective in a world where the collection and exploitation of personal data is becoming forever easier and more convenient.

This paper will examine the EU Data Protection Directive, look at the possible problems U.S. businesses will incur upon its implementation in 1998, and analyze some of the possible solutions these businesses can effect to prevent the blocking of vital business data.

It seems as if there will be no problem enacting the Directive in EU Member States because all of these countries have the same cultural and political attitudes regarding privacy. However, foreign privacy commissioners have voiced concerns about American standards. (25) Privacy approaches in the US have been a product of many, well-recognized fundamental elements in our national life including: the basic distrust of the government and emphasis on individual rights and choices on which our country was founded; the immense importance of the First, Fourth and Fifth Amendments in framing the ways we define and implement privacy rights and information-handling; the powerful role of the media in the U.S. in exposing misconduct or abuses by businesses and government, and the profound commitment of the American people to market-based solutions. (26) These markedly different attitudes are the root of the problem that will face American businesses that rely on information from Europe to operate.

As long as the US is deemed to be making serious efforts to deal with the issue, sanctions may be avoided. However, businesses need to begin making efforts at compliance early, so that their efforts can be evaluated by the EU before 1998. Of the possible efforts listed, I believe that the contractual model of compliance will be the one that works, until or unless U.S. business lobbies change their perspective about the power of market driven solutions and agree to let Congress enact harmonizing legislation.

According to many, the single most important element missing in the US system is the absence of an independent enforcement mechanism that would provide a fair hearing, any necessary investigation and a remedy for individuals. (41) Senator Paul Simon once considered introducing a bill to enact a Data Protection Agency. (42) This would be a body to oversee the Federal Privacy Act with additional duties to monitor issues in the private sector, act as a communication point with European agencies over concerns they might have about the transfer of data from Europe to US companies and run awareness campaigns about potential threats to privacy. (43) As far as I know, this bill was not introduced. Even so, this need has been recognized for years by leading business and government authorities on privacy, but with no action.

Because we have no comprehensive law and because we have no series of sectoral laws that set out a full set of standards for industry, I think that we will see American companies face the presumption that there are no standards in the U.S. Thus, the only viable choice businesses have is the contractual model set forth below.

Some analysts warn that individual contracts will translate into spiraling costs as companies pay attorneys hefty fees to hammer out the pacts. (66) However, once the EU has determined with some resolution what their test for "adequacy" will be, U.S. companies will be able to develop standard agreements that can be copied by other companies in the same, or different, industries. The biggest hurdle will be the first few contracts. Once the EU gives its nod of approval to these, others will be easier to implement. However, it does seem that multinational corporations, like Citibank, will have an advantage over small businesses, since they have the legal and financial resources to develop these intricate agreements. Overall, though, the contract model will likely become the method U.S. businesses use to comply with the EU Directive.

Ideally, some framework legislation should be enacted to lay out guidelines for compliance with the Data Protection Directive for all U.S. industries. This would give small businesses just as much of a chance to continue overseas operations as large mncs. However, this will probably not happen until the business lobby seeks it. The contract solution will force businesses to live with their request for self-regulation, even though it will costs a lot of money and will disproportionately affect smaller U.S. businesses. This may, according to Professor Reidenberg, provide the incentive needed for U.S. businesses to support framework legislation as a less onerous solution. (68) But, until the Directive takes effect in 1998, we can only wait and see.

Advances in modern technology have continually made doing business across state and national borders easier.  The internet is the newest advance in modern technology and has made the world a much smaller place by allowing individuals to ignore geographical boundaries and distance.  Like previous advancements in telecommunications and transportation, the internet increases interaction across state and national borders.  Any time this occurs, problems in conflict of laws results.  However, before a claim can be asserted, the defendant must be personally subject to the court's jurisdiction.  Unless, personal jurisdiction exists, the court lacks the authority to render a judgment against the defendant.  Thus, this article focuses on what conduct in cyberspace may subject a person to personal jurisdiction in foreign forums.

This article begins with a preliminary discussion of whether cyberspace is an independent sovereign whose sovereign authority is infringed upon by a "foreign" court (any non-cyberspace court) asserting jurisdiction over one of its citizens or, in this case, netizens.  The conclusion is that cyberspace is not sovereign and, therefore, presents no independent barrier for courts asserting personal jurisdiction.  The preliminary section also finds little difference between the internet and other modern means of communication.  The next section discusses the applicable law of personal jurisdiction in the United States as established through numerous Supreme Court cases followed by a discussion of recent personal jurisdiction cases involving cyberspace contacts.   The analysis section attempts to differentiate between conduct that should and should not constitute minimum contacts for determining whether personal jurisdiction exists.  The article concludes that use of the internet need not subject the user to personal jurisdiction worldwide.

The Court appeared to have focused on two main issues in finding insufficient contacts for personal jurisdiction. First, the court found defendant did not purposefully attempt to serve the Oklahoma market. Second, it was the unilateral action of the plaintiffs that brought the car to Oklahoma. The court still left unresolved just how much a defendant has to do to "purposefully attempt" to serve a market.

Internet activity usually involves a web page, e-mail, or posting to bulletin boards or newsgroups. Although any type of action may arise from cyberspace activity, advertising and solicitation of business, trademark and copyright infringement, and torts, including defamation, appear to constitute the most common causes of action arising from cyberspace interaction. From the previously discussed cases, solicitation of business is likely to result in a contact sufficient for personal jurisdiction if the action arises from that solicitation.[26] On the other hand, courts are not uniform in determining whether mere advertising is sufficient.

Placing something on the internet is similar to placing a product in the stream of commerce such as an ad in a magazine distributed worldwide. As the cases in the following section indicate, there is little difference between suits arising from conduct in cyberspace and those arising from the physical world when defendants purposefully direct something at the jurisdiction that gives rise to the suit. For example, if an e-mail is sent from someone in one jurisdiction to someone else in another jurisdiction, the court will spend little time differentiating between an e-mail, telex, phone call, or a physical letter sent through the postal service. Regardless of the means of communication, the defendant purposefully sent a message into another jurisdiction and any actionable harm arising from the message will likely subject him to personal jurisdiction unless he can prove that it was not directed at a particular person or place.[33] As with any new technology, cyberspace alters the types of contacts, but this rule of purposeful availment is still applicable unless sovereigns are willing to allow people to do through the internet that which would otherwise be illegal. As previously discussed, sovereigns are not likely to surrender their power to regulate that which occurs within their territory.

Of the fifteen relevant cases discussed in this section, only three courts declined to assert personal jurisdiction over the defendant. Nevertheless, nearly all of the courts asserting jurisdiction required something more than mere presence on the internet. The cases asserting jurisdiction will be discussed first beginning with the criminal cases.

Playboy Enterprises v. Chuckleberry Publishing  involved trademark infringement, but defendant's had been previously enjoined from publishing or distributing its "Playmen" material in the United States.[39] Thus, whether the court used cyberspace connections to establish personal jurisdiction or merely asserted the jurisdiction based on it being retained from the previously issued injunction is not clear. The court found that asserting personal jurisdiction based on contacts from a passive website would have a devastating impact since that would subject website owners to jurisdiction everywhere in the world. However, in this case, the court found that defendants had purposefully availed themselves of the forum's market. Defendants site was a fee for service site that, like Thomas, required members to submit an application and a fee defendant before defendant would send a password. Since defendant received an application showing where the applicant was located. Defendant's purposeful act of sending the password, therefore, demonstrated his knowledge and intent to publish and distribute his material within the jurisdiction for a profit and in violation of the injunction.

In Digital Equip. v. AltaVista Technology, defendant entered into a contract with a Massachusetts company and sold software and advertising in that state.[40] All of this activity was related to defendant's internet service which plaintiff claimed was infringing upon its trademark rights. Thus, the suit arose from defendant's contacts with the forum and those contacts were not based on the mere presence of a passive website. Entering into contracts and making sales in a forum, even a single sale, is purposeful availment of that market regardless of how the transaction is consummated.

In Compuserve v. Patterson, defendants contracted via the internet with Compuserve, an Ohio corporation, to use its services and separately to sell its own software through Compuserve.[41] Similar to the courts reasoning in Burger King, the court found that defendant had reached outside his own state to establish a relationship in the forum. That relationship was maintained for three years with defendant sending mail, e-mail, and his product into the forum. The court found that the defendant did not merely place an item in the stream of commerce like a passive web page, but intentionally established a long term relationship in the forum that resulted in various contacts including at least twelve sales of his software to Ohio residents.

In a recent case, Cody v. Ward, defendant solicited buyers for purchase of a company's stock on chat lines and bulletin boards. Additionally, defendant sent e-mails and telephoned Connecticut, where the plaintiff lived, to induce plaintiff into buying the stock. Plaintiff's cause of action arose from the sale of this stock. Although mere solicitation or advertising, such as a passive web page, should not produce minimum contacts, the court found that the sole purpose of defendant's contacts were to induce the purchase that resulted. The use of e-mails, regular mail, and telephone calls all purposefully directed at Ohio established defendant's intent to avail himself of the benefits of soliciting business in the forum state.

The Supreme Court made clear in World-Wide Volkswagon, that a defendant must be able to limit where he will be subject to personal jurisdiction. A person must be able to conduct business in cyberspace without every corner of the globe being able to assert personal jurisdiction. As in the previously discussed cases, a sale requires a defendant to affirmatively accept, directly or indirectly, establishing contacts with a particular jurisdiction. Affirmative acceptance is indirect when a computer accepts and processes a payment and then sends the sold item to the purchaser. If the computer is programmed to accept sales without regard to location, then the owner has targeted the entire world, but should only be subject to personal jurisdiction if a sale was made since that is when a benefit accrues from purposefully availment of the market.

According to the court in Heroes, Inc. v. Heroes Foundation, a broader basis for finding personal jurisdiction exists when a person or entity specifically targets a market. Defendants solicited charitable contributions through a web page and an ad in the Washington Post. Plaintiff claimed trademark infringement and brought suit in Washington D.C.[44] The court held that personal jurisdiction was appropriate because the advertisement in the local newspaper demonstrated defendant's intent to solicit specifically within the forum state purposefully availing itself of the benefits of the state. This case can be differentiated from merely advertising on a web page where a specific market is not being targeted. Targeting a specific market demonstrates intent to enter and purposeful availment of the market. Whereas, a web page owner has not demonstrated specific intent to enter a particular market and, therefore, requires purposeful availment be proven by a benefit derived from the market.

In Edias Software Int'l. v. Basis Int'l.. defendant, a New Mexico company, terminated its distribution agreement with plaintiff, an Arizona company, and sent customers and plaintiff's employees e-mails explaining why agreement was terminated. Plaintiff sued for defamation based on the e-mails. The court found that defendant had established minimum contacts by entering into a contract with an Arizona company and having carried on a relationship that involved visits to Arizona and phone calls, faxes, and letters being sent to Arizona. The defamation was aimed at Arizona and the connections were related to the claim. Defendant purposefully availed itself of the benefits of transacting business in Arizona and directed its allegedly defamatory statements specifically at an Arizona company. This conduct produced contacts sufficient to give notice that Arizona was a likely forum for litigation.

In Panavision Int'l. v. Toeppen, the court found that defendant was a cybersquater.[45] Defendant had registered numerous domain names that he knew were protected by trademarks. The court found that defendant had no business reason for this conduct other than to extort payment from the companies. To assert personal jurisdiction, the court found that defendant's conduct was targeted at California because he knew that the conduct would have a harmful effect on a California corporation. Here, defendant engaged in non-passive behavior that targeted a particular jurisdiction and that he knew was likely to result in litigation.

The three courts that declined to assert jurisdiction all found that the mere accessability of a website, without more, did not constitute sufficient minimum contacts. In Hearst Corp. v. Goldberger, the court found that New Jersey site advertising services for attorneys, but not yet operational, could not subject the owner to personal jurisdiction in New York because no sale or contracts had been accepted to demonstrate the owners purposeful availment of the New York Market. [49] The court further found that to assert personal jurisdiction over this defendant would have a devastating effect since defendant would then be subject to personal jurisdiction worldwide.

In Press-Kap, Inc. v. System One, defendants ran a travel agency in New York and contracted for a computerized reservation system. [50] All dealings occurred in New York and there was no evidence that defendant even knew that plaintiff's main office was in Miami because all transactions occurred through the computer system. The court held that asserting personal jurisdiction over defendants would offend traditional notions of fair play and substantial justice because defendant had no notice that it was transacting business in Florida. Therefore, contacts based on transactions over a computer when defendant is unaware of where the transaction is taking place cannot constitute minimum contacts.

In the last case in this section, Bensusan Restaurant Group v. King, a Missouri business owner posted a web page disclaiming affiliation and linking a New York business with the same name. [51] The New York business owner brought suit alleging trademark infringement. The defendant, however, had no contacts with New York. The web site was informational only and displayed a Missouri telephone number to call for tickets. No orders were taken over the internet. Defendant also required purchasers to pick the tickets up in Missouri rather than mailing them to purchasers. Thus, defendant's only contact with New York was through its passive website that could be accessed by New Yorkers. The court held that something more than placing an item in the stream of commerce to prove that defendant had purposefully availed itself of the forum's market is required to satisfy due process when asserting personal jurisdiction.

Although a few courts still appear willing to assert personal jurisdiction based on a mere advertisement placed in the stream of commerce through the World Wide Web, the majority are likely to continue applying basic rules of personal jurisdiction which requires that a defendant has purposefully availed himself of some benefit, more than merely advertising, of that market. The law of personal jurisdiction is not as muddy or as difficult to extend to include cyberspace as some would argue or imply. The Supreme Court's interpretation of Due Process suggests at the very least that defendants intend to enter a market or purposefully avail themselves of the benefits of the market in such a way that they are on notice that they may be hailed into court there.  Additionally, defendants must be allowed to alter their conduct to limit where they can be hailed into court.

A defendant posting a web page on the World Wide Web certainly foresees the possibility of it finding its way into every jurisdiction in the world.  However, the Supreme Court has made clear that the forseeability for Due Process is not the mere likelihood that the product will find its way into the forum state.[52] Thus, not all internet users need be subject to unlimited personal jurisdiction.  A quick review of the recent cases dealing with cyberspace contacts shows that certain conduct directed at the forum must occur before the court will assert personal jurisdiction.  The vast majority of these cases involved defendants making a sale within the forum state.  Whether computers and the internet were used to accomplish these sales does not matter.  A direct sale to someone within the forum does not implicate the stream of commerce theory because the "product" was purposely sent, not swept, into the forum.  Thus, a seller cannot directly sell a product within the forum without purposefully availing himself of the benefits of the market.

A number of these cases also involved interaction only after the site owner, or its computer, issued a password.  In these cases, defendant knew or could have known with whom he was interacting and within what jurisdictions.  Since a password was issued, the site owner made an affirmative decision to accept the benefits of interacting within that market.  Again, defendants intentionally entered the market rather than being passively pulled into it.  Entering into contracts, regardless of the mode of communication, involves an affirmative act by defendant to accept and purposefully avail himself of the benefits of the contract which are derived from the forum state.  E-mail sent to a particular jurisdiction is clearly an affirmative act no different than mailing a letter, sending a fax, or placing a telephone call.  Courts, however, are split on whether these activities constitute minimum contacts.  Nevertheless, they will be considered with other contacts and may suffice on their own in some jurisdictions if the cause of action arises from the communication.

Based on existing law as reviewed, there are a number of things people can do on the internet to limit where they will be personally subject to jurisdiction.  The first thing would be to limit any significant interaction with people outside jurisdictions in which there is meant to be purposeful availment.  One Author suggests "publishing globally, but interacting locally." In other words, the more you interact, whether by having automatic e-mails sent, responding to requests for catalogs, or whatever, the web site owner is establishing two way communications that is probative to his or her purposeful availment of the market. Another author suggests using filters to deny people access to certain areas.  Passwords can also be used and issued only to markets an operator wishes to enter.  Disclaimers stating that the site is only for (specify area) and that nothing in the site is a consent to any jurisdiction may or may not be effective. Nevertheless, all of this activity shows conduct intended to limit where one is subject to jurisdiction, which the Supreme Court has held must be allowed.

The conduct that will subject a person to a foreign court's jurisdiction is not much different whether the contacts arise in the virtual or physical world.  A person operating a toll-free order line may avail himself of any market where he accepts and sends an order.  A computer, just like a person answering the phone, can decline to transact business with people in certain jurisdictions.  Failure to do so results in availment of the market that may or may not be sufficient for personal jurisdiction.  The net offers the opportunity to transact business, interact, or publish and disseminate information globally.  The mean is more efficient, but not that different from magazines distributed worldwide or worldwide toll-free numbers.  Thus, whether in the virtual or physical world, people must take steps to limit the markets that they will be subject to personal jurisdiction in at least be aware of their activities that are purposefully availing them of the benefits of a particular market.

Although the second issue, whether passive behavior like merely posting a web site can result in worldwide personal jurisdiction, has not been decisively determined by the Supreme Court.  Nevertheless, the best authority on the stream of commerce theory is World-Wide Volkswagon, which suggests that something more than merely posting a passive website is needed to confer jurisdiction over a person.  More people will be subject to personal jurisdiction in more places, but this is only because the internet makes it possible and more feasible for more people to choose to avail themselves of the benefits of additional markets.  A comparison of cyberspace and non-cyberspace cases demonstrates that the current law applies well and uniformly to both with little adaptation.  The internet merely increases transactions across sovereign borders which necessarily increases the number of instances personal jurisdiction will be asserted over a nonresident.

Individuals using these remailers can openly express unpopular ideas or expose illegal conduct without fear of ridicule or reprisal. [3] However, misuse of remailers creates some hardship for enforcement officials concerned about tortious and criminal activity on the internet. [4]  The ability to send untraceable communications and visit potentially illegal sites anonymously creates a tension between advocates of privacy rights and advocates of accountability and control.  Anonymity advocates claim both a fundamental right to privacy and the need to be protected from intrusive data collection. [5] This paper will address the opposing views of the role of anonymity on the Internet, the peculiar technical aspects of remailers which create legal problems, and the legal battle  over a recent Georgia law which limits anonymity in electronic transmissions.

Beyond humor, the White House computer systems have received anonymous e-mail death threats against President Clinton. [18]  Opportunities abound for obscene speech or terroristic threats to proliferate without any consequences to the instigator.  Professor Lawrence Lessig put it succinctly: "Perfect anonymity makes perfect crime possible. The ability to appear invisibly on a network and slander, or harass or assault, certainly will increase the incidence of those on the network who slander, or harass or assault." [19]  The secure nature of these altered messages presents a dilemma for regulators when actual risk of harm may be low, but enforcement of speech laws is, with few exceptions,  impossible.

Distributing top secret government material over the Internet potentially compromises national security.  On another front, mass publishing of copyrighted and works could devastate many corporations.  Although an anonymous leak can often be traced to a small group with access to the information leaked, there is potential for great harm before the person is discovered.

The closing of anon.penet.fi served to highlight the already increasing numbers of more sophisticated remailers.  Remailers are divided into two main categories: anonymous and pseudonymous. [29]  This distinction originally reflected large security differences beween the two types of remailers.   However, today's pseudonymous remailers are only slightly less secure than anonymous remailers and offer unique benefits.

Anonymous remailer users achieve great security through two techniques: chaining and encryption.  Chaining is the simple process of forwarding a message through two or more remailers.   Each remailer changes the headers of the message and forwards it to the next stop. [33]  Encryption is the encoding of data to secure the privacy of its contents.  Most anonymous remailers support the use of strong encryption such as PGP or other RSAREF technology to encrypt messages and headers. [34]  Used in tandem, these tools make anonymous communications exceedingly difficult to trace.

In contrast to complicated anonymous remailers, pseudonymous remailers like anon.penet.fi were simple to use because messages were sent to one remailer which attached the pseudonym and forwarded the message to the recipient.  This provided less security than with an anonymous remailer because one remailer had access to both sender and recipient headers. [39]  Thus, if a remailer's log was subpoenaed (as was the case with anon.penet.fi), there might be evidence of a link between a particular sender and recipient. [40]  However, the current generation of pseudonymous remailers, such as nym.alias.net, supports encryption and allows for chaining through Cypherpunk remailers when establishing a pseudonym or receiving replies to messages to maintain near untraceable communication. [41]  This technology has brought pseudonymous communication within a small step of anonymous communication in terms of security.

Until recently, anonymity had been used only by a relatively small group of internet users.  Much of the remailing software, like strong encryption software, was highly technical and designed to be used strictly in UNIX or DOS formats.  However, recent programs have made remailers much more accessable for the average computer user.  Joel McNamara's Private Idaho software is a widely used Windows interface which makes using both anonymous and pseudonymous remailers  a simple point and click operation.  Chaining and encryption operations are automated negating the need for technical knowledge. [42]  There are World Wide Web-based pseudonymous remailers such as Replay which remove the necessity of software for the user. [43]  Again, with ease of use in advanced remailers may come the ease of abuse foreshadowed by anon.penet.fi.

The first test case of anonymity on the Internet is likely to be ACLU of Georgia v. Miller, currently pending in the Northern District of Georgia.  [48]  The 1996 Georgia legislature enacted a law which the ACLU and numerous other privacy rights groups believe prohibits all anonymous communication over the Internet.  [49]  Based on the three Supreme Court cases dealing with anonymity, the law probably does not pass constitutional muster under First Amendment analysis because it bans all anonymous speech rather than certain illegal segments.

Applied to Internet anonymity regulation, NAACP provides precedent for the proposition that laws that compel disclosure of identity on the Internet violate a persons freedom to "espouse dissident beliefs."   Expanding on the holding that members of a group should be allowed to remain anonymous to those outside the group, NAACP can be read to state that individuals should be able to remain anonymous within their group associations.  Thus, persons afflicted with disease or victims of rape or abuse, can post to news groups anonymously.  Requiring such persons to identify themselves would subject them to the same economic and social reprisals that the Court found reprehensible in NAACP.

The laws in Talley and McIntrye attempted to restrict a fundamental right and thus, the Supreme Court applied strict scrutiny as the standard of review.  To survive strict scrutiny, legislation must be narrowly tailored to serve a compelling state interest.   While the states argued in both Talley and McIntrye that the ban on anonymous communications prevented fraud and libelous speech, neither of the state laws included language to suggest such a conclusion.  Thus, the Court found the laws overbroad and an infringement on free speech.  Similarly, a statute banning anonymity on the Net would like fail for being overly broad.

These statements may suggest a general right to anonymity.  The McIntyre opinion expands the reasoning of NAACP to include anonymous speech motivated "merely by a desire to preserve as much of one's privacy as possible."  [57]  The opinion could be read broadly to protect anonymity on the Internet without requiring a showing of a fear of economic or social reprisal.  However, narrowly construed, the speech in McIntyre was political speech which stands atop the  hierarchy of speech protected by the First Amendment.  Thus, the case may only apply to political speech.

Justice Scalia's disdain for an "unknown right to be unknown" [62] is not without supporters.  Without accountability there will be no remedy for on-line torts or crimes.  Anonymous communications over the Internet are often, for all practical purposes, untraceable.  As such, harassers, libelers, and trademark infingers will not be punished.  However, given that under the majority opinion in McIntyre statutes limited anonymous speech must be narrowly drawn, statutes making anonymous libelous, harassing and trademark infringing speech illegal would probably be constitutional since that speech is already outside First Amendment protection.

Legislatures face the problem of how to enforce a law that allows some, but not all anonymous speech over the Internet.  The Georgia statute appears to regulate all anonymous speech.  Whether it will be upheld is uncertain.  This law is being challenged on the grounds that its effect on anonymous speech on the Internet is overbroad and violates First Amendment guarantees.

A violation of this statute is a misdemeanor.  According to the unofficial legislative history, the sponsor of the legislation was concerned with copyright, trademark, and patent infringement. [63]  However, Georgia has no official legislative history and nothing in the statute indicates such a limitation.

There are evident social benefits to internet anonymity.  However, the potential for uncontainable abuse is present and is in the minds of legislators.   Current technology hides a sender's identity from not merely the recipient of his message, but from the most sophisticated methods of tracing.

The United States Supreme Court has ruled that there is a fundamental right to anonymity in at least some contexts.  It appears that any law restricting that right must be narrowly tailored to serve a compelling state interest.  Because it bans all falsely identified messages, Georgia's statute appears to fail that test.  Justice Scalia's argument for accountability may be enticing to legislators desiring to curb the rise of false information and trademark infringement on the Internet.  However, it is unlikely that a statute would pass constitutional scrutiny if it bans all  anonymous on-line speech.

Scientology v. anon. penet.fi.  Because the remailer kept a log translating pseudonyms to user IDs, the Finnish police were able to obtain the former Church member's name with a warrant to obtain the entire log.

Lance Cottrell's Mixmaster and Remailer Attacks details the functional differences among current remailer types and explains why no remailed message is completely untraceable to a mathematical certainty.

"No person shall distribute any hand-bill in any place under any circumstances, which does not have printed on the cover, or the face thereof, the name and address of . . . (a) The person who printed, wrote, compiled or manufactured the same.  (b) The person who caused the same to be distributed; provided, however, that in the case of a fictitious person or club, in addition to such fictitious name, the true names and addresses of the owners, managers or agents of the person sponsoring said hand-bill shall also appear thereon."

The ease of access and the availability of information on the Internet, combined with the advent of high speed digital data transmission has exposed cyberspace as a new and vulnerable ground for the exploitation of patents and other intellectual property.  Owners of such property have often found that the adaptation and extension of our current laws must be made to protect their legal rights in cyberspace. U.S. Constitution, Article I, Section 8, Clause 8, grants to Congress the power to "promote the Progress of Science and useful Arts, by securing for limited Times to Authors and Inventors the exclusive Right to their respective Writings and Discoveries ...."  Congress enacted the "Patent Act of 1952" under 35 U.S.C.  1, et. seq., which establishes the authority of the Patent and Trademark Office (PTO) to govern the standards for the issuance of registered patents to qualified applicants.  Under provisions of the Patent Act, patent owners are now eligible for patent protection beginning from the date of issuance, and ending 20 years from the date of filing the application.  [1]  This article will outline several Internet-related developments of patent law, including products and creations available on the Internet and their effects on the patentability standards, and the infringement and licensing issues involving patentable subject-matter in cyberspace.

Section 101 as a "process, machine, manufacture, or composition of matter ...." [3]  The Supreme Court in Diamond v. Chakrabarty has judicially interpreted this standard to mean "anything under the sun that is made by man" may be appropriate subject-matter for a patent. [4] However, the Court's broad language is not without limitations, as the objective of traditional and modern intellectual property laws is not to create an unlimited monopoly in the underlying ideas, facts, or discoveries, but to reward an inventor's creativity and originality embodied within an invention, with a limited set of enforceable property rights.  Such a limited monopoly adheres in subject-matter which arguably falls within one of the four categories described in Section 101.

The next legal standard is whether the proposed invention is "useful" under the statutory language of Section 101.  A low threshold of social utility or beneficial purpose is required to meet this standard, which is similar to the low threshold "spark of creativity" copyright standard for works of authorship mandated by the Supreme Court in Feist Publications, Inc. v. Rural Telephone Service Co., Inc. [8] However, the proposed utility cannot be an illegal or immoral purpose, or the PTO will deny patentability to the applicant.

The fourth and final standard of patentability is "non-obvious," which relies upon the subjective opinion of the PTO as to whether "the subject matter as a whole would have been obvious at the time the invention was made to a person having ordinary skill in the art...." [10]  For this inquiry, the "prior art" of the proposed invention is examined, consisting of an inquiry into all references such as patents, publications, and knowledge in the pertinent field addressed by the invention. [11] If the proposed invention would be "obvious" to the ordinary skilled person in the pertinent field addressed by the invention, the invention is considered to be "anticipated" and the application will be denied.

When a patent application is submitted to the PTO, specific technical claims of the invention are analyzed by the Patent Examiner for meeting the standards of patentability.  The scope of the patent claims define the inventor's patent, against which similar inventions may be judged for direct or contributory infringement.  Either a case for literal infringement of the patent claims or a violation of the "doctrine of equivalents" may be alleged against similar inventions.

Problems involving the Internet could arise when a user downloads a patented computer program from the World Wide Web.  If the computer program is downloaded without the permission of the patent owner, the user of the unauthorized copy of the computer program could be liable for patent infringement, by way of violating the patent owner's exclusive right to "use" the invention. [24] The act of downloading unauthorized patented computer programs from an overseas website to the user's computer here in the United States, could also subject an unwary browser to liability for patent infringement, as a violation of the patent owner's exclusive right to "import" the invention would occur. [25]  An act of contributory infringement could occur if the user downloads an unauthorized copy of the computer program from a licensee of the patent owner. [26] Above all, the user cannot sell these programs, as the patent owner's exclusive right to "sell" would be violated as well. [27] Finally, any person "actively induc[ing] infringement of a patent" can be held liable for infringement. [28]  Thus, the collector of computer programs obtained from the Internet must be cautious as to the source of his collected programs and the ultimate usage or distribution of those programs, as severe penalties for patent infringement could accrue, despite any lack of intent to infringe upon the owner's patent.

Similar to copyright law, a finding of intent to infringe is not required for holding the infringer liable for patent infringement. [29] The strict liability principle of intellectual property law creates a strong disincentive for those who contemplate infringement, as the sometimes difficult to prove element of the infringer's state of mind is removed from the owner's burden of proof.  A patent owner's property rights in computer programs can be provided joint protection by copyright and patent law, but the enforcement of the owner's rights on the Internet can be a difficult if not daunting task.  If the patent and copyrighted computer program were to be made available on the Internet to millions of users, the simple of act of unauthorized downloading or use of the program could expose many Internet users to potential liability for patent and copyright infringement. [30]  An even more innocent act that could lead to liability for patent and copyright infringement, would be if a user logged onto a network that contained unauthorized computer programs, then the user could technically still be held liable.

Graphical user interfaces (GUI) first appeared on visual window-type software applications as icons or images that portrayed a function to the computer user.  One of the most famous GUI is the garbage can that Apple Computer uses to delete files. [35] When the user drags files onto the garbage can, the can actually bulges to indicate that files are in the garbage, and the user then has the option to "take out the garbage" or permanently delete the files, which returns the garbage can back to its orignial shape. [36] The ease of using such an icon for the computer user removes the difficulty and time of typing in a series of computer commands, when the user makes the association between a GUI depicting a garbage can and the series of commands to "delete a file."  The value of the inventor's innovation and creativity to save the computer time and effort deserves to be protected under the design patent standard of "any new, original, and ornamental design for an article of manufacture."  However, three considerations under the design patent standards must be made, (1) ornamental, (2) design, and (3) article of manufacture.

As with computer programs, the Internet user must be careful not to download patented computer-generated icons, or the exclusive rights of the patent owner could be violated.  Even if the user did not download a patented icon, but independently created a patented icon such as Apple Computer's famous "garbage can" at the same time that Apple invented it, the subsequent usage of the user's icon on a computer screen with similar GUI features as Apple's "garbage can" would violate Apple's exclusive rights in its patent, if Apple was indeed the first to file a patent.

Interchange Format) files, files which have been compressed to enable the file user to transfer and store photographic and visual image files quicker.  The use of the GIF format takes up less space on the user's storage and memory devices, thus resulting in increased efficiency and ultimately reduced cost for the user.  The GIF format was developed by Compuserve Information Service in 1987 for use on communications networks, and has become the industry standard for transferring and storing graphics files. [47] However, the GIF format had been derived from a Unisys Corporation software algorithm, LZW, patented in 1985.  [48] Unisys did not begin enforcing its patent rights in LZW until 1991, beginning with hardware and software companies using the GIF format, and then in 1994 demanding patent royalties from network providers using the GIF format, such as Compuserve.

If E-Data's patent claims are interpreted broadly, or in limited part, by the courts in pending litigation, E-Data's demands for licensing will be respected by a greater number of businesses conducting electronic commerce on the Internet.  If a company chooses not to obtain a license from E-Data, that company will bear the risk of having its electronic distribution method scrutinized in a patent infringement suit, even if E-Data's patent is interpreted to cover limited forms of electronic distribution.

For the Internet user other patented encryption technology is available, but the distribution is still a tightly controlled transaction for reasons of national security, as cryptography is considered a "munition." [72] PGP is available in a freeware version to the public, but to obtain a copy, the user must agree to a license restricting the use of PGP to personal, noncommercial applications within the United States.  [73] This unusual license expressly allows the user to modify PGP and distribute the changed source code, as long as the distribution does not violate United States' export controls and the program is named so that confusion with the original PGP will not result. [74] Violation of the terms of the PGP license could subject the user to possible liability for patent infringement in the case of commercial use, or a violation of federal export control laws for releasing the domestic version outside of the United States.  The unusual terms of PGP's license for noncommercial use are by virtue of the author's desire to encourage the public's beneficial use of encryption for personal security, an end which has drawn the attention of the federal government opposed to unregulated cryptography.

A number of procedural issues may arise when a patent applicant uses the Internet before filing or in conjunction with a pending patent application. [75] The possibility of a "statutory bar" to patentability arises from the issue of "printed publication".  What is the definition accorded to "printed publication" in 35 U.S.C.  102(b), when for example, an applicant discusses or inadvertently releases a description of an invention on the Internet more than one year prior to the date of the inventor's application? [76] Generally, the clock on the "statutory bar" begins when the invention is publicly disclosed, where the disclosure of information on the Internet is widely considered to be exposure to a public forum.

Two issues are related to prior Internet discussions of an invention, the possibility of challenging the patent as "non-obvious" and the dispute over ownership of the patent.  When information is available on the Internet, arguably that information is widely accessible to others.  An increased scope of persons with access to information could allow a court to broaden the field of "ordinary" persons skilled in the art, when determining whether "the subject matter as a whole would have been obvious at the time the invention was made to a person having ordinary skill in the art ...."

The use of the Internet as a medium for discussion and information exchange could pose obstacles to a patent applicant or patent owner, under the current U.S. patent laws.  When transacations are performed via cyberspace, the potential patent holder must be careful to avoid prejudicing his rights to a valid and full term patent.  Patent owners should exercise ordinary care in distributing their products on the Internet, using adapted forms of notice somewhat similar to those they would use in distributing the same product by more traditional modes.

The Internet user should be aware of patent owners' rights as these rights are no less important than the commonly encountered copyright and trademark owners' rights.  Patent law affords a limited monopoly of exclusive rights upon the patent owner, who may file for patents in computer programs, computer-generated icons, cryptography systems, data compression techniques, and possibly electronic payment and distribution systems.  A patent in any of these inventions or ideas would provide broader protection than a copyright, as the idea of the invention can be monopolized.  Patent licensing allows the patent owner to capitalize upon the investments that potential licensees put into the patent owner's invention.  The Internet user should be aware of the licensing terms and agreements in place when using or incorporating patentable material into a webpage or website.

The advantages of patent protection are restricted by the limited duration of a patent, the time and monetary costs of filing and maintaining a patent, and the difficulties in marketing the invention.

Pornography-filled magazines and films have existed for years and their censorship was rather easy.  One would have to show identification of age (21 in most states, 18 in others) to purchase a magazine or film.  With the invention of the Internet, pornography can be seen by anyone at anytime around the entire world.  Likewise, hate groups have also started to use the Internet to show their propaganda.  Access to the Internet can be obtained quite easily for someone with a computer and a modem.  Furthermore, the Internet is available in many libraries, cybercafes, and schools.  It is a cheap form of advertisement for anyone interested in using it to attract mass audiences.

So then what form of censorship, if any, is needed to protect people from the harmful information that could be displayed on a web site?  Children under the required legal age can view pornographic materials on the Internet and other people can promote various forms of hatred and racism via the Internet.  Should these pornographic pictures and hate messages be censored, or should the viewer and the creator have a choice?

This paper will discuss the various forms of current censorship of the Internet and the controversies of putting limits on free speech.  It will also discuss other forms of censorship called "self-censorship" which may provide a better answer than government-mandated techniques.

But, as many people are disgusted by such material, censorship is not the right answer.  By bringing such issues to the forefront, we can discuss these topics openly.  What may be questionable to some, is not for others.  The government has tried to censor a lot of this material through various state laws.  All of this Internet censorship has brought up much debate over the constitutionality of the censorship.  Below are such instances of censorship.

Joseph Bunkley, a former student at Georgia State University, advocated Neo-Nazi material through his Internet access at school.  He wrote about "white supremist" views, the Holocaust, and like material.  Many people complained about his distasteful use of the Internet, particularly because his account was available through Georgia State.  Therefore, Georgia State University was faced with a major problem: what will the school do about this "nuisance."  The GSU administrators did not want to directly infringe on Mr.

Bunkley's 1st Amendment rights of free speech, but at the same time, they wanted to terminate the negative press they were receiving.  So, they found a loophole.  At the time of the incident, Mr. Bunkley was "not enrolled" at GSU.  So, the school cut off his access to email and the Internet.  The law allows the school to terminate access to the Internet to those students not currently enrolled.  Therefore, instead of creating some form of "censorship", the school was able to avoid the problem without directly infringing on Mr.

Alabama has a method of censoring information on the Internet.  Alabama House Bill 100 would prohibit "electronic transmission" of material deemed "obscene to minors."  Since the U.S. Supreme Court has already defined obscenity as well as stated that it is not protected expression, the main argument against this bill, which has not come into force, is that it is attempting to re-define "obscene to minors" to include Constitutionally protected expression.

Pennsylvania has a more creative form of censorship.  It is still pending, but is expected to pass.  Pennsylvania House Bill 1727 makes it a crime to use a computer network to transmit information describing the production of explosives.  On its face, the law seems to be prohibiting information based on content.  However, if it is already against the law to distribute information describing the production of explosives, then the use of a computer to do this should also be prohibited, and therefore would not create any serious censorship issues.

Georgia has also passed a censorship law regarding speech.  House Bill 76 was signed into law in March of 1995.  It prohibits the online transmission of fighting words, obscene or vulgar speech to minors and information related to terrorist acts and certain dangerous weapons.  This law is quite controversial.  What if two friends, both minors, are communicating online and they are using "vulgar language."  Would this be prohibited?

This seems to infringe on the 1st Amendment free speech provision.  This law, like the others mentioned above, will most likely be under judicial scrutiny in the near future.  Groups like the ACLU are already looking into the matter.

Pornography.  The state law in question banned users on state-owned computers from accessing pornography on the Internet.  The University of Oklahoma banned campus access to almost 200 Internet newsgroups in the "alt-sex" area of Usenet.

Loving failed to prove that his 1st Amendment rights were violated.  The University computers were paid with taxpayers' money and the people of Oklahoma do not want their money used to distribute pornography.  Also, the state has the right to preserve its property.  Furthermore, the school has a duel-server system: one that blocks obscene material, and one that does not.  The user of the server that does not block obscenity has to agree to use the net for academic purposes and the user's age is verified.

What about the material that is blocked out because it may have sexual connotations, but in fact is academic, like Indian sculptures, African tribal nudity, and stories on female genital mutilation?  Perhaps this case will be appealed for further review of its harsh ramifications.

The CDA prohibited minors from access to indecent materials.  However, as the court noted, there are other material contained in the prohibition that did not need to be censored.  Topics like photographs in National Geographic or a travel magazine, articles on female genital mutilation, and Indian sculptures that have educations values were also censored.  The court said such censorship sweeps more broadly than necessary and thereby chills the expression of adults.

The CDA is unconstitutional on its face for these four reasons: (1) the Internet presents very low barriers to entry (2) these barriers to entry are identical for both speakers and listeners (3) as a result of these low barriers, astoundingly diverse content is available on the Internet, and (4) the Internet provides significant access to all who wish to speak in the medium, and even creates a relative parity among speakers.

If a speaker's content is at all indecent, then she will face the risk of prosecution and the cost of compliance of the CDA.  This is exactly why the court chose to hold the Act unconstitutional.  The court further noted that the CDA would undermine the substantive, speech-enhancing benefits that have flowed from the Internet.  The diversity of the content on the Internet would diminish, and therefore, defeat the very purpose for which the Internet was invented.

Instead of having government-sponsored methods of censorship, people can choose for themselves which Internet sites they want unviewable.  There are many different services that provide this option.  These services require a small fee, but the user gets to decide exactly what they want censored.  Many choose this option for their personal computers at home to protect their children from questionable Internet content.  Other users include schools and libraries.  Using this method can allow the user full control and avoid any government-mandated censorship that can infringe on viewers' rights.

Net Nanny is a service that provides censorship methods to protect children.  In order to subscribe to the Net Nanny service, one can visit their web site and fill out the necessary form.  The service fee is $39.95 to order Net Nanny.

According to Net Nanny, their screening lists are "completely user-defined" and "allow parents to screen and block any words, phrases, sites and content according to their parents values - not a developer's arbitrary selection or the Governments."  For example, if a parent did not want her child to view any sites with the word "sex" or "white supremist", then Net Nanny could block these words when the child is on the Internet.  Furthermore, Net Nanny can load family information, such as names, addresses, and credit card numbers so the child or anyone else cannot transmit this information through the Internet.  This is a very helpful option for a parent in situations where a child chooses to purchase something without permission or if the child is conversing with someone who asks the child for her name and phone number.

Another advantage of Net Nanny is that it blocks anything you desire, whether it be pornography, hate literature, bomb-making formulas, theft tips, Neo-Nazi teachings, or drugs.  Parents are concerned about protecting their children from the usual pornography, but are also concerned about other material like those mentioned above.

Net Nanny with a password.  This feature is important so that a family's computer is not completely blocked from certain Internet sites.  If the sole purpose of obtaining Net Nanny is to protect the children and censor only certain sites from their eyes, then the other family members can disable Net Nanny so they can view sites that are otherwise questionable for their children.  This gives the users more control over what is censored and when it is censored.

Internet without government intervention.  Instead of having the government involved in censorship, the control should be left with families, schools, and other institutions that are worried about questionable content for children.

Both Adult Check and Net Nanny offer a small-fee service for restricting material that may be questionable for certain viewers.  These are good methods of censoring information without government intervention.  The owner chooses which sites to censor, who has access to certain sites, and when to censor.  When the user has control over censorship, there is little room for 1st Amendment infringement.

Pornography, hate group literature, and other "offensive material" is widely disseminated on the Internet.  The Internet provides a cheap, easy, and widely-viewed forum for everyone.  When these kinds of questionable material are presented on the Internet, many viewers are disgusted and want censorship to protect people like minors.  Many states and even Congress passed laws to censor certain material available on the Internet.  Some laws have succeeded, while others have failed.

Then there are organizations like Net Nanny and Adult Check where viewers have the control to pick and choose which sites are suitable for their users.  Such forms of self-censorship are more popular than government-mandated restrictions.

Issues that are controversial should be openly communicated so that people can face the ramifications and have a chance to create change.  When such views are locked up from society, there will never be an opportunity to resolve them.  The Internet provides such a forum, and this forum is the fastest and most technologically-sound method.  Any form of censorship of the Internet should be done cautiously, if at all.  Whatever the form, the user should have full discretion, and there should never be any unnecessary restrictions by the government.  Often overlooked, the state criminal codes are sufficient to meet these very ends.

It is not ironic that, a century later, all of the arguments adduced in favor of protecting individual persons? privacy in the specifically electronic media have been adopted by corporations as a means of protecting their own transactions. Not only are corporations the first among equals, when their rights conflict with mere biological persons, but more recently both Congress and the courts have favored corporate interests even above the former trump card of national security.[3] There is considerable irony in the correlative rhetoric of preserving freedom in the new electronic media, however; although retaining the language of individual rights, the individuals concerned are largely corporate. The reality of the recent court decisions is that wherever biological and corporate interests collide, the latter win. Hence, especially in the debates over the licensing of strong encryption software, the freeware program Pretty Good Privacy (PGP) is being touted as the technological guarantor of true or enhanced privacy by both biological and corporate persons. Yet in all of the possible contexts where those two interests collide, corporations have been able to assert their traditional role as master to defeat the privacy or other related liberty claims of "their" persons or servants.

In sum, the dialectic by which a right that was originally defended as an individual right has been presumed to belong first and foremost to corporations. History repeats itself, first as irony then as law.

But I need not insist on even the slightest of subliminal plots here. As cultural anthropologist Louis Dumont has noted,[7] whenever any two cultural elements conflict, as commerce and protection in this last case, there will always necessarily be ranked in some sort of operative hierarchy. This ranking may be at least partly the result of a political debate or process, but there may be moreover an underlying cultural value (ranking) more generally determines the outcome. While this ranking may also be influenced by the same Hollywood process above, I will simply note what that value is rather than insist on any particular explanation of it. The value is that corporate interests count more heavily than personal ones. The relevant irony is that the "personal" language is used so interchangeably with the corporate apologetics. It takes these typical cases of conflict between the two to mark the fact that the two rhetorics are so easily conflated.

The question: are the current "electronic" claims about free speech and, conversely, privacy as new as their proponents stereotypically claim? Or are they old, moreover presupposing the paradigm of the Santa Clara model by which corporations were granted at least some powers by federal government license, not to be unfairly taxed by the state governments? If the latter, then there is yet another complication to the above noted problem of cultural hierarchy: where do corporate rights and powers stand in relation to the more traditional individual and governmental ones?

This same reversal however has only strengthened the legal bargaining position of the employer. Next I will show how this commerce-as-freedom factor, despite retaining the same individualist language of freedom licensed in the Santa Clara holding, actually diminishes the freedoms of mere biological individuals.

The very fact that the European Union Data Protection Directive[44] still proclaims it a crime for companies to invade the electronic privacy of their employees indicates that this presupposition is banal. If the individual (employee) has the right to protection of personal data, this will raise the information cost to the employer. Thus, "even when a [U.S.] company moves to self-regulate" in this regard, "by adopting its own data protection code, this does not give data subjects [employees] a legal right of recourse, which is crucial in the European system."[45] Hence the argument that whether a given (set of) employee(s) is actually accorded a privacy right in E-mail is answered solely in terms of "corporate culture"[46] crucially presupposes that the given corporation is the legal holder of the right or prerogative. But the mere assertion of this right presupposes the tautologous triumph of the efficiency definition above.

While not delving into the legal details of the EU Directive here, its relevance is obvious. The actual is the possible: it shows that the interests of commerce can be considered compatible with those of employees, even if employee rights raise the cost of information. This helps us to narrow the question about the lack of employee protection in the U.S. Why this lack? Pace Dumont: in our culture, corporate entities have both the rights of individuals and the power of governments. That is, they are (tautologously) regarded as the more efficient keepers of the (escrow and other) keys.

Although there is no federal court precedent[48] on whether so-called remailers or anonymizers, by which E-mail users can relay their electronic communications by way of a service that allows each user to adopt a pseudonym, there is a common legal thread running through these phenomena. The recently passed Georgia Electronic Records and Signatures Act[49] makes electronic signatures legally binding. The traditional idea is that no contract is valid without both being reduced to a writing (at least, as far as the statute of frauds is concerned) and attested to by the relevant parties, such that the parties? signatures in effect constitute their legal claim of being the individuals named in the act.

Space precludes going into this topic in its own right, but essentially the spirit of the Act is that nobody can claim legal anonymity in the final analysis. The following desiderata however should question whether the "contract" framework is even appropriate for the types of activity that the remailer services provide.

The Act will predictably raise a connected chain of legal questions in its own right. UPS, for instance, not only records customers? signatures on the electronic pad that they sign, but sells (electronic copies of) them to other companies.[50] Obviously, the copy is not what the traditional law of contracts takes to be the legal voucher, but companies claim that it is a good enough replication of the original to afford a pattern against which to test subsequent signatures by real persons.

Finally, we can return to my claimed inversion of constitutionally intended priorities.  Do these distinctions have any implications for prioritizing corporate and individual entities? respective interests?  Is there a genuine analog here to my paradigmatic case of minority groups' inability to use the Fourteenth amendment under the environmental discrimination rubric, insofar as their corporate neighbors own the rights to that amendment over any mere association that does not have standing?

It is noteworthy here that the pro-corporate advocates use the more descriptive term, that Push is just "the next logical step in Internet evolution," while detractors call it "a pox on the Web [that] must be eradicated at all costs."[63] (Or as the greatest of all individualists put it, "Your crime is that you tried to steal my world!")[64] Not having the corporate-strength right to say this, however, I will defer to mere confirmation of my original hierarchy hypothesis. In the words of Internet economic seer Ted Lewis in the aptly named "The Year I Shoot my TV," this is really just corporate democracy defeating the "elite/business users" in favor of the "unwashed masses," a process whose market segmentation can be exploited. "One [viz., one corporate CEO] must not ignore the profit opportunities along the value chain connecting a consumer to a product."[65] While I believe there is such a thing as an "Internet culture" that will retain the above "sense of community and control" and not let this happen on a grand or totalitarian scale, my more general point from the Dumont perspective is that Lewis? "value chain" notion represents the corporatist inversion, for its own ends, of the original preeminent valuation of individualist rhetoric in the larger U.S. constitutional culture.

Imagine the following scenario:  In a small town in Wisconsin, a teacher at the local high school clears a paper jam in the computer lab printer.  She retrieves an email written by one of the high school students (obviously to his girlfriend) describing in graphic detail the couple's prior weekend sexual activities.  Horrified that the school's computers are being used to transmit such obscene messages, the teacher notifies the school principal who, in turn, calls the young man into his office.  As punishment for his misuse of the school property, the boy's access to the school computers is suspended for two weeks.  In retaliation, the boy and his parents file a lawsuit against the high school officials for violations of his constitutional right to free speech and privacy.

Classrooms across the United States have increasing access to electronic communication and this scenario is fast becoming a practical issue that school administrators, school boards, and families with children in school must address.  Email communication in the school setting is not only useful to send messages between students in the same school, community, or state, but Internet sites even encourage communication worldwide.  Enhancing communication between students worldwide can have a tremendous educational benefit.  Students can learn first hand about different cultures, customs, and traditions.  Teachers can increase educational expectations beyond the knowledge available from encyclopedias, books, and videotape.  Literally, email can bring to life any cultural, history, science, or geography project.  Foreign language classes can exchange messages with Spanish, French, German or other students who do not speak English, or who use English as a second language and receive first hand experience reading and writing with "experts."  Students studying a particular State or region of the country can get first hand knowledge of the area by emailing students or teachers from that region.  Students can also use email to communicate with businesses, librarians, government agencies, teachers, universities, researchers, or similar resources about practically any issue.

Abuse of the email technology can be a valid concern among school administrators.  Using the school's email system to send graphic sexual messages like the scenario described above can negatively impact on the education environment.  Students can further abuse the technology by sending inappropriate messages to other students at rival schools before sporting events creating tension that may result in violence.  Gang members in schools may use the technology to recruit members or plan illegal activities.  The emerging availability of user friendly encrypting technology can guarantee privacy with relatively minor software additions to the schools current computer systems.  Thus, now may not be too soon to raise questions about using this technology in the school setting or permitting students to have access to encrypted email messages.

Increasing technology in the school setting and the potential to abuse the technology is making it necessary for school administrators to examine the issue of school policies that address electronic communication and Internet use.  As a practical matter, school administrators have an interest in the effect technology abuses may have on the educational process and the relative safety of students.  For example, policies may address safety by advising students how to respond to informational requests from strangers.  Other policies may establish terms and conditions for using the school's email and Internet or address censorship.  For schools that establish policies or subject a student to discipline for email abuse, the question becomes whether school policies governing email, either formal or informal, create constitutional questions relating to the student's right to free speech protected under the first amendment or privacy protected under the due process clause.  Courts have not reported a decision on this emerging topic, but one commentator posted a paper on the Internet that discusses some of the legal issues relating to school-based internet use policies.  It is a broad discussion that examines the School Board's role, student discipline, plagiarism and copyright, and free speech in general for both students and school staff.  This paper focuses exclusively on the student's use of email and the school administration's interest in monitoring email content.  This paper examines the question of students' autonomy, students' constitutional rights, and the interests of school administrators to insure their  educational setting is safe and effective.  Although case law directly on point does not exist, we can draw from analogous decisions regarding free speech and due process in the school setting to discuss the balance between authority and autonomy in our public school environment.

There is no doubt that Americans place great value on personal freedom.  The right to exercise individual choice not only has been the battle cry for countless wars over the centuries, it was a major theme in the framing of the U.S. Constitution and continues to be a powerful political concept today.

The Supreme Court again reversed, holding that a school need not tolerate student speech that is inconsistent with its "basic educational mission," even though the government could not censor similar speech outside the school.(45)  Further, educators are "entitled to exercise greater control . .

While the holdings of these cases alone should provide ample legal justification for any actions taken by school officials, another recent Supreme Court decision appears to have given educators' blanket authority over students.

When Justice Hugo L. Black dissented in Tinker he exclaimed, "I wish, therefore, . . . to disclaim any purpose . . . to hold that the Federal Constitution compels the teachers, parents, and elected school officials to surrender control of the American public school system to public school students."(78)   This warning has apparently been taken to heart by the courts.  In the wake of the Supreme Court's recent decisions in Bethel, Hazelwood and Vernonia, it appears that the constitutional rights children may not have shed at the schoolhouse gate are nonetheless handed over to the home room teacher before the bell rings.

These decisions applied to the question of whether student email should expect a level of privacy appears to favor school administrators' rights to deny student access to email and further monitor email transmission for its content.  Further, applying these analigous decisions school officials can take action for student email that is materially disruptive or interferes with the school's ultimate educational mission.

Since the Supreme Court's departure from T.L.O., the school official again sits comfortably in the role of having a degree of supervision and control over the students.  This change places the Court's view squarely on the premise that learning is more vital in the classroom than free speech, and student email is not private.

I know a man who is firm -- he's firm in his pants, he's firm in his shirt, his character is firm -- but most . . . of all, his belief in you, the students of Bethel, is firm . . . Jeff Kuhlman is a man who takes his point and pounds it in . . . He doesn't attack things in spurts -- he drives hard, pushing and pushing until finally -- he succeeds.  Jeff is a man who will go to the very end -- even the climax, for each and every one of you.

First Amendment did not prevent school board from removing previously approved textbook from high school class due to book's vulgarity and sexual explicitness since board's methods were reasonably related to legitimate pedagogical concerns).

S.Ct. 518 (1995)(holding that teacher's refusal to allow student to write a research paper on the life of Jesus Christ was not a violation of the student's right to freedom of speech since teacher has broad authority over grading, curriculum and course content).  "The bottom line [is] that when a teacher makes an assignment . . . the student has no constitutional right to do something other than that assignment."  Settle at 158 (Batchelder, J., concurring).

Further aggravating the potential liability of sysops are computer systems that allow users to upload[6] and download[7] various types of files.  These various file types include "computer software, digital images or video, digital audio, text, or novel combinations of all these media (multimedia)."[8]  Many of these files are not copyrighted and therefore do not expose the sysop to any potential liability by users downloading or uploading them.  Files which are available for uploading or downloading are known as freeware or public domain software.[9]  Other software may fall into a category known as shareware.[10]  However, despite the volume of information available to the public, there remains a great deal of material that is copyrighted.

Many computer systems work as "software repositories" from which users can post and acquire files.  The basic concept is one that is utilized by small home based bulletin board systems to large commercial online systems alike.  Many systems have amassed huge file libraries containing thousands of files from a multitude of sources.  Therefore, it is important to note that each individual file could potentially be copyrighted and as such, open the sysop to some form of copyright infringement.

Copyright law was created to balance the rights of creators of original, tangible works in a fixed medium, against the needs of society.  The authors of these works have a right to receive credit as well as compensation, if so desired, for their creations; while others should be allowed access and use of these works for the advancement of society at large.  The United States has codified copyright law in federal statutes under Title 17 of the United States Code, also known as the Copyright Act.

The right of literary property as recognized and sanctioned by positive law.  An intangible, incorporeal right granted by statute to the author or originator of certain literary or artistic productions, whereby he is invested, for a specified period, with the sole and exclusive privilege of multiplying copies of the same and publishing and selling them.

Whenever a third party user accesses a computer system and either uploads or downloads files, there is a risk that the file or information within the file was copyrighted material.  Thus, the operation of uploading or downloading the file may have "copied, displayed, distributed, or otherwise violated one of the enumerated rights under section 106 of the Copyright Act."[19]  Consequently, sysops could be faced with a claim of direct infringement, contributory infringement, or vicarious liability.

Assuming the first element, a valid copyright, is satisfied by the plaintiff, the issue becomes whether by virtue of running a computer system is a sysop liable for direct infringement.  Under the decision of the United States District Court for the Middle District of Florida, the answer is yes.

Every contributory infringement must flow from a direct infringement.  The model applied in the Sega case requires that the sysop induce or in some manner contribute to the infringing activity of the direct infringer.  Whether a sysop performing his job of maintaining his system rises to this level of contribution is a question still left unanswered by the courts.  Not every instant will be as clear as the facts presented in Sega.

Therefore a more workable model is needed.  A vicarious liability model could satisfy this need.  Vicarious liability is derived from the tort theory of respondeat superior.[44]  It has two elements:  (1) it requires that the plaintiff prove that the defendant had the right or ability to control or supervise the actions of the direct infringer, and (2) that the defendant also had a financial interest in the use of the copyrighted work.

Another case type that provides a vicarious liability framework is the landlord/tenant cases.  These cases present relationships between parties that are not unlike those between the parties involved in a sysop liability case.  The landlord/tenant cases involve fact patterns where the landlords rent their property to tenants who then commit acts of copyright infringement on or using the leased property.  This scenario is exemplified by the case of Deutsch v. Arnold.[53]  Plaintiff had a copyrighted handwriting analysis chart.  Defendant a former employee of plaintiff, leased property from Defendant Dworman for $200, and opened a competing location of her own using a substantially similar handwriting analysis chart.[55]  The court found that Defendant Arnold directly infringed the copyright of the plaintiff.[56]  Plaintiff also tried to hold Defendant Dworman, and her rental agent Bernart, liable for the infringement since she had leased the space in which the infringement occurred to Arnold.  The court held that "[s]omething more than the mere relation of landlord and tenant must exist to give rise to a cause of action by plaintiffs against these defendants for infringement of their copyright on the demised premises."[57]  The lack of proof of any infringement on the part of Defendants, Dworman and Bernart,  and the fact that they received no particular benefits from the infringement, as well as the lack of proof that they had any knowledge of the infringing activities, satisfied the court that they should not be held vicariously liable for the acts of the direct infringer.

The lessor/lessee relationship between defendants Dworman and Arnold is similar to the relationship that exists between sysops and the users of their systems.  There are many instances where the sysop does nothing more than essentially provide "space" on their BBS for the users to utilize.  If there is no knowledge of the infringing activity nor any benefit that flows directly from the infringing activity than under the landlord/tenant model, vicarious liability would not attach to the sysop merely for providing the user access to the BBS or online system.

The Netcom decision thus presents the most recent model of sysop liability, but is it the best?  The California district court has given a clear and concise test for vicarious liability for sysops, but at the same time they may have undermined the direct infringement standard set by the Playboy decision.

Finally, there is the vicarious liability standard outlined in Netcom.  In order for the sysop to be held vicariously liable for the copyright infringement of a user, the plaintiff must prove that the sysop:  (1) had the right and ability to control the direct infringer and (2) received a direct financial benefit from the infringement.

While all three theories of liability will have their place in future cases dealing with sysop liability, the one that best balances the position of a sysop with the rights of a copyright holder that have been infringed by a third party user is the vicarious liability model.  But even this model may prove unworkable in assessing liability of large systems such as America Online.  On the other hand, if large online systems are aware of the exact liabilities they face, they can purchase insurance to protect against damages which could flow from their vicarious liability or they could contract their liability away by requiring users who access their systems to indemnify them against any vicarious liability claims.

In defense, AOL argued that the suit violated CDA 230 "by seeking to treat AOL as the 'publisher' of third-party content -- that is, 'information provided by another information content provider.'"  The court, deciding in favor of AOL, stated that "the CDA preempts a negligence cause of action against an interactive computer service provider arising from that provider's distribution of allegedly defamatory material provided via its electronic bulletin board."[112]  The wide spread adoption of the Zeran decision would provide sysops with a broad federal  defense against any liability claims predicated upon third party infringement.  Further, this decision, if adopted, would preclude the application of either the contributory and vicarious liability models against system operators in third party user infringement cases.  Such analyses, would never be reached.  Instead, the critical question becomes whether the sysop can be considered to be a "publisher"

One event which must occur is that the Copyright Act needs to be revised to address the effects that technological advances are having on the rights of copyright holders and the liability faced by those working and utilizing these advances.  Just as copyright holders have rights which must be protected, sysops have a right to know what liability they potentially face.  This needs to be codified by Congress into the Copyright Act, or the Supreme Court will have to hear and decide a case that specifically addresses the sysop liability issue for third party user infringement.  Perhaps the Zeran case will be that case.  It  seems to be well suited, since it involves the judicial interpretation of a Congressional act, even though it lies outside of the Copyright Act, and the bulk of case law interpreting it.

Probably the most likely scenario will be thean adoption of a new right granted to copyright holders.  This new right would grant copyright holders exclusive control over the electronic transmission and posting of their works.

Until one of these scenarios comes to fruition, assessing whichat model to best appliesy to sysop third party liability issues will continue to be a topic of debate and a source of inconsistency in the growing body of online law.

Additionally, there is the question of who is liable for copyright infringement, i.e. does liability stop at specific individuals posting copyrighted work in an unlawful manner, or does it extend to entities such as bulletin board services and online service providers?

Others contend that new laws must be passed. Meanwhile, courts have had to deal with these issues with or without new laws in deciding the liability of defendants for alleged Internet copyright infringement.

Part III will lay out the facts of pertinent Internet cases and discuss the reasoning of courts in reaching different conclusions on the appropriate scope and standard of Internet copyright liability. Part IV will propose a model of Internet copyright liability consistent with the principles behind American copyright laws. The author's concluding reflections will be presented in Part V.

CompuServe Incorporated[20], involved music publishers who commenced suit against CompuServe Incorporated, alleging copyright infringement based on a strict liability theory like that applied in Frena and Sega. The plaintiffs alleged that CompuServe was liable for the acts of its subscribers, who had uploaded to and downloaded from a CompuServe Forum sound recordings of the publishers copyrighted musical compositions.[21] The case was concluded by use of a court-approved settlement.

Under this theory many contend that the incentive to produce should be served by an expansion of copyright law to offset the harmful effects of new technologies on copyright owners' profits. Naturally, anyone supporting this theory must believe that the level of copyright protection before the rise of the Internet and other new technologies was ideal, or, alternatively, lacking even then.

This position is consistent with traditional copyright law and serves the principles behind copyright law by protecting a copyright owner's right to profits and by providing creators incentive to produce as liability is strict for those who intentionally infringe protected works. However, it is the author's position that, consistent with holdings of cases such as Netcom, Internet service providers, BBSs, and other entities accused of indirect copyright violation must be shown to have either known or should have known of a copyright violation by one of its users before liability for infringement attaches. The reason for this known or should have known standard is that direct online violators of copyright are already liable, and while the principles behind copyright laws may be served by strict liability for even indirect online infringers, there is the competing goal of widespread dissemination of information to the public.

Internet users from all corners of the world may view and download these images at their own discretion. Such access is unfiltered and unguarded and is always anonymous. The utter ease with which a minor may encounter such inappropriate material has instigated a national outcry for censorship of the Internet. This article will peruse the libraries of legal precedent in an effort to analyze the validity of censorship laws as they are applied to the Internet.

If one were to delve further into this proposed solution, it would be clear that the solution itself is fraught with problems. Of the foremost concern would be ensuring the integrity of the membership. How would one ensure that those who are engaging in community discretion are not, themselves, minors or members of other protected classes? How could one guarantee that the membership is diverse, and that it reflects the desires of the entire Internet community? Though technologically possible, it would be costly to implement the safety precautions necessary to authenticate the veracity of the "community's" will. Whereas local community standards may be evidenced by what appears in contemporary magazines, books, newspapers, television, motion pictures, novels and other media of communications, there is no doubt that local laws carry great weight.

However, being a government controlled entity, it was kept under tight reigns, at least until 1983, when the military division separated an became the MILNET.[8] Eventually, with the increased availability and functionality of computers, a vast network developed and finally became known as the "Internet", basically swallowing the former ARPANET.[9] Now there are tens of thousands of nodes on the internet, and is being accessed by millions of people.

The two most popular browser store cookies in similar ways. Both store a cookie in typical text format. Netscape Navigator uses one file named cookies.txt. To access the file, it is typically located in the path "C:\Program Files\Netscape\Users\username\cookies.txt".

While this may not be a major problem for some users,[26] others may want to at least know what type of information about them can be accessed and what type of information they are giving to a server without there knowledge.

This state of affairs is short-sighted for a number of reasons in the internet context, but perhaps most glaringly because of the jurisdictional problems that will inevitably arise in a context where state lines become blurred if not completely obliterated.

With technology evolving at increasingly rapid rates, and regulation failing to keep even moderate pace alongside it, it seems likely that the uses of cookies in the future will become even more clandestinely invasive.

At this point in time, anyone using the internet as either a consumer or a commercial entity should proceed at their own risk. Cookies are a good illustration of this warning, since they were designed for a limited purpose that in practice has been greatly expanded and at least to some, become exploitive of consumers. If our current state of non-regulation continues, it is difficult to predict how much more clandestine and invasive cookies and/or similar technologies may become in the future.

The need for electronic court filing has grown out of a desire for speed and automation, and a desire to cut down on great amounts of paper shuffling through the courts. Paper filing in Georgia courts is time consuming, wasteful, difficult to store and costly. Additional disadvantages to paper filing are misplaced documents, delays in requests for documents and labor costs for staff to manage the paper.

Courts can reduce costs, time and effort by converting to electronic filing for many or all court proceedings. Most documents that attorneys produce and submit to the court are originally created on a computer. After printing them and sending them to the court, these documents are then logged in at the court, and in the case of a motion, the court then creates by computer an order, which is then printed and sent to the attorney. This means that documents go from computer to paper, to computer to paper. With the growth and popularization of the Internet and electronic transactions it is now more and more rational to skip the printing step and accomplish the same tasks in an electronic format only.

Three barriers to electronic court filing are the need to "sign" documents, to automate the process of signing and verifying electronic signatures, and to ensure security of those documents. In order to solve these problems and take the important step into modern electronic court filing, courts, lawyers, administrators and legal policy makers need to examine carefully several issues. For example, we need to be assured first of all that our electronically signed documents will be accepted under Georgia's court rules requiring a signing and time deadlines. We also want to be sure that our documents will not be corrupted or changed en route, and that if they are changed, that the recipient can tell and alert us of the discrepancy.

In certain cases we might want the motion or another document encrypted so that the information remains confidential for privilege purposes and for general privacy reasons. Finally, and most important, we need to be certain that when a document bearing our name is submitted to the court that it can verify that the sender really was he and not an imposter.

In addition, we may also need to file other motions to the local district court, and to a state court 100 miles away. Since it would be inconvenient to have different electronic filing procedures for each county and the three districts in Georgia, a simple, uniform procedure by which to submit and electronically "sign" and submit our documents to any court would be preferable.

There is a debate about whether or not a court needs all of these characteristics in documents submitted to them electronically. This paper takes the position that in the legal world all of these services are essential at one time or another. Confidentiality is perhaps the least essential in electronic court filing only because most filed documents are a matter of public record.

Therefore, actually encrypting a motion, for example, would be rare. However, adoption, juvenile records and sensitive discovery items are examples of things that would need to be encrypted to preserve confidentiality. Message integrity is always important because of the need to be sure that documents arrive intact. Both the sender (e.g., the attorney) and the recipient (e.g., the court) can use the digital signature of a document to verify that a document was not altered between the time of sending and its arrival.

Trusted authentication is the most important and difficult to attain service in electronic court filing. For example, a complaint cannot be presumed to have been "signed" by the attorney unless there is a way to verify that the digital signature attached to the complaint belongs to the attorney claiming to have sent it. Similarly, non-repudiation services will prevent a party from claiming he sent a particular document when he really did not, or it could prevent a recipient from claiming that he did not receive a document when he really did.

Time-date stamping is of course important in the legal world. In court filing, time limits such as filing deadlines and statutes of limitation demand that an electronically filing attorney be assured that his documents bear an electronically generated, non-repudiable time-date stamp so that he can satisfy these requirements. This fifth characteristic is actually in a class by itself. When a document is time-date stamped using digital signature technology it also necessarily embodies the characteristics of message integrity, non-repudiation and authentication (explained later in paper).

There is debate about whether the full force of these services will actually exceed current levels of security in the paper-based world, which might be unnecessary. With the exception of encryption, all of these services are what we expect today in court -- timely, unaltered documents that all parties can rely on. But the problem remains that courts are overwhelmed with cumbersome quantities of paper. Electronic court filing is therefore still a desirable goal. Additionally, with modern computerization we will expect a degree of automation that allows for easy data entry, an elimination of redundant work that is labor intensive and error prone (such as entering case and party names again and again) and quick responses. We may even come to expect remote access of a case file, which will probably not be possible without allowing for documents to be submitted electronically.

The draft Illinois Electronic Commerce Security Act(13) has a useful set of definitions that subdivides electronic signatures into three main categories, which is relevant to a PKI. These are explained below and then applied to the electronic court filing scenario.

Sometimes this low level of security is acceptable, for example, for non-confidential documents sent between attorneys, simple notices sent by the court, or casual communications (so long as no one later repudiates the document).

When used to create a digital signature, it can also provide unverifiable authentication. The drawback to relying on PGP is that this public key-private key encryption system requires the recipient to trust that the public key it uses to verify a signed message is indeed from the person who sent the message. (This is because there is no in-person identity verification when the public/private key pair is issued). Without a third party to verify that the person who has been issued this particular key pair is the human attached to the name, a recipient can fall prey to "imposters" who appropriate others' email addresses and can create a public/private key pairs to be used in unorthodox ways. Another drawback to PGP is that it carries no date-time stamp, which is necessary in the legal world. In order to affix a time-date stamp and to verify that the sender is indeed the person who he says he is, a trusted time-keeper with a highly secure digital signature are needed.

The benefit of PenOps is that it is a low-cost, natural way to "sign" documents. On closer look, however, PenOps is unlikely to be useful in electronic court filing because of the inherent lack of verification. The first problem is that since people always change their signatures just a little bit each time they make them, it is unlikely that a 100% match will ever be made. Therefore, each comparison result of less than a 100% match is essentially a "maybe." A second problem is that PenOps is also not as good as a digital signature within a PKI because although it might link the signer to the document, there is no way to link the signer to the human without a trusted third party to verify identity. Potentially any person could have created (forged) the original signature.

PGP and PenOps offer some security, however this security is inferior because it lacks a trusted third party to verify the identity of the person holding the keys that signed the document, and it fails to provide a means for verifying that the signer on a digitizing pad is who he claims he is.

What is important for court filing is trusted authentication and non-repudiation, which can be accomplished using the other set of keys, the digital signing keys. These keys are used to append digital signatures to a document by running the encryption process "in reverse."

However, not all of these characteristics can be achieved without some sort of orderly and efficient structure to manage these services. The solution to the problem of how to develop electronic court filing that provides all of the characteristics lies in the establishment of a public key infrastructure.

In electronic court filing today, the objective is to authenticate an electronically "signed" document so that it will be accepted in court and so that it will be reliable, secure and authentic. A public key infrastructure offers a workable solution by providing a system for issuing certificates that attest to the identity of a sender and the authenticity of an electronic document.

This could mean limiting access to the main computer or installing sophisticated network security measures. Additionally, operating an in-house server also necessitates having personnel on hand who have in-depth knowledge of cryptography and security.

These scenarios illustrate the flexible nature of the parties and the roles they play in a PKI. For example, in the above example the role of certificate issuer could be performed by the company itself (it would be its own CA), or it could be performed by a third party, i.e., an outside CA. The next section examines what at Certification Authority is, or can be. The following sections describe the different services that it or other companies provide, and how they apply in electronic court filing.

Key generation refers to who actually creates the two key pairs - the digital signature pair and the encryption key pair. The issue of who generate the key pairs, and in particular the private keys, is hotly debated. Basically, key pairs (for digital signatures and/ or for encryption) can be generated in one of two ways: by the person himself or by someone else.

Given the fact that accidents happen, he might also choose to place his private key with an entity that provides key backup in case he loses his smart card, or his computer with the key on it gets stolen, or he becomes incapacitated and his company needs to access information he has encrypted.

Similarly, the second way to generate the key pair is for someone other than the user to generate them. This could be someone within the company or firm, or it could be an outside company. The advantage of using an outside company (outsourcing key generation) is that it will be less costly initially for a person or entity to begin to use digital certificate technology, and much simpler technologically. The disadvantage is that not only is the security link weakened because someone other than the user has created and issued the key, but potentially a third party, the key backup service provider, might also be in the picture, which creates additional liability risks.

This tension between needing to ensure that a key is used only by the person to whom it is issued, and the practical need to breach that security somewhat (by maintaining a back-up or letting someone else generate the keys) is an inevitable aspect of a PKI. Key issuance is therefore a crucial aspect of designing a PKI to fit a company's or entity's needs.

In the court filing scenario, key generation and issuance could be done either way, according to that attorney's or firm's needs. For example, a small firm might want to get its key pairs from an outside company in order to save itself administration duties and costs. A larger firm might, on the other hand, find it preferable and feasible to issue its own keys.

In that case the firm would have better control over who is issued keys; because of the quantity of keys they would issue it would probably be cost efficient for them as well. This service alone, however, is much less important than what is done with the keys, namely using them to issue certificates.

Another consideration for certificate issuance is cost. In general, setting up certificate issuance is costly and can be difficult technologically, but offers greater control to the entity. For example, Entrust's CommerceCA sells for $110,000 and includes 5,000 certificates, a LDAP directory (see next section) and proprietary management software. On the other hand, using an outside company will cost less and be less difficult technologically.

Issuing certificates that conform to a widely recognized format is important to allow many different users (subscribers or recipients) to find and verify certificates. Verisign describes the X.509 certificate format: "[It] provides for certificate extensions, including standard extensions and private or community-defined extensions.

Looking for and finding other subscribers' certificates will tell the recipient that the private key that was used to digitally sign that document does in fact belong to the holder of this certificate, which is mathematically linked to the public key associated with the certificate. In electronic court filing, attorneys will use the certificate repository to retrieve his own certificate (distribution) or to look up others' certificates to verify a document he has received. A court will use certificate repositories to verify documents it has received. There is however one more step to accepting that certificate. The person searching must be also assured that the certificate is valid for that time period. This information is kept on a certification revocation list (next section). Quite conceivably these two services could be provided on a single list.

A PKI must have a certification revocation list (CRL) which provides for automatically updating key pairs and certificates, and for looking up which certificates are valid and which are not. Usually the CRL will be maintained on a web site. The CRL can be maintained at the same site as the certificate repository, which would allow for digital signature verification and revocation/expiration information to be in one location.

When certificates are issued, they should always be issued for a finite length of time, requiring periodic renewal. Good software will allow for an automated process to renew valid certificates. Or, a certificate might even be issued for a one-time use. For example, a key pair might be issued to a person who is working temporarily at a different company or in a different state. Certificate revocation might be necessary when an employee leaves the company. Notification of this too must be posted on the web site. The CRL must also list suspended certificates when the subscriber is on leave or on vacation.

In the court scenario, an attorney will submit to the court a digitally signed document which bears his digital signature, produced with his private key. The court must then check the CRL to verify that the attorney's public key is valid. If the CRL also serves as the certificate repository, this one check will also prove to the court that the private-public key pair used to sign that document belongs to the named individual. This provides the most difficult to attain characteristic of trusted authentication.

Key backup and recovery is where the CA (or another entity) holds a copy of private (decryption) keys to allow someone to decrypt a document when that key has been lost, broken or corrupted. Destruction of a private key could occur, for instance, if the key was on a card and the card was lost or destroyed. There is no need to back up the private key of the encryption key pair because if a subscriber loses his ability to encrypt using that key, he should simply obtain a new encryption key pair.

Also remember the distinction between the two key pairs. There will never be a need to back up the key pair that is issued for creating digital signatures. In fact, to have a backup would weaken the essential characteristic of the PKI: binding a signing key to a person and holding that person responsible for it. If a user loses his signing key pair he must simply get a new key pair and use it from then on. The only key that needs to be backed up is the private key of the encryption/ decryption key pair.

In electronic court filing each subscriber will probably want and need to have a backup of his private decryption key. The tricky issue is who will hold the backups. The options here include having an outside CA provide this service or having them stored in-house. The advantage to having someone outside hold them is that they may have more sophisticated security measures, but this service might be costly to the user. Also, if security breaks down there, there are potential liability problems because the backup provider might be held liable for negative consequences of that breach. On the other hand, storing them in-house may cost less but then the subscriber must take steps to provide for safe-keeping. If the private key is on a smart card a simple solution might be for an individual subscriber to put the backup copy in his safety deposit box. This solution might not work for a company that needs to store thousands of private keys. The important thing is to realize that there are options when considering this important issue.

Another method to create a time-date stamp does away with the time and expense of publishing the hash value by relying on a CA to attest that a subscriber sent a hash value of a particular document. In this case the CA could automate the process by sending a digitally signed and dated certificate to the subscriber and/or to the intended recipient each time a subscriber sends it a hash value. The subscriber (sender) would then send the original to the intended recipient, maintaining confidentiality. To verify when the hash was created the recipient would then run the hash on the original document and compare it to the hash published by the CA. This would also provide document integrity and non-repudiation because the sender/subscriber could then never claim he did not send the document. This entire procedure can be automated to allow for ease of use for the recipient. However, this procedure will only work as long as the CA is trustworthy and there are no security breaches.

Digital Notary (software program) then hashes that (or those) documents together with all the other documents it has received up to that point in time. It creates this "superhash" each second of the day of all of the documents it has received up to that point in time. This superhash is published on web sites, on CD-ROM, and for a time, in the New York Times. Digital Notary also issues an authenticating certificate for the document; the document and the certificate are then stored on the subscriber's computer or elsewhere, either together or separately. When the subscriber needs to authenticate a time-date stamp Digital Notary will compare a newly created hash of the original document with that which is associated with the certificate. If there is a match then the document has not been changed, ensuring integrity. To verify the time and date Digital Notary then looks at the superhash corresponding to the time-date stamp as it appears on the certificate (the superhash that was created the second the subscriber's hash was first hashed by Digital Notary), and compares it to what has been published (on the Web, on CD-ROM or in newspaper). Thus Digital Notary provides the services of integrity, non-repudiation, time-date stamping and confidentiality (because Digital Notary never sees the original document). This service can be done by a CA or can be done independently of the CA.

In the court filing scenario, any of these procedures would work. However, since the arrival time of a document is what is important in court filing, it would be logical to have the time-date stamp applied when the document reaches the court's network server. This process could certainly be automated so that no personnel need be bothered with the procedure. Also, a receipt could also be automatically be sent to the filing attorney, giving him proof that he filed that document at that time. This proof would rarely be needed but might be needed if the court's server is compromised by fire, security breakdown or other problems. Another consideration for date-time stamping in electronic court filing is batch processing. For simplicity and cost considerations, it might be effective for all of the documents filed that day (or hour) to be time-date stamped at the same moment. This is certainly a technical issue but it might be useful to consider it when deciding what kind of date-time stamping service Georgia courts want.

The value of a PKI in Georgia electronic court filing will be tied to the ease of use for attorneys to encrypt their documents, to digitally sign and send documents, and to have them time-date stamped. Attorneys and courts will need well-written, easy-to-use "client-side software" to actually encrypt the documents and run the hash functions for digital signatures.

Once Georgia decides to establish a PKI for electronic court filing an important issue will be whether or not to use the same PKI structure for electronic court filing in the state and federal branches. This paper posits that the advantages of a common PKI structure for both court systems is desirable because it is efficient.

PKI. However, the companies assigned to perform each service do not need to be the same for each firm or court, but there needs to be a common overall structure and interoperability. There are several advantages to coordinating the state and federal courts' PKI.

Politically, a barrier will be some loss of autonomy for individual court systems, by county or at the federal level. For instance, one county may not wish to use the same CA than the other counties use. This could lead to a delay in implementation, training problems, higher expenses and a lack of consistency. In order to gain the advantages of a coordinated PKI, each county must be encouraged to adopt the same or a compatible CA. A second barrier is the potential loss of a large number of private (decryption) keys that might be stored at a central location. If a single CA holds the backups of all of the private keys, and that CA's security is breached, potentially all of the keys would be compromised and in need of reissuance.

On the other hand, if more than one entity holds key pairs then this problem is lessened because of the unlikelihood that all of those systems will be breached at the same time. A third barrier is that there may be a decrease in performance if one vendor does the entire job of key issuance, certificate issuance, repositories, CRLs, backup services and time-date stamping because a company without any competition may allow itself to raise prices over time without bettering service. It therefore might be desirable to choose one CA who will serve as the root CA, and choose other vendors to provide some or all of the other services. This would allow for some competition, which is likely to result in lower prices and some innovation at the user level.

Since the job of setting up a PKI to be used by attorneys and across the state is a difficult one, it seems more logical to work on one, efficient system that all can learn to use. A single PKI in all Georgia courts would simplify the process of making a smooth transition to the world of electronic court filing. It would be wise to have a knowledgeable group (or committee) survey the products available from Verisign, GTE Cybertrust and the like, and have them decide if it would be best for the state (practically and financially) to outsource the job of CA server. This group also needs to consider if it would be better to build its own server software and have a local group serve as certificate issuer (such as the state bar association).

Given the prevalence of electronic communications today it is practically inevitable that electronic court filing will be a part of attorneys' lives and courts' practices. Electronic commerce is already here today in the form of simple business by fax transactions and more complicated secure transactions involving money transfers. All of these technologies and the benefits they bring are relevant to electronic court filing. When electronic court filing becomes commonplace, attorneys and courts will spend less time managing their paperwork and more time on the substantive issues at hand. They will also get better security, easier access to court files (if remote access is allowed), fewer misplaced documents and hopefully faster service.

Of all of the current technologies, the use of digital signatures is the best way to ensure the trusted authentication, integrity, confidentiality, non-repudiation and time-date stamping of an electronically filed court document because all of these services can be automated and because all of these services are provided with exact full credibility. This system will not work, however, unless a trusted third party binds that digital signature to the person claiming to have sent the document. This is the role of the PKI: it will manage those certificates that prove to the recipient that the digital signature attached to that document belongs to a particular person.

Finally, since establishing Georgia's first PKI will be a big task, it would be logical to start off using one PKI system for all of the courts in Georgia, at the Federal level and in each county. This will lend some simplicity to a complex thing. A common PKI for all of Georgia's courts will cut down on the initial costs, training, certificate prices and certificate maintenance. These advantages will benefit attorneys and all of Georgia's courts.

Information Technology Policy Council, which has several powers and duties including: "(1) Provide strategic planning and direction for information technology deployment and development; and (2) Set information technology policy for the executive branch of state government including all state agencies, the board of regents, and all authorities."

"electronic signature" as "any identifier or authentication technique attached to or logically associated with an electronic record that is intended by the person using it to have the same force and effect as a manual signature."

This definition parallels what this paper defines as a "digital signature," although it is conceivable that "any...authentication technique" is broad enough to include biometrics verification technology. Text of Massachusetts Act available at <http://www.state.ma.us/itd/legal>.

There are many types of data encryption, and they are the basis of network security. Common types include Data Encryption Standard and public-key encryption." CertCo <http://certco.com/resource/glossary/glossary.htm>.

Despite [the government dropping its investigation] the investigation "sent a powerful message to those who would dare to challenge the government's regime of export control regulations." Edward J. Radlo, Legal Issues in Cryptography, The Computer Lawyer, May 1996, at 7.

Some writers use this term to refer to lower level CAs who perform some of the necessary services. The advantages of using a LRA for certificate issuance is that it can be less costly for an entity to use certificates because it has a lower start up costs and outsourcing requires less in-house expertise. These third-party CAs should have large storage vaults for storing and tracking certificates.

Rather than focusing on the traditional Internet issues, such as pornography, this law focused on fraud. The law criminalized the use of misleading names for email addresses, domain names, and hyperlinks on a Web page. The purpose of the law was to protect intellectual property, such as trademarks and logos, and to avoid fraudulent misrepresentation to consumers.

According to an April 17, 1996 editorial in the Augusta Chronicle, the law may stem from Democratic reaction to the Web page of Georgia Representative Mitchell Kaye, who was a Republican. Mr. Kaye used an official seal of the State of Georgia on his Home page. Opponents of Kaye argued that he intended to mislead readers into thinking that they had reached the official House Web page. In response to this, Representative Don Parsons (R-Marietta) introduced House Bill 1630. According to Mr. Parsons, he introduced the bill to "make the Net into a safer, or at least more legal, place for businesses and consumers." However, Representative Kaye believed that the bill was a product of Parson's ignorance about the Net and that the law's passage will taint Georgia's reputation among high-tech companies.

Web page publishers, and other businesses launched an all out attack on the Act. On September 24, 1997, this diverse coalition of fourteen plaintiffs filed suit in the Northern District of Georgia, seeking both injunctive and declaratory relief in a challenge to the new law.

They felt that the problem with the law was that it was entirely too restrictive. Scholars have claimed that courts could interpret the law to criminalize the use of any e-mail address that does not include the name of the mailbox owner, as well as the use of domain names and Web page hyperlinks for which permission was not obtained first by the owner of any included trademark, trade name, logo, legal or official seal, or copyrighted symbol.

They also argued that the law was too vague. Additionally, the group argued that the Act violated the Commerce Clause of the United States because it attempted to regulate interstate commerce occurring entirely outside the State of Georgia.

Although the plaintiff's achieved a victory in Georgia, other states are likely to attempt to pass similar statutes. After all, fraud, trademark infringement, and misrepresentation are damaging behaviors to consumers and states are not going to be any more tolerant in cyberspace than they are in real space.

In a landmark victory for advocates of free speech rights on the Internet, the Supreme Court struck down the Communications Decency Act in Reno v. ACLU in June 1997, finding that the Constitution's guarantees of freedom of speech and of the press apply to the Internet as well. In doing do, The Supreme Court granted the highest level of First Amendment protection to communications in cyberspace.

The Communications Decency Act was rejected by the Supreme Court because governmental regulation of the Internet was found to be inappropriate as it interferes with the free exchange of ideas. Two specific exceptions were made with respect to the drafting of the language of the Act; 1) "patently offensive" and "indecent" are overly broad; and 2) the penalties under the Act were criminal and not civil.

Given the Reno v. ACLU and ACLU v. Miller cases as a back drop, many states seem to believe that regulation of communications through the Internet is still possible. It appears that the vast majority of the state legislative activity is aimed at keeping obscene material away from minors. The following is a brief synopsis of, 1) Present State Laws governing Internet censorship, and 2) Pending State legislation.

Overturned in ACLU v. Miller, this case struck down on free speech grounds a Georgia state law that made it a crime 1) to communicate anonymously or using a pseudonym on the Internet; 2) to create links to Web sites that use tradenames, trademarks, or logos.

Bill 670, Requires the mandatory use of blocking software by all users on Internet terminals at state funded public libraries, school districts, and state and local educational institutions, colleges and universities.

Also, criminalizes the transmission of "indecent material" to minors and requires the use of a "mechanism such as labeling, segregation or other means that enables the indecent material to be automatically blocked or screened by software or other capability reasonably available".

Present Law: Senate Bill 210E, passed 7/96. Criminalized the transmission of "indecent" materials to minors. Overturned, ALA v. Pataki,. in a precedent setting opinion, the court struck down a New York State online "indecency" law because it violated the Commerce Clause of the Constitution, which prohibits states from regulating speech wholly outside their own borders and from imposing inconsistent state burdens on speakers.

Bill 2864, Makes it a felony to transmit by computer "any notice, statement, advertisement, or minor's name, telephone number, [or] place of residence . . . for the purpose of engaging, facilitating, encouraging, offering, or soliciting unlawful sexual conduct and/or any felony or misdemeanor."

Bill 3353, Requires the mandatory use of blocking software by all users on Internet terminals at public schools and libraries. Holds Internet service providers strictly liable for the dissemination of "obscene material, child pornography, or pornographic materials harmful to youth.". Also, it calls for the US Congress to create a domain code for adult sites to facilitate the management of the problem of uncontrolled access by minors.

Present Law: House Bill 7, enacted 3/96, Prohibits any government employee from using state owned computer systems to send or access sexually explicit material. Overturned, Urofsky v. Allen, this case struck down a Virginia law that forbade state employees -- including university professors -- from using state owned computers to access or transmit sexually explicit material.

Bill 348, Requires the mandatory use of blocking software by all users on Internet terminals at state funded libraries. Imposes criminal penalties for communicating online material at libraries that is "harmful to minors."

Given the legislative difficulties the Internet has caused throughout the United States, it will come as no surprise that the rest of the world is experiencing the same problems. From the issues of pornography and free speech to privacy and encryption, each country must try to devise a legislative strategy that will allow them to leverage the resources of the Internet without sacrificing the safety and rights of their citizens. These strategies must be devised under the watchful eyes of organizations such as the Electronic Frontiers Foundation and the Global Internet Liberty Campaign. Comprised of Internet users, the organizations attempt to police government regulation of the Internet in an attempt to insure that all people have access to the Internet and that their use is as restriction free as possible. The following is a summary of Internet related legislation and mandates occurring around the world today.

Some other types of regulated speech include: promoting gambling, violence, murder, sexually suggestive material, slander, rumor spreading, inciting hatred among nationalities, and defaming the government. These regulations are backed up by stiff penalties for those who are caught breaking them.

The diversity of issues caused by the rise in popularity of the Internet is highlighted by a recent announcement of the Videsh Sanchar Nigam Limited (VSNL), the overseas telecommunications arm of the Indian government. It found that people were using Internet telephony to make overseas calls at a much cheaper rate than direct dialing. Therefore, the VSNL announced that in the future, all long distance calls using Internet telephony would be automatically disconnected.

Like most countries, Ireland is concerned with child pornography. Towards this end, the Irish Minister of Justice has proposed the Child Trafficking and Pornography Bill. This bill would make it a crime to possess sexually explicit material involving children under 17 years of age. "Possession" for the purposes of the bill includes information stored on computer hard drives, diskettes, CDs...etc.

In an effort to keep pornography out of the cyber-cafes that cater primarily to teen-agers, the government has instituted a new policy requiring cafe owners to pay what amounts to about $5100 as a porn-free deposit. If the government finds that a cafe owner has allowed access to pornographic sites, the deposit will be confiscated. According to the Boston Globe article, the government has promised to raise the amount of the deposit if the problems persist.

Privacy is the latest victim of the Dutch government. Concern about the deregulation and privatization of the telecommunications industry has prompted the Dutch Parliament to propose and approve a new Telecommunication Act. Article 13.1 says, "Providers of public telecommunications networks and public telecommunications services shall not make their telecommunications networks and telecommunications services available to users unless they can be wiretapped." Article 13.6 goes on to say "The investment, exploitation and maintenance costs of the technical provisions which will be incurred by the providers of public telecommunications networks...shall be borne by the aforementioned providers," Essentially then, ISPs in the Netherlands will not only be required to use equipment that will allow the government to intercept any communication but they will also be required to pay for this equipment. A recent article in the New York Times provides more details of this incredible legislation.

The Philippines primary concern so far is blocking access to pornographic material. Towards that end, the Department of Justice recently sent a letter to the ISPs operating in the Philippines attempting to persuade them to block pornographic material voluntarily. It also solicited ideas for further means of filtering harmful content on the Internet.

The government is considering amendments that would redefine "mass media" to include information distributed via computer networks. In Russia, distributors of mass media must register with the government and obtain a license. The proposed license fee is $1,000. This means that anyone with a home Page on the Internet would have to register with the government as if they were a television broadcaster.

The Internet here is treated like any other medium and, along with books and movies, is severely censored by the government. A recent article in the on-line magazine Wired related the Singapore government's latest step in that direction. By the end of 1998, all ISPs will be required to install "filtering" software at the server level. The filtering software will be aimed at sites containing pornography, violence and racial or religious hatred.

It has disconnected several Internet IDs and deleted hundreds of sites without previous notice to the user. The actions are rooted in Articles 16 and 53 of the Telecommunications Business Law which defines "threatening telecommunications" as any that are "injurious to public morals or social order" and directs the Minister of Information and Communication to "reject, stop or restrict" such telecommunications.

Offering further evidence of South Korea's policy, the CNet news service reported that the government has totally blocked access to the GeoCities online community because of a page that espouses North Korean beliefs.

The government is considering a new law that would regulate speech and content on the Internet. Article 11 of the draft prohibits certain types of information from being disseminated on the Internet. Prohibited information includes pornography, political issues which impact the nation's security, inappropriate information concerning the Royal Family, support of gambling, immoral information, and information which is against the peacefulness of society.

A new plan for legislation of encryption was recently released in the UK. The plan calls for a method of "key recovery" that would allow law enforcement agencies to obtain decryption keys when they deem it necessary. As in the United States, any effort to dilute the security of personal privacy has been met with strong opposition. The GILC has issued a statement criticizing the new plan and urging the UK to reconsider its future legislation.

In order to operate in Vietnam, they must agree to inspections by Vietnam officials. In fact the language in the preliminary rules release by the Vietnam government says that online service providers must "absolutely obey the government's decision on mobilizing parts of or the entire network for its own use." The regulations contain provisions for the censorship of "information that is not appropriate to the culture, morality, and traditional customs of the Vietnamese people." Naturally, the government decides what information falls into that category.

Justice Department, along with a host of State Attorney General's, filed a broad antitrust action against Microsoft Corporation. This filing is the latest result of a investigation of Microsoft's business practices that stretch back into the early 1990's. This is certainly not the first legal scuffle between the Washington based software maker and the Justice Department but it is by far the most serious. Microsoft has responded by waging a carefully crafted public relations campaign against the government.

Is Microsoft attempting to confuse the issues in the public's mind through slick sound bites and patriotic appeals? How strong is the government's case and what specific relief is it seeking? To understand and answer these questions if is first necessary to past litigation between Microsoft and the Justice department from which this suit derives.

